Loading spaCy, this may take a moment.
The sheriff's initial estimate of as many as 25 dead in the Columbine High massacre was off the mark apparently because the six SWAT teams that swept the building counted some victims more than once.
Sheriff John Stone said Tuesday afternoon that there could be as many as 25 dead. By early Wednesday, his deputies said the death toll was 15, including the two gunmen.
The discrepancy occurred because the SWAT teams that picked their way past bombs and bodies in an effort to secure building covered overlapping areas, said sheriff's spokesman Steve Davis.
''There were so many different SWAT teams in there, we were constantly getting different counts,'' Davis said.
As they gave periodic updates through the night, Davis and Stone emphasized the death toll was unconfirmed. They said their priority was making sure the school was safe.
Students returned to classes Thursday at Chatfield High School, but the bloodbath at rival Columbine High haunted the halls. Jittery staff and students walked past armed guards and cried and hugged inside.
At one point, two bomb squad trucks sped to the school after a backpack scare. Dozens of students streamed out of the school hours early, unable to stand the tension any longer.
''It's like a prison in there,'' said Jessica Miller, 15.
''You can't even go to the bathroom without permission, and then they time you,'' said Holly Bernside, also 15. ''All the teachers are wearing nametags, and there is one at every door.''
The school's marquee proclaimed ''Rebels our thoughts are with you.'' Two days earlier, a massacre by two students at Columbine High, whose teams are called the Rebels, left 15 people dead and dozens wounded. Columbine is about three miles away.
Armed deputies stood guard at the only entrance and students needed their parents' permission to leave.
Students leaving the school said the intense security inside scared them.
''It's very uncomfortable in there. There are a lot of people crying,'' said Tyler Herbert, 16, a sophomore.
Rumors quickly spread, these days fueled on the Internet as well as by phone, that ''Chatfield would be next,'' said Ms. Miller, a sophomore. Parents drove up and asked a reporter if it was true that a student was barricaded inside a classroom. It wasn't.
Students were forbidden to leave their backpacks lying around. Some of the bombs used in the assault at Columbine were planted in knapsacks.
The principal came onto Chatfield's public address system and urged students to wear ''more moderate clothes both in school and when you go out,'' Ms. Bernside said. The killers at Columbine wore black trench coats.
The arrival of two bomb squad trucks with sirens blaring further shook those inside. The bomb squad was called because a backpack had been found unattended in a hallway. It contained books.
A pizza delivery followed. The school wanted to make sure there was enough to eat since students couldn't leave campus for lunch and get back in.
Diane Hitchingham of the Jefferson County school system said schools were getting phony bomb threats. School officials kept reporters out of Chatfield and other Jefferson County schools.
Ms. Bernside, a sophomore, said all the efforts to counsel students and banners in the school lamenting the deaths made things worse.
Joe Murphy, a 16-year-old sophomore, said that anyone with a free hour was required to go to the school's commons.
Herbert interjected: ''I'm a little worried about putting all the kids in one place. If someone wanted to come and start shooting again it would be real easy for them.''
A couple of hours after Chatfield opened, Nancy Hoag decided to pull her daughter, Melissa, 15, out. ''I was a little nervous about her going back and it is scary in there,'' she said, her voice choking.
''We have friends whose children go to Columbine,'' Mrs. Hoag said. ''They were lucky, but why do you have to be lucky?''
Herbert said he had to leave because ''I needed a smoke. I went three hours without one.''
Barbara Monsu, who oversees the county's high schools, said more students than expected had come to class. Chatfield has 1,870 students. She said the school was allowing students to stay home.
''But the kids want to be here,'' she said. ''They need to be here.''
Republican presidential candidate Pat Buchanan says stricter gun laws could not have prevented the deadly school shootings in Littleton, Colo.
''The question is who has the weapons, the good people or those who are ugly and warped,'' he said. ''The problem began long before they walked into school.''
Fifteen people, including the two killers, died Tuesday in a shooting and bombing spree at Columbine High School.
''The massacre is a tragic reflection of the dark side of American society,'' Buchanan told reporters Wednesday. ''At Littleton, America got a glimpse of the last stop on that train to hell America boarded decades ago when we declared that God is dead and that each of us is his or her own god who can make up the rules as we go along.''
The New York Times plans two pages of stories, photos and graphics on the aftermath of the school shooting in a Denver suburb that left 15 dead.
COLO-SCHOOL-SHOOTING (Littleton, Colo.) _ The governor of Colorado tours Columbine High School and says investigators are all but certain that the two gunmen had help from others; the police say security cameras may provide crucial evidence of a conspiracy. The 911 tapes are released. By Sam Howe Verhovek.

COLO-SCHOOL-WEB (Littleton, Colo.) _ A look at the World Wide Web as a home for lonely outcasts and talking to kids who find solace there. By Amy Harmon.
COLO-SCHOOL-SENIORS (Littleton, Colo.) _ A look at the situation of seniors and others at a now-closed Columbine High. By Sara Rimer.

COLO-SCHOOL-RELIGION (Undated) _ Pastors in Jonesboro, Ark., scene of an earlier school shooting, reach out to those in Littleton, Colo. By Gustav Niebuhr.
COLO-SCHOOL-THREATS (Undated) _ A wave of copycat threats of violence prompted by the Tuesday massacre at Columbine High School in Littleton, Colo., prompted school and law-enforcement officials across the country to respond quickly to any new sign of trouble, even if the threats were pranks brought on by a dose of youthful spring fever. By John T. McQuiston.
This story, budgeted earlier, is now scratched:
COLO-SCHOOL-AID, The Times is using wire services.

The day supervisor is Gary McCardell.
The evening supervisor is Lynn Hoogenboom.
The late-night supervisor is Henry Louis Warnken.






Lynda Pasma and Kerry Herurlin stopped halfway down Mt. Columbine on Saturday morning to pray.
The women, both mothers of two young children, bowed their heads, closed their eyes and whispered, ''Oh, God please bless the families who lost children,'' and they began to cry. ''Please comfort them and be with them,
and comfort the people of this town. Please comfort this town.''
Littleton needs comfort.
Tuesday morning 12 Columbine High School students and a teacher were murdered when Eric Harris and Dylan Klebold, also Columbine students, opened fire with at least four guns and dozens of bombs. The gunmen died in the massacre as well, apparently from self-inflicted gunshot wounds.
Littleton needs comfort.
Many looked for it Saturday morning on top of Mt. Columbine, a hill in Clement Park that borders the high school's baseball fields. The first few visitors climbed over slushy snow that melted quickly as the sun finally made an appearance after three days of snow.
As the day progressed, the snow became thick mud and as many as 100 visitors at a time came to the top of the hill to look at the rough wood cross that had been staked into the ground there. They bent to leave flowers, poems, balloons and other mementos of grief at the base of the cross, then stood to gaze at the familiar town that seemed to look different after such a loss.
Most of Littleton is visible from the top of Mt. Columbine _ the rows of roofs, the sidewalks, the strip malls and trash cans, the basketball backstops above garage doors. Physically, it's the same town it was Monday.
But 15 of its own are gone, and the loss resonates deeply and profoundly.
Many wonder what to do now. How do people experiencing grief and anger and confusion and intense sadness navigate the unfamiliar paths to peace?
''I don't know,'' said Debbie Ellwanger, a 10-year Littleton resident. ''Nobody knows where to go from here. I think we have to learn from this and not let those kids die in vain.''
She and her husband, Larry, trekked through the dirty snow up Mt. Columbine on Saturday, fingers laced together as they cried for the children.
''They shouldn't have died,'' Larry Ellwanger said. His wife nodded: No, they shouldn't have died.
So they came to the wood cross on top of Mt. Columbine to try making sense of something that never will. Below the hill, in the middle of the baseball field, someone had built 13 small snowmen in an even circle. Some cannot forgive Klebold and Harris, and possibly never will.
On top of Mt. Columbine, though, people thought more about healing and pulling together and getting through.
''All we can do is come together,'' said Carrie Goertz, 16. ''It's just something that all the barriers have been broken and people have to accept and take care of each other. There's always going to be differences between
people, but we've got to look past that, the exterior stuff, and just be together, be unified.''
''And we've got to take advantage of our time with our family and friends,'' Aimee Jensen, 18, added quietly.
The tragedy at Columbine has brought unity that for now is unbreakable _ it has reached around the world and drawn in the thoughts and prayers of people far removed from suburban Colorado. The memorials in Clement Park testify to the depth of grief that those who didn't lose loved ones in the massacre feel.
They bring cards and flowers, donate food and building materials, thinking about how impossibly sad it is when people _ particularly children _ die without reason, about what they would have done if it had happened to someone they love, about the people suffering most.
One card written by a boy named Mark hung on a larger memorial sign and said: ''Dear Columbine, I hope you feel better.''
The tragedy has forced huge issues to an overburdened spotlight: guns, youth violence, school safety, cliques and disaffected youth, community togetherness, peace.
Hopefully they are issues that will not be forgotten when time passes. But for now, for the next several weeks, people seem able only to get through the worst of it, to handle the realization that some people are not coming
back and that yes, things like this do happen here.
And that somehow, life keeps moving.
''That's the strange things,'' said Aaron Burningham, 27, looking out across Littleton from the top of Mt. Columbine. ''It seems like life should stop, but it doesn't.''


They streamed in from all over -- hand-lettered signs and cards and bouquets by the hundreds, aimed at comforting a town torn asunder. One good wish, soaked by the morning rain, was signed, simply, ''Your community.''
But what community was it from? So many forms of community, rippling outward from Columbine High and across the planet, have come together since last week's violence that it was difficult to tell.
In an age when so many Americans regularly lament the breakdown of community, the many communities that the Columbine massacre has produced are proving that the notion, at least in time of crisis, still thrives.
''Jefferson County has 500,000 residents, but today our community is much larger,'' county commissioner Patricia Holloway said Sunday at a shopping-center parking lot service attended by 70,000 people -- a hastily stitched-together community unto itself.
There are the communities that existed already, like Columbine students and Columbine Valley residents. There are myriad mini-communities created by the bloodshed: Denver-area students, their rivalries suddenly rendered irrelevant; emergency personnel, united in their harrowing experiences; towns like Jonesboro and Paducah and Springfield and Edinboro, who understand Columbine's anguish but never asked to be members of this kind of community.
The list continues onward, outward -- beyond metropolitan Denver, past President Clinton and his prayers, as far as the president of the West African nation of Ghana, who counted himself among the community of Littleton mourners and said ''something must be done to stop this thing.''
The response is most visible in metropolitan Denver, radiating outward from the high school and adjacent Clement Park, which has become a mourner's Lourdes.
Fast-food restaurants are flying flags at half-staff and posting sympathy signs. Businesses are contributing goods and raising funds. Denver's newscasters have donned blue Columbine ribbons. Big-league sports teams canceled games in deference; Mile High Stadium now sports a giant Columbine ribbon visible from Interstate 25. Hugs have become a greeting of choice -- even, sometimes, between strangers.
''We get so busy in our everyday lives and we're so self-sufficient that we think we don't need the help of our community,'' said Marny Danneberg, a volunteer dispensing hot drinks and food from a Red Cross truck near the high school since Tuesday.
''It's when something like this happens that we realize the community's there for us,'' she said Sunday.
After the shootings, messages and contributions of support came in from across the nation, from towns and individuals that repeatedly reassured mourners that they were ''part of a larger community.''
Folks from Elgin, Ill., drove a giant banner of support into town. Kids by the busload came from towns across the West to share grief. In Seaside Heights, N.J., 1,800 miles away, Mayor P. Kenneth Kershey scheduled a candlelight vigil on an Atlantic Ocean beach as ''a clear demonstration of the nationwide caring for the people of Littleton.''
What unifies regions this way? A national culture, for one -- the very mass media that many blame for fomenting the violence. Instantaneous news delivery unites people in shock and grief, creating a virtual community of TV viewers and another of Internet users that didn't exist 40 years ago. Thus, people who don't know each other can mourn together.
''The entire nation is a community of shock, of love and of grief,'' Vice President Al Gore said Sunday. ''One of the hidden truths of the human condition is that suffering binds us together.''
In Littleton (literally ''Little Town''), an affluent town of 35,000 at the foot of the Rockies, the fresh bonding of its existing communities and the birth of so many new ones are serving as salves for recuperation.
Residents say the area around Columbine in the Southern Platte River Valley has been a tight-knit community for 26 years, since the high school opened on an undeveloped patch of prairie and houses sprouted up around it. This was long before the retail sprawl unfurled from the north to connect Columbine to Denver and make the area a suburb.
''A community formed around that high school, and the school grew as the community grew,'' said Gerry Difford, who opened Columbine in 1973 and was principal for its first two years. ''It has a sound community base to it that's somewhat unusual for a suburban high school.''
Today, though a few patches of open prairie remain, houses continue to sprout. And the families that have streamed into Denver's suburbs in recent years have, some say, created a populace unfamiliar with its neighbors -- one hungry for the coming-together that the Columbine deaths caused.
''Disaster brings out the best of us, not the worst. People may not know each other, but when disaster hits that doesn't matter. We knock on the neighbor's door and talk about it,'' says Robert R. Butterworth, a psychologist who studies both child trauma and how people cope with public tragedy. ''That sense of reaching out makes us feel better.''
That reaching out resonates nationally and globally as people sew together crisis bonds that wouldn't otherwise exist.
Now, as the event recedes and coping begins, some are hoping that perhaps, this time, the unity allegedly caused by two angry boys' violent acts can last.
''If they would have known the revival they have started, they never would have done what they did,'' said Phyllis Cain, whose daughter, Mickey, attends Columbine. ''They wanted death and destruction. Instead, we've all come together.''
Comforting each other with ceremony and song, Columbine High School's mourners turned a strip-mall parking lot into an arena of grief and promised each other they would reach past their pain.
Vice President Al Gore brought the 70,000 heartbroken people a message Sunday: ''You are not alone.''
Investigators, spending the day at the memorial service, were to resume their work this morning, conducting more interviews and eyeing the possibility of additional suspects in Tuesday's massacre.
Of the 12 students slain, three were to be laid to rest today. A funeral also was scheduled for Dave Sanders, a popular teacher hailed as a hero for shepherding students to safety during the attack.
Sunday's outdoor ceremony was a mass catharsis at the foot of the snow-capped Rockies. People hugged and wept as a parade of students, singers and public officials tried to make sense of the week's events. Many wore Columbine clothing; everything in sight -- even portable toilets -- was festooned with blue Columbine memorial ribbons.
''Behind you, scarred but still standing, is Columbine High School,'' Gov. Bill Owens said. ''One thing is clear: This community will not be beaten.''
Christian singer Amy Grant began a tribute song to the victims with a gentle lament: ''So much pain and no reason why.'' Bagpipe players played ''Amazing Grace'' and four F-16 jets flew over in a ''missing-man'' formation after 13 doves were released -- one for each victim.
Brothers Jonathan and Stephen Cohen sang a tribute they wrote. Jonathan Cohen, a junior, was trapped in the Columbine choir room when gunfire erupted. Stephen, a senior, was in the cafeteria where many students were shot or hit by shrapnel from pipe bombs.
''Can you still hear raging guns ending dreams of precious ones?'' they sang. ''In God's son, hope will come, his red stain will take our pain.''
Columbine Principal Frank DeAngelis called the gathering ''the end of a nightmare.'' Religious leaders urged trust in God. And Gore, thundering like a preacher at a revival, underscored that bloodshed like that allegedly caused by Dylan Klebold and Eric Harris must remain an aberration.
''The young killers of Columbine High School do not stand for the spirit of America,'' Gore said. ''America is a good and decent place, and our goodness is a light to all the nations of the world.''
The pair, enraged by what they considered taunts and insults from classmates, allegedly rampaged through their school with guns and bombs before turning their weapons on themselves. Investigators, amazed at the sheer firepower, are trying to determine if others were involved.
Police have found a diary plotting the mayhem in precise detail, as well as bomb-making materials and weapons in one of the pair's bedroom. More interviews were set for this week; more than 500 have already been conducted.
Deputies suspended their investigation and media briefings for the day, concentrating on directing traffic for the shopping-center ceremony.
At times, the service took on the flavor of a somber pep rally. Senior Amber Burgess, after eulogizing Sanders, urged the crowd to persevere and invoked school spirit.
''We are!'' she yelled.
''Columbine!'' thousands replied.
Then the proceedings moved en masse to Clement Park, adjacent to Columbine and -- as long as the school remains cordoned off -- the mourning place of choice and site of a vast makeshift memorial. Hundreds lined the procession route.
''I always knew this school was very strong and this is a good community, and all the kids love each other. But to see the kids and the community come together was just amazing,'' said Scott Rathbun, a senior.
Nick Foss, 18, grazed by a bullet while helping teachers and students hide in a closet and overhead air ducts, limped behind Gore and was supported by DeAngelis. Mourners applauded as they passed, and Littleton firefighters walked beside Foss, patting him on the back.
''God Bless you guys!'' a man shouted. ''You've got a reason to live.''
On Sunday evening, some 1,300 friends and family gathered at a church to remember Daniel Mauser, 15, and Kelly Fleming, 16.
He was a cross-country runner who had recently returned from a two-week trip to Paris with the French club; she was an aspiring songwriter and author eager to get her driver's license. The victims' families held the dual funeral because they belong to neighboring churches of the same Roman Catholic archdiocese.
Jefferson County school officials said Columbine's 1,800 students would return to classes Thursday a few miles south at Chatfield High School, a school originally built to accommodate Columbine's overflow.
Columbine's graduation ceremony will be held May 22 at Fiddler's Green, a suburban amphitheater normally used for rock concerts -- one baby step toward normalcy -- and in defiance of the gunmen.
''They wanted death and destruction. Instead, we've all come together,'' said Phyllis Cain, whose daughter, Mickey, attends Columbine. ''They can't kill the message. They can't kill the hope.''
Vice President Al Gore on Sunday bid farewell to Columbine High School's dead, issuing a ringing challenge to parents and schools before a crowd of 70,000.
''All of us must change our lives to honor these children,'' said Gore, in a forceful speech filled with religious references less than a mile from the site of the worst school killing in U.S. history.
The gathering, held in a movie theater parking lot under threatening skies, commemorated 12 students and one teacher killed Tuesday when two gunmen burst into the Jefferson County school wielding guns and bombs. Authorities believe Columbine students Eric Harris and Dylan Klebold carried out the massacre and then killed themselves.
Gov. Bill Owens acted as master of ceremonies during the 75-minute memorial service that included speeches from Archbishop Charles Chaput, and Franklin Graham, the son of evangelist Billy Graham. Singers Amy Grant and Michael Smith joined a large bagpipe band in providing music for the crowd, joining two Columbine students who wrote a song in honor of their fallen classmates.
In the crowd were people who had driven hundreds of miles to pay their respects. ''It's something that can help us personally by coming and seeing and sharing the hurt and the pain. It's just something that struck my heart,'' said Tim Weitzel, who with his wife, Donna, drove from Grand Junction to attend the service.
Owens extended his sympathy to the families of the slain and wounded, some of whom gathered in front of the crowd, while the archbishop told them that ''love is stronger than death.''
''Confronted with an unimaginable evil, this community has grown closer,'' Owens said.
The nation and the world have joined in grieving for the students of Columbine, Gore said. He asked the crowd ''to feel the embrace of hundreds of millions.''
''One of the hidden truths of the human condition is that suffering binds us together,'' Gore said. ''Here in Jefferson County, the spring has yielded to the cold winter of the heart.''
Gore asked that the shootings serve as a wake-up call for parents and schools. Decrying the violence and cruelty of pop culture, Gore said parents must cushion their children against hate.
''If you are a parent, your children need your attention,'' Gore said. ''If you are a grandparent, they need your time.''
It's too easy for children to get guns, and schools must focus on discipline in teaching character, he added.
In his only comment that addressed the killers, Gore called for forgiveness.
''We must have the courage not to look away, either in life or in death, from those who feel despised or hated,'' he said.
Harris and Klebold, who authorities say planned the massacre for more than a year, have been portrayed by classmates as outcasts from the popular students at Columbine.
The suspects were not mentioned by name during the service, although Chaput also asked they be forgiven.
Graham praised the Columbine community for uniting under the pain of a tragedy that could have torn it apart. He seized the opportunity to chastise public schools for being empty of ''the teachings of God.''
''They are indeed dangerous places,'' Graham said.
Owens closed the memorial by reciting the names of the 12 students and one teacher killed and releasing a white dove for each, as many in the crowd wept and light rain fell.
It was a message of hope that was repeated throughout the day.
''Love is stronger than death _ I believe that,'' Chaput said. ''Love is stronger than death.''


The day that Columbine High School students are to return to class has been delayed because so many have been attending funerals for students killed in the April 20 massacre, an administrator said Tuesday.
The students are scheduled to begin classes Monday at another school a few miles away in afternoon sessions until the end of the year, said Barbara Monseu, area administrator for the Jefferson County School District.
Students were originally scheduled to go back Thursday.
Calling the return to the classroom ''a very important next step in the process of healing,'' Monseu said the first thing Columbine students will do when they arrive at Chatfield High School is attend an assembly to reunite them with their teachers.
''The teachers are very anxious to see their students again,'' she said.
Columbine and Chatfield are sports rivals, but junior John Danos said he welcomed the newcomers.
''I'm fine with it,'' he said. ''We're going to treat them normal.''
To accommodate the 1,965 Columbine students, the school day is being split with Chatfield students beginning early in the day and Columbine students showing up shortly before 1 p.m.
To prepare for the resumption of classes, some of Columbine's 158 teachers met Tuesday morning for the first time since two student gunmen fatally shot 12 fellow students and a teacher before taking their own lives.
Columbine High School junior Matt Wells took time out from the grieving world around him to crack a smile, chew on a wad of sunflower seeds and talk a little baseball.
''It's just good to be smiling and laughing,'' he said.
Wells, a 16-year-old catcher on Columbine's varsity baseball team, watched the junior varsity play Arvada West High School on Wednesday. There were cheers and grins here, eight days after teen-age gunmen walked the halls of their school and killed 12 students and a teacher before killing themselves.
Among other things, the gunmen had complained about their treatment at the hands of athletes at Columbine. When they burst into the library on April 20, one of the gunmen yelled: ''All jocks stand up! We're going to kill every one of you.''
Since the massacre, the suburban school has become a sealed crime scene. Hundreds of backpacks and other personal belongings abandoned in the crisis still litter the hallways and classrooms. School athletic equipment is also trapped, probably for the rest of the school year.
But thanks to an outpouring of donations and support from the community and the sports world, Columbine's baseball team has uniforms, gloves, balls and everything they need to get back on the field.
Without the equipment and clothing donations, the Columbine Rebels would have been forced to end their season, Wells said.
''We wouldn't have played,'' he said. ''We wouldn't have been able to.''
The baseball team has received an estimated $5,000 worth of clothing and gear from Reebok, Mizuno, Denver Athletic Supply and other sports companies. The gifts include dozens of bats, stark navy blue uniforms, never-used leather gloves, even socks.
''They're taking care of us,'' coach Robin Ortiz said. ''I hate to say it, but it's been like Christmas at times.''
Team members decided they wanted to play out the rest of the season.
''For a lot of them, it's a chance to start healing,'' he said.
Some players also had the chance to realize a dream. The Colorado Rockies opened their doors to Columbine players Monday, allowing the team to work out in their hitting cages and tour Coors Field.
The Rockies worked with the Denver Police Activities League to help coordinate the donations and support. League director Nick Arcuri said he hopes the efforts show the teens they are not alone.
''I was around these kids at practice the other night and some of them are afraid to smile,'' he said. ''They need to know that people out there care.''
The community outpouring has touched some Columbine students. Katie Crona, a junior varsity soccer player with the Rebels, said her team received new uniforms from Adidas and assistance from rival Arapahoe High School.
''They've been so wonderful to us,'' the 14-year-old freshman said. ''It's so nice to know they care.''
Some players said the donations and support will encourage them to play better. But Wells said he is more interested in simply trying to have fun and move beyond the tragedy that put his life on hold.
''It's like getting back to normal life,'' he said.
The parents of Amadou Diallo plan to meet with the Bronx district attorney on Wednesday to receive a preview of the criminal charges that the grand jury voted to bring against the four New York City police officers who killed their son seven weeks ago.
Diallo's father, Saikou Amad Diallo, arrived here Wednesday from the West African nation of Guinea and said he was anxious to see the officers not only charged, but brought to trial. ''We are waiting for this, for justice,'' he said, ''and we feel strong.''
The mother, Kadiadou Diallo, and two of her children, are expected to arrive at Newark International Airport from Guinea on Thursday morning. She had been expected Tuesday, but had to cancel her flight because the U.S. Embassy in the Guinean capital of Conakry was unexpectedly closed Monday and she was not able to pick up her visas.
The parents, who are divorced, were last in New York in early February, when they came to collect their son's body for burial in Guinea and found that his death had set off a storm of political protest that has yet to abate.
Diallo, a 22-year-old immigrant who worked as a street peddler in Manhattan and attended computer classes, was shot in the vestibule of his Bronx apartment building Feb. 4. He was unarmed. The four officers fired 41 shots, hitting Diallo 19 times.
Bronx District Attorney Robert Johnson plans to meet with the Diallos shortly before 2 p.m., when the grand jury indictments are scheduled to be unsealed in open court. Johnson has refused to confirm reports, based on people familiar with the case, that the officers will be charged with second-degree murder.
The Rev. Al Sharpton, who organized the daily protests over the Diallo shooting and is an adviser to the family, also is expected to attend the meeting, said Steven Reed, Johnson's spokesman. Sharpton's National Action Network in Harlem has helped finance the Diallo family's trips to and from New York City.
A lawyer representing one of the officers in the shooting, Stuart London, has criticized the delays in unsealing the indictments against the officers, particularly since the grand jury voted on the charges last Thursday. Asked if the timing of the arraignment was scheduled to accommodate the Diallo family's travel plans, Reed said he would not comment.
It is not unusual for a prosecutor to brief a victim's family on criminal charges, he added, even in cases far less publicized than the Diallo case. ''It is the district attorney's practice to have families of the deceased hear about grand jury results in advance,'' he said.
During their stay in New York City, Diallo's parents will have a packed schedule of meetings and rallies, organized by Sharpton, that will keep them in the spotlight. When they came in February, shortly after their son's killing, they attained near-celebrity status _ trailed by television cameras, greeted by crowds and transported from place to place by motorcade.
Friday, both parents are expected to meet with many of the people who were arrested for civil disobedience during protests at Police Headquarters over the last several weeks.
Charles Barron, an organizer of the protests, said the Diallos would speak at rallies organized around other high-profile cases in which the police are accused of brutality against young black men.
He said they would be taken to U.S. District Court in Brooklyn, for example, where a jury is being selected to hear the case against police officers charged with brutalizing a Haitian immigrant, Abner Louima.
The parents, according to Sharpton, will stay in New York City for about 10 days.
Mayor Rudolph Giuliani also plans to be in the Bronx on Wednesday. The mayor is scheduled to rename the block in front of the 50th Precinct station house, on Kingsbridge Avenue at West 236th Street. The block will named for Officer Vincent Guidice, who died in May 1996 after he fell on the shards of a broken mirror while responding to a domestic dispute.
Outside Bronx Supreme Court on Tuesday, about 400 off-duty police officers chanting ''No Justice, No Police'' and ''Its a Tragedy, Not a Crime'' rallied to show support for the four police officers before their expected arraignment.
Some of the police officers who shot and killed Amadou Diallo have told associates that their attention was initially drawn to Diallo when they saw him standing on the stoop of a Bronx apartment building and thought they saw him peering into the window of a first-floor apartment, according to people with knowledge of the case.
Those officers told associates that they grew more suspicious when two of them got out of their car to question him and he retreated into the vestibule of the building, the people knowledgeable about the case said on Tuesday.
The four officers, who are scheduled to be arraigned on criminal charges in state Supreme Court in the Bronx on Wednesday, did not testify about the shooting before the grand jury that heard their case. Diallo, an unarmed man with no criminal history, was killed on Feb. 4 when the four officers fired 41 shots at him, 19 of which hit him.
The shooting led to 15 days of protests outside Police Headquarters and reignited the gnawing debate about police in New York City. During the outcry the officers, their lawyers and law-enforcement officials have remained silent about what set off the shooting.
But several officers are said to have told associates that the chain of events that led to the fatal shooting of Diallo began when the officers first spotted him and thought that they saw him looking into the window.
The four officers _ Edward McMellon, Sean Carroll, Kenneth Boss and Richard Murphy, all in plain clothes _ were driving along Wheeler Avenue in the Soundview section of the Bronx at 12:40 a.m. when they first spotted Diallo pacing on the stoop of No. 1157. The officers did not know it, but it was the building where he lived.
McMellon and Carroll got out of their maroon Ford Taurus and approached Diallo on the stoop. McMellon stood to the left and Carroll to the right as they mounted the steps.
What happened next is sure to be the subject of much debate at the future criminal trial of the four officers. The four police officers have yet to officially explain their actions. But several officers told associates that after the officers identified themselves and asked to talk to Diallo, he retreated into the building's vestibule and appeared to be trying to reach the inner door, the people with knowledge of the case said.
Diallo remained silent during the whole encounter, they said.
According to this account, several officers told associates that while Diallo was in the vestibule, he made a move that led them to believe he was armed: he turned to his right, reached into his pocket and pulled something out. It turned out later to be his black wallet.
At that point, Carroll yelled, ''Gun!'' the people knowledgeable about the case said.
Some of the details were first reported Tuesday in The New York Post.
It was unclear from Tuesday's accounts who fired the first shot.
As the first gunshots rang out, McMellon fell backwards down the steps and injured his tailbone, causing at least some of his colleagues to believe that he had been hit by return fire, people knowledgeable about the case said. Carroll moved to his right and continued firing, and Murphy and Boss, who were closer to the car, began firing as well, they said.
Several of the officers are said to have told associates that they continued firing because Diallo did not fall even after they had unleashed the fusillade. When the officers saw afterward that Diallo was unarmed, the people knowledgeable about the case said, at least one of the officers wept.
Four white police officers were charged with murder Wednesday for killing an unarmed African immigrant in a hail of 41 bullets -- a shooting that has led to months of protests and a painful examination of police tactics and race relations.
Officers Kenneth Boss, Sean Carroll, Edward McMellon and Richard Murphy pleaded innocent in a Bronx courtroom to second-degree murder. They could get 25 years to life in prison on the murder charges.
Amadou Diallo, a 22-year-old street vendor from Guinea with no criminal record, was shot 19 times Feb. 4 in his vestibule by members of an elite street-crime unit looking for a rape suspect. Through their lawyers, the officers have said they thought Diallo had a gun.
The slaying has frayed Mayor Rudolph Giuliani's already strained relationship with the black community, and many have accused him of failing to understand the depth of New Yorkers' anger.
Giuliani said Wednesday: ''We should allow the criminal justice system to now operate.''
Judge John P. Collins set bail at $100,000 for each officer, even though District Attorney Robert Johnson had asked that they be held without bail. The officers left the courthouse together shortly after the arraignment.
Johnson told the judge: ''On Feb. 4 in the vestibule in his own building, Amadou Diallo stood blameless, unarmed and defenseless when 19 of 41 shots were fired at him, struck him and killed him. ... These four defendants intended to take his life.''
After leaving court, one of the officers, Carroll, shook hands with supporters and said in a quivering voice, ''I want to thank the New York City police officers and the Street Crime Unit for their undaunted support.''
The officers were immediately suspended from their jobs.
Marvyn Kornberg, Carroll's lawyer, called the intentional murder count ''ludicrous.''
''What's the district attorney saying? That they had nothing to do that night but roll up on an individual and attempt to kill him because he's black?'' the lawyer asked.
Steven Brounstein, Boss's attorney, said in court that Johnson had ''succumbed to a political agenda. My client is innocent of all charges. There was no crime on February 4.''
In the two months since Diallo was killed, 1,203 people have been arrested in demonstrations over Diallo's death, the alleged police torture of Haitian immigrant Abner Louima in 1997 and the perception that law-abiding minorities are routinely humiliated by police stop-and-search tactics.
Off-duty police officers and more than 25 of Diallo's friends and relatives packed the small courtroom for the 45-minute arraignment. About 1,000 demonstrators stood outside the courthouse.
Since the slaying, the street-crime unit has been ordered to wear uniforms instead of plainclothes, and 50 slots at the predominantly white division will be reassigned to minority police officers.
The case also reflects tension over police attitudes and tactics nationally. Earlier this month, President Clinton said he was worried that recent charges of police misconduct could undermine the fight against crime.
The officers in the Diallo case did not testify before the grand jury.
Brounstein and Culleton both said their clients began firing because they saw one officer on the ground. McMellon supposedly slipped and fell as he and the other officers confronted Diallo.
James Culleton, Murphy's lawyer, said his client ''had a sick feeling inside of him, believing that he was going to be shot, and he reacted.''
Earlier Wednesday, Giuliani and Police Commissioner Howard Safir attended a tribute to a police officer killed in the line of duty in 1996. Safir called Diallo's death a tragedy but urged critics of the Police Department to ''acknowledge the tragedies that befall our family.''
''We grieve for Amadou Diallo and the four officers involved and pray they get a fair trial,'' Safir said.
The Rev. Al Sharpton stepped to the microphone outside the Bronx County Couthouse and bellowed: ''The police in there have just been charged with murder in the second degree,'' and the crowd of hundreds whooped and cheered.
It was the first time ever that a New York City police officer has been indicted for murder, according to prosecutors and police spokesmen, though a few have faced manslaughter charges.
The three-count indictment _ two for second-degree murder, one for reckless endangerment _ applied to all four of the white officers who fired 41 bullets at African immigrant Amadou Diallo in the wee hours of Feb. 4, as he stood, unarmed, in the vestibule of his Bronx apartment building.
The officers _ Kenneth Boss, Sean Carroll, Edward McMellon, and Richard Murphy _ pleaded not guilty to the charges.
State Supreme Court Judge John P. Collins set bail at $100,000 for each officer, which was expected to be met.
Police commissioner Howard Safir suspended the officers from the force immediately after announcement of the indictment, which was returned by a grand jury last week but officially unsealed just Wednesday.
What happens next could intensify, rather than quell, the racial tensions that have been simmering in the two months since the shooting.
Wednesday's indictment coincided with the start of jury selection in the trial of the five officers in Brooklyn who were indicted in last year's torture and sodomy, inside a stationhouse bathroom, of Haitian immigrant Abner Louima.
The Louima trial, too, is bound to be perceived _ and treated _ as a showcase of the dark underbelly of the N.Y.P.D. Potential jurors have been instructed to fill out a 42-page questionnaire, asking 128 questions, such as ''Do you think there is a prospect of social unrest following a verdict in this case?'' and ''Have you ever been exposed to persons who show, or who have shown, racial, sexual, religious, or ethnic prejudice?'' and ''How would you rate the job the New York City Police Department is doing in dealing with crime?''
The Diallo case has spawned three official investigations _ by the US Justice Department, federal prosecutors, and the New York state attorney general _ into a possible pattern of racial discrimination in the department's practices.
Meanwhile, some police are shouting back. A few hundred off-duty officers rallied outside the Bronx courthouse Wednesday, as well, some shouting, ''No justice, no police'' _ a threatening play on Sharpton's chant, ''No justice, no peace.''
Inside the courtroom, though, the atmosphere was solemn. The four officers, wearing suits, sat stonefaced. Among the spectators, on one side of the aisle were Diallo's parents, who had flown in from Guinea for the occasion, along with friens and relatives. On the other side were friends of the officers. There were no outbursts. Diallo's mother, Kadiadou Diallo, had tears in her eyes.
Later in the day, lawyer Johnnie Cochran, who is representing Diallo's parents, announced he will sue the city for civil damages, saying, ''We will be relentless in our pursuit of justice.''
The Diallo shooting has set off the largest protests the city has seen in years _ and cast a serious blemish on the pride of Mayor Rudolph Giuliani's five years as mayor. Crime has dramatically declined, with murders down by over 70 percent, to the lowest point since the early 1960s. But many people are now wondering if the social cost _ white officers behaving too aggressively and intrusively in minority neighborhoods _ might be too high.
In a 15 days leading up to Wednesday's indictment, 1,203 people _ including prominent officials, lawyers and other professionals of all races and religions _ were arrested in Sharpton-led civil-disobedience protests outside police department headquarters.
Those protests are now over, but Sharpton promised Wednesday, ''We will keep on marching, we will keep the pressure on.''
Lawyers on both sides Wednesday offered previews of the cases they will argue when the trial starts April 30.
Bronx District Attorney Robert Johnson noted New York law does not require him to prove premeditation on the part of the four officers. Rather, he need only show that they shot Diallo ''with intent to cause'' Diallo's death, acted with ''a depraved indifference to human life,'' and ''did recklessly engage in conduct which created a grave risk of death.''
The defense lawyers called their clients ''political prisoners,'' and said they would show the incident was ''a tragedy, not a crime,'' because the officers had ''reasonable'' cause to believe Diallo was reaching for a gun when they fired. One lawyer said his client, Richard Murphy, did not fire until he saw McMellon fall. McMellon had slipped on the sidewalk, but Murphy thought, his lawyer said, that he had been shot.
The arraignment and the subsequent comments by the officers' lawyers offered a glimpse of the defense they will provide.
Stephen Brounstein, the lawyer for Boss, and James Culleton, the lawyer for Murphy, both said that their clients heard gunfire and saw McMellon on the ground, leading them to assume that McMellon had been shot.
After the arraignment, Kornberg said his client, Carroll, had seen a ''black object'' _ which turned out to be Diallo's wallet _ coming out of the victim's back pocket.
''My client saw him reaching into his back pocket, saw this black object come out and my client yelled `Gun!''' Kornberg said.
After the court proceedings, the officers briefly thanked their supporters, and proclaimed their innocence. Eyes welling, brows knitted, Murphy said, ''I did nothing wrong and this trial will show that I did nothing wrong.''
But the Diallos, who met with Johnson for half an hour before the arraignment, and their supporters expressed satisfaction with the indictments.
''Amadou's blood will feed the battle for justice for everyone in this life,'' said Diallo's mother, Kadiadou Diallo, at a news conference after the arraignment at the Manhattan law offices of Johnny Cochran, who said he would prepare a civil suit on behalf of the Diallo family.
Police officers have rarely been convicted for killings that occurred while they were on duty. The last such case was in July 1997, when Officer Paolo Colecchia was convicted of second-degree manslaughter for fatally shooting an unarmed man in the back as he fled down a Bronx subway platform.
With the indictments barely unsealed against four police officers in the Amadou Diallo shooting, a battle is already taking shape over physical evidence in the case, as lawyers and experts seek to buttress their own versions of what happened based on entrance wounds, bullet trajectories and other forensic details.
Since there were apparently no eyewitnesses who saw the whole incident except for the officers, such evidence _ and the often fuzzy or conflicting interpretations it can yield _ could be a crucial element in the officers' trial on murder charges.
Both sides hope to use forensic evidence to answer vexing questions that have loomed since Feb. 4, when Diallo was killed in fusillade of 41 bullets fired into the vestibule of his Bronx apartment building.
Where was he when the four plainclothes officers began shooting? How quickly did he fall? Is there anything at the crime scene to explain why the officers unleashed such firepower at an unarmed man?
The potential significance of the forensic evidence is apparent in the efforts being expended by all sides to collect it:
The Police Department's Internal Affairs Bureau has done an extensive re-enactment of the shooting at the department's firing range.
The FBI dispatched a team of ballistic experts from Washington who spent days making measurements of the crime scene and traced bullet trajectories with lasers.
Defense lawyers have employed their own set of crime-scene specialists who may be called to rebut whatever theories the prosecution's experts propose.
The Diallo family has employed a pathologist whose autopsy has led to charges by their lawyers that the West African immigrant was shot repeatedly, even after he had collapsed, paralyzed, from his initial wounds.
''The forensic evidence is critical to the case because it is the forensic evidence that offers the best challenge to the credibility of the four police officers,'' said Peter Neufeld, a lawyer for the Diallo family, which is planning to bring a civil suit in the case. ''You can question their story based on common sense and logic and what passersby might have seen or heard. But none of that can be as devastating an impeachment as objective, irrefutable scientific evidence.''
Not surprisingly, the officers' lawyers embrace the same irrefutable science to argue a opposite position.
''I am not afraid of the forensic evidence,'' said Stephen Worth, the attorney for Officer Edward McMellon, one of the four accused of second-degree murder. ''What the forensic evidence will not show is that these officers fired repeatedly into a prone body. Quite the contrary, I expect it to show the opposite, that, namely, the vast majority of the shots, if not all of the shots, were fired at a standing person.''
Of course, it is far from certain that a verdict in the case will hinge on forensic evidence. Assuming the officers testify, their credibility in asserting that they feared for their lives in the mistaken belief that Diallo was armed could also be a decisive factor.
But it seems likely that a dizzying parade of expert witnesses will take the stand at the trial to debate the trigonometric calculation of bullet trajectories, and more importantly, to contradict one another.
''Ideally, the physical evidence should support one conclusion,'' said Peter R. De Forest, a professor at John Jay College of Criminal Justice. ''But what often happens is that one side or the other pays someone to dispute it and the science gets polluted.''
The Bronx district attorney's office has declined to comment on details of the evidence or how it might be used in the trial. But the Diallo family lawyers have shown no such reticence, virtually constructing a criminal case against the officers while preparing the civil suit.
One of the central disputes will likely focus on the officers' assertion that Diallo continued to stand upright, even after he had been hit by many of the 19 bullets that struck him. There are apparently no eyewitnesses to confirm or rebut that account, although several of Diallo's neighbors on Wheeler Avenue have said they saw a portion of the incident and heard the shooting.
But the Diallo family's lawyers dismissed the officers' version as ''absurd,'' pointing to an autopsy by their pathologist, Dr. Cyril H. Wecht of Pennsylvania, that suggests that Diallo was knocked down and paralyzed quite early in the barrage.
''Amadou Diallo was already on the ground with his spinal cord severed,'' said the Rev. Al Sharpton, a family adviser, ''so the alibi they have put on the court record will devastate the defense.''
The official autopsy by the city Medical Examiner's office does not discuss the sequence of shots, the position of Diallo's body when he was hit or whether he was paralyzed at any point, people who have reviewed the report have said.
The autopsy report does indicate that two shots, one from the front and one from the back, perforated Diallo's spine at separate points. Those perforations are the primary basis for the family's conclusion that he was paralyzed. Wecht's analysis that those shots came early in the sequence is based, in part, on the amount of blood from those wounds that filled his chest cavity.
But Marvyn Kornberg, who represents Officer Sean Carroll, said the officers' semiautomatic weapons fired so fast that it is impossible to determine with any precision when the shots to the chest were fired.
''You are talking about a matter of eight seconds,'' he said. ''You can't tell which is first and which is second. Any medical examiner who testifies to that can expect some rigorous cross examination.''
A second set of bullets that struck Diallo's right leg and foot also figure to be a source of debate. The city's autopsy indicates that one shot struck Diallo just above the heel and traveled up the calf before lodging behind the knee, people who reviewed the report have said.
The Diallo family's lawyers believe this bullet, as well as a second bullet that the autopsy says hit Diallo's middle toe ''adjacent to the front of the nail,'' indicate that Diallo was shot after he had fallen.
Defense lawyers dispute that conclusion and argue that the incident took so little time that the officers most likely had no chance to gauge the impact of their initial shots as they fired subsequent rounds.
There could also be a dispute over just how much time elapsed as the 41 shots were fired, especially since witnesses have said they heard a pause in the firing, apparently caused when Officer Edward McMellon fell down while firing.
Now that the four police officers charged with killing Amadou Diallo have been arraigned, the next step in the legal process will come at the end of the month, when their lawyers and Bronx prosecutors are to appear before a judge to set a schedule for the pretrial proceedings.
That meeting is set for April 30 at the state Supreme Court in the Bronx, before Acting Justice Patricia Anne Williams.
Defense lawyers will be given a timetable in which to make their motions, or requests to the court. Prosecutors will be given deadlines to respond to those motions. If the matters are likely to be contested, the judge might set dates for hearings.
Marvyn M. Kornberg, the lawyer representing Officer Sean Carroll, said Thursday that in addition to standard motions like those for discovery _ in which lawyers ask prosecutors to hand over the information they have collected _ he expected defense lawyers to ask the judge to review the grand jury minutes to decide if the indictments were supported by the evidence. A request for a change of venue is also possible, he said.
Kornberg also said he plans to ask the court to review grand jury attendance records to make sure that a quorum were present each day, and that the grand jurors who voted to indict the officers were present to hear all the evidence presented.
''If they weren't present, or there wasn't a quorum, these indictments may be dismissed on motions,'' Kornberg said.
After the initial motions, other issues may arise, including whether any of the defendants ask for separate trials and whether the officers waive their right to a jury trial. Police officers in criminal trials have often asked for a judge to decide their case, fearing that juries would be unsympathetic.
The cheering began as the parents of Amadou Diallo left the prosecutor's office.
Black bystanders fell in behind the couple Wednesday as they marched two blocks to a courthouse where four white police officers pleaded innocent to murder charges in the shooting death of the Diallos' son, a 22-year-old street vendor from Guinea with no criminal record.
The officers heard cheers, too -- from scores of their off-duty colleagues, most of them white.
''On Feb. 4, in the vestibule in his own building, Amadou Diallo stood blameless, unarmed and defenseless when 19 of 41 shots were fired at him, struck him and killed him,'' prosecutor Robert Johnson told the court. ''These four defendants intended to take his life.''
The case has inspired a painful examination of police attitudes and tactics across the nation. Earlier this month, President Clinton said he was worried that recent charges of police misconduct could undermine the fight against crime.
More than 1,200 people have been arrested in the city in demonstrations since Diallo was cut down in the fusillade. Many of the protesters -- white and black, celebrities and common folk -- also demonstrated against the alleged police torture of Haitian immigrant Abner Louima in 1997 and the feeling that law-abiding minorities are routinely humiliated by police stop-and-search tactics.
''Amadou's blood will feed the battle for justice,'' his mother, Kadiadou Diallo, told 1,000 supporters outside the courthouse.
The Rev. Jesse Jackson, who was arrested at a Feb. 19 rally protesting the Diallo killing, praised prosecutors for taking what he called ''the first step in the pursuit of justice'' but added that ''justice will not prevail until the officers are punished for the crime.''
''Even under duress,'' Jackson said, ''those who are called to uphold the law must be held at a higher standard.''
The killing has frayed Mayor Rudolph Giuliani's already tense relationship with New York's black community. Many have accused him of failing to understand the depth of New Yorkers' anger over the incident.
Giuliani declined to comment on the charges, but said earlier in the day: ''We should allow the criminal justice system to now operate. ... Now you move to another stage in which the crime has to be proved beyond a reasonable doubt.''
Officers Kenneth Boss, Sean Carroll, Edward McMellon and Richard Murphy -- who were searching for a rape suspect and fired apparently believing Diallo had a gun -- showed little emotion when the charges were read.
Each was indicted on two counts of second-degree murder and one count of reckless endangerment. They could get 25 years to life in prison on the murder charges.
Judge John Collins set bail at $100,000 for each officer, although Johnson had asked that they be held without bail. The officers were immediately suspended from the force. They had been on desk duty.
Marvyn Kornberg, Carroll's lawyer, called the murder count ''ludicrous.''
''What's the district attorney saying, that they had nothing to do that night but roll up on an individual and attempt to kill him because he's black?'' he asked.
Lawyers for the four officers spoke separately in court, offering the first glimpse of the defense account of what went wrong the night they confronted Diallo outside his Bronx apartment building.
James Culleton, Murphy's lawyer, said his client ''had a sick feeling inside of him, believing that he was going to be shot, and he reacted.''
Culleton and Steven Brounstein, Boss's attorney, said their clients fired because they saw an officer on the ground. McMellon reportedly slipped and fell as the officers confronted Diallo.
Boss ''believed there was a fire fight was going on,'' Brounstein said.
At a news conference, Johnson criticized the officers for choosing not to testify before the grand jury which voted last week to indict them.
''Having exercised that right, they cannot then say, `We're police officers, therefore what we did was OK,''' he said.
''Without explanation, what we have is four people driving up to a location, pulling out their guns and killing an individual.''
The Rev. Al Sharpton, who organized daily protests against the shooting, praised the grand jury's action.
''We can only say that it is appropriate that these policemen have been indicted for murder,'' he said. Diallo's father would only say, ''I'm very happy.''
Since the shooting, New York's street-crime unit has been ordered to wear uniforms instead of plainclothes, and 50 slots at the predominantly white division will be reassigned to minority police officers.
Earlier Wednesday, Giuliani and Police Commissioner Howard Safir attended an emotional tribute to a cop killed in the line of duty in 1996. Safir called Diallo's death a tragedy but urged NYPD critics to ''acknowledge the tragedies that befall our family.''
''We grieve for Amadou Diallo and the four officers involved and pray they get a fair trial,'' Safir said.
The four New York City police officers charged with murdering Amadou Diallo returned to work with pay Friday after attending a morning court session in the Bronx in which a Jan. 3 trial date was set.
They left the courtroom to the cheers of nearly 200 other officers, gathered outside the Bronx County Building.
But inside state Supreme Court, the defense team showed signs of division.
Marvyn M. Kornberg, the lawyer for Sean Carroll, said he might make a motion to disqualify Stephen C. Worth, the lawyer for Edward McMellon. Kornberg said Worth, who had represented all of the officers immediately after the shooting, might have a conflict of interest now since he was representing only one of them and might be forced to cross-examine the others.
It was a point that Worth disputed outside court by saying, ''I don't think I have a conflict of interest, though it is obvious that Kornberg would like for me to go.''
Police officials declined to say where the officers _ Kenneth Boss, Richard Murphy, Carroll and McMellon _ would be working, adding only that they were on modified duty and carrying no guns or badges.
Worth said that the officers reported to their new assignments Friday but would not officially start work until Monday, on what police officials called administrative assignments.
Friday, acting Justice Patricia Anne Williams, who refused defense requests to put off scheduling a date for the case, chose the Jan. 3 date after the defense lawyers said they would need time to go through the prosecution's evidence and discuss possible pretrial motions.
The lawyers also said there could be pretrial scheduling conflicts because of other trials some of them are involved in, like the Abner Louima case, in which officers are accused of brutalizing a Haitian immigrant. That case is set to begin on Tuesday.
Prosecutors turned over more than 160 pages of forensic, ballistic and crime scene evidence to the defense lawyers, adding that more would be forthcoming. The judge said the next court appearance would be on Sept. 29, when she would decide all motions.
While the trial date would come nearly a year after Diallo's death on the night of Feb. 4, it is not unusual in such high-publicity cases. Defense lawyers are usually pleased by delays to the extent that they can temper bad publicity about the case, which they see as possibly prejudicial to their clients.
But if the delay was welcome, there were still Kornberg's efforts to force Worth, the official lawyer for the Patrolmen's Benevolent Association, off the case. Kornberg said later that if Worth was not disqualified, Kornberg might push for a separate trial for Carroll.
The issue of severing the cases is important because the defendants will probably need one another's testimony to corroborate their accounts of the shooting.
For example, the defense has suggested that the 41 shots fired at Diallo _ a number that has become a flash point in the case _ were precipitated by one of the officers yelling ''Gun!'' and another falling down some steps as if he had been shot.
A judge ordered four police officers Wednesday to stand trial for the fatal shooting of an unarmed West African immigrant.
Officers Kenneth Boss, Sean Carroll, Edward McMellon and Richard Murphy left the courthouse without comment. They have all pleaded innocent to second-degree murder.
The judge rejected defense arguments that public outcry and intense media coverage following the shooting put undue pressure on the grand jury to issue the murder indictments.
The officers were indicted in March. They are accused of firing 41 times at Amadou Diallo while searching for a rape suspect on Feb. 4. Diallo was hit 19 times. Attorneys for the officers said their clients mistakenly believed Diallo was reaching for a gun.
The defendants remain on restricted duty pending the outcome of the trial, which is scheduled for January.
Sen. John Kerry clashed with President George W. Bush over how to deal with the nuclear issue of the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (DPRK) during Thursday's first debate of the three debates in their election campaign.
"I want bilateral talks (with the DPRK) which put all of the issues, from the Armistice of 1952, the economic issues, the human rights issues, the artillery disposal issues, the DMZ issues, and the nuclear issues on the table," Kerry said while talking about his means to deal with the DPRK.
Bush said he would continue the six-party talks to try to resolve the DPRK nuclear issue in addition to bilateral talks.
"The minute we have bilateral talks, the six-party talks will unwind," Bush said.
Bush said before his administration was sworn in, the United States signed an agreement with the DPRK and "we found out that was not being honored by the North Koreans."
"And so I decided that a better way to approach the issue was to get other nations involved," Bush said.
"We began a new dialogue with North Korea, one that included not only the United States, but now China. And China has got a lot of influence over North Korea in some ways more than we do," Bush said, adding that South Korea, Japan and Russia were also included in the process.
"It is not going to work if we open up a dialogue with Kim Jong II. That is what he wants. He wants to unravel the six-party talks or the five-nation coalition that is sending him a clear message," Bush said.
Kerry reacted by saying that Bush reversed the stance of dialogue with the DPRK held by US Secretary of State Colin Powell and for the past two years, "this administration did not talk at all to North Korea."
"While we did not talk at all, the fuel rods came out, the inspectors were kicked out, the television cameras were kicked out, and today there are four to seven nuclear weapons in the hands of North Korea. That happened on this president's watch," Kerry said.
Bush warned that it would be a mistake without China involving in the process.
"We must have China's leverage on Jim Jong Il, besides ourselves," Bush said.
Kerry said bilateral talks with the DPRK does not mean without China in the process.
"We can have bilateral talks with Kim Jong Il and we can get those weapons at the same time as we get China because China has an interest in the outcome, too," Kerry said.
The first debate between the two opponents took place in Miami, Florida.
Zambia, which until recently had not have the problem of child trafficking, is reviewing its legislation to take into account the scourge which currently is not reflected as a crime in the laws.
"The seriousness and gravity of this scourge requires that as a nation we have to reach a consensus on the magnitude of the problem of child trafficking in Zambia for effective planning," George Chilumanda, deputy minister for youth and child development, said here Friday. "As government, we have embarked on the review of the national child policy in order to take on board new emerging issues such as HIV/AIDS, poverty, child streetism and child trafficking."
The Zambian minister said the cabinet has already approved a child rights bill, which will facilitate the review of all legislation dealing with children.
Speaking during a meeting called to disseminate the findings of a report done to establish the magnitude of child trafficking in Zambia, the minister said the scourge has reached alarming levels, which needs concerted efforts to tackle.
The government, he said, will soon call a consultative meeting to map a way forward in combating child trafficking.
Last month Zambian police arrested 12 Asians who were suspected to be involved in child trafficking. The suspects were reported to have promised the would-be victims of lucrative jobs in Europe.
The police also smashed an international child trafficking scam in which three Afghanistan teenage boys found themselves in the country after being hoodwinked by child traffickers of finding them schools in Britain.
Though statistics to show a national picture of the problem are not available, the research conducted by the Anglican Children's Project, a nongovernmental organization dealing in child issues, found that about 108 children have been trafficked in the recent past.
Belgian authorities denied a French media report Friday that confessed serial killer Michel Fourniret had admitted raping or murdering several more young women.
The French newspaper Le Parisien reported Fourniret made new confessions to investigators that he could have committed two rapes or murders a year in between 1990 and 2000.
"It is totally wrong. There is no truth in this," said an official at the prosecutor's office in the city of Dinant, where Fourniret is being held. The official asked not to be identified.
Fourniret, 62, has confessed to killing nine people in France and Belgium between 1987 and 2001, mostly girls and young women. He is also suspected of more killings.
No date has yet been set for his trial.
The one-time forest ranger moved to Belgium after serving time for child sex offenses in his native France during the 1980s. Prosecutors say he was a sexual predator who murdered his young rape victims to prevent them from identifying him.
Fourniret has been held in Belgium since June 2003 after the bungled kidnapping of a 13-year old girl.
Yomiuri Giants infielder Toshihisa Nishi could become the next Japanese player to pursue a career in the North American major leagues.
Nishi will become a free agent at the end of the 2004 season and told reporters he intends to exercise his free agent rights, but will start by holding talks with his current team.
"I'll start by talking with my own team and if other teams are also interested, we'll see," Nishi said Friday.
The 32-year-old second baseman has 28 homers and 58 RBIs this season, along with a .290 batting average for the Giants.
Nishi, who bats right-handed, is one of Yomiuri's best defensive players and was named to this year's Central League All-Star team.
The International Committee of the Red Cross insisted Friday that Britain does not hold any women prisoners in Iraq, although the demand of militants holding a British man hostage is that female prisoners be freed.
The ICRC added that it was ready to act as a mediator to help free Kenneth Bigley.
The British government said more than 100,000 leaflets had been distributed in Baghdad containing a personal plea from Bigley's family and an appeal to his captors to release him.
Bigley, an engineer, was kidnapped two weeks ago in Baghdad along with two American colleagues who have since been beheaded. The Islamic militants claiming responsibility for Bigley's abduction have demanded the release of female Iraqi prisoners. The British government has repeatedly stressed that it does not hold any.
The U.S. military says it has two Iraqi women in custody _ Rihab Rashid Taha, a scientist who became known as "Dr. Germ" for helping Iraq make weapons with anthrax, and Huda Salih Mahdi Ammash, a biotech researcher dubbed "Mrs. Anthrax."
The ICRC, which visits prisons around the world to monitor the condition and treatment of prisoners, told The Associated Press that it had repeatedly visited Britain's sole detention facility in Iraq, near the southern city of Basra.
"We have repeatedly visited Shaiba, the only British detention place in Iraq. There are no women detained there," said Rana Sidani at the ICRC in Geneva, Switzerland.
Sidani said the ICRC did not have any contacts with the militant group, controlled by Jordanian terror mastermind Abu Musab al-Zarqawi, believed to be holding Bigley.
"We stand ready if we are contacted to mediate," she added.
Foreign Secretary Jack Straw said Thursday that Britain would not pay a ransom or meet any political demands to secure Bigley's release.
"If we did not have this position there would be many, many more people who would be kidnapped, and the world would be less safe," Straw told British Broadcasting Corp. television.
The Foreign Office said Friday that leaflets had been distributed in the streets around 28 mosques in Baghdad. They contained messages from Bigley's family and from prominent British Muslims, including Yusuf Islam, the singer once known as Cat Stevens.
"I request you, in the name of Allah ... to release the British citizen Ken Bigley for the good name of our religion and according to the sayings of Allah in the Glorious Quran," said Islam, who was taken off a Washington-bound plane last month and expelled from the United States after his name turned up on a list of people suspected of having terrorist links.
Britain has complained to the United States about the treatment, and Islam has said he plans legal action against U.S. authorities.
"Our religion Islam does not allow us to harm the innocent," said the Muslim Council of Britain's Iqbal Sacranie in the leaflet. "We urge you to please listen to this appeal and release this man back into the arms of his waiting family."
European stock markets climbed in early dealing on Monday even as many investors sat tight on the eve of the US presidential election.
The London FTSE 100 index rose 0.70 percent to 4,656.70 points, the Frankfurt DAX won 0.41 percent to 3,976.63 points and the Paris CAC 40 gained 0.47 percent to 3,724.21 points.
The DJ Euro Stoxx 50 index of leading eurozone shares advanced 0.43 percent to 2,823.90.
The euro stood at 1.2745 dollars.
US stocks ended mixed Friday as investors held onto gains ahead of Tuesday's presidential vote.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average ended 0.23 percent higher at 10,027.47 points, while the tech-heavy Nasdaq composite edged down 0.04 percent to 1,974.99.
The main broad-market indicator, the Standard and Poor's 500 index, climbed 0.24 percent to 1,130.20 points.
In Asia, Tokyo's benchmark Nikkei-225 index closed 0.34 percent lower at 10,734.7 points on Monday on concerns about the impact of a strong yen on exporters and on investor caution as people geared up to vote in the United States.
"Investors remained on the sidelines as they are waiting for tomorrow's US presidential election to see the outcome and its impact on the stock market," said Mitsushige Akino, chief fund manager at Ichiyoshi Investment Management.
"Few investors wanted to make any aggressive bets today. Especially if (Senator John) Kerry wins, the market wants to see what his policies will be."
Hong Kong's key Hang Seng Index closed 0.3 percent higher to 13,094.25 points.
Russia's embattled Yukos oil giant faced additional tax claims Monday after authorities said the firm was suspected of underpaying 6.7 billion dollars for 2002, Interfax reported.
The sum was contained in an audit that the tax authorities presented to Yukos Monday, the news agency cited an unnamed source with the federal tax agency as saying.
A Yukos spokesman declined to either confirm or deny the report.
If the firm is eventually ordered to repay the amount, which it can contest, Yukos's total bill for back taxes and penalties would stand at more than 14 billion dollars. The firm's market capitalization currently stands at just under nine billion dollars.
The tax bill could still grow as authorities have hinted they may file charges for 2003.
In more bad news, Yukos's top production subsidiary, Yuganskneftegas, was hit with tax bills of its own.
Authorities accused it of not paying 986 million dollars in taxes for 2002 and said it was suspected of underpaying 2.25 billion dollars for 2001.
Russia's largest oil producer has had its accounts and assets frozen for months as prosecutors investigated it for tax infractions, and authorities have said they would sell off Yugansk in an effort to raise funds to pay the overdue bills.
Earlier Monday, Yukos said it had repaid over three billion dollars of its overdue tax debt.
"As of Friday Yukos has paid 3.56 billion dollars to the Russian state," an official with the oil giant told AFP.
Critics say authorities are singling out Yukos on orders of the Kremlin to punish the political ambitions of its founder Mikhail Khodorkovsky.
Senior government officials have repeatedly denied the charges, saying prosecutors are pursuing a tax cheat.
Indonesia took a confident step towards full democracy Friday, swearing in legislators elected in landmark polls to a newly-reformed bicameral parliament free from military representation.
In a ceremony witnessed by outgoing President Megawati Sukarnoputri, 550 members of the upper House of Representatives and a 128-strong senate-style Regional Representatives Council took oaths to serve their country.
Supreme Court chairman Bagir Manan presided over the swearing-in of the two chambers, which make up the National Consultative Assembly -- the first fully elected parliament with no military and police representation.
The ceremony marks the culmination of democratic reforms which began after the resignation of military-backed dictator Suharto in 1998 and led to the country's first ever direct presidential elections last month.
Previously the national assembly was made up of 500 members of the House of Representatives, 200 people representing the regions and interest groups including the military and police.
Legislators, including a former actress and a one-time Miss Indonesia, pledged to work as "fairly and justly as possible" for their country.
"I will struggle for the aspirations of the people and regions that I represent," they said in unison.
Unlike previous elections in which people voted only for parties, this year's polls allowed voters to choose both parties and individual legislative candidates representing their areas.
In another historic vote on September 20, Indonesians overwhelmingly elected to replace Megawati with general Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono, who is due to take office on October 20.
Economic data Friday showed strong factory activity in the United States as well as a surge in construction spending, although consumer sentiment was slightly weaker.
The Institute for Supply Management reported its national index of manufacturing activity fell to 58.5 percent in September from 59.0 percent in August. The decline was in line with expectations, with Wall Street analysts expecting a figure of 58.3.
Any number above 50 indicates expansion, and the ISM said September marked the 16th straight month of expansion.
"The manufacturing sector continued to grow during September, but at a slightly slower r "However the decline in new orders is less positive suggesting a slowdown over the coming months."
Merrill Lynch's Sheryl King said the ISM report showed price pressures and slipping new orders, adding that "this suggests that firms continue to face cost pressures, adding to the squeeze they are feeling on profit margin."
As a result of the positive ISM and strong construction report, King said, "It now looks like third quarter GDP (gross domestic product) will record a four percent annualized increase. However, the forward looking indicators in the ISM suggest that growth should moderate in the coming months."
Wachovia economist Gina Martin said the construction report was especially good, more than double the Wall Street expectation.
"If there is still a soft patch in the economy, it is certainly not in construction markets," she said.
Taiwan is seeking to recruit skilled individuals from Japan's hi-tech sector for its domestic opto-electronics industry, a spokesman for the Cabinet-level Council for Economic Planning and Development (CEPD) said Friday.
Relevant government agencies have maintained contacts with about 200 professionals in Japan's opto-electronics sector after an official recruitment delegation visited Tokyo, New York, Chicago, Dallas, Los Angeles and San Francisco in late September, the spokesman said.
Claiming that Japan's hi-tech workforce is highly competitive and that some 200 of them have shown interest in coming to work in Taiwan, he said that government authorities will further work out preparations and arrangements to make it possible for them to relocate.
Citing CEPD statistics, he said that the supply-demand gap in Taiwan's hi-tech spectrum is deteriorating fast. He pointed out that domestic high-tech companies will need about 248,000 professionals with an advanced education over the next three years, while supply is estimated at 198,000, resulting in a shortfall of 5,000.
The Taiwan authorities are actively promoting the opto-electronics industry, which has been targeted by the Cabinet in its flagship "two-trillion, two-star" program that also includes the biotechnology and digital-content industries.
A plume of steam and ash rose from the crater of Mount St. Helens on Friday, CNN reported.
Suspected Taliban guerrillas attacked a remote checkpoint in southeastern Afghanistan, killing seven Afghan soldiers after forcing them to lay down their weapons, an Afghan official said.
At least 40 gunmen surrounded the checkpoint in Shinkay district of Zabul province late Wednesday evening, Gov. Khan Mohammed told The Associated Press.
Nine militia soldiers manning the post held off the assailants for an hour. Two escaped, but the other seven were forced to surrender.
"They laid down their weapons, but the Taliban opened fire on them," Mohammed said Thursday, citing the pair who got away.
He said the troops were militia fighters from neighboring Kandahar province who often operated with U.S. troops in the region, where the Taliban-led insurgency is at its strongest.
Violence has surged in advance of Afghanistan's Oct. 9 presidential election. Remnants of the hardline militia ousted three years ago have vowed to disrupt the voting.
Also, a foreign freelance reporter and his Afghan interpreter came under rocket attack in eastern Afghanistan on Wednesday, and the interpreter was wounded, U.S. military spokesman Maj. Mark McCann told the AP.
The injured man was brought by the reporter to an American base in Kunar province and later flown to a hospital at the main U.S. base at Bagram, north of the capital, McCann said. The wounded man was in guarded condition Thursday.
McCann said he had no details on the identity or nationality of the freelance reporter. He said he had been "out on his own" and not traveling with American forces when attacked.
Dr. Robert Ersek, a 66-year-old plastic surgeon, invited reporters to his Texas operating room recently and, in front of their cameras, proceeded to liposuction himself.
After numbing the skin near his navel, he slipped in a hollow tube about a quarter-inch (0.6 centimeters) wide and moved it back and forth until it had sucked out about half a pound (225 grams) of fat.
Ersek's office throws away tons of liposuctioned fat every year. But he shipped his own to a California company for processing and long-term storage of some of the cells from that fat.
Why did he do that? It turns out the type of cell being stored for Ersek is medically promising. In fact, an international group of scientists is meeting next week in Pittsburgh to discuss its potential.
Medical value? In fat? The waist product most people want to get rid of?
It's true. As members of the fledgling International Fat Applied Technology Society will discuss at their meeting, fat is a little-discussed source of stem cells, those versatile biological building blocks that can morph into a variety of tissues. Fat-derived stem cells, researchers say, might someday provide replacement tissue for treating such conditions as Parkinson's disease, heart attacks, heart failure and bone defects.
"We're trying to make fat do good," says IFATS president Dr. J. Peter Rubin, assistant professor of plastic and reconstructive surgery at the University of Pittsburgh School of Medicine.
The fat-derived cells, which are being studied by relatively few labs, aren't the ones that store fat. Instead, they're found in between fat-storing cells. They're an example of so-called "adult" stem cells, different from the controversial embryonic stem cells.
When stem cells are taken from an embryo, the embryo is destroyed. That's abhorrent to people who consider an embryo to be developing human life. President Bush has restricted federal money for research into embryonic stem cells, a step that Democratic presidential nominee John Kerry has said he will reverse if elected.
Some who oppose research into embryonic stem cells champion the cause of adult stem cells, which are found in bone marrow and elsewhere and theoretically could be taken from the very people who will be treated with them. In recent years, scientists have found evidence that adult cells can turn into a wide variety of cell types.
While such studies have focused largely on cells from marrow, fat has "certainly been overlooked as a potential source of stem cells," says Dr. Adam Katz, a plastic surgeon who studies the fat-derived cells at the University of Virginia. Actually, it's probably the most practical source, he said.
Why?
Fat is plentiful and researchers say it's easy to harvest _ much easier than marrow, for example. Just about everybody, even slender people, carries enough to yield a good supply of cells for their own treatment. Fat produces so many stem cells that there's no time-consuming need to grow more of them in the lab. Giving up some fat isn't likely to be medically dangerous. And after all, who'd object?
"This is the only stem cell that people will pay you to take out of them," says Kevin Lee, chair of the neuroscience department at the University of Virginia.
While Ersek's self-liposuction was meant to publicize the idea of banking one's own fat-derived cells for future use, researchers say doctors may one day remove fat right when the cells are needed.
To be sure, the research into fat-derived cells is still in very early stages and many questions remain. Katz, in fact, says he's not even convinced the cells deserve to be called stem cells, because he's not sure they really do turn into other kinds of cells when transplanted into the body. Nonetheless, he says they do show promise for being used someday to treat disease.
Rubin says there's good evidence the fat-derived cells can morph into bone, cartilage, skeletal muscle, blood vessel tissue and fat, at least in the laboratory, with suggestive evidence they can also turn into heart muscle and nerve cells.
Lee says people look at him askance when he talks about research into fat-derived cells, but some studies point to a possible payoff.
Last May, scientists reported that such cells could turn to bone and heal defects in the skulls of mice.
Korean scientists reported last year that when they put human fat-derived cells in the brains of rats that had simulated strokes, the animals showed some improvement.
Lee has found the cells will migrate to damaged brain areas in rats and turn into what looks like brain cells, though it's not clear yet whether the cells hook up with neighbors to form working circuits.
Dr. Kai Pinkernell, a cardiovascular researcher at Tulane University, says he found an encouraging result in pigs that were given experimental heart attacks. When he took fat-derived cells from the pigs and put them into the hearts of the same donor animals, those hearts began to work better.
In fact, they worked just as well as hearts that received stem cells from marrow, the gold standard for this kind of experiment, he said.
But how? The standard explanation would be that the cells, sensing that the heart needed new muscle to replace tissue lost in the heart attack, morphed into heart muscle. But Pinkernell said he can't prove that. He also says he's more interested in the results than the explanation.
Katz, the skeptic about whether such cells really change identities, said they could be producing therapeutic effects in other ways. Maybe they're alerting other stem cells that already live in the target tissue or that show up from the marrow, he said. Or maybe they're stimulating the growth of new blood vessels that speed up healing.
Dr. Marc Hedrick, president of Macropore Biosurgery Inc. of San Diego, which hopes to harness such cells to treat heart attacks, said there's good evidence the cells can become heart muscle cells. But they probably also stimulate nearby cells to make new blood vessels, heightening the therapeutic effect, he said.
"They're like orchestra leaders, we think, in terms of healing," Hedrick said. "They not only participate by playing an instrument, but they also direct some of the other people in the orchestra."
In any case, Rubin figures fat-derived cells might also someday provide a way to grow replacement bone and cartilage to resurface joints damaged by arthritis. They might even be used to make more fat, for uses like breast reconstruction after surgery, he said.
Researchers say they need to learn much more about just what the cells can do and how safe it would be to use them in treatment, especially what the long-term risks might be. Attempts to test the cells in humans have been scarce worldwide, but researchers said human studies in the United States might start within five years.
Dr. Curt Civin, a stem cell expert at Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore, called the fat-derived cells intriguing but said he had some questions of his own: How do they compare with stem cells from elsewhere in the body, like bone marrow? Do they really live in fat deposits or are they just passing through via the bloodstream? Apart from their abundant supply, do they have any unique abilities?
"When you really do the cost-benefits, do they come out, even if they're not unique, as superior in some respects?" Civin asked. "The jury is still out."
Pinkernell, for one, is optimistic about finding a medical value in fat.
"Not a lot of researchers in the world have realized this tissue might be a potential source of these types of cells," he said. "But I think it's just a matter of time."


is the International Fat Applied Technology Society
Mount St. Helens, the volcano that blew its top with cataclysmic force in 1980, erupted for the first time in 18 years Friday, belching a huge column of white steam and ash after days of rumblings.
"This is exactly the kind of event we've been predicting," said U.S. Geological Survey scientist Cynthia Gardner.
Still, the eruption was nowhere near what happened 24 years ago, when 57 people were killed and towns 250 miles (402 kilometers) away were coated with ash.
About 20 minutes after Friday's eruption, the mountain calmed and the plume began to dissipate.
The eruption was so short-lived that the ash appeared to pose no threat to anyone. No evacuations were ordered, and there was no sign of any lava pouring from the volcano.
Few people live near the mountain, about 100 miles south of Seattle. The closest structure is the Johnston Ridge Observatory, about five miles from the crater.
The eruption occurred at 12:03 p.m., when there was a small explosion, followed by the steam and ash cloud that rose from the southern edge of a 1,000-foot (305-meter)-tall lava dome in the volcano's crater. Steam frequently rises from the crater, but the 8,364-foot (2,549-meter) peak had not erupted since 1986.
For the past week, scientists have detected thousands of earthquakes of increasing strength _ as high as magnitude 3.3 _ suggesting another eruption was on the way.
The earthquakes quit after the eruption, said University of Washington seismologist Tony Qamar.
"That makes us think this is the end of the eruption," Qamar said. "All this buildup was leading to that relatively small eruption."
But USGS seismologist Bob Norris said magma could be moving underground and he would not be surprised to see more explosions in the next days or weeks.
"The monitoring will definitely continue on a very intense scale until we can determine that the thing has really gone back to sleep," said Tom Pierson, a USGS geologist.
Mike Fergus, a spokesman with the Federal Aviation Administration in Seattle, said the plume had reached 16,000 feet in altitude, but did not know whether any planes would need to be rerouted.
The Texas Rangers won't end their season where they wanted to, in the playoffs.
But they still have had a year to remember, particularly for the 23,036 fans at Thursday's 6-3 win over the Anaheim Angels at Ameriquest Field in Arlington.
The fans saw the Rangers give maximum effort less than 24 hours after being eliminated from playoff contention. They also got a surprise thank-you from the coaches and players, who took a handshaking circuit around the stands after the final home game of the season.
"The fans, this is the best I've seen in my four years here," Rangers shortstop Michael Young said. "It's important for us to go out there and play very well. There were four games to play, and we wanted to show we didn't shut it down even though we didn't make the playoffs."
The crowd was on its feet clapping before relever R.A. Dickey recorded the final out. Although the Rangers will fall just short of the playoffs, they have a chance to finish at 90 wins for just the fourth time in club history. And the fans appreciated the season of scrappy efforts.
Tom Hamahan of Dallas fell for this bunch of Rangers, and showed it with a giant "Thank you" sign.
"The spirit and the chemistry, you never knew who was going to step up," Hamahan said. "It's been wonderful t see their attitude and how they walk. They can beat anybody, and they knew it. They're so young, they're going to be here a long time. It's been a real special year, and I just wanted to be here at the beginning of what hopefully is a long run of good stuff."
With the youth on this Rangers club, he could be right. Six starters in Thursday's lineup are 27 or younger: Young (27), right fielder Kevin Mench (26), pitcher Chris Young (25), designated hitter Mark Teixeira (24), third baseman Hank Blalock and center fieldr Laynce Nix (23), and first baseman Adrian Gonzalez (22).
"We had a chance to do something special this year," Teixeira said. "Unfortunately, that fell through, but we've got a chance to do that next year."
Right-hander Chris Young (3-2, 4.71 ERA), in particular, gave a performance that will linger into the off-season. In his seventh major league start, he earned his second victory in two tries against the American League West co-leaders.
Young maneuveredthrough the Anaheim lineup, with MVP candidate Vladimir Guerrero the only exception. Young gave up three earned runs on four hits and one walk in six innings. Guerrero (4-for-4) accounted for three of the hits off Young, including two home runs and all three RBI.
"He's hot as can be right now," Young said. "Maybe I challenged him when I shouldn't have, in hindsight. He's a great hitter."
Guerrero was 12-for-17 in the series, including five home runs and nine RBI. But this loss was damaging for Anaheim, which fell back int a tie for first with Oakland, which edged Seattle 3-2. The Angels tonight open a three-game series in Oakland that will decide the AL West champion.
The Rangers' sluggers had an easier time with Anaheim starter John Lackey (14-13, 4.67 ERA), who gave up five runs in 4 1/3 innings. They loaded the bases in three of those innings.
Gonzalez, a rookie, drove in the first run with a second-inning single that scored Teixeira. The Rangers scored four run in the fifth inning. Nix led off with a single up the middle, followed by Michael Young's single to center field. After a Teixeira flyout, Blalock and Mench walked to force in Nix. Then Gonzalez knocked in two runs with a single to left-center that knocked Lackey out of the game. Outfielder Chad Allen drove in the final run of the inning with a sacrifice fly.
The Rangers tacked on one more run in the sixth when Nix tripled off Kevin Gregg and scored on Michael Young's sacrifice fly.
With Guerrero as the Angels' onl offense, those were plenty of runs for the Rangers to give their fans a final victory to savor. Relievers Brian Shouse, Jeff Nelson and Dickey shut out Anaheim over the final three innings, with Dickey earning his first save of the season.
Manager Buck Showalter, who had the idea for his team to leave the field with a meet-and-greet lap, said: "This club doesn't need to be reminded of how many people live and die with their efforts, what they do each night A lot of our success this year was feeding off (the fans') energy, with what they do."
The cheering fans, including one with a "We Love Our Boys" sign, thanked them. nn
Advisory to NYTRNG editors and designers. The following graphics are available on the desktop of the Art Library. FOOTBALL -- A folder containing illustrations that can be used for high school, college and pro football coverage. NOTE: If you have football art -- or any other useful images -- to share with other papers, please have someone drop a copy into the "Incoming" folder on the Art Library.
Just before noon on Friday, seismometers at the Cascades Volcano Observatory in Vancouver, Wash., wiggled in a familiar pattern. Soon afterward came confirmation that Mount St. Helens had erupted for the first time since 1986.
After the mountain's cataclysmic explosion in 1980, the volcano erupted more modestly an additional 21 times, each usually accompanied by a characteristic seismic signal.
"Events like this were very common between 1981 and 1985, so this is not unusual or extraordinary by any means," Dr. Jon J. Major, a geologist at the observatory, said at a news conference on Friday afternoon.
Mount St. Helens is one of several large volcanoes in Washington, Oregon and California that are part of the tectonically active Ring of Fire around the Pacific Ocean. The volcanoes can lie dormant for centuries, then revive, sometimes catastrophically. Before 1980, Mount St. Helens had last erupted in 1857.
The pulsations of steam and dust on Friday, described by Major as "a relatively small burp," sent a gray-white plume nearly 10,000 feet into the air. After the eruption, small earthquakes that had been rumbling around the volcano for the last week stopped, suggesting that pressures that had been building up had been relieved for now. Seismic activity resumed later in the afternoon, Major said, but at a quieter level.
"This event is pretty much what we expected and anticipated over the last several days, a relatively small explosion from the lava dome," Major said. Scientists cannot say whether the volcano will now calm down or whether more eruptions will occur.
At the time of the eruption, scientists aboard a helicopter were taking measurements using a thermal imager, a device that measures heat from a distance. The instrument's readings showed that the site of the eruption was not particularly hot, indicating that the eruption of steam and ash had originated from at least several hundred feet underground.
The flow of water out of the crater increased slightly, Major said, but there was no danger of floods or mudslides. Scientists said they saw no signs that would lead them to worry that a larger, dangerous eruption was imminent.
"There is no indication magma has worked its way up to the surface," Major said.
The belch on Friday might have instead been the denouement of some underground indigestion from six years ago.
Then, as in the last week, a swarm of small quakes rumbled around the dome, a bulge 925 feet high and a half-mile wide at the center of the crater, but then the ground quieted without a new eruption. Analyzing the patterns of shaking, scientists said fresh magma, molten rock, had risen from deep below to the base of the dome, but had not broken through to the surface.
Major said the working hypothesis was that the eruption on Friday was somehow related to the 1998 events. "Exactly how it is related is still a matter of speculation," he said.
After a week of steadily increasing seismic rumbling, Mount St. Helens on Friday burped a tall column of steam and ash that officials said was probably not a precursor to a large sustained eruption from the most active volcano on the West Coast.
The volcano is being closely monitored in part because of its cataclysmic explosion in 1980. The explosion killed 57 people, triggered the largest landslide in recorded history and blew 520 million tons of ash eastward across the United States.
The plume from Friday's 24-minute noontime eruption rose 10,000 feet before drifting away in light winds on a spectacularly clear autumn day. No injuries or damage to property were reported.
When the eruption ended, government monitoring instruments showed a sharp decrease in the seismic activity that in recent days had been registering as many as four small earthquakes per minute on the mountain, located in a sparsely populated area of southwest Washington.
''This was a relatively small eruption,'' said John Major, a hydrologist with the U.S. Geological Survey. He said USGS observers near the volcano reported that no molten rock flowed from the point in the mountain's lava dome where the steam vented.
Speaking at a news conference, Major said the eruption appeared to have punched a hole about 100 feet in diameter in the glacial ice that covers part of the mountain's horseshoe-shaped dome. He said there was a small increase in melting ice and snow off the volcano but no reported mudflows, or lahars, which historically have been damaging consequences of volcanic eruptions in the Cascade Range.
After the 1980 eruption, a lahar traveled 50 miles from Mount St. Helens, ripping out bridges and destroying homes.
In comparison, Friday's eruption was a ''hiccup,'' USGS geologist Tom Pierson told reporters.
''This is exactly the kind of event we have been talking about and anticipating,'' Major said. He noted there is no evidence that a major flow of gas-rich molten rock, which could trigger a sustained eruption, has ascended from its known location seven miles underground to the top of the mountain.
Absent such a flow of molten rock, USGS scientists have said it is unlikely that recent increases in seismic activity on Mount St. Helens will result in a significant eruption that could endanger people or property outside the immediate vicinity.
Major compared Friday's ''small explosive eruption'' to the activity that came to be regarded as normal in the six years after the 1980 eruption.
In those years after Mount St. Helens literally blew its head off, more than a dozen lava eruptions built a rock dome inside the mountain's crater. That dome is now partially covered by a glacier, which is growing because the edges of the mountain crater shades snow and ice from summertime sun.
USGS scientists will keep a close eye on their instruments, Major said, and if seismic activity levels off for several consecutive days they may be able to conclude that the threat of more eruptions has passed.
Supporters of former Yugoslav president Slobodan Milosevic gave a hostile welcome Friday to chief UN war crimes prosecutor Carla Del Ponte as she visited Belgrade to attend a conference, witnesses said.
Riot police were on hand as a group of around 30 protesters gathered outside a Belgrade hotel where Del Ponte attended the start of a conference on war crimes, amid mounting pressure on Belgrade to hand over fugitive indictees.
The protesters waved banners in support of Milosevic, who is on trial at the UN war crimes court at The Hague for his role in the Balkan conflicts of the 1990s.
It is the prosecutor's first visit to Belgrade since October, when she delivered indictments against four Serbian generals charged with war crimes allegedly committed during the 1998-99 Kosovo conflict.
She is due to meet Serbian President Boris Tadic and Prime Minister Vojislav Kostunica during a return visit on Monday, when she is expected to demand the arrest of former Bosnian Serb commander Ratko Mladic and the four generals.
Her trip comes a day after US Undersecretary of State for Political Affairs Marc Grossman and the US senior envoy for war crimes, Pierre-Richard Prosper, visited Belgrade to step up pressure on Serbia to arrest war crimes suspects.
But despite the withholding of badly needed US aid and threats of sanctions, Kostunica has said the stability of the Balkan country is more important than arresting war crimes suspects.
He has also maintained that local courts should be able to prosecute war crimes cases which have yet to be heard at The Hague.
Del Ponte said cases could be transferred as early as next year but Serbian courts had to prove they were ready to handle them.
"Local prosecutors and judges have to be focused more and more on building capacity for domestic war crimes persecutions," she said, adding such cases would be "a very serious test" for domestic courts and institutions.
Grossman told reporters after meeting Serbian leaders that "the deadline was yesterday" for arresting Mladic, and warned Serbia it faced international isolation if it continued to obstruct the UN tribunal at The Hague.
Mladic and Bosnian Serb wartime leader Radovan Karadzic were charged in 1995 with genocide, war crimes and crimes against humanity in Bosnia's 1992-95 war.
A Belgrade court issued warrants for the arrest of the four generals earlier this week but they remain comfortably at large.
One of the four, police general Sreten Lukic, responded Thursday to a court summons and formally received the indictment, but he was not arrested, a court spokeswoman told AFP.
Spokeswoman Sonja Prostran said the former deputy interior minister was "informed about the charges and a demand on his transfer (to The Hague)."
Lukic was the chief of Serbian police forces in Kosovo under the overall command of then-Yugoslav president Milosevic.
The other three generals have failed to appear in court.
US volcano Mount St. Helens roared to life Friday, spewing a giant plume of steam and ash into the sky and raising fears of a new larger eruption.
After letting off steam from its lava cap in a spectacular natural display, the rumblings stopped and the huge cloud quickly dispersed.
But the burst of activity sent scientists scrambling to establish whether the volcano, which killed 57 people when it erupted dramatically 24 years ago, was holding another more powerful eruption in store.
US Geological Survey scientists said the eruption at 11:57am (1857 GMT) marked a "small explosion" following a week of intensifying earthquakes in the area.
"This was small explosive eruption from the lava dome that lasted for 24 minutes and generated a plume that rose up to a height of just under 10,000 feet (3,000 meters)," said USGS volcano and hydrology expert John Major.
"The eruption was predominantly steam but containing a little bit of ash," he said adding that there were no lava or mud flows from the crater and that the alert level in the region had not been raised.
The steam cloud poured from the southern edge of a 300-meter tall (1,000-foot) lava dome in the volcano's crater that has risen in recent days.
An area of two-to-four hectares (five to 10 acres) on the lava cap rose and fractured during the eruption, releasing glacial water and the column of steam, Major said. The last explosion from the dome took place in 1986.
The steam cloud drifted southwest from the mountain peak in southern Washington state and aviation officials warned aircraft in the area to avoid the plume, Federal Aviation Authority officials told AFP.
Seismic experts scrutinised the volcano from aircraft and from the mountainside to determine whether further eruptions were expected from the volcano that has been extremely active for more than 4,000 years.
"We are going to keep a very close eye on it," Major told journalists in Seattle, adding that the level of earthquake activity in the area would be a crucial indicator of what is to come.
"If the seismicity in the area does not ease off, it's a sign that it's not over yet. If we do not see anything over the coming days, then there is a good chance that that might be it," he said.
But another USGS expert Jeff Wynn warned that while the volcanic activity had ceased for the moment, it could come roaring back at any time.
"The history of this volcano suggests that this could be the opening salvo of more eruptions," he said adding that the small 1986 eruption was similar to the latest one.
Volcanic experts have been warning of a possible imminent eruption of Mount St Helens for several days as seismic activity in the area grew.
"This is exactly the eruption we predicted," the USGS's
A powerful car bomb exploded early Friday in the Lebanese capital of Beirut, injuring former Lebanese economy minister Marwan Hamadeh and killing his driver, local media quoted security sources as saying. The explosion occurred in the Lebanese capital's corniche area, where two US organizations, American Community School and the International College are located. (Lebanon-Car Bomb Explosion, 1st lead) - - - - GAZA -- At least six Palestinians were shot dead by Israeli troops' gunfire as the military operations in northern Gaza entered the third day Friday. Three Palestinians were killed and 10 others were injured by a missile fired from an Israeli Apache helicopter at the northern part of Jabalya refugee camp early Friday. (Palestinians-Israel- Killing) - - - - GAZA -- One Israeli soldier was killed on Friday when two Palestinian militants managed to reach Erez Crossing and one of them blew himself up, Palestinian security sources said. Hamas armed wing Izzedin al Qassam claimed responsibility for the bombing attack, saying in a leaflet that one of the two militants blew himself up and the other clashed with Israeli soldiers. (Palestinians-Israel-Suicide Bombing) - - - - BAGHDAD -- One US soldier was killed and four others wounded during a military operation launched by US and Iraqi forces to regain control of the rebel town of Samarra on Friday, the US military said. "One soldier of the 1st Infantry Division was killed at about 12:58 pm (0858 GMT) today as Iraqi Security Forces and Multi- National Forces (MNF) secured areas throughout Samarra on Oct. 1," the military said in a statement. (Iraq-US-Soldier-Killing, 1st lead) - - - - BAGHDAD -- US and Iraqi forces killed more than 100 rebels and captured 37 others in a major offensive to regain control of the Iraqi city of Samarra on Friday, Iraqi national security adviser Qassim Dawoud said. "The Iraqi National Guards backed by US forces launched the offensive according to calls from tribal leaders and people of the city," he told a news conference. (Iraq-Samarra-Arrests) - - - - GAZA -- Israeli army Apache attack helicopters fired at least two missiles on Friday night at a house belongs to a local family in one of Gaza City's neighborhoods, injuring several people, local witnesses said. Two explosions were heard at the Daraj neighborhood in al Sahaba street, said the witnesses, adding that dozens of people as well as ambulances rushed to the area to rescue survivals. (Palestinians- Israel-Airstrike, 1st LD) - - - - FALLUJAH -- US forces launched a new round of fierce air raids on Iraq's restive city of Fallujah late Friday, killing at least four people. Four houses in al-Jugayfi in east Fallujah were badly damaged and people drew out four bodies out of the debris, a Xinhua correspondent reported on the scene. (Iraq-Fallujah-Raid, 1st LD)
China's new anti-secession law will include belligerent wording likely to intimidate Taiwan, the target of the bill, according to a leaked version published by the island's media Wednesday.
At the same time, the bill does not include the key phrase "one country, two systems," the formula used for governing Hong Kong, which would be a non-starter with the Taiwan authorities.
The draft, published by Taiwan's United Daily News, calls for the use of "non-peaceful means and other necessary measures to protect China's sovereignty and territorial integrity," if everything else fails.
This will be necessary "in the event that the 'Taiwan independence' forces should act under any name or by any means to cause the fact of Taiwan's secession from China," the draft law said, according to the newspaper.
Non-peaceful means will also be employed if "major incidents entailing Taiwan's secession from China should occur, or (if) possibilities for a peaceful reunification should be completely exhausted," the draft said.
The draft law, as reported by the paper, does not spell out what is meant by "non-peaceful means," but analysts believe it would cover anything from blockade to surgical missile strikes and all-out invasion.
Wang Zhaoguo, a vice chairman of the National People's Congress (NPC), or parliament, on Tuesday outlined the basics of the new law in front of a full session of lawmakers.
A spokesman of the NPC, which is currently discussing the bill, declined Wednesday to either confirm or deny the report, saying he had not seen the draft himself.
Although the "one country, two systems" formula is carefully avoided in the draft, it describes a future for Taiwan that comes very close, according to the text published by the paper.
"After the country is reunified peacefully, Taiwan may practice systems different from those on the mainland and enjoy a high degree of autonomy," the draft said.
In Hong Kong, "one country, two systems" allows the city to govern itself in all areas apart from foreign policy and defense, at least in theory, although critics have blasted what they see as constant interference from Beijing.
Key points of the Kyoto Protocol:
The protocol obliges industrialized countries to cut or limit emissions of carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases by an average 5.2 percent from 1990 levels by 2012. These gases are believed to trap heat in the atmosphere, warming the Earth.
To take effect, the accord must be ratified by 55 countries responsible for 55 percent of global greenhouse gas emissions.
The United States rejected the Kyoto Protocol in 2001, saying it would harm its economy and that it unfairly favored developing countries.
The Kyoto Protocol would come into worldwide effect 90 days after receiving sufficient ratification.
Countries may offset the requirements by properly managing forests and farmlands that absorb carbon dioxide, known as carbon sinks. They can earn further credits by helping developing countries avoid carbon emissions.
The agreement allows for emissions trading _ buying and selling the right to pollute.
The signatory countries face mandatory punishment if they fail to meet their emission targets.
An employment agency has been indicted on charges of conspiring to use fake documents to get illegal immigrants jobs at the nation's top producer of the U.S. military's battlefield rations, federal prosecutors said Thursday.
The Tollin Group, which does business as Remedy Intelligent Staffing, is accused of hiring illegal immigrants and trying to cover it up by falsifying employment eligibility forms for Wornick Co., which makes the MREs _ or "meals ready-to-eat."
Wornick, which has not been charged, had subcontracted with the agency to provide temporary workers to fill a $67 million order of MREs that came just before the Iraq war.
U.S. Attorney Michael Shelby said the investigation followed January 2003 intelligence reports indicating al-Qaida may have planned to tamper with MREs for U.S. troops in Iraq. Shelby said investigators found no evidence of terrorist activity and no altered meals.
Nine employees have pleaded guilty to misdemeanor fraud for having false Social Security numbers and have been sentenced. Another employee pleaded guilty to a felony charge of fraudulent use of a Social Security card and will be sentenced Nov. 8.
San Antonio-based Tollin is accused of conspiracy. Company vice president James Eckensberger Jr. entered a not guilty plea on behalf of the company Thursday. He declined to comment.
Communist rebels have proposed holding peace talks later this month with the government of India's southern state of Andhra Pradesh, after a meeting was canceled because of the guerrillas' insistence that they be allowed to carry their weapons.
Emissaries for the People's War Group delivered a letter on Friday to K. Jana Reddy, home minister of Andhra Pradesh.
The letter _ seen by The Associated Press _ said senior leaders of the People's War Group, and a smaller rebel group Janashakti would come to the state capital of Hyderabad for talks on Oct. 13.
Reddy said he would consult with other state government leaders and announce early next week if the talks would take place this month.
Peace negotiations had been scheduled for Saturday, but were scrapped because of disagreement over the rebels' demand that they be permitted to bring weapons. The letter sent Friday made no comment on the issue.
The rebels have been fighting for 23 years in several parts of India, but most of the conflicts have occurred in Andhra Pradesh, where 6,000 people have died. The state government had outlawed them 13 years ago, but lifted the ban in June.
The rebels have targeted rich landowners, accusing them of exploiting landless farm workers. They also attacked police and administrative officials, saying they collude with landowners.
PULSE: FIGHTING FOR HER LIFE, ON LIFETIME Health news, for use on or after Monday, Oct. 4, for New York Times News Service clients.)
When Lisa Bronson of Sherman Oaks, Calif., was diagnosed with breast cancer in January, she agreed to have Lifetime Television Network's cameras follow her through treatment. Initial tests showed only microscopic traces of the disease, and she figured a lumpectomy would take care of it.
"First I had a lumpectomy, and they kept cutting and cutting and cutting," said Bronson, 44, the national sales director for Cydney Mandel Shoes. "The tumor was larger than expected, and I was going to have to have a mastectomy."
Although the cancer was confined to one breast, she elected to have a double mastectomy to reduce the chances of the cancer returning or growing in the other breast. Bronson, the single mother of a 17-year-old son, also endured months of chemotherapy and radiation treatments.
Her story will air at 11 a.m. Oct. 9 on Lifetime's "Speaking of Women's Health" with hosts Florence Henderson and Rachel Campos.
Despite the constant presence of the cameras, which followed Bronson at home, at work and to doctor visits, she said the crew wasn't intrusive.
"They were so respectful," she said. "(When I was at the doctor) they would turn their backs while I took my clothes off. They were part of it from the very beginning. I sort of tuned them out. I got to know them all very well. If something particularly painful or poignant was happening, they would turn around and go away."
In November, she'll have her last surgery, for breast reconstruction. Now she's taking Tamoxifen, an estrogen-inhibiting drug that is used to prevent breast cancer.
Bronson's decision to go public with her story has already caught the attention of the health community.
Later this month, the John Wayne Cancer Institute Auxiliary will bestow Bronson with the Ellen Cooperman "Angel" Award for her courage and openness in allowing her story to be televised.
Former auxiliary president Ina Lewis, who recently stepped down from her post, said Bronson's generosity in sharing her story could not go unrecognized.
"Here was a woman, an ordinary woman, who went in for a routine mammogram and found that she had a problem," Lewis said. "What she did really was give a gift to so many of us because she allowed her experience to be televised. She wanted everyone to know how important mammograms are."
The auxiliary's luncheon honoring Bronson will take place Thursday, Oct. 28 at the Regent Beverly Wilshire Hotel in Beverly Hills. Actress Donna Mills is expected to present the award. Tickets are $125 and all proceeds will benefit the John Wayne Cancer Institute. For more information, call (310) 829-8324 or visit www.jwci.org.
Bronson said the emotional support she received from her family and friends was instrumental in her fight against breast cancer. Now, she is helping others cope with the disease.
Since her diagnosis, three friends who underwent mammograms have learned they, too, have breast cancer.
"There's no such thing as going through this alone," Bronson said. "You have to rely on your friends and family. People are so wonderful, and strangers would come up to me and say, 'I had that haircut two years ago and you're going to be fine.' It's amazing, the outpouring of support and love." -- Nicole Sunkes
GETTING YOUR SHOT: Need a flu shot but don't know where to go? Visit www.lungusa.org, type in your ZIP code and find the nearest shot clinic within 50 miles of your home. The American Lung Association database includes more than 20,000 locations across the United States. -- Sherry Joe Crosby
DENTAL HEALTH: With tooth decay as the single most common chronic childhood disease in the U.S., instilling good brushing habits in children is a must for parents. Crest SpinBrush for Kids is a battery-operated toothbrush that comes in 12 different designs, including Spider-Man and Dora the Explorer. Available in retail stores nationwide for about $5.99 each. -- S.J.C.
HEART AND MIND: Breast cancer survivor Maureen Murray knows intimately the physical and emotional ravages of the disease. In "You Are Never Alone: Prayers and Meditations to Sustain You Through Breast Cancer" (Oncology Nursing Society; $16), she offers readers prayers, meditations and resources for support groups. The collection of 60 conversational prayers and 20 meditations is designed for every stage of the journey, including the surgical holding area and nighttime anxieties. Additionally, there is a resource section of support groups who accept prayer intentions. -- N.S.
Richard Avedon, whose high-profile fashion photography of the 1950s and 1960s was eclipsed in later years by his own distinctive and evocative portraits of the known and unknown, died Friday of a subdural hematoma at a hospital in San Antonio, where he was on a photo shoot for the New Yorker magazine. He was 81.
Avedon's New Yorker project, tentatively titled ''On Democracy'' and scheduled to run the week of the election, started out with pictures taken at the Democratic and Republican conventions, where Avedon had photographed Karl Rove, James Carville, former President Jimmy Carter and Illinois Senate candidate Barak Obama, among other delegates and speakers.
Avedon's stark and unsettling portraits have filled America's most prestigious magazines and museums for the past half-century. He was considered the world's most famous, and perhaps richest, photographer.
His celebrity subjects over the years included Pablo Picasso, Andy Warhol, Frank Lloyd Wright, Marilyn Monroe and hundreds of others. They were, as one photographer described them, ''pinned like butterflies'' on a seamless white background, staring at Avedon's big 8-by-10 Deardorf camera.
Ordinary Americans also were frequently the subject of his arresting, at times disturbing portraits.
The New Yorker project had grown in recent weeks to include ordinary people, including gun collectors in Winnemuca, Nev., two homeless men in Reno, Nev., soldiers at Fort Hood, Texas, and burn victims from the war in Iraq being treated at Brooke Army Medical Center in San Antonio. These were people whose lives were affected by the decisions of political leaders he portrayed at the Boston and New York conventions this summer.
Avedon began experiencing headaches and blurred vision while shooting tanks on Thursday at Fort Hood and was unable to continue the project.
He also had scheduled shootings for this week in Washington of Secretary of Defense Donald Rumsfeld, Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan and U.S. Chief Justice William Rehnquist.
For decades, Avedon was one of the nation's most celebrated fashion and portrait photographers. The way he captured women made several of them rich and famous. His early models included Dorian Leigh, Dorothy Horan (''Dovima'') and, perhaps most famous of all, Suzy Parker. He later worked with Lauren Hutton, Twiggy and Brooke Shields.
He was the first staff photographer hired by the New Yorker, a magazine that traditionally did not run photographs until Tina Brown took over as editor in 1992. His 1963 portrait of Malcolm X was the first full-page photograph published in the magazine.
Avedon described ''a separation between fashion and what I call my deeper work'' in a 1974 Newsday interview. ''Fashion is where I make my living. I'm not knocking it; it's a pleasure to make a living that way. ... Then there's the deeper pleasure of doing my portraits. ... I consider myself to be a portrait photographer.''
Richard Avedon was born in New York City. His father, Jacob Israel Avedon, was a Russian Jewish immigrant who grew up in a New York orphanage and later operated a successful retail clothing business called Avedon's Fifth Avenue.
As a boy, Avedon was casually interested in photography and kept a scrapbook of photos that his father consulted for the dress business.
He and a cousin sometimes sat outside the service entrance of their grandparents' apartment listening to music coming from the apartment of another of the building's residents, the famed Russian composer-pianist Sergei Rachmaninoff.
''Maybe that's where I learned about discipline and what's beautiful about rigor, what's compelling about craft, those months listening to him going over and over one phrase,'' Avedon told a reporter.
He dropped out of high school at 17 and found a job as an errand boy with a small New York photographic company, even as he dreamed of being a poet. He joined the Merchant Marine in 1942, and with a Rolleiflex camera his father had given him as a going-away gift, he applied to the Merchant Marine's photography branch.
When he left the Merchant Marine in 1944, he found work with Bonwit Teller, one of New York's most fashionable department stores. About a year later, he took a portfolio of his work to Harper's Bazaar and was hired for the Junior Bazaar section.
Avedon set about changing the look of fashion photography. He moved his models out of the studio -- to the beach, the zoo, a circus, the waterfront, a junkyard, the pyramids of Egypt -- and had them drop the frozen-faced mannequin look. When he was in the studio, he eliminated props and backgrounds, an approach he would use to singular advantage in years to come.
More than 80 portraits of the famous -- including Mae West, Bert Lahr, Marian Anderson, Louis Armstrong and Charlie Chaplin -- were compiled in the 1959 book ''Observations'' (Simon & Schuster), with comments by Truman Capote.
Although his portraits had been represented in various group shows over the years, including Edward Steichen's ''The Family of Man'' at New York's Museum of Modern Art in 1955, it was a 1962 Smithsonian Institution exhibit that began the shift in how the critics viewed his work.
By the mid-1960s, Avedon was the hottest fashion photographer in town. Revlon, Pabst, Maidenform, Cartier and Douglas Aircraft were among the high-profile companies clamoring for his signature look.
Avedon served as staff photographer with Harper's Bazaar from 1946 to 1965. He worked in the same capacity for Vogue from 1966 to 1970.
''In a field where something new and flashy is needed every season, Avedon was at the top of his game for over 40 years,'' said Arthur Ollman, director of the Museum of Photographic Arts in San Diego. ''The way we see fashion, and ultimately the way we have pictured women, was totally altered by Richard Avedon. And it was not just any 40 years, but it was the 40 years in which feminism came into the public consciousness.''
In the summer of 1970, the Minneapolis Institute of Arts mounted a comprehensive exhibit of Avedon photographs, said to be the largest exhibit ever devoted to the work of a single photographer. A highlight of the show was a collection of portraits of the Chicago Seven defendants in the 1969 conspiracy trial of New Left activists.
Pamela Maffei McCarthy, Avedon's editor at the New Yorker, said portraiture is a tricky business. ''It's very difficult to go behind the facade,'' she said. ''He was able to get the inside out, and uniquely so. He was able to expose character.''
Beginning in the late 1970s, Avedon spent five summers trekking across 17 states to photograph more than 700 people who, in his view, represented the American West.
Commissioned by Fort Worth's Amon Carter Museum, ''In the American West'' offered 120 powerful and affecting portraits of ''ordinary, hardworking people.'' Photographed in harsh light that exposed every sag, wrinkle and blemish, they included miners, drifters, carnies, bartenders, waitresses, oil field roustabouts. Perhaps the most memorable was a pale, nearly hairless beekeeper with thousands of bees forming dark, freeform tattoos on his bare torso.
In Richard Avedon's West, there was no John Wayne, no Gary Cooper, no Marlboro Man. ''This is about a class,'' he told The Washington Post. ''It's about very hard times, very long hours, hard work, unrewarding lives with very little expectation of upward mobility.''
Laura Wilson, a Dallas photographer who worked for six years as Avedon's assistant on ''In the American West'' and the latest New Yorker project, described him as ''beyond extraordinary, when I first met him and in these last two years. There was enormous energy, enormous enthusiasm and an enormous obsession with the work itself.''
In a 2002 exhibit, the Metropolitan Museum of Art offered 180 portraits Avedon had done from the late 1940s through the end of the century. Curator Maria Morris Hambourg said, ''By dint of progressive challenges to himself, Richard Avedon has not only distilled photographic portraiture to its irreducible core, but has also produced an extended meditation on life, death, art and identity.''
Avedon's final New Yorker project was in some ways an updating of a 1976 Rolling Stone assignment, called ''The Family'' and shot during that year's presidential campaign.
''He was interested in the politics of the moment. He wasn't a nostalgist,'' New Yorker editor David Remnick said. ''He saw this as a serious political moment, and he wanted to get in the middle of it in the way that he could.''
The photographs will run as scheduled and will include color and black-and-white images.
''He had the energy of five hummingbirds,'' Remnick said. ''We were getting an enormous amount of new work right up until this morning.''
Avedon married and later divorced Dorcas Nowell, a model, who became known professionally as Doe Avedon. He married Evelyn Franklin in 1951 and later separated.
Survivors include a son from the second marriage, John Avedon of New York City, and five grandchildren.
(Begin optional add end)
In 1974, Avedon told Newsday: ''I can see myself as a very old man in a terrific wheelchair. Only, I won't be photographing the tree outside my window, the way Steichen did. I'll be photographing other old people.''
As it turned out, the octogenarian photographer was shooting Army tank drivers, injured soldiers and, yet again, ordinary people in the American West and Southwest.
''He had the greatest life for doing what he wanted to do,'' said Wilson, who was with him when he lapsed into a coma. ''And to do it this way, where he was going full tilt to the very end, that's how he would have wanted it.''
Speaking to Wall Street for the first time since the Walt Disney Co. board vowed to find his successor by June, Chief Executive Michael Eisner said Tuesday that he planned to leave the company so robust that it would thrive for years after he leaves.
''It's in my interest that when I leave the company, it's in good enough shape that it will take a decade to screw it up,'' Eisner said at an investor conference hosted by Goldman Sachs in New York.
In a 40-minute question-and-answer session, Eisner delivered his characteristically upbeat assessment of Disney's prospects, pointing to a recovery in theme parks, gains at the ESPN sports cable powerhouse and the company's consumer products unit.
But even as he summarized Disney's outlook, the topic of succession was on his mind. ''By the way, I am not going to succeed Sumner,'' he joked, referring to Viacom Inc. CEO Sumner Redstone, who has said he would step down within two years. Eisner drew chuckles when he added: ''Although, he is on the short list for Disney.''
Eisner announced last month he would resign at the end of his contract in September 2006, capping a tumultuous year in which he fended off a shareholder revolt by investors unhappy with his management and the company's long-term performance.
On Tuesday, however, Eisner portrayed Disney as a company on the rebound. He repeated earlier forecasts that Disney earnings would rise by more than 50 percent in the fiscal year that ended Sept. 30, and that the company would enjoy double-digit earnings growth over the next several years.
Aiding the growth will be Disney theme parks, which are benefiting from an upsurge in tourism that plummeted after the Sept. 11 attacks, he said. ''We've recovered from the hurricanes amazingly,'' he said, referring to the recent spate of storms that walloped Florida.
Eisner also pointed to a turnaround in Disney's licensed merchandise business -- whose new Princess line alone generated $2 billion in sales -- and improvements at the ABC-TV network. The network is enjoying its strongest fall debut in years, garnering strong ratings for such new shows as ''Desperate Housewives'' and ''Lost.''
''There's a lot of high-fiving going on at ABC,'' Eisner said.
Eisner did not directly address Disney's relationship with its longtime partner Pixar Animation Studios, creator of the blockbusters ''Toy Story'' and ''Finding Nemo.'' This year Pixar ended talks to extend its partnership with Disney. It has two more films to deliver under its current deal: ''The Incredibles,'' which debuts Nov. 5, and ''Cars,'' which is due next year.
With or without Pixar, Eisner said, Disney will make two more ''Toy Story'' movies. Disney aims to become a major player in the competitive computer animation business, he said.
''It's our legacy and our heritage,'' he said.Disney shares rose 34 cents to $23.88 on the New York Stock Exchange, a 2 1/2-month high.
A birdie blitz catapulted Ernie Els to the top of the leaderboard at the WGC American Express championship here on Friday.
The South African, who had warned before the tournament that he was raring to go after a two week lay-off, opened his second round with four straight birdies to move to seven-under and one ahead of first round leader Todd Hamilton who had just teed off.
Els reached the turn in 31 when he birdied the ninth but the gap with Hamilton remained at one as the American birdied his second hole.
But then Els moved to nine-under with a birdie at the 10th and the gap widened to two.
But with still eight holes to play, Els still had plenty of work left to do to keep his place atop the leaderboard.
Unlike on Thursday when conditions were ideal, the players were having to compete with driving rain squalls which were interupted from time to time with a brief glimpse of the sun.
The early morning starters saw none of the sun as rain poured down but despite the conditions Fred Couple shot a brilliant five-under 67 to move to four-under for the tournament.
Sergio Garcia, who began the day only one back of the lead, got the worst possible start when he dropped his drive on the par three third into the pond guarding the green.
The Spaniard ran up a double bogey and was suddenly five behind the charging Els.
Tiger Woods, still clearly suffering from the shoulder injury that dogged him on Thursday, continued to fight through the pain. Two birdies after only seven holes took him to six-under and firmly in touch as he chases his third straight win in the championship.
Ireland's Padraig Harrington was giving the local fans brave enough to battle the elements something to smile about as he was two-under for his round after 12 holes.
It put the world number eight at five-under.
Angel Cabrera was on one of his famed hot streaks as he carded three birdies after only eight holes to go to six-under.
With the green softened by the rain, birdies were there to be had but American Chad Campbell, who started his second round at two-under par, found himself racing back down the leaderboard as he collected two double bogeys in his opening three holes. Another at the ninth and suddenly Campbell reached the turn seven-over for his round and four-over for the championship.
Thailand's Thongchai Jaidee, struggling in the rain, went out in five-over 41 but a hole-in-one at the 169-yard 11th gave him something to finally smile about.
It was his second hole-in-one in Europe this year. Earlier he had holed in one at the PGA Championship at Wentworth.

Scientists who compared frogs collected over the past 150 years have discovered a dramatic increase in hermaphrodites during the times when contamination from the pesticide DDT and other organochlorine chemicals was widespread.
Frogs with both male and female reproductive organs were rare in the 19th century and early 20th century but abundant during the 1950s, when the largest volumes of the popular chemicals were used.
The findings, reported Tuesday in the journal Environmental Health Perspectives, adds to the growing evidence that a variety of pesticides and industrial chemicals can alter the sex hormones of animals.
The ability of chemicals to mimic or block estrogen and testosterone, which are critical for normal sexuality and reproduction, is considered one of the most disturbing discoveries in environmental science of the past decade.
Scientists believe that the phenomenon has been occurring for decades but wasn't documented in wildlife until the early 1990s, when it was observed first in Florida alligators and then many other species.
Toxicologists and veterinarians at the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign, led by Amy Reeder, examined the reproductive organs of 814 cricket frogs collected in Illinois between 1852 and 2001 and stored at natural history museums.
Studying endocrine disruption of animals dating back over a century is novel.
Cricket frogs, once abundant, declined dramatically around Chicago and other regions in the 1960s, and the scientists found that the times and places with high rates of hermaphrodites, also called intersexes, overlapped with when and where the frogs disappeared in Illinois.
The scientists theorize that DDT, industrial compounds called PCBs, and other contaminants had an anti-estrogenic effect, reducing the proportion of females and causing them to develop skewed sex organs, triggering a population crash, particularly in the Chicago region.
Frogs and other amphibians have been vanishing worldwide over the past few decades.
''These guys have been around a long time, since before the dinosaurs, and they are declining all over the place,'' said Val Beasley, a co-author of the study and a professor of ecotoxicology at the university's College of Veterinary Medicine. ''Endocrine disruptors seem to be a factor, but certainly not the only factor.''
Frogs are considered a key sentinel for effects of environmental degradation because they undergo a vulnerable time of metamorphosis and spend most of their time in water, where pollutants accumulate. Environmental Health Perspectives science editor Jim Burkhart said frogs ''may show the effects of ecological change more quickly or more obviously than other species.''
The new study has limitations. The team did not measure individual animals for contaminants because archived samples cannot be reliably tested. As a result, there could be other explanations for the hermaphrodites, such as factory and vehicle emissions or other environmental changes. Also, the scientists could not compare frogs from the same lakes or ponds over time.
The highest rates of intersex animals were found in frogs collected from 1946 through 1959, when large volumes of DDT were used for mosquito control in Illinois. The area around Chicago had four times more intersex frogs than southern Illinois.
Between 1852 and 1929, one intersex frog was found in the 84 collected. Then, beginning in the 1930s, the intersex rate increased. Between 1946 and 1959, 17 out of 153, or 11 percent, were intersex.
Recent rates of hermaphrodites were the lowest of any period studied except for 1852-1929. Out of 339 collected from 1980 through 1996, there were nine intersex frogs, or less than 3 percent. DDT and PCBs (polychlorinated biphenyls) were banned in the 1970s in the United States and although they remain in the environment, levels are low now in most areas.
Nevertheless, the scientists reported, ''we cannot conclude that the era of endocrine disruption in cricket frogs has come to an end.'' The severity of the current problem is unknown, Beasley said, ''because you can't collect where the intersex rate was high. There aren't any frogs left in those areas to collect.'' Also, males still outnumber females, while it was the opposite before 1930.
Atrazine, a herbicide widely used today on corn, might also contribute to the sexuality problems and decline of the frogs, the report says. Beasley said the intersex rate in central Illinois, where atrazine is used, is twice as high as in the southern areas, where atrazine use is low.
Arsenal manager Arsene Wenger on Friday dismissed the reported bust-up between his two major players as just "a storm in a tea cup".
There had been reports that Arsenal captain Patrick Vieira and Cameroon defender Lauren had to be separated by Norwegian police after they almost came to blows on the team bus following a 1-1 Champions League draw with Rosenborg in Trondheim on Thursday night.
Wenger admitted that there was an incident on the team bus, but it was a very minor incident.
"It was a disagreement between Patrick and Lauren. But it was nothing that needed the intervention of the police," Wenger told a routine press conference at the club's training ground.
The Frenchman also saw the positive from the incident, saying that it showed the players still have burning desire for victories.
"It is not the first incident we have and I hope it will not be the last because it shows the players desire to improve," said Wenger.
The incident was thought to have taken place due to the argument over the defending which allowed Rosenborg to score their 52nd minute equalizer.
But Wenger refused to be drawn on what led to the argument, stressing the need to respect the privacy belonging to the team.
"If I ask what was going on in a disagreement in your family, do you come and say it?" asked Wenger.
Wenger also ruled out any action against either player, because he saw nothing wrong with them in terms of team discipline.
"I would be more likely to take action if they didn't care ( about the match result).
"I like the fact that they come out with their feelings on professional issues. There are two attitudes you can take, either you hide and talk behind their back, or you come out and say 'don' t do that'. I like the second attitude even if it goes a bit further than you would wish sometimes."
Top European news stories for Saturday:    NewYear-worldwrap    VATICAN CITY: Pope John Paul II remembered the tens of thousands killed by tsunamis in Asia in his New Year greetings after revellers around the world lit candles and observed moments of silence before seeing in 2005.    Asia-quake-health-WHO    GENEVA: The first signs of potentially deadly diseases are threatening survivors in areas hit by killer tidal waves in Asia, the World Health Organisation said.    Ukraine-vote    KIEV: Ukraine moved closer to ending its weeks-long electoral crisis after Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich resigned and all but admitted having lost the December 26 presidential rerun vote.    Turkmenistan-Ukraine-Russia-gas-energy    ASHGABAT: The Central Asian republic of Turkmenistan said it had carried out a threat to cut gas supplies to Russia and Ukraine but was ready to turn the pumps back on in exchange for higher prices.    Asia-quake-Nordics-mourning    STOCKHOLM: Sweden, Finland and Norway held an official day of mourning for the more than 125,000 victims of the tsunamis in Asia, with thousands of Nordic holiday-makers feared to be among the dead.    Asia-quake-aid-Austria-concert    VIENNA: The New Year classical music concert broadcast from the Austrian capital Vienna every year went ahead but was marked by mourning for the victims of south Asia's killer tsunami.    Germany-economy-politics-social-labour-reform    BERLIN: A sweeping reform of welfare payments that aims to cut long-term unemployment went into effect, with protesters expected to hit the streets in more than 30 German cities Monday.    Italy-politics-Berlusconi    ROME: Italian Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi said he felt fine after he was slightly injured in an attack in a Rome square on New Year's Eve when a young Italian man hurled his camera tripod at him.    Turkey-economy-forex-money-reform    ANKARA: Turkey ushered in the new year with a new currency, scrapping the multi-million-lira banknotes that had bewildered tourists and embarrassed government officials and ordinary citizens during decades of hyperinflation.    Asia-quake-religion-youth-Taize-Portugal    LISBON: A five-day gathering of more than 40,000 young adults from across Europe at a festival of spiritual reflection wrapped up in Portugal with renewed prayers for the victims of the devastating Asian earthquake and tsunami.
The Philippine stocks went down 27. 10 points Tuesday due to profit-taking with some stocks being overbought, dealers said.
The main index tumbled 27.10 points, or 1.3419 percent, to close below the 2,000 support level at 1,992.46.
The mining and oil sectors advanced while the all-shares, commercial-industrial, property, bank and financial services subindicators retreated.
Traders assured that this is just a technical correction and that there are no bad news right now to drag the market lower.
They said the peso's strong performance and the decision of the California Public Employees' Retirement System (CALPERS) to retain the Philippines on its list of investment areas may even inspire some bargain-hunting in the coming sessions.
The day's most active was telecom giant Philippine Long Distance Telephone Co., or PLDT, which dropped 10 pesos to 1,415 pesos per share. Its rival, Globe Telecom, also closed lower by 5 pesos at 920 pesos.
The country's banking stocks also succumbed to profit-taking.
Tokyo stocks ended flat Tuesday in directionless trading, with investors finding it difficult to chase higher prices ahead of a slew of potential market-moving events overseas.
The 225-issue Nikkei Stock Average inched down 3.19 points, or 0.03 percent, to 11,384.40.
The broader Tokyo Stock Price Index of all First Section issues on the Tokyo Stock Exchange edged up 0.35 point, or 0.03 percent, to 1,146.71.
Losers outnumbered winners 777 to 673, with 150 issues ending unchanged.
Trading was active primarily due to short-term traders, with 1, 741.14 million shares changing hands on the TSE's main section, up from Monday's 1,583.58 million.
The main decliners were warehousing and harbor transport services, oil and coal, securities, metal and construction issues.
Among notable winners were high-tech, pulp and paper, air transport, marine transport, steel and chemical sectors.
Mitsubishi Tokyo Financial Group was the most heavily traded issue by value, up 1,000 yen to 978,000 yen.
Resona Holdings was the volume leader, up 1 yen to 212 yen.
The TSE's Second Section index rose 15.53 points, or 0.48 percent, to 3,268.09 on a volume of 73.33 million shares. In Osaka, the near-term March Nikkei 225 index futures contract was down 10 points to 11,360.
The government of Bosnia- Herzegovina on Monday asked  the US administration to release four Bosnian citizens held in the US military detention center in Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, reports from Sarajevo said.
The government said in a statement that the four men, all Algerians with Bosnian citizenship, were arrested in October 2001 by the Bosnian police on suspected involvement in planning attacks on US and British embassies in Sarajevo and connection with al- Qaida. But the four were freed soon due to lack of evidence.
The Bosnia government arrested the four again in January 2002 at the request of the US government and transferred them to the US prison in Guantanamo.
In 2003, Bosnia's human rights tribunal announced that the Bosnian authorities trampled on human rights when the four were transferred to the United States without enough evidence.
Market exchange rates of four major currencies against RMB yuan for Wednesday, announced by the People 's Bank of China: Currency          Unit   Middle Price (in RMB yuan) US Dollar         100        827.65 Euro              100       1079.67 Japanese Yen      100        7.9683 Hong Kong Dollar  100        106.07 The rates are mainly based on the closing prices of the previous trading session on China's interbank market of foreign exchange. Exchange rates of other convertible currencies against RMB yuan on the interbank market are based on these rates and changes in the international exchange markets.
German paympany-results-Premiere
Following are the standings after National Basketball Association games played on Monday: EASTERN CONFERENCE ATLANTIC DIVISION W  L  PCT  GB Boston            29 28 .509   - Philadelphia      26 29 .473   2 New Jersey        25 32 .439   4 Toronto           24 32 .429   4 1/2 New York          24 33 .421   5 CENTRAL DIVISION Detroit           35 19 .648   - Cleveland         31 24 .564   4 1/2 Chicago           29 24 .547   5 1/2 Indiana           28 27 .509   7 1/2 Milwaukee         23 31 .426  12 SOUTHEAST DIVISION Miami             42 16 .724   - Washington        31 24 .564   9 1/2 Orlando           28 27 .509  12 1/2 Charlotte         11 42 .208  28 1/2 Atlanta           10 45 .182  30 1/2 WESTERN CONFERENCE SOUTHWEST DIVISION San Antonio       43 13 .768   - Dallas            38 17 .691   4 1/2 Houston           32 24 .571  11 Memphis           31 25 .554  12 New Orleans       11 45 .196  32 NORTHWEST DIVISION Seattle           38 16 .704   - Minnesota         28 29 .491  11 1/2 Denver            27 29 .482  12 Portland          22 32 .407  16 Utah              19 37 .339  20 PACIFIC DIVISION Phoenix           43 14 .754   - Sacramento        36 21 .632   7 LA Lakers         28 27 .509  14 LA Clippers       25 32 .439  18 Golden State      16 39 .291  26 TUESDAY, MARCH 1 SCHEDULE Golden State at Memphis Sacramento at Charlotte Seattle at Indiana Philadelphia at Milwaukee Houston at Chicago Atlanta at Denver Detroit at Portland
Taiwan share prices closed 0.84 percent higher in active trade Tuesday on rotational interest, as investors shifted funds away from the bellwether electronics stocks into other sectors, dealers said.
They said the market continued the positive tone sparked last week by President Chen Shui-bian's more conciliatory stand on relations with China and is now well established above the key 6,000 points level.
The weighted index closed up 51.86 points at 6,259.69, off a low of 6,207.78 and a high of 6,260.32, on turnover of 103.47 billion Taiwan dollars (3.32 billion US). The market was closed Monday for a public holiday.
Risers led decliners 481 to 423, while 87 stocks closed unchanged.
A total of 14 stocks closed limit-up and 23 limit-down.
The plastics/petrochemical sector was up 3.82 percent, construction rose 3.73 percent, paper 1.61 percent, textiles 1.46 percent, cement 1.46 percent, financials 1.12 percent and food added 0.92 percent.
The electronics sector lost 0.22 percent.
"The market extended Friday's firmer tone, thanks to a shift of investor interest to shares outside the electronics sector, which managed to hold up relatively well rather than suffer a major decline," said Alvin Teng, a SinoPac Securities assistant vice president.
"It deserves special note that select electronics majors, led by flat-panel companies, did not come out that weak," he said.
Such rotational play could prove healthy and lead to a further gradual rise in share prices in the coming sessions, Teng said.
"What really matters will be what happens next. That is, it remains to be seen if electronics can regain momentum if and when the non-electronics shares also lose steam," he added.
Members of the Formosa Plastics group posted strong gains due to a fresh rise in oil prices that will boost the prices of their products.
Formosa Plastics was up 2.20 Taiwan dollars at 59.20, Nan Ya Plastics up 1.35 at 48.80 and Formosa Chemicals up 3.80 at 65.80.
Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Co. lost 0.70 at 54.30 while rival United Microelectronics Corp was down 0.40 at 20.40.
AU Optronics was up 1.15 at 49.80 and Chi Mei Optoelectronics up 0.60 at 49.00, benefitting from the interest in flat panel makers.
DRAM makers were lower due to a continued decline in chip prices. Powerchip was down 0.50 at 25.60 and ProMOS down 0.20 at 13.80.
Chinatrust Financial was up 0.35 at 37.50.
Malaysian share prices closed 0.98 percent lower Tuesday, below the 900-points psychological barrier, on program selling of blue chips by foreign funds, dealers said.
The Kuala Lumpur Composite Index lost 8.89 points at 898.49, off a high of 906.22 and a low of 894.57.
PLO chairman Mahmud Abbas, favourite to win next week's Palestinian elections, on Saturday decided to go ahead with a campaign visit to the southern Gaza Strip despite earlier saying it had been cancelled.
Abbas had said that he had cancelled the visit in protest at intensified Israeli army activity in the territory.
But an official from Abbas' campaign team told AFP that "Mr Abbas is heading towards the south of the Gaza Strip after rethinking his decision to cancel the visit owing to Israeli army aggression."
Eleven Palestinians have been killed by the Israeli army since Wednesday in Khan Yunis in the south of the Gaza Strip in an operation which the army says aims to thwart Palestinian rocket and mortar firing at Gaza's settlements.
Two other Palestinians were also killed Friday in Rafah, further to the south.
Sex between men has become a significant cause of HIV infections in China but half of Chinese gays mistakenly believe they are safe from the virus, according to a first-ever government survey.
The survey estimated there were five to 10 million gay men in China and that 1.35 percent of them were infected with the HIV virus that causes AIDS, according to the Xinhua news agency Wednesday.
Infection rates among gay men were expected to rise rapidly unless prevention efforts were undertaken because many of them have extremely limited knowledge of the disease, practise unprotected sex and have multiple sex partners, experts said.
"Gay people have been ignored for a long time in China and this is very dangerous," said Lu Fan, head of China's Center for Disease Control and Prevention's center of AIDS control and prevention, which carried out the study.
Half of the previously little-studied group have more than one sex partner and casual, unprotected sex is common. Some men have more than 100 partners, said Lu.
But just as many believe they are free from HIV/AIDS, the survey found.
They also risk spreading the disease to women because many of them are married or have female partners, said experts.
Social stigma keeps many gay men in the closet, with many getting married to avoid social pressure.
Outreach and studies of the group are difficult because many gays shy away from revealing their sexual preference for fear of discrimination, said Lu.
Information for the survey was collected from pubs, parks, public bathhouses and Internet cafes where gays congregate.
Male homosexuals comprised 11 percent of China's HIV cases in 2003, according to government figures. Drug injection was the chief transmission route, followed by commercial blood donors, sexual contact among heterosexuals and gay sex.
While China maintains it has an estimated 840,000 HIV/AIDS sufferers as of late 2003, international AIDS experts say the actual number is much higher.
Without strong government efforts to address the epidemic, the World Health Organisation has predicted that the numbers of Chinese infected with HIV/AIDS could grow to 10 million by 2010.
The radical Hamas group announced on Wednesday that it would boycott the presidential election due on Jan. 9, 2005.
Speaking to reporters, senior Hamas leader Isma'eel Haneya said that his movement made a decision to boycott the election.
He also called for holding together the presidential election, legislative election and local election.
Cyprus is to host the world's leading forum on maritime economics next year, local press reported Wednesday.
The International Association of Maritime Economists (IAME) said the 2005 IAME annual conference, slated for June 23-25, will be hosted by the Cyprus International Institute of Management (CIIM).
The major sponsor of the conference will be the island's Limassol-based Inter-orient Navigation Company, with the support of the Merchant Shipping Department of Cyprus.
"The IAME annual conference is key to understand the global shipping industry," Photis M. Panayides, a professor of marketing and shipping Management at CIIM, was quoted as saying.
"It is the only forum bringing together state-of-the-art international research and practice in shipping, from marketing and management to finance and logistics," the professor said.
Over 200 participants from around the world are expected to attend the meeting, which will focus on efficiency, productivity and competitiveness of the shipping industry in Cyprus and worldwide.
As a leading ship management centre with the world's fifth largest fleet, the Cyprus shipping industry is a world player and a major contributor to the island's gross domestic product (GDP).
Cyprus has great expertise in shipping operations and services, and this conference is a major opportunity to showcase its achievement.
IAME was founded by a group of maritime economists in 1991, with a permanent secretariat at Victoria University in Melbourne, Australia.
The IAME Council approved a decision to hold the 2005 conference in Cyprus during this year's meeting in the Turkish city of Izmir.
Chinese President Hu Jintao said here Saturday that the year of 2005 will be of crucial importance for China in its drive to "build a relatively prosperous society" in face of opportunities and challenges arising from both domestic and international fields.
Hu, also general secretary of the Central Committee of the Communist Party of China (CPC), made the remarks at a New Year tea party held by the National Committee of the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference Saturday morning, attended by leaders from all political parties, as well as noted figures representing people from different walks of life.
After reviewing China's social and economic achievements in the past year, Hu said that "we are faced with opportunities that need to be tightly grasped and challenges to be seriously handled" under the conditions that China's social and economic development has entered a crucial stage and profound changes are undergoing in the international arena.
Top on his work agenda is "fast and healthy" economic development this year.
"In the new year, we shall continue to strengthen and improve macro-economic control, speed up reform and opening up process for the transformation of mode of economic expansion, so as to maintain fast and healthy development of national economy," Hu said.
He pledged to advance socialist democracy by upholding the leadership of the Party, ensuring that the people have the final say on state affairs under the principle of rule of law. "Our socialist democracy shall be further expanded and the socialist legal framework better composed."
For the building of a harmonious society, the Communist Party of China and the government shall function by the mandate of the people, empathize with the feelings of the people, work for the well-being of the people, do its best to solve difficulties of the people and properly handle various conflicting interests in the society, the president said.
"The CPC is built for the public and exercises the state power for the people," Hu stressed. The Party shall launch a nationwide campaign to educate its members for the improvement of its ruling capacity.
On the issue of Taiwan, Hu said that China will adhere to the fundamental policy of "peaceful reunification and one country, two systems" and the Eight-Point Proposal on the process to develop cross-Straits relations and propel the peaceful reunification of the motherland in the present period," adding that the mainland will continue "to promote cross-Straits exchanges in personnel and economic and cultural spheres and maintain stability of the cross- Straits situations.
"Here I once again reiterate that we will strive for the prospect of peaceful reunification with the utmost sincerity and effort," he said.
He called for resuming cross-Straits talks and negotiation based on the one-China principle as early as possible.
"We, however, will never allow anyone to separate Taiwan from China in any form, and the Chinese government and Chinese people will never hesitate to safeguard China's sovereignty and territorial integrity," he said.
The central government will in the new year adhere to the policies of "one country, two systems," "Hong Kong people governing Hong Kong" and "Macao People governing Macao" with a high degree of autonomy, Hu said.
China will uphold the banner of peace, development and cooperation, continue to pursue its long-standing independent foreign policy of peace in its road of peaceful development, Hu said, adding that China will work with people all over the world for the establishment of a new world political and economic order and the promotion of peace and development.
He also encouraged the CPPCC to play a bigger role in coming up with new ideas and suggestions and supervise the Party and the government in its daily work.
Following are the standings of the Israeli Premier League on Saturday (tabulated under games played, won, drawn, lost, goals for, against, points): 1. Maccabi Haifa       14 11  3  0 37  7  36 2. Ashdod SC           14  8  2  4 19 14  26 3. Maccabi Petah Tikva 14  5  7  2 14  7  22 4. Maccabi Tel Aviv    15  6  4  5 14 16  22 5. Bnei Yehuda         15  6  3  6 16 23  21 6. Betar Jerusalem     15  5  4  6 21 22  19 7. Upper Nazareth      15  4  6  5 21 23  18 8. Hapoel Petah Tikva  15  4  5  6 14 19  17 9. Bnei Sakhnin        15  4  4  7 21 23  16 10. Hapoel Beer Sheva   15  3  7  5 18 27  16 11. Hapoel Haifa        15  3  4  8 12 22  13 12. Hapoel Tel Aviv     14  3  3  8 13 17  12
China's latest white paper on national defense lists "the vicious rise of the 'Taiwan independence' forces" as one of the factors having major impact on China's security, which experts said is an objective assessment of China's current security situation.
The 85-page white paper, the fifth of its kind since 1995, was titled "China's National Defense in 2004" and released last Monday by the Information Office of the State Council, China's cabinet.
The paper says, "The separatist activities of the 'Taiwan independence' forces have increasingly become the biggest immediate threat to China's sovereignty and territorial integrity as well as peace and stability on both sides of the Taiwan Straits and the Asia-Pacific region as a whole."
Referring to the above statement, Chen Zhou, a military expert involved in drafting four defense white papers, said it reflected the current "grim" situation as "'Taiwan independence' forces have gone too far on their way."
The variance, slight or significant, in the statements about Taiwan issue in earlier defense white papers mirrors what the situation is like, Chen said.
Recalling the defense white paper issued in 1998, Chen said that the Taiwan issue constituted a small part of China's security situation outlined in the paper, adding that year's defense policy didn't touch upon Taiwan at all, but said "China must have the capability to safeguard sovereignty, unity and safety."
Against the background that Lee Teng-hui, then Taiwan's leader, came up with a "two states" theory in 1999 in an attempt to split the country, China's defense white paper the following year devoted much more space to the Taiwan issue, Chen said.
"The paper correspondingly described the Taiwan Straits situation as 'complicated and grim'and for the first time laid down the specific defense policy about Taiwan and  affirmed determination and responsibility of the Chinese People's Liberation Army (PLA)," Chen noted.
The term "PLA" is replaced by "China's armed forces" in the latest defense white paper, Chen said. "This is because 'China's armed forces' refers to a larger defense force, including PLA in both active and reserve services, armed police and militia."
Chen lauded the adoption of this term, as it "specifies in a precise way China's defense forces' responsibility in fighting ' Taiwan independence' forces."
The white paper also offers the possibility of cross-Straits talk, including the establishment of a confidence-building mechanism (CBM) in the military field, Chen stated.
According to Chen, "CBM in the military field" refers to the measures aiming at improved security environment, including cross- Straits military exchanges, transparency-building, restriction and check measures, setting up hotlines and information notification system between militaries cross the straits.
"This is the first time for a white paper to include a cross- Straits military CBM," Chen added.
Shen Jiru, an expert with Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, said, "China builds up its image as an open and responsible big nation by making public its evaluation of security situation and defense policy, which also work as a deterrent to forces that are hostile or attempt to pose threats to China's security.
Canada has another confirmed case of bovine spongiform encephalopathy (BSE), or mad cow disease, Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) said Sunday.
A final laboratory test has confirmed the case in a dairy farm in Canada's western province of Alberta, according to veterinary officials with the CFIA.
"The infected animal was detected through the recently enhanced national surveillance program. Additional cases may be found as testing of high-risk cattle continues," the agency said in a news release on its website.
"The CFIA is continuing its investigation and has determined the infected animal's farm of origin. Efforts are now under way to identify any other animals of similar risk."
The results confirmed preliminary tests released earlier this week. Officials with the CFIA said the infected cow did not enter the human food or animal feed supply and posed no risk to the public.
The confirmed case turned up just days after the United States announced plans to reopen its border to live young cattle from Canada after a 19-month ban which has brought about economic loss of billions of dollars.
On Wednesday, the US Department of Agriculture said it would reopen its border to nearly all Canadian exports of beef and live cattle beginning March 7, and on the next day US officials said there were no plans to change that, despite the preliminary positive test.
The US Department of Agriculture said it recognized Canada as a "minimal-risk region" for BSE, partly because of measures taken to prevent the spread of the disease.
Canada's first home-grown case of mad cow disease was found in May 2003 and cost export-dependent farmers an estimated 4.2 billion US dollars as trade partners closed their borders to Canadian beef and cattle.
Indonesia's official earthquake and tsunami death toll rose by more than 100 people Wednesday to 94,200, the health ministry said.
The ministry, which has said it expects the number of dead on hardest-hit Sumatra island to top 100,000, had not increased its count since Monday, when it jumped by 14,000 to 94,081.
Sumatra is the focus of a massive international aid effort, with foreign militaries led by the United States flying in assistance since the magnitude 9.0 quake struck on Dec. 26.
It was the biggest earthquake anywhere in the world for 40 years and unleashed a tsunami that slammed into coastal communities from southern Asia to Africa killing nearly 150,000 in 11 nations.
Lawyers for a prominent Belarusian opposition figure convicted of stealing U.S. government computers said Wednesday they had appealed his 5-year prison sentence.
A Minsk district court last week found Mikhail Marinich, a former international economic affairs minister who joined the opposition in 2001, guilty of stealing some 40 computers belonging to the U.S. Embassy in Minsk.
The U.S. Embassy, however, did not report the computers stolen, and a U.S. State Department statement presented to the district court said the embassy had no claims against Marinich.
Marinich pleaded innocent, saying the entire trial was "totally lawless."
His lawyer, Vera Stremkovskaya, said Wednesday she filed an appeal, asking a Minsk regional court to throw out the sentence and demanding a new trial.
Marinich's case raised concerns from the United States and the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe, which sent representatives to watch court proceedings. The International Helsinki Federation human rights group earlier called the charges politically motivated.
Belarus has been branded Europe's last dictatorship, because of President Alexander Lukashenko's stifling of dissent and the persecution of independent media and opposition parties. He also has boosted his authority through a series of elections that international organizations say were marred by fraud.
In October, he pushed through a referendum that will allow him to seek a third term in 2006 and run in subsequent elections.
The referendum sparked days of protests by youth and opposition activists.
In the grounds of a college at this southern Sri Lankan town lashed by tsunami a week ago, giant pots of rice and lentils are being cooked over wood fires for the masses crowding into classrooms.
Workers flit around the grassy courtyard and a team of South Korean medics had set up shop in one wing, their fresh faces and cowboy hats starkly contrasting with the downcast appearance of refugees desperate for their help.
Aid is trickling through to Sri Lanka's battered south, but at levels far below what is required. Crucial food shipments are arriving irregularly, sparking scuffles put under control by armed police.
At Rahula College in southern Sri Lanka's Matara, 2,000 people are being fed, sheltered and given health care by medics, but as scores of more homeless arrive daily, worker Gunasena Gamage rattles off a list of items urgently required.
"We need vegetables, we have very, very few vegetables, and this is the main problem we face. And we need vegetable oil, mattresses, pillows, mats, women's underwear, baby powder, feeding bottles, mosquito nets, cups," he said.
"And there's not enough room. There are so many people, accommodation is really a problem."
Even as relief items started reaching Matara, though slowly, many other affected regions were without any aid thanks to flash floods which made relief work difficult, especially in districts such as Ampara on the east.
In Matara, at Kemagoda temple just outside Dickwella, a smaller settlement further east along a stretch of coastal road hammered by the tsunami and still being cleared of debris, around 1,000 people have been waiting for hours for food to arrive.
Aid worker I.W. Damitha pointed to a mountain of tangled clothes people had rushed to donate but said they had no food to distribute to the people whose homes are still standing but who remain hungry.
"All these people are hoping for something to collect... They have been waiting for five or six hours because we have nothing to give them," he said.
The atmosphere is calm, but scuffles break out when supplies arrive. The crowds are only kept in control by two armed policemen, Damitha said.
An array of soft drink bottles filled with water are kept in the locked store to hand out as well. Asked if the water is clean, a worker shrugs: "It's somewhat safe."
The World Health Organisation said it was working against the clock to prevent outbreaks of diarrhoea and cholera at the camps and voiced fears that malaria and other mosquito and fly-borne diseases could break out within a week.
"Our main objective is preventing outbreaks," WHO representative to Sri Lanka Kan Tun said during a visit back to Rahuna College.
"The main thing is (to ensure the cleaning up of) garbage. The second is getting enough toilet facilities. And the third is access to clean water."
With most of their houses completely flattened, the refugees will not be budging any time soon, said aid worker Gamage back at the college.
"The government is planning to rebuild houses within six months, but we don't know if that is practical. And people are afraid of going home, they are afraid of another big wave," he said.
Fisherman Sheldon Jayasvoora, 34, sitting outside a classroom nursing a bandaged arm injured as he fled the tsunami that pulverised his home, is one of those dependent on the aid getting through.
And even then, his future is uncertain -- he is too frightened to return to work on the unpredictable ocean that suddenly rose up and killed thousands.
"But I want to make a living. Whatever I can do to get by, I will do."
Italy's TV channels broadcast twice as many commercials featuring food as their US counterparts, threatening children who watch them with serious eating disorders such as bulimia and anorexia, according to a study published here Tuesday.
Children star in one out of every three commercials on Italian television, and 40 percent of all ads sell food products, according to the study by Rome's Sapienza university.
Psychologist Maria D'Alessio said her study "shows the threat caused by commercials aimed at children and featuring foodstuffs, because it distorts one's natural relationship with food".
"In the coming years, we will certainly have to face the problem of anorexia and bulimia," in Italian children.
D'Alessio said 40 commercials in every hour of programming were dedicated to food. "In the long term, this is very damaging for children."
The study -- based on two weeks of programming in March 2004 on Italy's six main private and state-owned chanels -- also confirmed that ads aimed at children encourge stereotyping.
"Boys starring with their mothers are shown eating, while girls watch their mothers do the housework."
Ichiro Suzuki got his 256th hit to move within one of George Sisler's major league record but his Seattle Mariners lost 3-2 to the Oakland Athletics on Thursday.
Suzuki extended his hitting streak to 10 games with a run-scoring single in the third, lifting Seattle's superb leadoff hitter one hit shy of tying Sisler's 84-year-old record of 257.
Suzuki went just 1-for-5 and made the Mariners' final out, striking out against Octavio Dotel in the ninth _ but he'll have plenty of chances to surpass the mark in a three-game series against the Texas Rangers back home at Safeco Field.
"I want to finish the season strong in Seattle and have no regrets," said Suzuki, who didn't want to talk directly about the record.
Suzuki struggled against three Oakland pitchers well aware of the record. He grounded out in the first inning, struck out in the fifth and flied to left in the seventh, with Eric Byrnes making an exceptional running catch.
Dotel (6-2) finished a perfect ninth by blowing a 3-2 fastball past Suzuki.
"I just wanted to show him my best pitches," Dotel said. "He's a great hitter, so I wanted to match up best on best with him."
After a disappointing season, the Mariners should have an excellent final weekend with big crowds. In addition to Suzuki's pursuit of Sisler's record, the club will bid farewell to designated hitter Edgar Martinez, who's retiring after the season.
"The year has been so tough on all of us, so this weekend will be nice," said Bret Boone, who went 2-for-4. "It's going to be sad. I have to speak (about Martinez), and I hope I hold it together."
An appeals court Friday unanimously upheld an ex-Ku Klux Klansman's murder conviction and life sentences for a 1963 church bombing that killed four black girls in Birmingham and galvanized the movement to end segregation in the United States.
The Alabama Court of Criminal Appeals rejected Bobby Frank Cherry's argument that the 37-year delay between the crime and his indictment in 2000 prejudiced his case.
"There is no proof in the record before us that the State intentionally caused the pre-indictment delay," Judge Sue Bell Cobb wrote in the 5-0 decision.
Cherry was convicted in May 2002 and is serving four consecutive life sentences. He has maintained that he is innocent and that he is "a political prisoner in Alabama."
A powerful bomb went off at Sixteenth Street Baptist Church on Sept. 15, 1963, as Birmingham's public schools were being racially integrated. The blast killed four girls inside the stone-and-brick church, which was a gathering spot for demonstrators seeking an end to segregation.
The bombing was one of the bloodiest crimes of the civil rights era.
Advisory to NYTRENG editors and designers. The following graphics are now available on the desktop of the Art Library. POLITICS 2004 -- A folder containing dozen of icons about voting, political candidates, donkeys and elephants. Includes logos for national political conventions, the race for the White House, congressional races and local votes. Also includes individual portraits of George W. Bush and John Kerry. NOTE: If you have election art -- or any other useful images -- to share with other papers, please have someone drop a copy into the "Incoming" folder on the Art Library.
11-1-04 Editors, an illustration is available on the FPC Web site -- www.nytrng.com/fpc/ -- to accompany this story. CREDIT: Robert Holst/NYTRNG (with sidebar 2BINGEEATING) Binge eating gets a closer look New study tests drug that curbs overeaters' urge
The temptation to overeat will strike most of us during the holiday season, but for those who suffer from a binge-eating disorder, holiday feasting can be self-inflicted hell.
Binge eating disorder is a newly recognized condition that probably affects millions of Americans. Those with the disorder frequently eat large amounts of food while feeling at a loss to control their eating.
To date, there are no approved medications to treat binge-eating disorder, but a large, multi-center study may offer hope to the 2 percent of the population who suffer from it.
Dr. Nathan Shapira, an assistant professor of psychiatry of the University of Florida's College of Medicine, is among the researchers testing the effectiveness of topiramate, a drug developed to treat the convulsions and seizures of epilepsy, in controlling binge eating.
Shapira said that when topiramate was used for epilepsy patients, many reported that they also had a marked decrease in appetite and even lost weight. A small study of some 60 patients with binge eating disorder showed that those who received the topiramate rather than a placebo binged less often and also lost weight.
The new study will test the effectiveness of topiramate in 350 binge eaters from around the country, Shapira said. Results are anticipated next year. It is funded by Ortho McNeil Pharmaceutical, which makes the drug.
Binge eating disorder, Shapira emphasizes, is not the same as indulging in an occasional binge at the table or "grazing" through an array of buffet offerings.
"Everyone probably binges at some point, particularly during 'sanctioned' events like Thanksgiving dinner," Shapira said. "The real difference between 'grazing' and binge eating is eating much more than normal in a short period of time, often less than two hours.
"It's a terrible situation to be surrounded by food when that's all that you are thinking about," he said.
After a binge, he said, binge eaters feel disgusted with themselves. As a result, they often eat alone or very rapidly, and will eat until they are uncomfortably full. Unlike eating disorders such as bulimia nervosa or anorexia where victims are predominantly female, the ratio of female to male binge eaters is about 3-to-2. It is common in all ethnic groups.
Almost all who have this disorder are either overweight or obese. It has been estimated that up to 30 percent of those in weight-loss programs have a binge-eating disorder. They usually develop a weight problem earlier in life and do not do as well in these programs. One study looking at Overeaters Anonymous found that 70 percent of the members had a binge eating disorder, Shapira said.
The major complications of binge eating disorder are the diseases that accompany obesity. These include diabetes, high blood pressure, high cholesterol levels, gallbladder disease, heart disease and certain types of cancer. The causes of the disorder are still unknown, but up to half of all people with binge eating disorder have a history of depression.
Whether depression is a cause or effect is unclear, according to the National Institutes of Health. Many people report that anger, sadness, boredom, anxiety or other negative emotions can trigger a binge episode.
"There's a lack of recognition that this disorder is very common and treatable," Shapira said.
For those who think they might have an eating problem, he suggests two questions: Do you eat a lot of food in a short period? Do you feel out of control as you do so?
Those who answer "yes" to both should consider whether they have a binge-eating disorder.
(Diane Chun writes for The Gainesville (Fla.) Sun.)
A Philadelphia securities firm has begun marketing a novel type of healthcare investment for those with a high tolerance for risk and a passion for combating particular diseases, such as diabetes and cancer.
Wellspring BioCapital Partners, led by former Philadelphia Republican mayoral candidate Sam Katz, has set up five "unit investment trusts," akin to mutual funds.
Each one contains a narrow collection of stocks in pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies that are working on or marketing treatments for Alzheimer's disease, breast and ovarian cancer, prostate cancer, diabetes, or rheumatoid arthritis.
With a minimum investment of $1,000, the funds target Main Street investors who have a personal interest in finding cures for some of the most troubling ailments in the United States, Katz said in a telephone interview. These investors may suffer from the diseases, or they may have a family member with a disease, he said.
"We think this is going to appeal to a class of investors who have not had a place to concentrate their investment in something they are passionate about," Katz said. "They have not had the time, the skill, or the capacity to pick companies that might be working in that disease space."
Katz and his partners have applied for a patent for their approach. Wellspring licensed its trusts, launched in September, to Doley Securities Inc., in New Orleans. Katz said the trusts have attracted some investors, but he would not disclose numbers.
The strategy of the funds is to offer the possibility of a big hit somewhere across a spectrum of 12 to 20 companies that are working on the cutting edge of research. Each fund contains some household-name pharmaceutical companies, but not in high concentrations, according to the WellSpring BioCapital prospectus.
For example, the prostate cancer trust has 7.14 percent of its assets in Abbott Laboratories. The managers also are betting the same percentage on a number of lesser-known biotech firms, including Seattle's Dandreon Corp., which focuses on cancer research with no products on the market but one prostate cancer treatment in late-stage clinical trials.
The idea of narrow funds organized around individual diseases was met with skepticism by Jim Lowell, chief investment strategist for Advisor Investment Management Inc., in Watertown, who said investors would be better off putting their money into broad-based mutual funds and then simply earmarking 5 percent of their return for charitable foundations.
"This just seems to be a mercenary play on investors' emotions," said Lowell. "If the best marketing message you can muster is going after the investor's heart rather than their mind, you've already put your product on the critical condition list.
"Investors need to think with their head, not their heart," he said, adding that the risk level is considerably high because a scientific setback for one company working in a single therapeutic class can negatively affect all of the companies working in that area.
Linda Miller, portfolio team leader for the John Hancock Health Sciences and John Hancock Biotechnology funds, said she could not comment without reviewing the prospectus herself. Based on the trusts' general description, she said, "it is for someone who is willing to look at a very narrow, speculative investment."
Katz said the investments are intended to supplement charitable giving, not replace it. "Not everyone will find this appealing."
Christopher Rowland can be reached at crowlandglobe.com.
AUSTRALIA TRADE GAP WIDENS Australia's trade deficit widened in September to 2.11 billion Australian dollars ($1.57 billion) as a 5 percent rise in imports outpaced a 4 percent increase in exports. Rising prices for fuel were partly to blame for the rise in imports, while the expansion in exports was the first in three months. -- WAYNE ARNOLD EUROPE RUSSIA: MORE TAX FOR YUKOS The Russian Tax Ministry served the oil company Yukos with claims for an additional $10 billion in back taxes, which would bring the company's total tax bill to $17.5 billion. Tax officials with the ministry finished an audit for Yukos for 2002, and as a result demanded 193 billion rubles ($6.7 billion) for that year, the Interfax news agency reported. Earlier, Yuganskneftegaz, the main production unit of Yukos, received a $3.3 billion back-tax claim, $2.3 billion for unpaid taxes in 2001 and $1 billion for 2002. As part of the Russian government's campaign against the company, the country's largest oil producer, Yukos already faced total back-tax claims of about $7.5 billion for the years 2000 and 2001. The company has almost fully repaid the $3.4 billion for 2000. The founder of Yukos, Mikhail B. Khodorkovsky, is in jail facing trial on separate criminal charges, and his detention was extended on Monday to Feb. 14 from Nov. 14. -- ERIN E. ARVEDLUND
A group of leading cybersecurity experts is preparing to accuse the Bush administration of not doing enough to protect the Internet from scammers or terrorists.
Next week, the Cyber Security Industry Alliance, whose members include the chief executives of some of the nation's top technology security companies, plans to formally ask the administration to jump-start the nearly two-year-old National Strategy to Secure Cyberspace.
The strategy, a blueprint for better protecting the Internet from viruses, worms and other attacks, was created after the Sept. 11, 2001 terrorist attacks. But many of its initiatives have never been implemented, and the Department of Homeland Security division that is supposed to oversee cybersecurity is in disarray.
The nation's first cybersecurity director, Amit Yoran, quit in September, at least partly in frustration over the government's lack of emphasis on cybersecurity and his lack of authority and funds to make significant changes.
Yoran, who has made little public comment since his departure, is planning to join the security industry executives at a news conference Tuesday in Washington to call for the Bush administration to do more.
The Cyber Security Industry Alliance also plans to deliver to the White House a list of recommendations to improve cybersecurity, and to call on the government to do a better job of working with private industry.
At the White House, spokeswoman Erin Healy said Wednesday that the administration is still committed to improving cybersecurity.
"As far as our commitment, we've put forth the strategy and the president has signed it," Healy said. "He's committed to it, and we're implementing it and moving forward."
Department of Homeland Security spokeswoman Michelle Petrovich defended her agency, saying it has accomplished much.
"Does that mean we're at the end of the road?" she said. "Absolutely not. This is a big job."
But while acknowledging some DHS accomplishments, Paul Kurtz, a former White House cybersecurity adviser who now is executive director of the Cyber Security Industry Alliance, said the government has let many in the industry down.
"I didn't expect changes overnight or even within a year," Kurtz said in a recent interview. "But is the (Department of Homeland Security) fundamentally giving the issue of cybersecurity the attention it needs? I don't think they are."

Sherill Tippins' first book illuminates a fascinating footnote in literary history: For about 18 months in 1940-41, in a house at 7 Middagh St. in Brooklyn Heights, the following people lived under one roof: W.H. Auden, Carson McCullers, Benjamin Britten, Paul and Jane Bowles, and Peter Pears.
Oh yes, and Gypsy Rose Lee.
Middagh Street is a four-block lane overlooking old dockyards, and beyond that, New York Harbor. The menage at No. 7 was an experiment in communal living devised by George Davis, an editor who was in the process of being fired from Harper's Bazaar. The house was more or less a wreck, but it contained four floors' worth of rooms, and the whole thing was available for $75 a month.
What if, Davis reasoned, the most talented people he knew all lived together? Each of them could pay a modest $20 to $25-a-month rent for their generously sized room -- a considerable savings from what most of them were paying for similar spaces in Manhattan -- and form a salon of the bright and beautiful intellectual elite.
"February House" takes its name from Anais Nin, who called it that because so many of the people living there had been born in that unrelenting month.
Basically, Tippins structures her book around the interface of extreme personalities. Davis, for instance, had exquisite taste -- rather too exquisite for a commercial venture. In one month alone at Harper's Bazaar, he had run a short story by Colette; one by H.E. Bates; John Cheever's "I'm Going to Asia;" a P.G. Wodehouse essay; a profile of Wendell Willkie by Janet Flanner; and poems by Elizabeth Bishop and Stephen Spender.
Not only that, but he ran McCuller's "Reflections in a Golden Eye." A story about repressed homosexuality on an Army base that culminated in self-mutilation, it struck many readers as inappropriate in increasingly patriotic times.
As might be expected in an environment made up almost exclusively of artists, things were a little dodgy at the Brooklyn house in matters of sanitation and emotional stability.
Most of the time, Auden served as den mother, both practically and intellectually. He collected the rents, figured out what everybody owed on the phone bill and served as the master of ceremonies at meals.
One time, the conversation turned to famous last words. Auden offered his favorite, a female impersonator named Bert Savoy, who noted an approaching thunderstorm by saying, "There's Miss God at it again," whereupon he was unceremoniously killed by a bolt of lightning.
Auden got on everybody's nerves by incessantly monopolizing the conversation. Paul Bowles began to bait the poet, at one point offering Stalinist interpretations of every topic Auden introduced in defiance of Auden's rules against political discussion.
But then, the Bowleses weren't exactly Ozzie and Harriet. They were both gay, as was nearly everybody in the house except Gypsy Rose Lee, and struck everybody as strange. Paul enjoyed playing the part of Bupple Hergesheimer, a giant parrot, who'd respond to Jane's efforts to get him back into his cage by saying one of two nonsense words, "Bupple" or "Rop."
Gypsy got along with everybody, but then she was working hard, either on tour with Mike Todd or writing her way slowly through her novel "The G-String Murders."
As one person moved out, another would move in. Golo Mann, Thomas Mann's son, departed and was replaced by Oliver Smith, a young man who would become the leading Broadway designer of the 1950s and '60s.
It was an atmosphere fraught with tension and neuroses; Auden as well as Britten and their respective significant others were fretful about not being in England during the war, and the resulting attacks against them in the English papers.
Then there was the question of surging infidelity, as both McCullers and her husband, and Auden's boyfriend, Chester Kallman, were constantly infatuated with someone besides their supposed mates.
Tippins' book sheds a lot of light on a group that could have been possible only in New York, London or Paris. The book is consistently interesting, but it has a slightly canned feel, as if there wasn't enough first-person testimony from these intellectual live wires to completely illuminate the rooms at 7 Middagh.
What's the epilogue? Britten and Pears moved back to England and were devoted to each other all their lives, as were, in a much looser fashion, Auden and Kallman.
"The G-String Murders" became the biggest-selling mystery novel since "The Thin Man." Davis ended up marrying Lotte Lenya, and they both lived happily off the late Kurt Weill's royalties. And the February House was torn down in 1945 to make way for the Brooklyn-Queens Expressway.
"February House," by Sherill Tippins. Houghton Mifflin; 384 pages; $24.
Scott Eyman writes for the Palm Beach Post.
To mark the one week anniversary of the Asian tsunami disaster, Agence France-Presse has compiled a special package of stories from around the region.    As our full text and photo coverage of the unfolding response continues, please find, below, the selection of special stories putting the full events of the past seven days into review.    -- A REVIEW OF THE WEEK AND PREVIEW OF EVENTS TO COME --    Asia-quake-week-review    BANDA ACEH, Indonesia    At 0758 local time last Sunday, the Earth's crust deep under the sea 160 kilometres off the west coast of Indonesia's Sumatra shifted, violently lifting the seabed by 15 metres. The seismic thrust, the world's biggest in 40 years measuring 9.0 on the Richter scale, sent shockwaves through the Indian Ocean, unleashing tsunamis speeding at up to 700 kilometres per hour in every direction. Nobody saw them coming.    1,000 words by Ahmad Pathoni and Victor Tjahjadi    Asia-quake-week-summary    HONG KONG    A summary of the situation in the quake-affected zone of Asia, one week after the tsunami disaster, covering: the death toll; the toll of missing and injured; the state of the relief operation; the health situation; the international response; and the economic cost.    600 words    Asia-quake-week-quotes    HONG KONG    The most powerful, poignant and touching quotes of the past week about the devastation wrought by the tsunamis that struck South and Southeast Asia last Sunday.    600 words    Asia-quake-week-chrono    HONG KONG    A chronology of the disaster as it unfolded from the moment of the massive quake to the current date.    1,400 words    Asia-quake-week-challenges    HONG KONG    The challenge for the world a week after Asia's devastating earthquake disaster was a race against time: to find the survivors, bring food and clean water to the hungry and thirsty, and prevent a massive outbreak of disease. Rebuilding and preventing future catastrophes is not for now.    700 words    -- AROUND THE WORLD --    Asia-quake-week-world    PARIS    Even with the death toll possibly creeping up to the 150,000 mark, Asia's tsunami crisis is far from being the world's deadliest natural disaster. But it is the world's first truly global catastrophe, with lives shattered and families sundered in dozens of countries on different continents.    900 words by Barry James    Asia-quake-week-aid    LONDON    Since a tsunami hit more than half a dozen nations a week ago, aid from around the world grew steadily as a global disaster steadily unfolded in all its horror.    990 words by Lachlan Carmichael    Asia-quake-week-health-trauma    TOKYO    Beyond the massive toll in human life, the tsunamis which tore apart the Indian Ocean coasts are also set to be a global mental hee question of humanitarian and development aid from the United States, one of the least generous of the world's rich countries.    650 words by Jean-Louis Doublet
Many people were wounded Monday in a large explosion in a market in Israel's commercial capital Tel Aviv on Monday, Israeli security and medical sources said.
The explosion, whose cause was not immediately known, went off in the Hacarmel market in the center of the Mediterranean coastal city, the security sources said.
An official for Magen David Adom, Israel's equivalent of the Red Cross, said that there had been numerous casualties.
easyCruise, the latest no-frills offering by easyGroup, will launch low-coast cruising next March to destinations across the Far East, it announced Monday.
easyCruise will trial six, one-week cruises in the Far Eastern Tropics next March and April, easyGroup said in a statement.
"If the trial of the far eastern itinerary proves successful, Singapore might become the permanent winter base of easyCruise I, the first easyCruise ship," it added.
easyCruise I's interior is currently being designed in Singapore, where the trial cruises would leave from. Destinations served from Singapore would include Melacca, Port Klang (the port for Kuala Lumpur), Penang,
Langkawi and other destinations in Malaysia and Thailand.
Meanwhile, in a break from easyGroup tradition, easyCruise said it was considering using travel agents to sell tickets, rather than exclusively over the Internet.
"Given how much interest easyCruise has generated... I think consumers will be going to their normal travel agent asking to be booked on an easyCruise," said Stelios Haji-Ioannou, easyGroup chairman and founder of budget airline easyJet.
easyGroup said that towards the end of April 2005 the easyCruise vessel would sail to the Mediterranean to run cruises during the Summer of 2005.
The first European season would offer cruises either in the south of France and the Italian Riviera or in Spanish waters around the Costa Brava and the
Balearic Islands, it said.
Stelios first announced the easyCruise project in February, with the order of a 250-passenger cruise ship. Cruise tickets were to sell for as low as 29 pounds (42 euros, 53 dollars) per night aboard the 1990 Italian-built cruise liner.
But it will be a far cry from the all-inclusive luxury travel that habitual cruise-takers may be used to.
Once on board an easyCruise ship, all food and entertainment must be paid for, and passengers will have to clean up their own compact-sized cabins before disembarking or else face a surcharge.
Erkka Westerlund was named as the new national side's ice hockey coach on Monday by the The Finnish ice hockey federation.
The 47-year-old replaces Raimo Summanen who was sacked last week.
Westerlund has been the assistant coach of the national team since 2003. His new contract runs through the World Championships in Latvia in 2006.
Summanen was sacked after relations between him and several of the team's key players deteriorated due to his attitude and behaviour towards them, as well as several of the side's coaching staff, according to Finnish media.
Questions about Summanen's future were first raised during the World Cup in September when a leading player, Janne Niinimaa, withdrew from the side in the middle of the tournament citing his lack of confidence in Summanen.

Norwegian oil group Statoil said on Wednesday that it remained "unclear" when it would be able to resume production on two of its platforms after a gas leak forced it to shut down operations earlier this week.
"At the moment it is unclear when production from Snorre A and Vigdis will resume," Statoil said in a statement.
Production was suspended and 180 of 216 employees were evacuated after a gas leak appeared at the Snorre A platform in the North Sea on Sunday, giving rise to fears of an explosion.
The gas leak, which Statoil said was "unusual and serious", came from an injection well used to pump gas and water into a layer of oil to extract as much oil as possible.
Until repairs are completed production has been halted on the Snorre A platform, causing losses of 130,000 barrels per day (bpd) and on neighboring platform Vigdis, entailing losses of 75,000 bpd.
"Work to secure the well on the Snorre A platform ... continued all through the night, and is still going well and according to plan today ... But it will take some time before these efforts will be completed," the company said.
Norway is the world's third-largest oil exporter after Saudi Arabia and Russia, with an average daily production of three million barrels.
Germany has raised its 2004 public deficit forecast to 3.75 percent of gross domestic product, from 3.7 percent previously, the finance ministry said Wednesday.
"As a result of the development of revenue intake, the public deficit will reach 3.75 percent of GDP in 2004 and again be above the limit foreseen by the Maastricht criteria," the ministry said in a statement, referring to the 3.0 percent of GDP ceiling for countries in the eurozone.
This year's deficit would mark the third year in a row that Germany has violated the terms of the European Union's Stability and Growth Pact.
The German cabinet reiterated Wednesday that it expected to rein in the deficit to 2.9 percent of output next year.
But the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development warned Tuesday that it expects Germany's public deficit to reach 3.5 percent in 2005.
An angry mob looted and burned five nightclubs in a southern mountain town after the death of a man who fought with a club guard, police said.
Police in Juliaca, about 850 kilometers (530 miles) southeast of Lima, were still trying Sunday night to control a mob of more than 2,000 people armed with rocks and firebombs.
About 200 officers, including reinforcements from the nearby city of Puno, attempted to restore order by firing tear gas at the rioters, but their efforts to break up the crowd were unsuccessful.
Police blocked roads into the city to prevent the crowd from attacking passing vehicles.
Three people were arrested. No injuries were reported.
Officials said the mob was responding to the death of a clubgoer shortly before dawn Sunday. The man, who has not been identified, fought with a nightclub guard, who threw him into the street. Witnesses said he was killed when a passing truck ran over him. Police said the man was drunk at the time.
According to radio reports, one of the protesters alleged that the guard threw the man into the path of the truck.
After the man was killed, a mob formed outside the club. The protesters broke down the doors of the club, destroyed the interior and burned the building before moving on to four other discos.
Radio stations also reported that the crowd attacked town officials with rocks when they attempted to move the body of the man who had been killed.
Less than a month ago, villagers in a nearby town killed an accused thief by dousing him with gasoline and setting him ablaze. Alejandro Noalca Mamani, 54, was caught stealing a propane gas tank used for home cooking in Azangaro, about 60 kilometers (37 miles) north of Juliaca.
Nearly 1,000 people took part in the public lynching, tying Noalca Maamani to a lamppost and beating him before setting him on fire. He suffered burns to more than 85 percent of his body and died about an hour later at a local hospital.
Vigilante justice is common in Peru's remote rural areas, where many residents complain of a lack of police presence.
Royal Dutch/Shell Group of Cos. said Friday that it shut down its 140,000-barrel per day Draugen offshore oil field because of damage to its oil-loading equipment.
The damage had forced Shell to cut production to 75,000 barrels per day in the field in the Norwegian Sea on Tuesday, but had shut down completely because bad weather prevented repairs, company spokeswoman Kitty Eide said.
The shutdown means that Norway has lost nearly 11 percent of its normal capacity of roughly 3.2 million barrels per day.
Bad weather was in part blamed for Statoil ASA being unable to restart 205,000 barrels per day of production from two other fields, Snorre and Vigdis, which were shut down after a Nov. 28 natural gas leak.
The Norwegian Petroleum Safety Authority, a government agency, has said it needs calmer weather to complete inspections of the Snorre field before it can allow production to resume. It has also said damage to wells may be greater than first believed, and could not give an estimated start date.
At the Draugen field, damage to loading equipment slowed transfers of oil to tankers to the point that the platform's storage tanks were full, and production had to be shut down.
Eide told Dow Jones Newswires that there was a small chance of completing repairs on Friday "but the weather window isn't looking good."
She also said the chances of repairs on Saturday also looked "very hit-and-run."
Once repairs are made, Eide said production could be back to normal within a day.
Norway's Meteorological Office said gales with eight-meter (25-foot) waves were forecast through early next week.
Norway is the world's third largest oil exporter, after Saudi Arabia and Russia.
Louise Arbour, the UN High Commissioner for Human Rights, met with Foreign Minister Laila Freivalds in the Swedish capital Wednesday, discussing the case of two men expelled from Sweden to Egypt in 2002 who later claimed they were tortured by Egyptian agents.
Sweden has been roundly criticized for sending Ahmed Agiza, 41, and Muhammed Alzery, 35, back to their home country of Egypt, where they were imprisoned on terrorist charges. At the time, Sweden said it had assurances the two men _ who were flown to Egypt on an airplane leased by the U.S. government _ would be treated fairly.
Arbour told reporters she could not give her opinion of the incident until the UN Commission on Human Rights and Commission on Torture _ which are investigating the case _ unveiled their findings.
"I think it's an issue that deserves attention," Arbour said after meeting with Freivalds. "But I'm not in a position now to commit to a particular initiative."
Arbour and Freivalds were also set to attend a seminar called "Security under the rule of law," discussing the need to secure human rights while fighting terrorism. Arbour said civil rights "have suffered a setback" because of the war on terror.
"We may be surrendering too much liberty for a very elusive kind of security," Arbour said.
Activists handed out condoms to passers-by and pamphlets urging people not to inject drugs, challenging conservative social mores in Asia as the region marked World AIDS Day on Wednesday with vows to fight harder to halt the disease's spread.
In China, the government signaled it was heeding dire warnings of an AIDS explosion this decade by broadcasting television footage of President Hu Jintao making a rare visit to AIDS patients in a hospital and ordering thousands of local officials to learn about the disease.
Like many countries in Asia, China has been criticized for being slow to admit that AIDS is a growing problem and for leaving public health systems ill-equipped to deal with it.
National infection rates are lower in Asia than in other parts of the world _ particularly worst-hit Africa _ but the large populations of many countries in the region mean vast numbers of people are stricken. The epidemic has claimed about 540,000 lives in Asia so far this year.
Chinese President Hu Jintao shook hands with AIDS patients during Tuesday's highly publicized hospital visit. On Wednesday, he called on "leaders of various levels to enhance their HIV/AIDS knowledge," the official Xinhua News Agency said.
China says it has an estimated 840,000 people infected with the AIDS virus and 84,000 who have the full-blown disease. The U.N. AIDS agency has warned that China could have as many as 10 million people infected by 2010 if it doesn't take urgent action.
Elsewhere in Asia, health officials stressed that women are the most vulnerable.
Some 47 percent of the 39.4 million people worldwide infected with HIV are female, and women in East Asia are contracting the disease at a faster rate, often because men who visit prostitutes are increasingly passing on the virus to their wives, the United Nations warned last week.
Health workers, patients and volunteers in Thailand _ one of the countries hardest hit by the disease and among the first to launch preventative campaigns _ were due to march through the streets of the capital, Bangkok.
About 600,000 people have died of AIDS in Thailand, where about 572,000 others live with the disease. Thai health authorities are providing free generic anti-retroviral drugs to about 50,000 people this year.
In the Philippines, gay men _ one wearing only shorts adorned with multicolored condoms _ strutted before the press Tuesday to promote HIV testing. Marches and a clothing donation drive were held in Vietnam, where alarming new infection rates have been reported in low-risk groups such as pregnant women.
Activists in Tokyo began handing out condoms and about 20,000 pamphlets in the streets, and a popular nightclub was planning a benefit concert for Wednesday night.
In Bangladesh, where the epidemic is still relatively limited, nearly 10,000 anti-AIDS activists, including health officials, volunteers, students and sex workers, marched through streets of the capital, Dhaka, to create public awareness about the disease.
In South Korea, members of the Korean Alliance to Defeat AIDS made balloons out of colorful condoms and distributed some wrapped as lollipops in a busy Seoul subway station.
Activists in Malaysia also targeted train stations, distributing pamphlets but not condoms in the predominantly Muslim country's capital, Kuala Lumpur.
Marina Mahathir, president of the private Malaysian AIDS Council, warned that the country's AIDS situation was worsening because of lack of awareness about the dangers of unprotected sex and intravenous drug use.
"We live surrounded by silence about HIV, even though we may hear a lot of news about it," Marina wrote in a column in The Star newspaper.
In Pakistan, about 400 aid workers were discussing how to coordinate an anti-AIDS strategy for the Asia-Pacific region, and focusing on empowering women in a region where men usually have a dominant role in society.
In Taiwan, activist Lin Yi-huei said the image of people living with the disease had to change, including media representations that often presented AIDS sufferers as promiscuous and reckless.
SBC Communications Inc. said on Tuesday that it expects to eliminate about 13,000 jobs after its acquisition of AT&T Corp. closes.
The projection came during an occasionally heated meeting with investors a day after SBC announced plans to buy AT&T, its former corporate parent, for 16 billion dollars.
The cuts would come in addition to existing plans at the two companies to eliminate jobs before the merger is finalized at least a year from now.
SBC said the operations which would have excess staffing following the merger included 5,100 from sales, order provisioning, network management, billing inquiry and customer support.
Egypt's intelligence chief Omar Suleiman on Tuesday met with Ramadan Shalah, secretary general of the Palestinian militant group Islamic Jihad (holy war), to discuss an end to anti-Israeli violence.
The meeting came as part of Egyptian efforts to help broker a truce between Israel and Palestinian militant groups after Mahmoud Abbas was elected chairman of the Palestinian National Authority ( PNA) on Jan. 9.
Abbas has repeatedly asked radical militant groups, including the Islamic Jihad and the larger Islamic Resistance Movement ( Hamas), to stop anti-Israeli attacks to restart the stalled peace process between the Palestinians and Israel.
However, the groups insisted attacks will only stop if the move was reciprocated by Israel with confidence-building measures too.
Egypt, a key regional mediator and the first Arab country to sign a peace treaty with Israel, has intensified efforts in recent months to help the Palestinians and Israelis end more than four years of bloodshed.
Palestinian Foreign Minister Nabil Sha'ath has announced that about 40 Palestinian security officers are due to arrive here later this week to take training courses as part of Egyptian efforts to help maintain law and order in the Gaza Strip after a planned Israeli pullout.
Meanwhile, officials said an Egyptian security delegation will also visit the Palestinian territories soon to hold talks with Palestinian officials and militant groups to help secure a formal ceasefire with Israel.
There has been a remarkable lull in Palestinian-Israeli violence in the last two weeks as Abbas worked to coax the militant groups into a truce with Israel.
Israel, in return, also scaled down military operations in the occupied Palestinian lands.
However, the relative clam was shattered again Monday when Palestinian militants shelled Jewish settlements after witnesses accused Israeli troops of killing a Palestinian schoolgirl.
Following are the leaders of the National Basketball Association in four statistics through Jan. 31: Scoring               G   FG   FT  PTS  AVG Iverson, Phil.       39  380  327 1132 29.0 Bryant, LAL          34  285  298  934 27.5 Nowitzki, Dall.      41  359  333 1106 27.0 Stoudemire, Phoe.    46  440  320 1200 26.1 McGrady, Hou.        43  387  232 1092 25.4 James, Clev.         41  392  201 1026 25.0 Arenas, Wash.        41  313  270  997 24.3 Allen, Sea.          42  338  220 1006 24.0 Wade, Mia.           42  334  317  988 23.5 O'Neal, Mia.         45  402  228 1032 22.9 Garnett, Minn.       44  375  250 1004 22.8 Pierce, Bos.         45  315  310  994 22.1 Richardson, G.S.     35  309  104  773 22.1 Redd, Mil.           42  343  171  921 21.9 Francis, Orl.        44  319  289  951 21.6 Webber, Sac.         38  346  121  821 21.6 Duncan, S.A.         47  391  222 1006 21.4 Maggette, LAC        38  236  301  801 21.1 Lewis, Sea.          41  316  107  840 20.5 Hamilton, Det.       43  307  244  875 20.3 Jamison, Wash.       43  344  147  875 20.3 FG Percentage FG  FGA   PCT O'Neal, Mia.          402  663  .606 Stoudemire, Phoe.     440  763  .577 McDyess, Det.         162  298  .544 Haslem, Mia.          213  396  .538 Miller, Sac.          237  441  .537 Blount, Bos.          189  356  .531 Yao, Hou.             297  560  .530 Curry, Chi.           240  453  .530 Boozer, Utah          332  631  .526 Patterson, Port.      163  313  .521 Rebounds G   OFF  DEF  TOT  AVG Garnett, Minn.       44  142  488  630 14.3 B. Wallace, Det.     36  144  294  438 12.2 Duncan, S.A.         47  159  400  559 11.9 Murphy, G.S.         42  144  327  471 11.2 Okafor, Char.        41  163  291  454 11.1 Marion, Phoe.        46  136  367  503 10.9 O'Neal, Mia.         45  157  318  475 10.6 Odom, LAL            42   86  343  429 10.2 Nowitzki, Dall.      41   52  362  414 10.1 Howard, Orl.         44  156  276  432  9.8 Assists G  AST   AVG Nash, Phoe.          43  475  11.0 Knight, Char.        30  276   9.2 Marbury, N.Y.        44  365   8.3 James, Clev.         41  310   7.6 Wade, Mia.           42  316   7.5 Iverson, Phil.       39  291   7.5 Alston, Tor.         44  311   7.1 Hinrich, Chi.        42  295   7.0 Francis, Orl.        44  303   6.9 Tinsley, Ind.        37  245   6.6
Spanish coach Victor Fernandez was fired from FC Porto after half a year in his post, to be replaced by Jose Couceiro, the coach of Vitoria de Setubal.
The executives of the club, after a long meeting, decided to change him as a consequence of the Sunday defeat against Sporting of Braga, 1-3.
"This has come as a surprise, I could not imagine," said the coach in remarks to Spanish radio station Cadena Ser.
Fernandez's replacement, Jose Couceiro, affirmed Tuesday that his goal in the club will be to become "national champion."
During his presentation before the media by Porto's President, Pinto da Costa, Couceiro said "there is no time to regret" or "to think about improving."
"We lost fifteen points at home, yet, if we win all the matches we will be champions," said Couceiro after admitting the existence of problems in the club.
With respect to the replacement of Fernandez, he said "A team that wants to be a champion and loses 15 points at home, can't allow things to continue like that."
On the other hand, with respect to Couceiro, Pinto da Costa said he has the "ideal profile" to take the reins of the best European champions.
Following are the leading times from Monday's training for the men's downhill at the Alpine skiing World Championships at Bormio of Italy: 1. Bruno Kernen, Switzerland, 1:58.39 2. Patrik Jaerbyn, Sweden, 1:58.67 3. Kristan Ghedina, Italy, 1:58.69 4. Hermann Maier, Austria, 1:58.70 5. Ambrosi Hoffmann, Switzerland, 1:58.92 6. Daron Rahlves, United States, 1:58.93 7. Michael Walchhofer, Austria, 1:59.04 8. Johann Grugger, Austria, 1:59.14 9. Didier Defago, Switzerland, 1:59.37 10. Finlay Mickel, Britain, 1:59.88
The manufacturing sector in the United States grew for the 20th consecutive month in January, though at a moderated pace, a private research group reported Tuesday, affirming the rebound in activity at the nations' factories.
The Institute for Supply Management said that its index measuring manufacturing activity declined to 56.4 in January, from a revised reading of 57.3 in December. The January figure was slightly below the reading of 57 anticipated by analysts.
Although the index declined, the fact that it remained above 50 indicates that the sector continued to grow last month but at a somewhat slower pace.
A reading of 50 or above in the index means the manufacturing sector is expanding, while a figure below 50 represents a contraction.
Norbert J. Ore, chairman of the institute's survey committee, said the January index reflects continued strength in manufacturing, with both production and employment picking up.
"January sets the tone for a strong first quarter. Even though the (index) is slightly lower, the month-over-month growth is still quite strong, and will provide significant momentum for the remainder" of the quarter, Ore said. "Demand for exports continues to be quite strong, with a number of industries reporting significant growth."
Adolph Coors Co. shareholders overwhelmingly approved a merger with Canada's Molson Inc. on Tuesday, one of the last steps in a $3.4 billion (euro2.61 billion) deal that will combine two family-run breweries hoping to keep up with the race for new international markets.
The deal won support from 92 percent of Coors stockholders, the company said. It was approved last week by Molson shareholders.
"This is a momentous time for our company," Coors board chairman Peter Coors said. "Coors and Molson were both founded by bold pioneers in their own time and our family looks at this merger as a pioneering step in its own right."
A hearing in Quebec Superior Court is scheduled for Wednesday for final approval. The deal is expected to close Feb. 9.
The new Molson Coors Brewing Co. will have 15 breweries and nearly 15,000 employees making brands such as Molson Canadian, Coors Light, Carling, Keystone, Aspen Edge, Zima, Rickard's and Kaiser.
The new brewer will rank fifth globally in both revenue and barrels sold. It would have a 43 percent market share in Canada, 21 percent in Britain and 11 percent in each of the United States and Brazil, where Molson has struggled.
Coors and Molson say their union will generate cost savings of $175 million a year by 2007 by optimizing the Canadian brewery network, making material procurement more efficient, streamlining the organization and improving tax efficiencies.
The company will have dual headquarters in Montreal and Denver, with U.S. operations based at the Coors' brewery complex west of Denver and the Canadian operations managed from Toronto.
Analysts say the combined company will be in a much better position to challenge industry giants Anheuser-Busch Cos., SABMiller PLC and others in the battle for China and other overseas markets as beer sales remain flat in North America.
Molson is facing diminishing market share in Canada and is still grappling with problems stemming from its Brazilian acquisition of Kaiser in 2002. Coors, meanwhile, has seen sales of leading brand Coors Light fall off in the United States, analysts say. Coors is the third biggest U.S. brewer after Anheuser-Busch, which makes Budweiser, and SABMiller's Miller Brewing unit which makes Miller Lite.
The history between Molson and Coors began in 1998 when they began selling each other's products in their respective countries. Several years ago, they began talking about a potential merger, negotiations that began taking shape early last year.
There has been no word on whether layoffs are planned.
Under the deal, each Molson Class B share will be exchanged for a 0.126 voting share and 0.234 nonvoting share of the combined company. Each Molson Class A share will be exchanged for 0.360 nonvoting share of Molson Coors. The exchange for Coors shareholders is one-for-one.
The deal appeared on shaky ground for months as several large Molson shareholders questioned whether they were getting enough money for their holdings.
Last month, the companies dramatically increased a special dividend for Molson shareholders to $4.53 per share U.S. from $2.71 U.S. under an earlier offer _ a 67 percent boost, or about $532.6 million. A rival bid from Ian Molson, the brewery's former deputy chairman, never emerged.
The Canadian brewery was built in Montreal on the banks of the St. Lawrence River in 1786 by John Molson, who was the driving force behind the city's first public hospital. Molson also was a major investor in Canada's first railroad, eventually linking the country from sea to sea.
Though described as a "merger of equals" by the companies, some in the French-speaking financial capital of Quebec describe the proposed merger as a U.S. takeover, largely because of the differences in their sizes. Others say just the opposite in Golden, where the company founded in 1873 is the largest employer and company executives are easily recognizable in the town's shops.
Coors shares slipped 2 cents to $74.58 in midday trading on the New York Stock Exchange. That is midway between their 52-week range of $55.82 and $80.11.


(i(Woman talking to woman, overheard in downtown Tiburon by (/i(Patricia Scott.
Daniel Detorie, who likes a good time, was impressed with the slogan of underground sf, a new Haight Street club having Sunday "t dances:" "Party like it's 1978, when music wasn't angry, drugs not addictive and Elton John was not gay."
Which reminds me, of course, of the presidential inauguration. I was just leaving for vacation when the executive fiesta got under way, which explains the lateness of this report from Bob Gardner, a Republican pal:
Gardner, wise enough to take along long underwear and hand-warmers for the swearing in, had a great time. The only college song played by the band, he says, was the Stanford song, perhaps in honor of Condoleezza Rice or perhaps because inaugural organizer Brad Freeman is a Stanford alum.
A few days before the inauguration, the Gardners and other guests were awakened in the middle of the night by a fire alarm at their hotel, the Madison. They were on the 12th floor and directed to take the staircase down. "I called this a mink coat evacuation," said Gardner, who looked down the staircase and saw a sea of furs. "My first thought was, is this a Michael Moore prank?"
Sober words of newscasters on the death of Johnny Carson: "His legacy will live on;" "The American public will never know how much they're going to miss Johnny Carson." Maybe the people writing this stuff should have turned off the TV and been in bed early enough to be bright-eyed in English class the next day.
Meanwhile, Ben Fong-Torres noticed the marquee at Loew's Metreon: "Loew's Theaters mourns the passing of former Tonight Show host Johnny Carson ... Tickets are on sale for the Grateful Dead movie ... "
P.S. A few days after Carson's death, eBay listed Carson's childhood home in Norfolk, Neb., $94,500, starting price.
That crew following Paris Hilton around last week was from "The Insider," a spin-off of "Entertainment Tonight" often broadcast along with "E.T." The reporter was former San Franciscan Victoria Recano.
I have received further explanation of Paris' bruise problems. When she left the Hilton hotel, she had a big gauze bandage taped to her behind, covering the football-sized bruise. But when the car pulled up to City Hall, she -- perhaps fearing the bandage would be glimpsed when she emerged -- reached under her dress and pulled it off. While the glitterati were inside playing, the poor limo driver was left alone with nothing but Paris' bandage.
The Davos Nerds' Dinner, a traditional gathering of Northern Californians, was Saturday night at the Pot-au-feu restaurant in Davos, hosted by venture capitalist Joe Schoendorf of Accel. The guest list included Gavin Newsom, Amy Tan, Sergey Brin and Larry Page of Google, Wired magazine editor Chris Anderson, Paul Sagan and Orville and Baifang Schell, and the amusements included the reading of a Schell poem in homage to some of the participants. This excerpt came from one participant's notes: "So who are these worthies of legend and lore?/ Well, let's start with V.P. Albert Gore./ After striving to keep the country from going to hell/ He set up INdTV and became a West Coast nouvelle."
At Farallon the other day, Denise Hale was hostess; guests of honor were Sotheby's chief exec Bill Ruprecht and chairman of Sotheby's Europe Henry Wyndham. The two were here burnishing relationships with clients and prospective clients. Wyndham, who's 6 foot 6, said that on his way to SFMOMA he'd discovered Rochester Big & Tall, where a pair of pants was long enough to fit him. But too wide, so "Bill and I are going to buy the business, although he doesn't know it yet." In addition to narrowing the pants, he's envisioning personnel changes. The London store High & Mighty has supersized salespeople, in much the way Sotheby's staff dresses like their fancy clientele. "Bringing in a fat man would be business move No. 1," he said. "We're going to hire people 7 feet tall and 8 feet wide." And then he finished his lunch.
P.S. In other commercial notes, Winona Ryder, eschewing items she said looked too trendy, bought two dresses, two tops and a sweater at Oceana Rain Apparel.
Can't resist boasting about my new desk accessory, a lamp with an 18th century swain as its china base, purchased at Sunday's preview of the Oakland Museum White Elephant sale. Volunteers told me that it wasn't the worst lamp there, but I don't believe them. Ugly is in the eye of the beholder, and there are lots more treasures there for your buying pleasure, March 5 and 6.
Just as football fans will argue over every detail leading up to the Super Bowl on Sunday, food fans will be debating the chunkier points of guacamole. Should it be spicy or not? Is sour cream suitable or sacrilege? And what's traditional, tomatoes, tomatillos or neither?
Less contentious is the dip's popularity: This weekend's avocado consumption, the most for any weekend in the year, is estimated to be 43.8 million pounds, most of it in guacamole.
New York guacamole comes in countless guises, from minimalist mashes to ingredient-stocked purees. A fruity trend has lately emerged. At Mercadito in the East Village a guacamole sampler sings sweetly of mint and mango. And Miracle Grill, a guacamole traditionalist for 17 years, now offers a newfangled pineapple version.
But Diana Kennedy, the cookbook author who has spent 40-plus years unraveling the mysteries of Mexican cuisine, was surprised when she encountered a pomegranate-peach guacamole in Comonfort, a small, fruit-blessed town.
"It's difficult to say what's traditional," Kennedy said by phone from her home in Zitacuaro, Mexico.
She said the word "guacamole" stems from the Aztec "ahuacamulli," or avocado mash. Chilies and tomatoes were indigenous additions. The spice and tang cut through the fruit's fattiness. "The cilantro came with the Spaniards," Kennedy added. So did onions. She favors a less-is-more, lumpy approach to draw attention to the avocados, which when ripe "are really so delicious in their own right." Over time the recipe became more elaborate. In an 1845 cookbook she found a reference to toasting jalapenos, a practice incidentally followed by Bobby Flay. "It brings out its oils, gives it a smoky flavor," he said.
Guacamole's ingredient list becomes even more elastic in the United States, where the vehicle of consumption switches from fresh tortillas to fried chips, an American invention, said Robb Walsh, the author of "The Tex-Mex Cookbook" (Broadway Books, 2004). The chips explain how guacamole morphed from a condiment to a dip, its volume often stretched with sour cream, mayonnaise or even low-fat yogurt.
"It's not something Mexicans would do," said Jim Moreno, the chief operating officer of Ninfa's, a Tex-Mex restaurant chain. The original Houston location rose to fame in the 1970s for serving free bowls of its creamy avocado "green sauce." Delicious, yes. But guacamole? No, even he acknowledges.
Still, creamy guacamole derivatives remain a party staple and guilty pleasure among many home cooks. "I don't make this recipe in front of people," said Sean Williams, an actor from Astoria, Queens, whose guacamole includes bottled salsa, sour cream and green onions.
Restaurants have nothing to hide. In fact making guacamole tableside in traditional basalt mortars and pestles, called molcajetes, has become a popular way of proving freshness to diners.
"You'd never see this in Mexico," said Roberto Santibanez, the culinary director of Rosa Mexicano, which has been serving guacamole tableside since 1984. Santibanez, a native of Mexico City, said that in his country last-minute preparation is simply expected. (Those waiting more than a few minutes should press plastic wrap onto the dip's surface to prevent browning.)
The most popular avocado for guacamole is Hass, a buttery, thin-skinned California native. Some chefs -- like Flay and Scott Linquist of Dos Caminos -- use California Hass when it is available between January and August. Its oil content increases as the season progresses, making for richer guacamole. Of the 700 million pounds of Hass consumed in the United States, 430 million pounds are Californian. Most of the rest come from Mexico, which many chefs prefer because of the higher fat content, fuller flavor and lower price, when they can get them. Their sale has been restricted during California's season. But this month, the U.S. Department of Agriculture will open the market year-round in all but the three states that produce avocados, California, Florida and Hawaii.
Buying Mexican avocado pulp is an even cheaper option, and new technology called ultrahigh-pressure processing has improved its quality by eliminating the need for preservatives. Steven Tedesco, Fairway's chef, said he was surprised by its firm texture and fresh flavor.
AvoMex uses this process for its AvoClassic guacamole (available at Costco and Wegman's), a chunky, fresh-tasting, seasoned dip, and a bargain at about $1.50 a pound. The company's founder, Don Bowden, said he designed a simple recipe so customers could add what they like.
"Guacamole is a lot like other things," he said from his office in Keller, Texas. "It's whatever you think it is."
3 tablespoons white onion, finely chopped, with another tablespoon for garnish
4 serrano chilies (seeds and all), finely chopped or to taste
3 tablespoons cilantro, roughly chopped, with another tablespoon for garnish
Sea salt to taste
3 avocados
1/2 cup tomatoes, finely chopped, with 1/4 cup tomato for garnish.
1. Put onion, chilies, cilantro and salt into a molcajete, and crush to a paste. (Or puree in a blender and transfer to a mixing bowl).
2. Cut avocados in half, and without peeling remove pit, and squeeze out the flesh. Mash avocado into onion-serrano base and mix well. Stir in 1/2 cup of tomatoes.
3. Sprinkle the surface with garnishes: 1/4 cup tomato, onion and a tablespoon of finely chopped cilantro. Serve immediately.
1. In medium saucepan, bring tomatoes, tomatillos, jalapenos, garlic and 2 cups water to boil. Reduce heat, and simmer until tomatillos are soft, about 10 minutes. Drain mixture, and reserve one cup cooking liquid.
2. Slice avocados in half, remove pit, and scoop flesh into blender. Add tomatillo mixture, sour cream, cilantro and salt. Puree until smooth. If mixture is too thick, slowly add a little of the reserved cooking liquid.
3. Transfer to bowl and serve with tortilla chips or warmed tortillas.
2 tablespoons adobo sauce from canned chipotles (save peppers for later use)
1/2 cup jicama, diced
1/2 cup mango, diced
1. Slice avocados in half, remove pits, and scoop flesh into large bowl. Mash, add the rest of the ingredients, and stir to combine.
2. Serve with tortilla chips.
Yield: About 3 1/2 cups
Hamilton College in Clinton, N.Y., has canceled a panel discussion featuring controversial University of Colorado ethnic studies professor Ward Churchill, citing dozens of threats to the college and members of the panel.
But relatives of Sept. 11 victims, who take issue with Churchill's comparison of World Trade Center victims to "Little Eichmanns," say it was their protests that forced the school to reconsider.
Vige Barrie, director of media relations for the college, said "more than a hundred" threats had been received and forwarded to local police.
The threats came as a result of controversy that erupted over an essay Churchill penned the day after the Sept. 11 attacks, comparing workers in the World Trade Center to "little Eichmanns," after Adolf Eichmann, a Nazi who Churchill describes as "a technocrat who made sure the trains ran on time."
Churchill resigned Monday as chairman of Colorado's ethnic studies department, but will remain as a teaching professor with a salary of $94,242.
But Tuesday, Colorado Gov. Bill Owens suggested that Churchill resign his teaching post, as well.
"Ideas have consequences, and words have meaning," Owens said in a written statement. "Mr. Churchill's views are not simply anti-American. They are at odds with simple decency. ... His resignation as chairman of the ethnic studies department was a good first step."
Tuesday, Churchill made it clear that resigning as chairman was as far as he intended to go.
"I didn't want the job (as chairman of the department) anyway, so it's worked out really well," he said, freeing him to concentrate on what he loves, teaching and writing.
In response to the calls for his resignation, he said with emphasis, "I'm not going anywhere."
"I was doing my job," because it is sparking discourse and debate, he said of writing the essay.
He is being misquoted, he said, and does not advocate the violence of 9/11. His essay, he said, merely points out that because of U.S. policy of dominating other countries, the attacks were inevitable.
Meanwhile, he said, he will continue to do what he lives for.
"Seeing lightbulbs go on and seeing people as a result of what I do connect the dots, I suppose it's akin to the birthing process," he said. "I'm almost 60, I'm not going to be hurtling myself over any barricades."
Tuesday afternoon, a throng of students and media accompanied Churchill between classes on the CU campus in Boulder. For every student who insulted Churchill as he passed, more praised him.
"Professor Churchill is a fantastic writer, and I wanted to be in an atmosphere where normal thought is challenged," said Shaina Mille , 20, who says she transferred to CU from Tulane University because of him.
Other students criticized him.
"I totally support his First Amendment rights," said Allison Sands, 18, who said she found his comments "offensive and blasphemous" and that they should not be supported by the university.
In a statement on Tuesday, Hamilton president Joan Stewart said the school had done its best "to protect what we hold most dear, the right to speak, think and study freely. But there is a higher responsibility that this institution carries, and that is the safety and security of our students, faculty, staff, and the community in which we live."
Dan English, chief of the Kirkland, N.Y., police department, said the college has been compiling e-mails and phone calls. Hamilton's director of campus safety will forward them to his department, the Oneida County Sheriff's Department or the New York State Police, English said.
English said he hasn't seen the e-mails or heard the calls so he couldn't comment on their nature.
Lt. Tim McGraw, of the University of Colorado police department, said CU detectives are aware of death threats against Churchill and have taken precautions to protect him and those around him, including students.
Some of the Sept. 11 families believe the reason the school canceled the event was because of the pressure relatives brought on the school.
At least three people were killed and 13 others injured in a suspected car bombing in Georgia on Tuesday, the Interfax news agency reported.
A car exploded outside a regional police office in the town of Gori, about 80 kilometers to the west of Georgian capital Tbilisi, killing three policemen on the spot.
The report quoted a source at Georgia's Interior Ministry as saying that two passers-by were also killed in the blast which seriously damaged the police building and a number of cars parked nearby.
A regional official said the exploded car had no number plates and police believed the blast was a terrorist attack.
Georgian Defense Minister Irakly Okruashvili said the explosion was not a random event but a well organized terrorist act aimed at destroying order and peace in the former Soviet republic.
Gori, the capital of the Shida Kartli region, is about 30 kilometers from Georgia's renegade region of South Ossetia which has enjoyed de facto independence after fighting wars with the central government in the early 1990s.
Georgian President Mikhail Saakashvili, who has vowed to reunite his country by bringing breakaway regions back under central control, is presiding over an urgent security meeting on the blast, the Interfax report said.
Renault took the wraps off the car which they believe can break Ferrari's stronghold on Formula One in Monaco on Tuesday.
The French team were involved in a tense standoff with BAR for second place in the constructors' championship last season, ultimately having to settle for third spot.
But in the R25 they are aiming at a far richer harvest in 2005 than last season's lone win in Monaco.
Renault Sport's president Patrick Faure said they wanted to be fighting for the title in 2005 and 2006 and they had to be winning races in the plural and not just the one win they had last year.
The task to try and deliver the world title falls to Fernando Alonso of Spain and new addition Giancarlo Fisichella.
Following are the first round results from the 300,000 US dollars Millennium International Tennis Championships at Delray Beach, Florida on Monday (prefix number denotes seeding): 3-Xavier Malisse, Belgium, bt Jeff Morrison, United States, 6-2, 4-6, 7-5 1-Vince Spadea, United States, bt Hugo Armando, United States, 6-2, 6-3 5-Ricardo Mello, Brazil, bt Tomas Zib, Czech Republic, 7-6 (7-4) , 6-3 7-Kenneth Carlsen, Denmark, bt Eric Nunez, United States, 7-5, 6-4 8-Kevin Kim, United States, bt Frank Dancevic, Canada, 6-4, 6-1 Todd Widom, United States, bt Olivier Mutis, France, 7-6 (8-6), 6-7 (4-7), 6-3 Phillip Kohlschreiber, Germany, bt Wayne Odesnik, United States, 6-3, 6-4 Sun Peng, China, bt Matias Boeker, United States, 6-3, 6-4
Report on the quality of air in 47 major Chinese cities (12:00 Jan. 31 to 12:00 Feb. 1, Beijing Time), released by the China Environmental Monitoring Center: City             Major Pollutant         Air Quality Level Beijing          particulate matter            II Tianjin          particulate matter            II Shijiazhuang     ------------------            I Qinhuangdao      sulfur dioxide                II Taiyuan          sulfur dioxide                II Hohhot           sulfur dioxide                II Shenyang         -------------------           I Dalian           sulfur dioxide                II Changchun        particulate matter            II Harbin           particulate matter            II Shanghai         particulate matter            II Nanjing          particulate matter            II Suzhou           particulate matter            II Nantong          particulate matter            II Lianyungang      particulate matter            II Hangzhou         particulate matter            II Ningbo           particulate matter            II Wenzhou          particulate matter            II Hefei            particulate matter            II Fuzhou           particulate matter            II Xiamen           particulate matter            II Nanchang         particulate matter            II Jinan            sulfur dioxide                II Qingdao          sulfur dioxide                II Yantai           ------------------            I Zhengzhou        sulfur dioxide                II Wuhan            particulate matter            III1 Changsha         particulate matter            III1 Guangzhou        particulate matter            II Shenzhen         particulate matter            II Zhuhai           ------------------            I Shantou          particulate matter            II Zhanjiang        ------------------            I Nanning          sulfur dioxide                II Guilin           ------------------            I Beihai           particulate matter            II Haikou           ------------------            I Chongqing        particulate matter            III1 Chengdu          particulate matter            III1 Guiyang          sulfur dioxide                II Kunming          particulate matter            II Lhasa            particulate matter            II Xi'an            particulate matter            II Lanzhou          sulfur dioxide                II Xining           particulate matter            II Yinchuan         sulfur dioxide                II Urumqi           sulfur dioxide                III1 The center classifies air quality in China's urban areas into five levels: level I or excellent (pollution reading: not exceeding 50), level II or fairly good (pollution reading: 51 to 100), level III or slightly polluted (pollution reading: 101 to 200), level IV or poor (pollution reading: 201 to 300), and level V or hazardous (pollution reading: over 301). The 47 cities monitored by the center include the four municipalities of Beijing, Tianjin, Shanghai and Chongqing, provincial (or autonomous regional) capitals, and major cities in economically developed coastal areas, and tourist attractions.
Indonesia's consumer price index (CPI) rose 1.43 percent month-on-month in January, with the Boxing Day tsunamis pushing the price of food higher, the Central Bureau of Statistics said Monday.
Bureau deputy head Mulyono Muah told a press briefing that there was a surge in the cost of foodstuffs in the capital of disaster-hit Aceh province in the immediate wake of the tsunamis.
"The highest inflation was recorded in (the provincial capital) Banda Aceh at 7.02 percent (month-on-month)," Muah said.
He said all CPI components were higher in January, with food prices marking the highest increase of 3.11 percent.
Analysts said distribution problems stemming from flooding caused by the tsunamis in some regions, including Jakarta, had driven food prices higher.
They also said the planned increase in fuel prices this year has led to high inflation expectations.
Muah said processed foods, beverages and tobacco prices in January were up 0.8 percent month-on-month while housing, water, electricity, gas and fuel prices were up 1.48 percent.
Clothing was up 0.03 percent, health care up 0.22 percent, education, recreation and sports up 0.07 percent and transportation, communication and financial services up 0.39 percent.
Aceh contributed 0.66 percentage points to national inflation in January, Muah said.
Given the extent of the devastation caused in Aceh by the tsunamis, the statistics bureau said it would be difficult to predict price trends in the province, despite massive relief operations currently underway.
"It is hard to predict because we have to collect data from 'emergency markets,'" Muah said, referring to temporary shops which opened after the disaster and now sell basic goods to survivors.
He said distribution of goods and services was one of the key factors fuelling inflation in the province.
Egyptian security forces were involved in a fierce gun battle Tuesday with a group of Bedouin suspected of links to last year's deadly bombings of Sinai resorts, resulting in casualties, security sources said.
Security forces, acting on a tip-off, had deployed in the mountainous central Sinai region where the men were believed to have holed up and sealed it off in preparation for a raid, the sources said.
But the suspects preempted the attack and opened fire on them before fleeing further into the mountains.
Human rights groups said security forces arrested thousands of suspects in the wake of the attacks on October 7 on the Taba Hilton and two tourist camps in Nuweiba further south on the Sinai's east coast that killed 34 people and wounded 105.
But authorities have announced the arrests of only a handful of suspects.
The explosion at the four-star Hilton was believed to have been caused by a powerful car bomb detonated near the entrance to the hotel, destroying an entire wing of the 10-storey building.
The dollar firmed against the euro here Tuesday after the employment component in a key US indicator showed signficant improvement, suggesting a strong January job creation report due out Friday.
The single European currency in late-day trade was at 1.3014 dollars, down from 1.3034 late Monday in New York.
The dollar was meanwhile trading at 103.97 yen against 103.65 on Monday.
While the headline figure in the US ISM index of manufacturing activity dropped to 56.4 in January from 57.3 the previous month, there was a jump in the employment component to 58.1 from 53.3 in December.
"The sharp rise in the employment component bodes well for the January jobs report on Friday, but it is worth noting that it has over-estimated the pace of manufacturing jobs growth over recent months," said Mitul Kotecha at CALYON.
The figures were positive for the dollar but traders were keeping a firm eye on the horizon as the week unfolds, with events ranging from the conclusion of a US Federal Reserve interest rate meeting and President George W. Bush's State of the Union address Wednesday to Friday's US labor market data and the weekend's Group of Seven finance ministers' meeting in London.
Fed policymakers are widely expected to approve a quarter-point hike in the benchmark Fed Funds rate to 2.50 percent.
The main question is whether the rate setters will crank up the rhetoric, signalling more increases ahead.
Elsewhere, the yen was lower amid receding hopes that China will revalue the yuan's peg to the dollar. It was the yen that bore the brun that the Bank of England will be on hold for a little longer yet," said John Butler at HSBC.
The euro was changing hands at 1.3014 dollars against 1.3034 late on Monday in New York, 135.28 yen (135.08), 0.6926 pounds (0.6922) and 1.5538 Swiss francs (1.5495).
The dollar stood at 103.97 yen (103.65) and 1.1938 Swiss francs (1.1889).
The pound was at 1.8792 dollars (1.8826), 195.41 yen (195.13) and 2.2429 Swiss francs (2.2384).
On the London Bullion Market, the price of an ounce of gold stood at 420.90 dollars against 422.15 dollars late on Monday.
France, Britain and Japan are unable to meet a second deadline set by Washington for introduction of biometric passports for their citizens, a State Department official said Tuesday.
The US Congress extended by one year a October 26, 2004, deadline for 27 countries under the American visa-waiver program to begin issuing new tamperproof passports that are biometrically enabled.
But Janice Jacobs, deputy assistant secretary of state for consular affairs, said France, Britain and several other European countries as well as Japan could not meet the new deadline.
"Some of the larger (European Union) countries -- UK, France -- they are going to come close but they are not going to be ready by October. Probably by spring they will be in production. Japan, same thing," Jacobs told a forum in Washington organised by the Global Business Dialogue Inc.
"We just met with the Germans yesterday, for example, (and) they said that they will begin producing the biometric passports in November and we know that some of the other EU members, like Belgium, will actually be in production by (October 26, 2005)," she said.
Following the September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks on the United States,  Congress voted to require biometric passports enabling officials to match an individual's physical characteristics with a digital image in his or her passport.
The measure applied to visitors from the 27 visa-waiver countries, mostly located in Europe. They would have to present a biometric passport or a visa to enter the United States.
Jacobs said EU nations were trying to work together to produce the passports so that they could address inter-operability issues.
The EU issued a directive a couple of months ago that basically gave member countries 18 months to have passports with facial recognitions in place and 36 months for additional biometric enhancements -- such as adding two fingerprints to the passports, she said.
"It is not because anyone is not trying hard enough (to abide by the new US biometric passport rules but) because it is a very difficult thing to do," she said.
Jacobs cited standards for such passports that were set by the Montreal-based International Civil Aviation Organization only in May 2003.
She did not say whether the State Department would again approach Congress to extend the deadline or whether Congress would seek additional pressure on the countries involved.
"We at this point are willing to work with these countries in helping them to meet the new deadline -- which is October 26, 2005 -- but many of them have already told us we are not going to be able to make that."
But Jacobs said the State Department would face "enormous resource implications" in terms of issuance of visas if the deadline was not extended.
Countries with US visa waivers are Andorra, Australia, Austria, Belgium, Britain, Brunei, Denmark, Finland, France, Germany, Iceland, Ireland, Italy, Japan, Liechtenstein, Luxembourg, Monaco, the Netherlands, New Zealand, Norway, Portugal, San Marino, Singapore, Slovenia, Spain, Sweden and Switzerland.
Citizens of those nations are allowed to enter the United States for up to 90 days without a US visa.
Israeli and Palestinian officials on Thursday welcomed U.S. President George W. Bush's promise in his State of the Union address to support regional peace efforts and Palestinian reform.
During his speech, Bush reaffirmed the U.S. commitment to two democratic states living side by side in peace in the region and said he would ask Congress for $350 million (euro270 million) to support Palestinian political, economic and security reforms to strengthen Palestinian institutions weakened by four years of fighting.
Palestinians have accused the Bush administration of favoring Israel in the past, but Mahar Al Masri, the Palestinian economy minister, said Bush's speech appeared to reflect a more positive attitude toward the Palestinians, adding that the pledge of financial assistance was vitally important for them.
"This assistance from the U.S. is more important because it has a political value, particularly that Congress has a positive attitude toward us," Masri said.
Israeli Foreign Ministry spokesman Mark Regev said Israel supported the U.S. administration's vision on how to end the conflict.
"We hope that the new leadership on the Palestinian side will make the implementation of that vision possible," said Regev.
(ks-rn)
While German national unemployment data put the jobless total in the eurozone's biggest economy at more than five million, the number of jobseekers is much lower when calculated using International Labour Organisation statistical methods, data showed Tuesday.
Using ILO norms, the German jobless total stood at 3.99 million in January, equivalent to 9.4 percent of the working population, the federal statistics office, Destatis, said in a statement.
The number was much lower than the January jobless total of 5.037 million published by the Federal Labour Agency in Nuremberg last month, a post-war high.
And the labour office was scheduled to publish February jobless numbers later on Tuesday, which were expected to show a further rise in unemployment to 5.216 million last month.
Destatis explained the reason for the discrepancy was the ILO's much more rigid definition of who is actually counted as unemployed.
iNavSat, a consortium led by the European Aeronautic Defence and Space Company (EADS), has been chosen to operate the European Union's new satellite navigation system Galileo, the daily Die Welt reported on Tuesday.
The consortium, which includes French group Thales and British firm Immarsat Ventures,beat rival grouping Eurely, which comprises French group Alcatel, Italian firm Finmeccanica and Spanish company Hispasat, for the contract, the newspaper said, without revealing its sources.
The official decision was scheduled to be announced later on Tuesday.
Dutch telecommunications operator KPN said Tuesday that net profit slumped 45 percent last year and announced a vast restructuring plan that would eliminate about 8,000 jobs by 2010 in an effort to offset its fixed-line weakness.
Net profit in 2004 stood at 1.511 billion euros, on sales off 1.2 percent at 11.731 billion from 2003.
KPN, with a workforce currently around 18,000, said that with sales flagging in its fixed-line division, it would focus on developing its Internet- and cable-based telephone services.
The company said it would cut 1,500-1,750 jobs per year or a total of around 8,000 jobs in the period to 2010, in an effort to lower annual costs by 850 million euros.
The bulk of the savings were expected to come from converting to a fully Internet Protocol-based network as well as simplifying information technology and group structures.
The move came alongside a forecast for a "high single-digit" drop in the company's EBITDA (earnings before interest, tax, depreciation and amortization) result this year, which will be depressed by investments in new services and further cuts in fixed call rates.
The decline will be most extreme in the first quarter, the company said.
The outlook excluded any restructuring or impairment charges and exceptional gains or losses exceeding 20 million euros. In 2004, the adjusted EBITDA result fell 2.0 percent to 4.840 billion euros.
The company said it expected stable sales this year.
For the fourth quarter, the group reported net profit dropping to 479 million euros from 1.639 billion a year earlier. The figure included a tax benefit of 126 million euros versus a tax credit of 1.080 billion in the year-earlier period. The gain helped the company beat market estimates of 106-278 million euros.
Sales fell to 3.050 billion euros from 3.114 billion, hurt by a cut in fixed-to-mobile tariffs. Analysts were forecasting sales of 3.013-3.124 billion euros. Operating profit dropped to 532 million euros from 681 million.
Fourth-quarter EBITDA, excluding exceptional items, fell 4.0 percent to 1.179 billion euros, in line with market estimates of 1.049-1.222 billion.
Investors punished the KPN share, sending it 2.6 percent lower to 7.12 euros in Amsterdam, the leading decliner on the slightly weaker blue-chip AEX.
Police chiefs from around the world gathered at Interpol's headquarters in Lyon, France on Tuesday to study the threat of bioterror attacks and strategies to prevent them.
More than 400 delegates from at least 120 countries met to discuss the risk of such attacks, case studies and the preparedness of law enforcement personnel to confront them during the two-day conference, according to the international police organisation.
"There is no criminal threat with greater potential danger to alll countries, regions and people in the world than the threat of bio-terrorism," Interpol Secretary General Ronald Noble said, opening the conference.
"And there is no crime area where the police generally have as little training than in preventing or responding to bio-terrorist attacks."
Topics to be covered include the threat of bio-agents and toxins; forensic challenges and the US anthrax attacks.
French Interior Minister Dominique de Villepin called on the international community to "redouble its efforts" against the threat of bioterrorism.
"Not only because it brings to bear especially odious risks on our societies, but because it could be the step in the evolution of terrorism," he said.
"We know today that certain terrorist groups have tried to obtain chemical or biological agenst. The threat should therefore be taken seriously."
Interpol is hoping the gathering will generate funding for a special anti-bioterror unit, recently set up. The conference itself was financed by a near one-million-dollar (756,000-euro) subsidy from the New York-based Alfred P. Sloan Foundation.
The debates, round-tables and addresses -- all closed to the media after the opening speeches -- were to discuss case studies such as Malaysia's approach to bio-terrorism, the release of biological agents in three British mail centres, and the 1995 Tokyo subway Sarin nerve-gas attack, which killed 12 people and injured more than 5,000.
The conference will be followed by training workshops, the first in South Africa at the end of 2005, the second in Chile in 2006 and the third in China the same year.
The organisation called the conference one of the largest in its history.
"Bio-terrorism knows no geographic, national, economic or political boundaries. An incident in any one country is likely to cause immediate and profound worldwide impact," it said in a statement.
Participants include police chiefs, experts and scientists from many countries and regions including Britain, Canada, Singapore, the United States and the European Commission.
Interpol is the world's largest international police organization. It was established in 1923 to help law enforcement officers from around the world -- with different languages, cultures and national laws -- to work together to combat crime.
It has an annual operating budget of 37 million euros (49 million dollars), mostly from its 182 member states.
Israeli Foreign Minister Silvan Shalom on Tuesday here called on Syria to withdraw from Lebanon and urged the international community to isolate Damascus along with "other extremists in the region."
"We don't think Syria should remain in Lebanon. Their occupation should come to an end," Shalom told reporters after meeting with officials in the Hungarian parliament.
"We should isolate the extremists and empower the moderates," he added.
"We should isolate the extremists -- that means Syria, Iran, the Hizbollah, Hamas and the Islamic Jihad and at the same try to work together with Egypt, Jordan, Abu Mazen (Palestinian leader Mahmoud Abbas) the north African countries and the Gulf states."
His statement adds to international pressure, notably from the United Nations and Washington, for Damascus to pull its troops out of Lebanon and end its interference in the country's political affairs.
Shalom is on a two-day visit to Hungary with an Israeli business delegation, aimed at strengthening bilateral ties between the two countries.
Lebanon began the search for a new prime minister Tuesday after the dramatic collapse of the pro-Syrian government in the face of mass public protests left the country facing an uncertain future.
Prime Minister Omar Karameh's surprise resignation after just four months in office was hailed as a rare display of people power in the Middle East and greeted with jubilation by thousands of opposition demonstrators in Beirut.
But the euphoria was tinged with apprehension about the future of the country which 15 years on still bears the scars of the 1975-1990 civil war, while the international community renewed its calls for a Syrian pullout.
"The fall of the government is not the end of the road," cautioned the Al-Mustaqbal newspaper.
The opposition, whose campaign of peaceful rallies was sparked by the assassination of Karameh's predecessor Rafiq Hariri in a massive bomb blast two weeks ago, vowed it would not stop its protests until Syria was out of Lebanon.
Pro-Syrian President Emile Lahoud has granted MPs 48 hours to decide on a candidate for the post of prime minister which is customarily given to a member of the Sunni Muslim community, a presidential spokesman told AFP.
Walid Jumblatt, the prominent Druze opposition MP, called for the formation of a "neutral" transitional government which should oversee a partial withdrawal of Syrian troops ahead of elections due by the end of May.
He said Lebanon refused to "remain hostage" to Syria, which first sent its troops into its smaller neighbour a year into the civil war and still has about 14,000 men on the ground.
"We cannot accept to be fooled all the time. This is the fifth so-called Syrian army redeployment," he said of a recently promised Syrian troop move that has yet to be carried out.
Opposition MP Ghassan Mukheiber also told AFP that "we are seeking a prime minister who will be neutral and not from any of the two camps."
"We want an interim cabinet to uncover the truth about Hariri's assassination, draft a law and oversee elections this spring and reach an agreement for a Syrian pullout which should be achieved before the elections are held," he said.
Lahoud told a visiting UN team of experts helping the probe into Hariri's assassination that Lebanese authorities were determined to cooperate with the world body and to carry out the inquiry "until the end."
The United States, which ratcheted up the pressure on Damascus following the Hariri killing, lauded Karameh's announcement as the fruit of a "Cedar Revolution" against Syria's political and military dominance.
"We fully support the Lebanese people in their pursuit of an independent, democratic and sovereign Lebanon, free of outside interference and intimidation," US Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice and French Foreign Minister Michel Barnier said in a joint statement in London.
General John Abizaid, the top US commander in the Middle East, said he believed the departure of Syrian forces from Lebanon was "inevitable."
He also expressed confidence that the Lebanese were capable of establishing a stable, sovereign state and not slip back into civil war.
Karameh announced the resignation of his government during a stormy parliamentary debate over the murder of his political rival Hariri, which many blame on the pro-Syrian regime and its political masters in Damascus.
Syria described Karameh's resignation as an "internal matter" but added that it hoped to see the formation of a new government that would extricate the country from the "current extremely delicate circumstances."
The Lebanese press noted the opposition's victory but voiced fears for the future given that the opposition is insisting on the departure of the entire pro-Syrian regime and a full Syrian troop pullout.
The unprecedented street demonstrations and political crisis stemmed from the February 14 murder of Hariri, a five-time prime minister and billionaire businessman credited with rebuilding the country after the war.
On Monday, Martyrs' Square where Hariri is buried was transformed into a sea of red and white Lebanese flags bearing the national cedar tree symbol as tens of thousands of people defied a government ban on demonstrations.
China said Tuesday it plans to establish anti-terror teams this year to monitor global terrorist activities and prevent attacks on its ports.
In 2005, the Administration for Quality Supervision and Inspection and Quarantine will improve port emergency plans and come up with more effective anti-terror measures, said the administration's Vice Minister Ge Zhirong.
"We are going to get together a group of relevant experts from the administration to analyze terrorist activities taking place overseas for any new methods they might be employing" and to come up with counter measures, Ge said.
China's Cabinet ordered increased terror monitoring in the wake of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks in the United States but the administration has so far "not detected any items of a terrorist nature in China's ports," Ge said at a press conference.
"But we are going to better prepare ourselves for the worst case scenario to prevent the future occurrence of such terrorist activities," he said.
Maritime and defense experts in Asia have warned that commercial shipping routes and ports are vulnerable to terrorist strikes.
A Virginia man accused of joining al-Qaida and plotting to assassinate President George W. Bush admitted his guilt and pondered hijackings similar to the Sept. 11 attacks, an FBI agent testified.
The testimony came at a pretrial hearing Tuesday at which a federal magistrate said Ahmed Omar Abu Ali posed a "grave danger" and ordered that he remain jailed pending trial.
Abu Ali, 23, was charged last week with providing support to al-Qaida and conspiring to assassinate the president. Authorities allege that Abu Ali, who grew up in Virginia, joined al-Qaida while studying in Saudi Arabia.
FBI agent Barry Cole testified that Abu Ali admitted many times that he joined al-Qaida and discussed various potential acts, including a plan in which he would personally assassinate Bush.
Cole said other plans included hijacking planes in Great Britain and Australia and using them as missiles to attack targets in the United States, a plan to free prisoners at Guantanamo Bay and a plan to destroy naval ships in U.S. ports.
"The defendant has in his own words indicated he is a grave, grave danger to this community and this nation," magistrate Liam O'Grady said after hearing Cole's testimony.
Defense attorney John Zwerling said the various plots that Cole described were "preposterous."
"How is he going to free the brothers at Guantanamo? Is he going to take a rowboat? Doesn't that sound bizarre to you?" he asked Cole.
Zwerling claims the government obtained its confessions through torture, and that four attorneys had seen scars on Abu Ali's back that the defendant says were inflicted by Saudi authorities.
Zwerling said after the hearing that he has more evidence to confirm claims of torture, but he would not discuss specifics.
Abu Ali was in Saudi custody for nearly two years before charges were brought. Zwerling noted that the government had obtained Abu Ali's alleged confession in September 2003 and suggested that the government would have brought charges then if it had a strong case.
Instead, he said the government only brought charges in the face of a civil lawsuit filed by Abu Ali's parents that sought details of the U.S. government's role in his detention in Saudi Arabia.
O'Grady said he would reconsider his ruling in keeping the defendant in custody if the defense could offer more evidence about statements made last year by FBI Assistant Director Michael Mason. He told a Muslim audience in northern Virginia that he believed the government had no interest in prosecuting Abu Ali and that he might soon be released.
O'Grady called Mason's comments disturbing, and Zwerling said the comments are evidence that the government did not believe it had a case.
Cole testified that he interviewed Abu Ali over four days in September 2003. He said Abu Ali initially demanded a lawyer but changed his mind after agents told him that he could be prosecuted by Saudi authorities or held as an enemy combatant.
Cole, a counterterrorism agent, said Abu Ali's confessions are supported by the admissions of an al-Qaida cell leader in Saudi Arabia who surrendered to authorities. Cole said the al-Qaida cell leader gave Abu Ali money to purchase a laptop computer and cell phone.
Cole also testified that Abu Ali discussed with him plans to assassinate members of Congress. No further details were offered.
Cole said the al-Qaida leaders gave Abu Ali two options: He could either become part of a martyr operation or he could establish a cell in the United States and he would "marry a Christian woman, assimilate into the community and he would be provided operatives."
Formula One driver Juan Pablo Montoya has criticized his former team boss Frank Williams for not supporting him enough and for saying he was overweight.
Montoya, who will drive for McLaren for the first time in Sunday's Australian Grand Prix, also said Wednesday he felt undervalued on the Williams team.
"I don't know what they wanted _ I was winning races for them ... driving the wheels out of the car," Montoya said.
"He (Williams) complained that I was so overweight and unfit, and he just whinged about it," he said.
"It's pretty demotivating, I thought I was working pretty hard _ and somebody goes and says that. And I think those things shouldn't go public."
Montoya said he was concerned _ after having already signed for McLaren for 2005 _ when the Williams car he was driving was quick early in the season.
"At the beginning of the year it was scary because we were fast _ Williams was the fastest car in the first few races and McLaren were having a lot of problems," Montoya said.
"The press was saying _ 'are you sure you made the right decision? You're going to regret it'. And everyone at the end of the year was saying, `congratulations. I don't know how you did it but you made the right decision'."
Montoya said Williams' criticism of him had built up over the years since he joined the team in 2001 from the mostly American-based CART open-wheel series.
"At BMW (Williams) they expect you to get the things done _ here at Mercedes and McLaren they give you the tools to do the things," Montoya said. "It makes a big difference for the driver _ the driver is a lot more appreciated."
Williams' team spokesperson wasn't available for comment.
France, looking to keep its Six Nations hopes alive against Ireland, made three changes Wednesday to its 22-man squad that lost to Wales 24-18.
In the pack, Imanol Harinordoquy was dropped in favor of Pascal Pape. In the backs, center Ludovic Valbon was brought back in place of Jean-Philippe Grandclaude. Valbon had picked up an injury in France's opening match against Scotland.
Winger Cedric Heymans was called up to replace Aurelien Rougerie, who injured his collarbone against the Welsh.

The squad:
Forwards: Nicolas Mas, Sylvain Marconnet, Olivier Milloud, Sebastien Bruno, William Servat, Gregory Lamboley, Fabien Pelous (capt.), Jerome Thion, Pascal Pape, Serge Betsen, Julien Bonnaire, Yannick Nyanga.
Backs: Pierre Mignoni, Dimitri Yachvili, Yann Delaigue, Frederic Michalak, Ludovic Valbon, Yannick Jauzion, Damien Traille, Christophe Dominici, Cedric Heymans, Julien Laharrague.
The Papua New Guinea (PNG) Defense Force, the police and health services are on standby to help the victims of a tsunami that wiped out several villages, killing scores of people, on PNG's remote north-west coast Friday night.
"Prime Minister Bill Skate has directed that immediate action be taken to arrange urgent supplies of food, water, shelter and cooking utensils while detailed assessments and reports are being prepared," Robert Igara, chief secretary of the PNG government, said Saturday in a statement, Australian Associated Press reported.
Igara said the PNG Red Cross had confirmed arrangements to provide food supplies and authorities had asked the Australian High Commission in Port Moresby for immediate air transport support.
The death toll so far from the tsunami that struck the coastline near the town of Aitape in the West Sepik (Sandaun) province Friday night, was officially announced 64 and many more people were missing.
Igara said reports so far indicated that a community school, government station, Catholic mission station and the Nimas village in the Sissano area west of Aitape had been completely destroyed, where 30 people were dead.
And Warapu village had also been completely destroyed, with 11 confirmed deaths and many missing.
Sixteen people in the devastated Arop village were confirmed dead, and two children had died in the Malalo village, which was wiped out.
Another five people died in the Teles-Lambu villages.
Igara said the population in the area affected by the tsunami was 8,000 to 10,000 people.
"Officers are now visiting the affected villages and areas to establish the whereabouts, safety and health of the population," he said.
Meanwhile, Prime Minister Bill Skate, National Disaster Services Chairman Colin Travertz and National Disaster Services Director-General Ludwig Kembu were reported to inspect the affected areas Sunday.
Australia will provide transport for relief supplies and a mobile hospital to Papua New Guinea (PNG) following Friday's tsunami tragedy.
Foreign Affairs Minister Alexander Downer said a Royal Australian Air Force C130 Hercules aircraft currently in PNG on training exercises would be diverted to deliver relief supplies such as tarpaulins and food to the affected areas in the country's remote north.
"We will also transport a mobile hospital and associated Australian Defense Force (ADF) medical personnel to the disaster area to provide urgent medical assistance to injured victims," Downer said Saturday in a statement.
The massive tidal wave wiped seven villages off the map, leaving hundreds people dead or missing.
The 10-metre tsunami engulfed the heavily populated villages near Aitape, 800 kilometers north of Port Moresby on Friday night - 30 minutes after an undersea earthquake of about 7.0 on the Richter scale in the area.
Many of the villagers are believed to have died instantly as the deadly wall of water struck without warning, sending their homes crashing into the raging torrent.
Downer said the federal government stood ready to consider further requests for assistance from the PNG government.
Huge sea waves set off by an earthquake crashed against Papua New Guinea's north coast, killing at least 70 people and crushing villages, the country's National Disaster Center said. 	   The 23-foot (seven-meter) wall of water, called tsunami, hit Friday night without warning just after an earthquake about 12 miles (30 kilometers) off the coast. The Australian Geological Survey Organization said it had a preliminary magnitude of 7.0. 	   The disaster center said late Saturday that hundreds are missing and thousands are without food and shelter. 	   ''We expect that about 3,000 people have been made homeless and there has been an estimate of about 300 people dead or missing,'' Fr. Austin Crapp, a relief organizer, told Australian Broadcasting Corp. radio. 	   He said most of the dead were children who drowned. 	   Disaster authorities said the seismic sea wave struck to the west of the town of Aitape in the West Sepik province, hitting at least four villages _ Sissano, Warapu, Arop and Malol. 	   The area is spotted with villages consisting of homes built on beaches of jungle materials. 	   ''At Warapu, there is no house standing _ it's a village of 1,800 people,'' Crapp said. ''Arop, again, is 1,800 to 2,000 people _ there's nothing standing there. 	   ''They (the two villages) are both clean sand. It's complete devastation.'' 	   A helicopter pilot who landed in Aitape on Saturday reported seeing bodies floating among the debris in the lagoon, he said. 	   Papua New Guinea provincial disaster coordinator Peter Tavun said homeless survivors were in desperate need of food and shelter. 	   Crapp said a helicopter was picking up injured people and doctors had been flown in to treat them. The injured, mostly suffering cuts and fractures, were being taken to a mission hospital at Aitape. 	   Rob Parer, a businessman who lives near Aitape, said some villagers who fled into the jungle after the tsunami struck are still hiding there. 	   ''The people have never heard of anything like it. They thought the world had ended,'' Parer told Australian Broadcasting Corp. radio. 	   In Canberra, Australian seismologist Kevin McCue from the Australian Geological Survey Organization said the earthquake's epicenter was just off the town of Aitape. 	   ''It was a shallow, major earthquake,'' he said. 	   An earthquake with a magnitude of 7.0 is devastating if it hits an urban area. The last tsunami in the area had been in December 1930 when a magnitude 6.5 earthquake struck the Admiralty Islands, McCue said. 	   Meanwhile, Australia said Saturday it will provide transport for relief supplies and a mobile hospital to Papua New Guinea. 	   Foreign Affairs Minister Alexander Downer said a Royal Australian Air Force C-130 Hercules aircraft now in Papua New Guinea on training exercises would be diverted to deliver relief supplies. 	   ''We will also transport a mobile hospital and associated Australian Defense Force medical personnel to the disaster area to provide urgent medical assistance to injured victims,'' Downer said in a statement.
A tsunami spawned by a 7.0 magnitude earthquake crashed into Papua New Guinea's north coast, crushing villages and leaving hundreds missing, officials said Sunday. 	   The 23-foot (seven-meter) wall of water hit Friday night without warning following an earthquake about 12 miles (30 kilometers) off the coast of Papua New Guinea in the Pacific Ocean. 	   The National Disaster Center said Sunday that hundreds of people are missing and thousands have no food or shelter. The Papua New Guinea Defense Force was on standby Sunday and police and health services officials expected the official death toll of 71 to rise. 	   ''We expect that about 3,000 people have been made homeless and there has been an estimate of about 300 people dead or missing,'' Fr. Austen Crapp, a relief organizer, told Australian Broadcasting Corp. (ABC) radio. 	   ABC radio, a government-owned corporation, quoted Australian army officials Sunday as saying the death toll could rise to as high as 2,000 people, but that figure could not be confirmed by Australia's government. 	   Papua New Guinea, with a population of 4 million, is largely dependent on agriculture and mining. The capital of Port Moresby is located about 600 kilometers (375 miles) east of the northeastern tip of Australia. 	   Disaster authorities said the wave struck to the west of the town of Aitape in the West Sepik province, hitting at least four villages. 	   The area, about 600 kilometers (370 miles) northwest of the capital of Port Moresby, is spotted with villages consisting of homes made of jungle materials built on beaches. 	   Robert Igara, the government's chief secretary, said in a statement that a community school, government station, Catholic mission station and the Nimas village in the Sissano area west of Aitape had been completely destroyed. Thirty people were confirmed dead. 	   The Warapu village had also been completely destroyed, with 11 confirmed deaths and many missing, Igara said. 	   Sixteen people were confirmed dead in the devastated Arop village, and two children had died in Malol, which was wiped out. Five people died in the Teles-Lambu villages. 	   Igara said the population in the area affected by the tsunami was 8,000 to 10,000 people. 	   ''Officers are now visiting the affected villages and areas to establish the whereabouts, safety and health of the population,'' he said. 	   Australia said it will provide transport for relief supplies and a mobile hospital to Papua New Guinea. Other air force transport planes were on standby in Sydney, ready to fly supplies in if requested by the Papua New Guinean government. 	   Queen Elizabeth II sent a message to Papua New Guinea, which is a member of the Commonwealth, expressing her shock at the deaths. 	   ''She said she was shocked at the tidal wave, and that her thoughts were with the families of the bereaved and injured,'' said a Buckingham Palace spokeswoman.
The 23-foot (seven-meter) wall of water hit Friday night without warning following an earthquake about 12 miles (30 kilometers) off the coast of Papua New Guinea in the Pacific Ocean. 	   ABC radio, a government-owned corporation, quoted Australian army officials Sunday as saying the death toll could rise to as high as 2,000 people, but that figure could not be confirmed by the Papua New Guinean government. 	   Among the dead are scores of schoolchildren. 	   Authorities at Aitape in the West Sepik province, on Papua New Guinea's northwest coast, said the tsunami that hit the coast west of Aitape on Friday night had wiped out three villages and had almost completely destroyed another. 	   ''The latest death toll for the district is 599,'' district disaster coordinating chairman Dickson Dalle said. ''But the figure may increase as more bodies are found.''   MORE
Dalle said it was impossible to say how many people are missing. 	   ''There are still people out there who are injured that we have not rescued,'' he said. ''They are scattered all over in the mangroves.'' 	   Dalle said most of the victims of the disaster were old people and schoolchildren. 	   ''We have assumed that the schools in Arop, the schools in Sissano and the schools in Warapu will be closed because we don't have the children,'' Dalle said. ''They're dead . . . they're all dead.'' 	   Dalle said the Nimas village near the Sissano lagoon, the Warapu village and the Arop village had been wiped out and the Malol village had almost been completely destroyed. 	   At Warapu 500 people had been confirmed dead, while Malol village had 40 dead and Sissano 41. 	   Prime Minister Bill Skate was expected to arrive in Aitape later this afternoon to assess the situation. 	   Earlier, the National Disaster Center said that hundreds of people were missing and thousands had no food or shelter. 	   Papua New Guinea, with a population of 4 million, is largely dependent on agriculture and mining. The capital of Port Moresby is located about 600 kilometers (375 miles) east of the northeastern tip of Australia.   MORE
Disaster authorities said the area, about 600 kilometers (370 miles) northwest of the capital of Port Moresby, is spotted with villages consisting of homes made of jungle materials and built on beaches. 	   Robert Igara, the government's chief secretary, said the population in the area affected by the tsunami was 8,000 to 10,000 people. 	   Australia said it will provide transport for relief supplies and a mobile hospital to Papua New Guinea. Other air force transport planes were on standby in Sydney, ready to fly supplies in if requested by the Papua New Guinean government. 	   Queen Elizabeth II sent a message to Papua New Guinea, which is a member of the Commonwealth, expressing her shock at the deaths. 	   ''She said she was shocked at the tidal wave, and that her thoughts were with the families of the bereaved and injured,'' said a Buckingham Palace spokeswoman.
Australia Sunday sent three Air Force C130 Hercules aircraft loaded with medical and food supplies on an urgent mission to help survivors of a devastating tsunami which struck Papua New Guinea (PNG) Friday night.
The tidal wave smashed into the northwestern coastline near the town of Aitape in West Sepik province, killing at least 600 people, according to reports reaching here.
Australian Defense Minister Ian McLachlan told reporters in Adelaide that Australia's aid agency, AusAid, estimated the final toll would be well over 1,000, with many thousands injured and as many as 6,000 left homeless.
Two Hercules aircraft left the Richmond airforce base, north-west of Sydney, in the afternoon, while another plane took off from Townsville. The planes were due to arrive Sunday night and fly out to the devastated region Monday morning.
McLachlan said the aircraft were ferrying 60 medical personnel with the aim of setting up a mobile hospital in the area. However, he said that how quickly the medical crew could get to work would depend on whether the landing strip at Wanimo was long enough for the C130s to land and the possibility of further earthquakes.
"It's very rough terrain and our problem is finding an area we can land and get in our equipment," he was quoted by the Australian Associated Press as saying.
Defense ministry spokesman Colonel Keith Jobson said that even when the planes touched down at the airstrip, the defense personnel would still have to use helicopters or road transport to access the stricken villages.
Deputy Prime Minister Tim Fischer described the events in PNG as "horrific", saying Australia would do all it could to help PNG cope with the crisis.
"We'll be further liaising with the Papua New Guinea government to provide realistic help in those circumstances," he said.
The death toll in Papua New Guinea's (PNG) tsunami disaster has climbed to 599 and is expected to rise, a PNG disaster control officer said Sunday.
Authorities at Aitape in the West Sepik province, on PNG's north-west coast, said the tsunami, that hit the coast west of Aitape on Friday night had wiped out three villages and had almost completely destroyed another, according to an Australian Associated Press report sent Sunday from Aitape.
A 10-meter tsunami engulfed the heavily populated villages near Aitape, 800 km north of PNG's capital city of Port Moresby. The disaster occurred 30 minutes after an undersea earthquake of about 7.0 on the Richter scale took place.
"The latest death toll for the district is 599," Dickson Dalle, chairman of district disaster coordinating, was quoted as telling reporters.
Dalle said it was impossible to say how many people were missing.
"There are still people out there who are injured that we have not rescued," he said. "They are scattered all over in the mangroves."
Dalle said the Nimas village near the Sissano lagoon, the Warapu village and the Arop village had been wiped out, and the Malol village had almost been completely destroyed.
At Warapu 500 people had been confirmed dead. At Arop 16 were dead.
PNG Prime Minister Bill Skate was expected to arrive in Aitape later Sunday afternoon to assess the situation.
A tsunami spawned by a 7.0 magnitude earthquake crashed into Papua New Guinea's north coast, crushing villages and killing nearly 600 people, officials said Sunday. 	   The 23-foot (seven-meter) wall of water hit Friday night without warning following an earthquake about 18 miles (30 kilometers) off the coast of Papua New Guinea in the Pacific Ocean. 	   Australian government aid agency Ausaid officers in Papua New Guinea estimated the final death toll would climb to more than 1,000, with many thousands injured, Australian Defense Minister Ian McLachlan said. 	   Authorities at Aitape in the West Sepik province, on Papua New Guinea's northwest coast, said the tsunami that hit the coast west of the village on Friday night had wiped out three villages and had almost completely destroyed another. 	   ''The latest death toll for the district is 599,'' district disaster coordinating chairman Dickson Dalle said. ''But the figure may increase as more bodies are found.'' 	   Dalle said it was impossible to say how many people are missing. 	   ''There are still people out there who are injured that we have not rescued,'' he said. ''They are scattered all over in the mangroves.'' 	   Dalle said most of the victims of the disaster were old people and schoolchildren. Ausaid estimated 6,000 people were left homeless, McLachlan said. 	   ''We have assumed that the schools in Arop, the schools in Sissano and the schools in Warapu will be closed because we don't have the children,'' Dalle said. ''They're dead . . . they're all dead.'' 	   Dalle said the Nimas village near the Sissano lagoon, the Warapu village and the Arop village had been wiped out and the Malol village had almost been completely destroyed. 	   Associated Press photographer Brian Cassey flew over the lagoon Sunday and said the beaches on which a number of villages had been built had been swept clean. 	   ''The villages no longer exist. The beaches are clean,'' Cassey said. ''The lagoon is filled with debris, coconut palms and what used to be houses.'' 	   In Arop, where according to locals about 2,000 people lived, there was no sign of life, he said. No bodies were visible from the air. 	   ''The place is desolate. Not a soul is there,'' Cassey said. 	   Dalle said that at Warapu 500 people had been confirmed dead, while Malol village had 40 dead and Sissano 41. 	   Prime Minister Bill Skate was expected to arrive in Aitape later this afternoon to assess the situation. 	   Earlier, the National Disaster Center said that hundreds of people were missing and thousands had no food or shelter. 	   Papua New Guinea, with a population of 4 million, is largely dependent on agriculture and mining. The capital of Port Moresby is located about 600 kilometers (375 miles) east of the northeastern tip of Australia. 	   Disaster authorities said the stricken area, about 600 kilometers (370 miles) northwest of the capital of Port Moresby, is spotted with villages consisting of homes made of jungle materials and built on beaches. 	   Robert Igara, the government's chief secretary, said the population in the area affected by the tsunami was 8,000 to 10,000 people. 	   Three Australian Defense Forces Hercules C-130 transport planes were due to takeoff from Australia late Sunday with equipment to set up a filed hospital in the stricken region. A fourth was diverted from training exercises in Papua New Guinea and has begun making food drops, McLachlan said. 	   The condition of airstrips in the region was unknown and it was not known if the planes would be able to land. 	   Small aircraft and helicopters are already ferrying some of the injured to unaffected towns. 	   Queen Elizabeth II sent a message to Papua New Guinea, which is a member of the Commonwealth, expressing her shock at the deaths. 	   ''She said she was shocked at the tidal wave, and that her thoughts were with the families of the bereaved and injured,'' said a Buckingham Palace spokeswoman.
Vietnam is launching a support fund for victims of the defoliant Agent Orange, more than two decades after its use by U.S. forces in the Vietnam War, the Labor newspaper reported Saturday. 	   The paper quoted Nguyen Trong Nhan, chairman of the Vietnam Red Cross, as saying those affected by the toxic chemical will receive assistance from the fund by the year 2000 after a survey on Agent Orange victims is completed next year. 	   The fund, which primarily will rely on donations from domestic and foreign organizations and individuals, will be inaugurated next Friday. 	   It will be managed by the Red Cross, which will provide loans and training to victims. They include former soldiers who fought in areas sprayed with Agent Orange by U.S. aircraft and children who were later born with deformities. 	   Nhan said the government's strained budget might have delayed assistance, pointing out that a laboratory test of a sample for Agent Orange costs dlrs 3,000. 	   Prime Minister Phan Van Khai in April assigned the Ministry of Labor, War Invalids and Social Affairs to conduct a survey on the estimated 300,000 Agent Orange victims in Vietnam.
The Veterans Administration must review all benefit claims denied to hundreds of Vietnam veterans who failed to say their illnesses resulted from exposure to Agent Orange, a federal judge ruled Thursday.
The federal government has paid some benefits to about 6,000 Vietnam veterans who developed cancer and other illnesses.
But an estimated 1,000 veterans were denied back payments under strict language that required applicants to state that Agent Orange or herbicides were linked to the cause of the disability or death, a hurdle ruled illegal Thursday in the class-action lawsuit.
Under VA regulations, veterans do not have to prove they were exposed to Agent Orange or other herbicides containing the toxic substance dioxin. In fact, anyone who served in the war is automatically presumed to have been exposed to it.
A 1989 court ruling in the case voided all VA benefit decisions it had made based on the agency's assertion that only the skin disease chloracne was linked to Agent Orange.
Although the VA has since recognized that a variety of cancers are connected to the defoliant, it has failed to review claims made prior to the 1989 ruling and continued to insist that benefit applicants state that their disability resulted from exposure to Agent Orange, the court found.
''We agree with plaintiffs that the VA's approach is inconsistent with both the spirit and intent of this court's decision, as well as the liberal nature of the VA's own claims process,'' U.S. District Judge Thelton Henderson wrote.
''The court expected that the VA would revisit those benefit decisions that had been erroneously decided under the invalidated regulations,'' he said.
The plaintiffs wanted the VA ordered to pay the benefits, but Henderson ruled that the agency should revisit the denied claims. With benefits denied as far back as 1985, retroactive payments would average $70,000 per person, plaintiffs' attorney Bart Stichman said.
No one knows how many people suffer from the effects of Agent Orange, which was sprayed over wide swaths of jungle by U.S. planes during a 10-year period to strip away cover from enemy troops and their convoys.
A call to U.S. Justice Department attorney Karen Richardson seeking comment Thursday evening was not returned.
The symbolism was lost on the children, all born with birth defects that often are the result of contact by parents with dioxin, a toxic component of the war-era defoliant Agent Orange. 	   They represent both the long-term casualties of war and hope for the future. 	   Veterans groups from the United States, France, Germany, Britain, Japan and Vietnam turned out Thursday to dedicate the Vietnam Friendship Village, which is testimony that old enemies can work together. 	   The result of a decade of corporate donations, bake sales and other grassroots fund-raising that brought in more than dlrs 1 million, the cluster of eight buildings 11 kilometers (seven miles) north of Hanoi will be home to young and old who still suffer a quarter-century after the Vietnam War ended. 	   ''This is about the possibility of average people making a difference,'' said George Mizo, a Vietnam War veteran who became a high-profile anti-war activist. ''We cannot change the past, but we can change the present and the future.'' 	   Vietnam Vice President Nguyen Thi Binh, other government officials, foreign diplomats and veterans gathered at the reclaimed swampland to dedicate the first phase of the village, which currently houses 30 children and 20 adults. 	   By spring, the number is expected to total 100, with a goal of providing housing and support for another 50. 	   No one knows how many people suffer from the effects of Agent Orange, which was sprayed over wide swaths of jungle by U.S. planes during a 10-year period to strip away cover from North Vietnamese troops and their resupply convoys. 	   Estimates range from tens of thousands to 2 million Vietnamese. In April, Prime Minister Phan Van Khai ordered the first nationwide survey, to be completed next year. 	   It's virtually impossible to determine which birth defects or ailments are directly related to Agent Orange. But the Vietnamese Red Cross says there appear to be common threads, and a research facility at the village will study the links. 	   Mizo, a Boston native who now lives in Stuttgart, Germany, was a sergeant in an artillery unit when he was injured in a rocket attack in January 1968 in the buildup to the Tet offensive. 	   Redeployed back home, he spoke out against the war and was in and out of military jails for two years. In the mid-1980s, he was among a group of four veterans who staged a hunger strike on the steps of the U.S. Capitol in solidarity with Nicaragua. 	   Shortly after his son Michael's birth in 1988, Mizo became involved in a project by American veterans to build a pagoda in Vietnam. It developed instead into the Friendship Village. 	   On Thursday, his son handed out drawings done by his fellow students in Stuttgart to the Friendship Village children. 	   ''This represents healing and reconstruction,'' the elder Mizo said moments earlier. ''Those who have experienced the horrors of war know how precious life is.''
A review of what has been done to determine how Agent Orange and other herbicides affected Vietnam veterans confirms earlier studies linking them with several diseases but leaves unanswered painful medical questions of the war that ended 24 years ago.
Thursday's independent report by the Institute of Medicine appears to offer no new evidence that would affect benefits for Vietnam War veterans or their offspring, although the Department of Veterans Affairs said the study will be valuable for further research.
Despite continuing investigation into possible links to birth defects, diabetes and a list of other illnesses, no scientific studies over the last two years has provided enough information to draw significant new conclusions about whether herbicides are linked to any condition, study director Dr. David Tollerud said.
Veterans Affairs, which issued a statement praising the ''thorough and impartial work of the committee,'' offers special compensation for 10 diseases listed as linked or possibly linked to herbicide used in Vietnam whether veterans can prove exposure or not.
Children of veterans also may receive benefits for the birth defect spina bifida, whose link is listed as ''limited or suggestive,'' but diabetes is not included. Evidence of a diabetes link to herbicides or dioxin is listed as still ''inadequate or insufficient.''
''A lot more research is being done, which we are very optimistic will continue to provide useful information to answer the questions that remain,'' said Tollerud, director of the Center for Environmental and Occupation Health at Philadelphia's Hahnemann University School of Public Health.
The review keeps four diseases on the list of those for which evidence establishes links with exposure to herbicides widely used as defoliants in Vietnam: soft-tissue sarcoma, non-Hodgkin's lymphoma, Hodgkin's disease and cholaracne. The first three are forms of cancer.
In the institute's last review of scientific research in 1996, six other diseases were listed with ''limited or suggestive evidence of association'' to Agent Orange, other herbicides or the contaminant dioxin. Added to the list then was spina bifida, the spinal birth defect found in the children of some Vietnam veterans.
''Based on the recent literature, there are no additional diseases that satisfy this category's criteria,'' the new report said. Nor did it find enough evidence to move diseases to a category of higher or lower certainty.
In an interview, Tollerud said new research was conducted on diabetes and on spina bifida as well as other diseases.
He said the most serious medical questions still being studied from the war involve the relationship between herbicides and cases of diabetes and birth defects among veterans and their offspring.
This year's review is the third in a series of reports. A law passed in 1991 calls for the National Academy of Sciences to review new Agent Orange and herbicide studies every two years to determine if the fresh research finds an added connection between the chemicals and disease. The Institute of Medicine is an affiliate of the National Academy of Sciences.
About 19 million gallons of Agent Orange and other chemicals were used to defoliate trees in the jungles of Vietnam, beginning in 1962. Their use was stopped in 1971, two years after studies first linked Agent Orange to birth defects in laboratory animals.
The Department of Veterans Affairs has received more than 92,000 claims and treated more than 50,000 cases of service-related conditions, spokesman Ken McKinnon said.
He said Vietnam veterans are presumed to have been exposed to Agent Orange, and veterans with any of the 10 diseases is presumed to have contracted it from the exposure, without individual proof.
Benefits for Vietnam War veterans are not likely to be affected by an independent review that confirms ties of Agent Orange to several diseases without resolving lingering questions about birth defects or diabetes.
The study retains three forms of cancer as well as chemical acne as definitely linked to use of herbicides to defoliate the Vietnam countryside. It also confirms a list of six other diseases, including a spinal birth defect that has appeared in some children of veterans, as possibly linked.
All 10 diseases remain on the list of those for which all veterans who served in Vietnam may receive benefits from the Veterans Affairs Department. Since 1996, Vietnam veterans' children have been eligible for coverage for spina bifida.
The department has received more than 92,000 claims from veterans who believed their condition was related to Agent Orange. Of those, about 50,000 were deemed service-related for any condition, and about 5,000 were linked to diseases on the Agent Orange list, said spokesman Ken McKinnon. About 2.1 million U.S. military personnel served in Vietnam during the period.
He said all Vietnam veterans are presumed to have been exposed to Agent Orange and anyone with any of the 10 diseases is presumed to have contracted it from the exposure, without any need for additional proof.
But a federal judge in San Francisco ruled Thursday that the Veterans Administration must reconsider the denial of benefits for hundreds of veterans.
A 1989 court ruling voided all benefit decisions the agency had made based on the agency's outdated assertion that only the skin disease chloracne was linked to Agent Orange.
The agency failed to review claims made before the ruling and continued to insist that benefit applicants state that their disabilities were linked to Agent Orange exposure, U.S. District Judge Thelton Henderson concluded.
''The court expected that the VA would revisit those benefit decisions that had been erroneously decided under the invalidated regulations,'' Henderson wrote.
Bart Stichman, lawyer for plaintiffs in the case, estimated the decision affects about 1,000 veterans whose claims were denied.
The independent report released Thursday by the Institute of Medicine, affiliated with the National Academy of Sciences, was praised for its thoroughness by the Veterans Affairs Department, which said it would be useful in further research. Congress has ordered a review every two years of links of various diseases to the use of chemicals in Vietnam.
Evidence of diabetes' link to use of herbicides or dioxin is listed by the study as still ''inadequate or insufficient'' to draw an association with Agent Orange or other chemicals used in Vietnam between 1962 and 1971.
''A lot more research is being done, which we are very optimistic will continue to provide useful information to answer the questions that remain,'' said Dr. David Tollerud, who directed the study and heads the Center for Environmental and Occupation Health at Hahnemann University School of Public Health in Philadelphia.
The four diseases on the list of those for which there is sufficient evidence to establish a link with exposure to herbicides are soft-tissue sarcoma, non-Hodgkin's lymphoma, Hodgkin's disease and cholaracne. The first three are forms of cancer.
In the institute's last review of scientific research in 1996, six other diseases were listed as those with ''limited or suggestive evidence of association'' to Agent Orange, other herbicides or the contaminant dioxin. Added to the list then was spina bifida, the spinal birth defect found in the children of some Vietnam veterans.
''Based on the recent literature,'' the new report said, ''there are no additional diseases that satisfy this category's criteria.''
Tollerud, in an interview, said new research was conducted on diabetes and on spina bifida, as well as other diseases.
About 19 million gallons of Agent Orange and other chemicals were used to defoliate trees in the jungles of Vietnam, beginning in 1962. Their use was stopped in 1971, two years after studies first linked Agent Orange to birth defects in laboratory animals.
Thai and U.S. experts would cooperate in an operation to identify the toxic chemicals recently discovered under an airport in Hua Hin, about 200 kilometers south of Bangkok.
The United States has dispatched a team of experts from the Joint United States Military Assistance Group to inspect the site with Thai experts, sources close to the U.S. Embassy here said on Friday.
The strong-smelling hazardous waste was unearthed last week under the Bor Fai airport runway in Hua Hin of Prachuab Khiri Khan Province.
The waste, suspected of being the deadly "Agent Orange" chemical used by the U.S. Army to denude forests to deny Vietnamese fighters ground cover during the Vietnam War, has caused several Thai villagers to fall sick.
However, there is conflicting information over who brought the substance into Thailand. Thailand's Foreign Ministry confirmed that the six Thai military facilities known to have been used by Washington during the Vietnam War excluded Bor Fai airbase, which had long been owned by the Thai Civil Aviation Department.
"It had been used as a pilot training ground years before the war and is still used for that purpose," an official said.
The U.S. Embassy has refused to disclose any further details concerning the possibility that Washington had secretly used the airbase during the Vietnam War, saying the information currently available does not go back that far.
Washington sent the inspection team at the request of Bangkok. Jarupong Bunlong, deputy director-general of Thailand's Pollution Control Department, said the chemicals should be identified by next week. All he could confirm for now is that the five 15-liter barrels and one 200-liter barrel that have been found originated from the United States.
Thai experts had earlier discovered the toxic barrels had a code designating their origin, but had not said what the substance was. The code names "Delaware" ( a U.S. state) as the place of origin.
Jarupong said his department has built a shelter around the area to prevent rainfall from dissolving the substance underground.
In what amounted to a chance second-generation reunion from the war years, five teen-age girls laughed and chattered at a lunch table the other day, all of them patients in a hospital for severely deformed or mentally retarded children.
Their fathers had been soldiers from different parts of North Vietnam who fought in the same area of Tay Ninh province in the south and dispersed to their homes when the war ended in 1975. Then they had children. The area where they fought had been heavily sprayed with the herbicide Agent Orange in a wide-ranging, decade-long campaign by the United States to deprive its enemy of forest cover and food crops.
Officials here are convinced that the five teen-agers _ along with tens of thousands of other deformed children of war veterans and exposed civilians _ are the victims of the herbicide and its poisonous residue, dioxin. Reunions like the one in the hospital are not uncommon, the officials say.
But Vietnam's scientific studies have been sketchy and its evidence is often anecdotal. Until there is firm proof that chemical herbicides are to blame, the United States says it cannot take responsibility.
Vietnam has raised the issue only glancingly in talks with the United States, said Ambassador Douglas Peterson. But it arises repeatedly among people here who say it is one of the most painful remnants of a war that ended 24 years ago.
In a country where Americans are generally welcomed with friendship, the absence of aid from the United States for deformed children is one issue that still rankles.
It is a subject that the government-controlled press keeps alive with occasional reports and that is sometimes placed on the agendas of foreign delegations, who are shown shelves full of glass bottles with labels like ''Deformed baby with two heads, one body.''
''You talk so much about human rights and humanity,'' said Dr. Le Cao Dai, who runs the Agent Orange program of the Vietnamese Red Cross. ''No human rights in China. No human rights in Vietnam. So why, these children, are they not eligible for human rights?''
U.S. officials and many independent researchers caution that there is no certainty that Agent Orange is responsible for the illnesses and birth defects, which can have other causes and can be found in other countries in the region.
The Veterans Association in Washington now offers compensation for 10 diseases, as well as for the birth defect spina bifida, that have been determined to be linked, or possibly linked, to the spraying in Vietnam.
The United States says more accurate tests are needed to confirm the Vietnamese assertion that there are victims here as well.
''The Agent Orange issue in this country is driven by propaganda,'' said a diplomat. ''They would have you believe that every deformed baby is a result of Agent Orange. And the same with American GIs.''
From 1962 to 1971, the United States sprayed 12 million gallons of defoliant over more than 10 percent of what was then South Vietnam. Some 14 percent of the area's forests were destroyed, according to U.S. figures, and broad stretches of the landscape are still bare of trees.
The strongest evidence so far that some areas are still contaminated was published last October by a Canadian environmental research group, Hatfield Consultants.
In a five-year study of the Aluoi Valley in central Quang Tri province, the researchers found high levels of dioxin in the soil, in fish and animal tissue, and in the blood of people born after the war.
''If such data were collected in most Western jurisdictions, based on similar sampling levels, major environmental cleanup and more extensive studies would be implemented,'' the report said. ''As Western-based scientists, we can hardly recommend less be done in Vietnam.''
The study was careful not to draw conclusions about the contentious question of human victims of the chemical spraying. But David Levy, vice president and senior scientist of Hatfield, said in an interview that logic would suggest that there were victims.
Over the years, tests conducted by Vietnamese and foreign researchers in certain localities here have documented high levels of contamination of breast milk and blood. Though the methodology may not be as rigorous as that in more-developed nations, the findings are often striking.
Dai said sharp contrasts are evident between the south, which was sprayed, and the north, which was not, and between northern residents who fought in the south and those who did not.
(STORY CAN END HERE _ OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS)
''Of course, to be very accurate, we need to have more medical study to confirm the causes,'' said Dr. Nguyen Thi My Hien, the director of the hospital here, the Thanh Xuan Peace Village, that cares for deformed children. But she said she believed that about 80 of her 100 patients were victims of chemical spraying.
One of these is Nguyen Cong Nang, 11, the severely retarded son of a former soldier who is himself disabled, with metal shrapnel lodged behind his right eye. Now the father, Nguyen Van Hien, 45, spends his days at the hospital, feeding and bathing his son and rocking him to sleep at nap times.
He said that all three of his sons had birth defects and that friends from the war also had children who were born deformed.
''For us it was OK,'' he said of his fellow soldiers. ''We were happy to sacrifice on behalf of the next generation. But these children are innocent of the war. They are a generation of victims who are the children of victims.''
The chance reunion of the children of battlefield comrades included Nguyen Thi Thoa, 15, whose body is covered with black blotches and whose younger brother died of heart disease. Hien described the blotches simply as a melanin disorder and said: ''It is a very serious case. We are confused about how to treat it.''
Sitting by her were two sisters, Nguyen Thi Thuong, 15, and Nguyen Thi Khuyen, 13, both of whom have mild mental retardation and whose growth has been severely stunted.
Hien said the sisters' father had been unable to bear their ailments and had fled their home. After their mother brought them to live at the hospital, the doctor said, the parents reunited and had another baby, who was also born deformed.
That story is not unusual, said Dai of the Red Cross. Parents often consider such births to be punishments for their sins and keep trying for healthy children, only to produce more sick ones.
In some cases, the parents are ostracized by fellow villagers for these presumed sins and exiled to live at the edges of rice fields.
In a final humiliation for these unlucky veterans, he said, ''People sometimes say, `This is happening to you because you killed too many people when you fought in the war.'''
Vietnam decided to undertake next month a nation-wide census of Agent Orange victims, Vietnam's English daily Vietnam News reported Saturday.
The results of the census are intended to be used by the Vietnamese government to work out more relevant policies for the well-being of victims, and to call for stronger support from domestic organizations and international assistance for victims.
During the Vietnam war, the Americans sprayed 42 million liters of toxic chemicals, most of it Agent Orange, said Vietnam News, adding that the victims include people who lived and worked in areas sprayed between 1961 and 1971 southwards of the 17th parallel.
Congenital deformity and disability caused by exposure to the toxic chemical during the war can be found even in the second generation of people directly exposed to it, said the daily.
Its effects on humans include cancer and skin disease, as well as congenital deformities and disabilities, while causing widespread environmental damage.
Officials of Vietnam's Ministry of Labor, War Invalids and Social Affairs believe more victims now live in Vietnam's central and northern provinces than the south, with some families in central Vietnam having three to five affected children.
The census will be implemented in all the 10,300 villages in the country and be completed by July, an official of Vietnam's Ministry of Labor, War Invalids and Social Affairs said.
The Vietnamese Red Cross launched a special fund Friday for victims of Agent Orange, saying the toxic defoliant is starting to claim its third generation of victims a quarter-century after the end of the Vietnam War. 	   ''With Agent Orange, the land mines were planted deep in the very essence of life _ in the genes of the men and women,'' said John Geoghegan, the country head for the International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies. 	   ''That this war is being fought again with their grandchildren is a horrific thought.'' 	   No one knows how many people suffer from the effects of Agent Orange, which was sprayed over wide swaths of jungle by U.S. planes during a 10-year period to strip away cover for North Vietnamese troops and their resupply convoys. Estimates range from tens of thousands to 2 million Vietnamese. 	   In April, Prime Minister Phan Van Khai ordered the first nationwide survey, to be completed next year. 	   In addition, veterans from at least four countries who fought on the side of the former U.S.-backed South Vietnamese government sued the chemical's manufacturers in the United States, saying exposure caused chronic illness, deaths and birth defects. 	   According to U.S. records, the United States sprayed about 12 million gallons (45 million liters) of Agent Orange over parts of southern and central Vietnam in 1961-71. 	   The total included about 375 pounds (170 kilograms) of dioxin, a mere trace of which can cause cancer. 	   The spraying was stopped in 1971 _ four years before the end of the war _ after laboratory tests showed that dioxin can cause cancers and birth defects. 	   It's virtually impossible to determine which birth defects or ailments are directly related to Agent Orange. 	   But the Vietnamese Red Cross says there appear to be common threads: brothers and sisters suffering from the same deformities, which is otherwise fairly uncommon; arms and legs that are twisted in a certain way; and eyes without pupils. 	   Hoang Dinh Cau, chairman of the National Committee for Investigation of Defects from Toxic Chemicals Used During the Vietnam War, said recent studies show dioxin levels are dropping, along with high rates of birth defects, in the affected areas. 	   But some still have high toxicity levels in both the soil and the oil of fish that were checked. 	   Cau, 81, dismissed concerns that dioxin has and will continue to leech into the food supply. However, some foreign scientists worry that ongoing demining efforts are stirring up buried dioxin and allowing it to be carried into the water system by erosion. 	   Vietnam estimates 16.5 percent of the 70,391 square miles (182,299 square kilometers) in the former South Vietnam were sprayed, some areas four times or more. Nearly 2 million people lived in the affected areas. 	   In most of the country, the deformity rates peaked in the late 1970s and have fallen sharply since 1985, Cau said. But in the most heavily sprayed areas, the declines didn't start until the '90s. 	   ''Initially, we did not think the chemicals would have an impact on the second generation,'' Cau said. ''But dioxin can stay in the soil very long.'' 	   He pulled out a stack of case studies. One showed a couple who had two healthy children before the father went to fight in the south. Four miscarriages followed his return. Another couple had eight deformed children. 	   He said recently developed treatments have improved the lives of some victims. Those children who have the most serious deformities are cared for at 11 ''peace villages'' scattered across the country that can handle a total of 500 patients. More villages are planned.
Dr. Le Cao Dai, one of Vietnam's top experts on the health effects of Agent Orange, first encountered American military herbicides when he ran a field hospital for the North Vietnamese army along the Ho Chi Minh Trail. American planes would fly low over the forest canopy and release a cloud of chemicals. Within days, the leaves would begin to fall, forcing Dai to move his hospital deeper into the forest for concealment. Only later did he come to believe that the spraying had done long-term health damage to Vietnamese soldiers and civilians.
That belief is shared by leading Vietnamese doctors who were interviewed on a recent trip through Vietnam. None would hazard a guess to this writer as to how extensive the damage had been, but one was later quoted in the Vietnamese press as asserting that some 70,000 Vietnamese are now suffering from illnesses caused by Agent Orange.
The evidence to support these beliefs is weak, for it is a sad irony of the Vietnam War that those most likely to have been affected by the spraying _ the Vietnamese themselves _ have been the least effectively studied. The United States has put enormous effort into assessing possible harm to American soldiers but found only limited damage, perhaps because most soldiers had relatively little contact with the chemicals during their short tours of duty. Meanwhile, the Vietnamese troops directly under the spray and civilians who lived in the sprayed areas for years or moved in later, have been studied primarily by Vietnamese scientists whose results are not generally accepted by scientists from more advanced nations.
American herbicides, of which the most prominent was Agent Orange, were widely dispersed to defoliate trees over supply routes, clear away brush from roadsides, riverbanks and base camps, and kill food crops that sustained guerrilla bands. More than 10 percent of the land area of South Vietnam was sprayed at least once, and some areas were sprayed repeatedly. The herbicides themselves would generally dissipate within weeks but would leave behind a toxic contaminant, dioxin, that was inadvertently created during the manufacturing process.
Journalists who inquire about Agent Orange are routinely taken to ''peace villages'' to see malformed children, to an exhibit on health consequences at the medical school in Hanoi or to a collection of malformed fetuses at an obstetrical hospital in Ho Chi Minh City. All three sites make a powerful case that there is appalling illness in Vietnam, but all fall short of demonstrating that Agent Orange was the culprit. The birth defects, cancers and other illnesses that the Vietnamese attribute to Agent Orange can be caused by a wide range of factors, and Agent Orange may not be prominent among them.
The epidemiological and laboratory studies that offer the best hope of teasing out answers are difficult for even the most advanced scientific countries to perform. Vietnamese studies that purport to find excess cancers, birth defects and other illnesses in soldiers and civilians from areas that were sprayed are discounted by Western experts for lack of stringent methodology.
Vietnamese and American scientists once started a collaborative research effort, but it fell apart three years ago when Vietnamese authorities confiscated research samples before they could leave the country. Now, however, the Vietnamese and the American Embassy in Hanoi are both suggesting a joint study of the effects of the herbicides. The U.S. National Academy of Sciences has been asked to consider whether it is feasible to do a study so long after the spraying, in a nation where health records and disease measures are notoriously incomplete.
The research seems well worth doing, if it is technically feasible. An authoritative study would add to the growing literature on the health effects of herbicides and dioxin, could help the Vietnamese decide how to allocate scarce health resources and might shed additional light on the effects of Agent Orange in American veterans. Most compelling of all, it might finally close one of the festering wounds from the Vietnam War.
Not that you'd expect a documentary to be fair and balanced _ the whole point of the genre is to shape opinion _ but "Going Upriver: The Long War of John Kerry" plays like a 92-minute campaign ad for the Democratic presidential candidate.
Director George Butler has been friends with Kerry for 40 years, so as you'd imagine, he paints a loving portrait of a dedicated, natural leader during the Vietnam War and a dedicated, natural leader of veterans who protested the war after coming home.
The closest Butler comes to unearthing even the slightest critical word is when Douglas Brinkley, author of "Tour of Duty: John Kerry and the Vietnam War," describes the young Navy man's immediate desire to command a Swift boat the first time he sees one. The anecdote merely speaks to the future Massachusetts senator's ambition, which has never exactly been a secret, and isn't such a bad thing.
Butler's unlimited access yields a mind-blowing amount of archival photographs and film footage, but what's truly effective is the way he lets the images speak for themselves, rather than manipulating them in a maudlin fashion.
The filmmaker-photographer _ who previously showed a keen eye for recognizing potential with his 1977 documentary "Pumping Iron," about a then-unknown bodybuilder named Arnold Schwarzenegger _ begins with home movies of Kerry as a boy, interviews his brother and sister, and evokes Kerry's exuberant first days at Yale University. (As roommate Harvey Bundy recalls, "John was always doing something.")
At the urging of Bundy's uncle, William, Kerry enlisted in the Navy, and frequently found himself the target of gunfire on Vietnamese rivers. He was wounded three times and earned a Silver Star.
"Every day, John Kerry made decisions that saved the lives of the crew of that boat," remembered one man who served alongside him.
You'll hear lots of quotes like that in the film. Over and over. You'll also see the young, dark-haired Kerry looking surprisingly handsome, shirtless in the sunshine and holding a puppy in his lap, like some shimmering vision from an Abercrombie and Fitch catalogue. (You won't, however, hear from Kerry himself, today. He declined to be interviewed for the film, which was probably smart _ doing otherwise might have looked like an infomercial.)
Butler, working with writer Joseph Dorman, included color-saturated, slow-motion aerial footage of nighttime explosions over the deep, lush jungles, as well as grainy shots of some soldiers weeping while others are placed in body bags.
But the images that follow are even more powerful, perhaps for the pure simplicity of their emotion. Once Kerry came home, he found himself questioning what the United States was doing in Vietnam, and became active in Vietnam Veterans Against the War. In April 1971, the group organized a weeklong demonstration in Washington, where more than a thousand veterans shared stories, camped outside and lobbied their congressmen.
The most stirring moment of the week consisted of veterans, one by one, lobbing their ribbons and medals _ and various pieces of clothing, boots and photographs _ over a wall that had been built in front of the Capitol steps. (Kerry is shown joining in, though Butler explains in the film's press notes that he tossed his ribbons, which represented his medals.)
Kerry made an even more high-profile appearance when he was asked to testify on the group's behalf before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee. Television coverage identified him as "John Kerry _ Former Gunboat Commander." Dressed in olive, his hair appropriately long for the period but not all-out hippieish, the 27-year-old spoke confidently and eloquently about the horrors he and his fellow veterans endured in Vietnam.
The address made him a star. It also made him a target of the Nixon administration.
"He looks like a Kennedy, he talks exactly like a Kennedy," chief of staff H.R. Haldeman tells an obviously paranoid President Nixon in an audio recording.
If that guy were running for president, MTV wouldn't need to air Rock the Vote promos between episodes of "Cribs" to lure young people to the polls.
"Going Upriver: The Long War of John Kerry," a ThinkFilm release, runs 92 minutes. Two and a half stars out of four.
A new U.N. policy that took effect Friday allows U.N. staffers' same-sex partners to collect benefits if permitted by the laws of their home countries.
The powerful U.N. budget committee asked Secretary-General Kofi Annan to re-examine a directive that took effect Feb. 1, which allowed gay and lesbian partners of U.N. staffers to receive benefits.
That directive angered many Muslim and African nations but was hailed by the gay and lesbian rights organization at the United Nations, which had lobbied for years for medical, pension and other benefits for same-sex partners.
The 57-nation Organization of the Islamic Conference said it was "seriously concerned about extending the scope of the family" eligible for benefits and opposed "the presumption" that same sex partners should qualify _ a view backed by a number of African nations.
In asking for a review, the General Assembly's budget and administration committee did not propose specific changes, leaving open the possibility that Annan could maintain the policy, modify it or abandon it.
The new directive, obtained by The Associated Press, abolishes the previous one issued in January.
That directive stated that "family status for the purposes of entitlements" would be determined using the long-established principle that such matters should be decided by the staffer's nationality and the laws of that country.
"A legally recognized domestic partnership contracted by a staff member under the law of the country of his or her nationality will also qualify that staff member to receive the entitlements provided for eligible family members," it said.
The directive that took effect Friday makes no mention of "family status" or "domestic partnership."
Instead, it states simply that "the practice of the organization when determining the personal status of staff members for the purpose of entitlements ... has been done, and will continue to be done, by reference to the law of nationality of the staff member concerned."
It said requests for entitlements will be sent to the U.N. mission of the country the staffer is from to verify its laws.
The United Nations doesn't keep track of laws on same-sex marriages or domestic partnerships.
The vast majority of countries don't offer any benefits to gay or lesbian couples. But U.N. officials have said they are aware that the Netherlands recognizes same-sex marriages and a number of countries recognize domestic partnerships, including Sweden, Norway, Finland, Denmark, Australia, Canada, New Zealand, France, Germany and Belgium.
U.S. and Iraqi forces battled their way into the center of this insurgent-ridden city Friday, claiming that they had taken control of more than half the town and that they had killed more than 100 guerrillas, in what is shaping up to be one of the largest military operations since the war began.
More than 5,000 troops, including 3,000 Americans, attacked the city from three sides early Friday, seizing the main government buildings and a pharmaceutical factory on the city's northwest end. Iraqi forces also took control of the Golden Mosque, a holy Shiite site visited annually by thousands of pilgrims, thereby preventing a siege like that in Najaf, where insurgents commandeered the Imam Ali Shrine to draw out the fighting there.
The assault here represented the first major effort by U.S. and Iraqi forces to reclaim areas that have fallen into the hands of insurgents before the elections scheduled for January. U.S. officials have said they plan to the retake the areas in time to allow the Iraqis to vote, and that their toughest challenges still lie ahead in places like Fallujah and Ramadi.
In Samarra, U.S. commanders decided to move in after a deal that had allowed Iraqi government officials to reassert control in the city fell apart before insurgent attacks. At the time of the deal, announced last month, Bush administration officials touted it as a breakthrough that achieved their political objectives without bloodshed.
At the same time, there was a growing concern among U.S. intelligence officers that insurgents in Samarra had begun to cooperate with their comrades in Fallujah, the heart of the Iraqi insurgency and a place where the U.S. military does not go.
The U.S. military said that one soldier, a member of the 1st Infantry Division, had been killed in the fighting Friday and that four others had been wounded. In addition to the 100 Iraqis the Americans said they had killed, 37 others were taken prisoner, they said.
U.S. and Iraqi officials said they planned to flush the insurgents from the city, which had fallen under their control in recent months, re-establish government authority and then pull the U.S. troops back once calm returned. Iraqi troops and police would then be charged with maintaining control, a task that U.S. and Iraqi officials say is one of the most difficult challenges facing the country today.
In an appearance in Baghdad, Qassim Daoud, the Iraqi national security adviser, struck a combative chord, promising more military operations in the Sunni Triangle.
"We will spare no effort to clean all the Iraqi lands and cities from these criminals, and we will pave the way through these operations not only for reconstruction but also for the general election," Daoud said.
Daoud said the operation in Samarra followed a meeting Sunday in Baghdad of about 110 of Samarra's sheikhs and city leaders, who, he said, had asked the government to get rid of the insurgents. Daoud conceded that plans for the military operation were under way by the time of the meeting, and that, in any case, the Iraqi government would have moved into the city even if it had received no invitation.
"Even if the citizens did not ask us, we would have gone in to clean it," Daoud said.
The fight for Samarra marks the largest operation in which U.S. forces have gone into battle alongside Iraqi soldiers; on Friday, U.S. soldiers went as far as to make room for their Iraqi comrades in their more heavily armored vehicles.
The strategy represents something of a risk for both the U.S. military and for the Iraqi government; in April, the Iraqi security forces largely disintegrated before uprisings in central and southern Iraq. From a U.S. standpoint, the Iraqi soldiers, even if they do not do the bulk of the fighting, provide critical political cover that allows the operations to go forward.
The benefits of the joint strategy were instantly apparent, when a group of Iraqi soldiers took control of the Golden Mosque, a place where the presence of U.S. soldiers would be sure to cause consternation among the locals. Iraqi soldiers searched at least one other mosque in the town.
As the operation unfolded, the Americans sealed off the roads leading into the city, cut the telephone lines and at least some of the electricity. That made it impossible, at least for now, to judge the reaction of ordinary Iraqis inside the Samarra, for whom the U.S. and Iraqi soldiers professed to be fighting.
The house-to-house searching resulted in a few hasty skirmishes, and uncovered a few small arms caches -- including several mortar rounds that were summarily detonated. Explosions and bursts of gunfire echoed throughout the city for much of the day. But there appeared to be few pitched battles, as the insurgents seemed to melt away before the superior force.
Some of the U.S. officers who led patrols through the city Friday seemed to sense that the guerrillas would return.
"The bad guys are just pulling back to see what we're going to do," said Lt. Jonathan Martin, the executive officer of one of the companies conducting the house-to-house search. "Our guess is, this battle is going to get pretty rough and will probably last a long time."
One by one, the houses in the Jebera neighborhood in the southeastern edge of the city were kicked open -- and sometimes shotgunned open -- at one point revealing a bewildered wedding party that had not noticed that U.S. forces were overrunning the neighborhood. Mostly, though, the houses were empty, and showed signs of a hasty departure.
In one home, a group of U.S. soldiers made a surprising discovery: Yaltchin Kaya, a Turkish truck driver kidnapped about two weeks ago by insurgents. The Americans found him when they snapped the padlock on a stifling room. He had worked for KBR, the U.S. military contractor.
"Chalk one up for the good guys," Army Spc. Jess Escamillas said.
(STORY CAN END HERE. OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS)
In the attempt to meld U.S. and Iraqi units together, some irritations appear to have developed.
As a U.S. platoon led a line of Iraqi soldiers through a Samarra neighborhood Friday morning, clinging to the outside walls of the homes to thwart potential snipers, one Iraqi soldier blithely strolled down the middle of the street.
"Hey, dummy, get out of the road," a sergeant shouted from a passing Humvee.
As two Iraqi soldiers played duelists with a pair of swords they had found in one of the abandoned houses, a lieutenant quietly berated their office for the looting and for the potentially dangerous tomfoolery:
"You better tell those boys to cut down on the swordplay."
A Humvee containing Escamillas -- whose platoon nickname is "Skull" -- also carried Martin through the city. Riding in the machine-gun turret was Sgt. Travis Glass, who the lieutenant called "Sunglasses," while Pvt. Gregory Echevarria of New York sat in the back, inevitably nicknamed "Big Apple."
Skull pulled on an icy bottle of Gatorade, but it was doing little to cut the fierce heat, stifling and miserable at well over 100 degrees Fahrenheit by 10 a.m. and unrelenting until well after sunset, when it plummets to the upper 60s.
"This heat, man, you can't get away from it," Skull said. "Your uniform always looks like you just pulled it out of the washer, sopping wet."
Up in the turret, Sunglasses wheeled around and shouted that he'd spotted a man in one of the upstairs windows of the houses. He shouted to a soldier guarding the house whether he knew about the man. "Yeah, yeah, take it easy," the soldier shouted back. "You can't shoot 'em all, you know."
Up one street and down the other, the Humvee picked its slow, deliberate way through the neighborhood, following the infantry as they kicked down doors. In one empty lot, a forlorn mule munched on debris. A disabled big-rig truck sat at curbside, its windshield pocked with automatic-weapons fire. Blossoms of black smoke rose in thick plumes above the distant rooflines to the occasional thud, thud, thud or mortar fire and tank rounds and the chattering of gunfire.
"Did you hear that?" Big Apple asked about something that had just squawked over the radio. "They got a mortar mounted on the back of a pickup truck."
Skull shook his head. "They are a resourceful people," he said.
"And sometimes crazy," Sunglasses added.
"A very crazy country," the lieutenant concurred.
An old man opened the gate to his compound and led about a dozen dusty goats out onto the road. Suddenly, up ahead, two infantrymen stopped a car and demanded that the occupants get out to be searches. A dozen people emerged from the front seat, back seat and trunk, the men all dutifully raising their hands to be patted down.
Suddenly, one of the infantrymen fired off two long bursts at a distant car that was not heeding warnings to slow down. The car stopped, turned and left the area as the old shepherd, startled by the gunfire, raised his staff, turned his herd and led them back into the cool of his hidden compound.
Rep. Tom DeLay, the majority leader rebuked by House ethics officials for pressuring a fellow member to switch his vote on a health care bill, still faces potentially more serious accusations, subjecting him to a new scrutiny that even some Republicans say could complicate his political future.
DeLay, the take-no-prisoners Texan known for maintaining strict discipline in his caucus, is entangled in a series of inquiries here and in Texas regarding his fund raising and other activities. In Texas, three of his top aides have been indicted; in Washington, the House ethics panel is deciding whether to initiate a formal investigation.
On Friday, Republicans publicly rallied around their leader, though some said privately that the surprise ethics rebuke on Thursday -- the second for DeLay, who was previously chastised for pressuring interest groups to hire Republicans -- could hinder the leader if he tried to become speaker.
Democrats, who are already making DeLay an issue in their campaigns, attacked him on Friday for what Rep. Nancy Pelosi, D-Calif., the minority leader, called a "continued abuse of power." She said there was "an ethical cloud over this Capitol because of how he is conducting business here."
The fracas is evoking memories of past ethics battles that have roiled Capitol Hill, and contributed to the ouster of two previous House speakers, Democrat Jim Wright and Republican Newt Gingrich. Both ultimately faced calls from their own party members to step down, which is not the case with DeLay.
"If there is any pattern, it is that whenever anybody gets in power and becomes an effective leader in Washington, the other side, rather than beating them with ideas and philosophy, does a flank movement on ethics charges," said Rep. Jack Kingston of Georgia, the vice chairman of the House Republican Conference. He predicted that by Monday, the ethics rebuke would be a "nonstory."
But more than one Republican, speaking on the condition of anonymity for fear that they would anger their party's powerbroker, said DeLay's ethics history might make it difficult for him to become speaker someday.
"There are a lot of folks who want to see that happen, and they're a little depressed right now," one said.
A spokesman for DeLay, Stuart Roy, dismissed the Democratic criticism as politically motivated, and said the leader was not worried about the speaker's job. "He has said in the past that the only job he ever wanted was whip," Roy said, "and he has let everything else take care of itself."
The rebuke, issued Thursday night, stems from last year's vote on the Medicare prescription drug bill. The committee found that as the bill appeared headed to defeat, DeLay offered to endorse the son of a Michigan congressman, Rep. Nick Smith, in a congressional primary in return for Smith's vote in favor of the measure. Smith, who considered the bill too expensive, refused; he was admonished for what the committee said was exaggerating the pressure and inducements made to him.
The bill passed; Smith's son lost the primary.
For the ethics panel, which is composed of five members of each party, investigating the House majority leader is a task so delicate that the panel made public its 62-page report practically under cover of darkness, dropping it off in the House press gallery without comment.
In fact, the House had been awaiting the ethics panel's decision on a separate complaint, filed by Rep. Chris Bell, D-Texas, that accuses DeLay of illegally soliciting campaign contributions, laundering campaign contributions to influence state legislative races and improperly using his office to influence federal agencies. An announcement could come as early as next week.
The admonishment on Thursday was particularly surprising since DeLay had not figured prominently in the controversy surrounding Smith. "It is like a second hurricane," one Republican official said.
Some wondered if a trade was afoot -- a public slap in the Smith case in exchange for a decision not to pursue Bell's complaint. Others said the ethics panel now had no choice but to look into those accusations.
"Mr. DeLay has a track record now in the ethics area, and it's a bad one," said Fred Wertheimer, president of Democracy 21, a watchdog group that has called for the ethics panel to hire an independent counsel to investigate DeLay. "There's just no basis on which the House ethics committee can do anything now but seriously move forward with an investigation into the ethics complaint pending before it."
Democrats are encouraging their candidates to invoke DeLay's name in campaigns. Since the indictments of his aides last week in Texas, the Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee has demanded that Republican candidates return donations from DeLay.
"He hasn't reached the stage of Newt Gingrich, but he has reached the center of gravity, where people do see him as representing the Republican Party in the House of Representatives, and as somebody who abused the rules of the House," said the committee's chairman, Rep. Robert T. Matsui of California, in an interview on Friday.
The telephone was ringing all afternoon on Friday at the Flower Cellar here in this small town in the shadow of Mount St. Helens. Callers were, as Shelby Gourde, the floral designer, said, "abuzz with the news."
The news was big: After almost two decades of dormancy, Mount St. Helens was stirring again. It erupted in a huge explosion in 1980, killing 57 people; blasting off its top; wiping out entire forests, sending houses, cars and refrigerators careering down the Cowlitz River; and dumping so much ash here and on towns across the Northwest that the ash had to be shoveled out like snow for weeks.
This week, a series of earthquakes in the lava dome of the most active volcano in the lower 48 states culminated on Friday in a small explosion that sent a cinematic, miles-high plume of steam and ash into the sky.
The explosion, predicted for several days and posing no imminent danger to people in the region, was greeted with jaw-dropping delight by the many thrill seekers and news reporters who had gone up to the mountain for an edge-of-the-seat volcano watch.
Government scientists said that the explosion could be one of several small to moderate eruptions that might occur in the restless mountain some time soon and that the quakes recorded in the last week were the same signs that foreshadowed the 1980 eruption.
But the scientists said even if further and possibly more powerful explosions occurred, they would be far less destructive than the 1980 eruption, possibly spewing ash and "fist-size" rock chunks in a 3-mile radius, dozens of miles from the nearest houses.
The reaction among many here, in a town of 2,000 people 100 miles south of Seattle, and in surrounding towns was summed up by Gourde.
"At this point, it was almost just like a burp," she said. "I think most of us are just kind of waiting for the next action. And there's a little bit of excitement that hey, it finally did something."
Among residents who suddenly find themselves stuck in traffic jams because of all the interest in visiting the mountain, there is sheer stoicism, too.
"If it blows it blows," said Lyle West, a Castle Rock resident who was here during the 1980 eruption.
PeopleSoft Inc. fired its president and chief executive, Craig Conway, on Friday, a move that appeared to increase the likelihood that the company would be taken over by Oracle Corp.
The board, citing a "loss of confidence" in Conway, said the decision was unrelated to the $7.7 billion bid by Oracle, but analysts said the dismissal opened the door for the company to be acquired. Conway has been a vigorous opponent of the Oracle hostile bid since it was first made in June 2003.
The board named David A. Duffield, founder and chairman of PeopleSoft, as its new chief executive, and appointed Kevin Parker and W. Phillip Wilmington as co-presidents, effective immediately.
"Over time, the board has become increasingly concerned with Craig's leadership," said A. George Battle, a company director. Battle said the decision to fire Conway was made at a special board meeting on Thursday night.
"There is no smoking gun, no accounting irregularities," he said. "It was a matter of the board losing confidence in Craig." Battle insisted the board's dissatisfaction with Conway had been mounting for some time, and was unrelated to Oracle's tender offer.
Also on Friday, the Justice Department said it would not appeal a federal court decision in an antitrust case last month that allowed Oracle to proceed with its bid.
Shares of PeopleSoft rose $2.98 on Friday to close at $22.83. Oracle's stock was up 62 cents to close at $11.90. Heather Bellini, an analyst with UBS, said it was likely that Oracle would now have to raise its bid, which currently stands at $21 a share.
Executives close to PeopleSoft said that while Conway's aggressive approach to the Oracle offer was a consideration in his removal, frustration with his handling of strategic business issues was also part of his undoing. Most notably, PeopleSoft's acquisition of J.D. Edwards in 2003, a project that Conway led, is largely considered a failure. The company has also been slow to give customers a clear plan for the future, the executives said.
In one of his box-of-chocolates moments, Manny Ramirez served up a surprise when he was asked if he had ever played for a better team than the 2004 Red Sox.
"This one's great," Ramirez said. "But I think when I was in Cleveland (in 1995), that was a better team."
Leave it to Manny to spark a good old-fashioned hot stove debate on the eve of the playoffs. He was 23 when he helped the Indians of Albert Belle, Jim Thome, and Eddie Murray steamroll the American League, going 100-44 in the strike-shortened season before they lost the World Series in six games to the Braves.
But were they better than the '04 Sox?
"It's really close," said Alan Embree, Ramirez's teammate in '95. "It's a good argument. The numbers may say (Cleveland's) offense was better, but I get the same feeling with this one. I know they're going to pick us up, and that makes you pretty confident going into a series."
Plus, Embree said, "Now we have two aces."
And the Sox will lead with them, throwing Curt Schilling against the Anaheim Angels in Game 1 of the best-of-five Division Series Tuesday and returning with Pedro Martinez in Game 2 Wednesday night.
"I think we match up great," Kevin Millar said. "Our starting pitching is what's going to carry us. The bottom line is, if Schilling and Pedro throw the way they can, we'll get back home (for Game 3 Friday) with a favorable lead and see what happens."
Both pitchers stayed in character Monday as the Sox worked out at Angel Stadium. Schilling was all business, intensely focused on his mission, which is to deliver nothing less to a championship-starved fandom than a world title. And Martinez, despite his recent struggles, was buoyant and playful, as he customarily is two days before a start.
"Most teams are dying for a No. 1 starter," manager Terry Francona said, "and I think what we did was try to accumulate two of them."
The Sox won five of their nine games this year against the Angels, but almost none of the victories came easily. And a couple of the losses ranked among the most humbling of the season, particularly the consecutive 7-6 and 10-7 defeats in Anaheim in early June.
"They're the toughest team we've played," Johnny Damon said. "It still holds true. Their starting pitching has been a little erratic, but when they put it together, like a few of them have lately, they're very tough, because once you get into that bullpen they're like the Yankees' bullpen a couple years ago. They're tough."
Francona and the front office pored over reams of scouting reports and statistical research much of Monday to try to gain an edge when the Sox face lefthander Jarrod Washburn Tuesday and righthander Bartolo Colon Wednesday night.
The Sox saw Washburn twice during the regular season, with day-and-night results. They pounded him for seven runs on nine hits, including a home run by Ramirez, over 3 1/3 innings in the 10-7 loss June 2. But they mustered only one unearned run on three hits and a pair of walks over seven innings in an 8-1 defeat July 15 in Anaheim. Their only hits off Washburn that day were singles by Millar and Jason Varitek and an RBI double by Bill Mueller.
"We played them early in the season and I thought they were by far the best team we played," Francona said. "We managed a split with them after the All-Star Game, but it wasn't easy. Now they are feeling good about themselves and they present a lot of problems, especially if you don't defense them. They can really create some havoc."
The greatest challenge for the Sox pitching staff, besides curbing Anaheim's running game, will be trying to limit the damage caused by their big gun, Vladimir Guerrero. He pulverized Martinez and the Sox June 2, homering, doubling, and launching a sacrifice fly off Martinez to knock in five runs before he tagged Mike Timlin for a three-run shot and Keith Foulke for an RBI single.
Schilling described Guerrero as "Barry Bonds with less patience."
"I remember being a young pitcher, and a lot of times guys would try and water down the great players, saying, 'This guy can be pitched to,' because they didn't want anybody to feel nervous or anxious," Schilling said. "But he is just one of those guys that it's black and white. You have to make great pitches to get him out."
While Schilling fared well against the Angels (2-0 with a 2.30 ERA in two starts), Martinez's numbers were skewed by the pounding he took from Guerrero. Martinez went 1-0 with a 7.36 ERA against the Angels, then when he faltered in September, he made memorable self-critical remarks that raised questions in some circles about his readiness for the postseason.
But Francona expressed as much confidence in Martinez as he did in Schilling. And as Embree did in the Sox' offense.
"I can't tell you how excited I will be to hand (Martinez) the ball," Francona said. "I don't think his confidence is going to be down going into that game."
While the Sox finished the season with a 42-18 run, the best in baseball, the Angels came back to the overtake the A's in the AL West by winning seven of their last nine games.
"We know how good they have been," Francona said. "We know what kind of run they have been on. We know they feel good about themselves right now. It's our job to change that."
Employees of California's secretary of State, Kevin Shelley, were routinely directed to pick up and process his personal political contributions as part of their state-paid jobs, according to sources familiar with the operation of his branch office here.
Shelley is already the focus of state and federal investigations involving campaign contributions and the way he has administered contracts.
Although it is not known if his use of employees is also under review, using state resources for political purposes is a violation of state laws intended to keep personal campaign work from being conducted at taxpayer expense.
Having a state employee ''picking up or processing political checks ... offends me,'' said Robert M. Stern, president of the nonprofit Center for Governmental Studies in Los Angeles and a coauthor of the state's political reform laws. ''A political employee (paid from campaign funds) should do that.''
The sources, including one former high-ranking official, said that on repeated occasions over the last two years at least four employees were ordered by Shelley or his undersecretary, Mark Kyle, to retrieve contributions and bills from a campaign mailbox and bring them back to the San Francisco office.
The mailbox was a few miles from the office, and the trips began to rankle staff members. Sources said some employees disliked the task so much that they flipped coins to see who would have to go.
''Given the volume of legitimate state work, we had people who were extremely resentful,'' said Fred Hamdun, a former Shelley deputy who resigned in May over what he described as professional differences.
One employee, he said, ''would throw temper tantrums over it. She hated it.'' That employee did not return a call seeking comment Thursday.
Shelley declined an interview request Thursday about the allegations. But his campaign spokesman, Sam Singer, said that ''only on rare occasions'' would staff members pick up checks from the campaign mail box -- and never while working on state time.
Shelley has been battered by news reports and developments in the investigations. A federal grand jury in Sacramento last week called witnesses who made major contributions to his 2002 campaign after receiving payments from a $500,000 state grant that Shelley helped arrange when he served in the state Assembly.
The Bureau of State Audits started examining Shelley's handling of millions of dollars in federal election funds after reports that his campaign treasurer, former campaign manager and others with political ties received no-bid contracts. And the State Personnel Board is examining his office's handling of complaints by three female employees who accused of him of yelling and other abusive behavior.
The campaign mail runs by his staff, however, are especially noteworthy because Shelley is California's chief elections officer, responsible for enforcing election integrity and expected to maintain the highest ethical standards.
Shelley is a San Francisco native and the son of the late Mayor Jack Shelley. A liberal Democrat, he served as a member of the San Francisco County Board of Supervisors, then in the state Assembly before being elected secretary of state in 2002. After his election, he expanded the office and staff in San Francisco.
The campaign mailbox, at Jensen's Mailbox and Copy, was in Diamond Heights, near Shelley's San Francisco home.
One of the proprietors confirmed Thursday that Shelley's campaign had a box there, and that the secretary of State's staff came ''once a week or so.'' When asked the names of the Shelley representatives, he replied, ''There were different people every time.'' He declined to provide his name or to elaborate.
Sources said the mail was taken to Shelley's office, where it was opened and sorted. Sometimes the contribution amounts were reported to Shelley, the sources said, then the checks were sent via interoffice mail to Sacramento, where another staff member would forward them to Shelley's campaign law firm.
Singer, who recently became Shelley's campaign spokesman, said Shelley never ordered any employees to pick up campaign checks. But Kyle confirmed that he sometimes directed staffers to get the mail -- but not to do it on state time and not to process it. Singer said Shelley noted that he has not been doing much fundraising since his election in 2002, so checks constituted a small part of his campaign mail.
Records show that his Shelley Every Vote Counts committee received $20,100 and spent $92,701 this year through June 30, and his re-election committee received $82,450 and spent $6,752.
According to records and interviews, Shelley also kept a campaign computer in his state office with a database of his contributors, and his state staff attended meetings regarding problems with the data. An entry for Shelley's 2003 calendar obtained by The Times lists one such meeting as being scheduled to include Shelley and two of his top aides.
Sources said those meetings generally were scheduled after normal working hours. They said the computer was kept in a small office and storeroom used by two employees doing other work. One of them was Andrew Lee, the son of Shelley fundraiser and community activist Julie Lee, who is at the center of the federal and state campaign finance investigations.
Sources said the computer was used to generate a list of Shelley contributors for his state staff so their names would be recognized if they telephoned.
Singer confirmed that a campaign computer and campaign records were stored in Shelley's office. He initially said it was never used, then after checking with Shelley acknowledged that it was used once to extract contributor addresses.
Stern, the political reform law expert, said that having a campaign computer in a state office would not be illegal but that having state employees devote time to it would be.
In late summer, the computer was turned over to the state attorney general's office after the agency and the FBI began investigations into Shelley's campaign finances, Singer said. The San Francisco Chronicle reported that several businesses and individuals who received money from a $500,000 state grant Shelley helped arrange as a state assemblyman were among Shelley's largest campaign contributors.
Nathan Barankin, a spokesman for state Attorney General Bill Lockyer, declined to comment on the probe. He said that in general, use of government staff for campaign purposes is prohibited. A government code section makes it unlawful to use public resources, including ''state-compensated time,'' for campaign activity. It carries a fine of $1,000 for each day of violation, plus three times the value of the use of the public resources. A felony criminal code makes it illegal to misappropriate public resources.
If Dan Rather were black and at the center of the flap about President George W. Bush's National Guard record, there'd be some crazy tunes humming in the ear of the American public about affirmative action and unqualified blacks and the sacrifice of competence to fulfill some politically correct social agenda.
And there'd be questions whistling around about how this embarrassing episode could ever happen, and blacks throughout the newsroom would feel the chill in the air and the heat of the glare magnified upon them.
If Dan Rather were black, black journalists would be blowing in the wind, as they were when Jayson Blair hit the fan more than a year ago; the veracity of black reporters and editors would be called into question, their honesty challenged, their past stories checked and checked again; and blacks in journalism schools would have the added burden of wondering whether they will be judged by the actions of the black Rather instead of their own individual qualities.
It would be hard times for black journalists beyond compare -- if Dan Rather were black like Jayson Blair.
But Rather is white like most journalists, and so there is silence with regard to what his skin color had to do with getting the information so wrong.
As it should be.
Rather's race had nothing to do with his pushing the Bush National Guard story through, despite questions about the veracity of the document and the reliability of the source. His race had nothing to do with the costly loss in confidence and trust in CBS and Rather himself.
Trust is a particular premium in the field of journalism. Rather and CBS had the public's trust. If Dan Rather and CBS reported it, as they have so many others stories such as the scandalous abuse at Abu Ghraib, well then, it must be true, because they check their facts. They check their sources. They are professionals.
But now there are questions.
''Our entire profession is under the gun,'' said Lew Brown, retired TV reporter who worked more than 20 years at NBC 30. ''No one'' -- meaning no other TV networks or print organizations -- ''should find glee in what has happened.''
Although three years into retirement, Brown still has the journalism profession in his blood. He spoke by phone with me recently about the need for journalists to ''reassess ourselves'' as a profession.
Brown, who is black, says he was shocked at Rather's performance in covering the story.
''He didn't do his homework on his sources,'' Brown said, ''and for an experienced professional, it seems unfathomable.
''Still, the racial aspect I can't help but mention,'' Brown added, referring to the difference in how Jayson Blair brought race into the spotlight versus nothing of the such with Rather.
Of course, Dan Rather is just one individual who demonstrated a lapse in judgment. He does not represent the entire white race.
This shows the advantage of being in the majority: He doesn't have to worry about making it hard on the rest of the race.
It's one of the big differences between Blair and Rather. Jayson Blair made up stories and lied about being at the scene covering them while working as a young reporter for The New York Times. Dan Rather got the facts wrong while working as a seasoned journalist for CBS.
More than 50 years ago, Ralph Waldo Ellison's novel ''The Invisible Man'' said blacks were off most whites' radar screen -- invisible. But I think the real invisibleness is to be white and do wrong. This doesn't mean that whites can do no wrong and that whites who do wrong will go unpunished. Certainly Rather is suffering tremendous fallout from his poor judgment. However, there is little reason to believe other whites will be branded the same as Rather. The white wrongdoer will be seen as an individual. An isolated case. An aberration. Certainly not a representative of the whole group.
White journalists need have no fear or care.
But if Dan Rather were black like Jayson Blair. ...
Merck & Co. said its surprise decision Thursday to withdraw the arthritis drug Vioxx -- used by about 2 million people worldwide -- was driven by recent evidence that the drug's adverse side effects outweighed any potential benefits. But that wasn't really news. Though the new study was more comprehensive than past research because it looked at patients over the course of three years, research since November 2000 has suggested that those who take Vioxx face a heart attack risk four to five times greater than those who take older, equally effective arthritis treatments such as ibuprofen and naproxen.
So why is Merck recalling the drug now? One can only speculate, but it may have less to do with side effects outweighing benefits than with legal liabilities outweighing profits. Merck faces several lawsuits, including a class action filed Thursday alleging the company made false and misleading statements about Vioxx's safety. Whatever the company's motives, its decision to withdraw Vioxx should cast scrutiny on at least two problems inherent in the nation's system for assessing and monitoring drug safety.
The first is misleading ads. Vioxx and a similar drug from Pfizer Inc., Celebrex, have been touted as ''super-aspirins'' in numerous TV commercials that have downplayed their known cardiovascular risks. Such commercials show how far the Food and Drug Administration has slipped in enforcing its own rules. When the agency determines a drug company has made a misleading ad, it first issues a warning letter, then imposes a fine if the ad is not pulled. But the number of warning letters has dropped precipitously since the Bush administration took power, from 82 in 2000 to 24 in 2003.
The second problem is the nation's almost exclusive reliance on drug companies to police the safety and efficacy of their own drugs. Although the FDA requires drug makers to demonstrate the superiority of their medications to placebos before they can release them, the agency lets drug companies monitor their own products' dangers after they've reached the shelves.
The FDA could help solve these problems not only by enforcing its own rules but by requiring doctors and hospitals to report ''adverse events'' when patients use drugs. Big government payers such as Medicaid or Medicare could pay only for expensive new drugs that are demonstrably superior to older, cheaper ones.
The withdrawal of Vioxx caused Merck's market value to sink by almost $27 billion. The FDA's current hands-off approach to drug companies doesn't just endanger consumers, it hurts investors -- who shouldn't be caught by surprise over a drug whose dangers have long been clear.
Two Indonesian women have been kidnapped in Iraq, but authorities in Jakarta do not know the identity of the captors or their demands, the foreign ministry said Friday.
Arab TV station Al-Jazeera showed footage Thursday of 10 hostages seized in Iraq by militants, saying two of them were Indonesians working for an "electricity company."
"We can confirm there are two Indonesian women being held in Iraq," said Marty Natalegawa, foreign ministry spokesman. "We are trying to ascertain why they are in Iraq. We have no knowledge right now of who the captors are and we have not received any demands for their release."
He identified the women as Rosidah binti Anan and Rafikan binti Aming and said they were from the capital Jakarta. He said the government was still trying to contact their families.
More than 140 foreigners have been kidnapped in Iraq by a range of groups, some holding them for ransom while others have set political conditions for their release. At least 26 hostages have been killed.
India's economy expanded 7.4 percent in the April-June quarter, surpassing expectations and prompting some economists to revise their full-year growth forecasts.
The latest government data, released Thursday, showed that a pickup in new investments by Indian businesses and brisk growth in the services sector led the economy's expansion.
Domestic companies have been bullish on new projects since India's gross domestic product _ the total value of goods and services produced by a country _ expanded 8.2 percent in the last fiscal year, its highest growth rate in 15 years.
During the April-June period, this fiscal year's first quarter, manufacturing output increased 8 percent. On the services side, trade, hotels and transportation grew 11 percent, compared with the same period a year earlier, said the Central Statistical Organization. Agriculture grew 3.4 percent.
The stock market cheered the news and the benchmark index of the Bombay Stock Exchange, the Sensex, closed 56 points, or 1 percent, higher Thursday. In early trading Friday, the market was bullish.
Even though "agriculture output is below trend, it is heartening to see that the cyclical momentum (in industry and services) continues to be strong," Kishlaya Pathak, an economist with Standard Chartered Bank, told Dow Jones Newswires.
Several economists and research bodies earlier predicted that economic growth for the fiscal year ending March 2005 would be significantly lower than during last year, because of a drought in some parts of the country and high oil prices that have pushed up inflation.
The government has said it would be happy to see growth touch 6.5 percent this year.
But the first fiscal figures have raised hopes that stronger growth in manufacturing and services will more than offset the impact of a bad crop.
The industrial and services sectors account for 75 percent of India's GDP, while the farm sector _ which employs nearly two-thirds of the country's work force _ contributes a quarter of the national output.
"Services and manufacturing will be the key growth drivers," Pathak said, adding that he planned to revise upward his earlier full-year growth estimate of 6 percent.
Some analysts believe high oil prices and inflation will not harm growth as much as earlier feared.
"The impact of the monsoon and oil prices is overestimated," said Dominique Dwor-Frecaut, emerging market strategist at Barclays Capital in Singapore. "We haven't yet seen the impact of the weak monsoon season, but I think we will continue to be surprised on the upside."
Dwor-Frecaut expects India's economy to expand 7.5 percent this year.
An official panel of defense experts has urged Japan's government to let the military strike an enemy before being attacked _ a policy change that would starkly counter Tokyo's longstanding ban on using troops in overseas combat _ a media report said.
The Defense Agency panel recommended that Japan stock missiles that have a range of several hundred kilometers (miles) and could be launched from Japanese territory or ships, Kyodo News agency said.
An official from the Defense Agency, which draws up military policy and carries out deployments, refused to confirm Thursday's report.
But a Cabinet Office spokesman, who refused to be identified, said a different government panel would formally recommend next week that Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi adopt an offensive military strategy, ahead of a broad security review expected to be completed by December.
Japan's military, called the Self-Defense Forces, was formed in 1954 and has one of the largest budgets of any armed forces in the world.
However, Japan's constitution, adopted during the post-World War II U.S. occupation, bans the military from using force to resolve disputes.
The government has long interpreted the constitution to mean Tokyo can't send soldiers to war unless it is directly attacked.
Recently, Koizumi has broadened the military's mandate and sent troops on overseas peacekeeping missions to Iraq and Afghanistan.
Kyodo said the panel's recommendations stem from fear of a North Korean attack. The suggestions are meant to soften potential objections to a missile defense system being jointly developed by Japan and the United States, Kyodo said.
Critics worry that letting Japan wage war overseas might trigger a resurgence of its earlier militarism.
Defense Agency chief Yoshinori Ono, who assumed his post after a Cabinet reshuffle Monday, told public broadcaster NHK on Friday that Japan's military must change to meet new threats, such as terrorism.
Asked whether he would approve of sending troops overseas in the future, he said: "If the situation arises, I would consider it."
Tokyo currently relies heavily on security provided by roughly 58,000 U.S. troops stationed in Japan under a mutual agreement.
North Korea tested a long-range missile in 1998 by firing it over Japan into the Pacific. Pyongyang agreed to a testing moratorium in 2002, but officials say it has apparently tested short-range missiles since then.
Last month, Japanese and U.S. officials said North Korea appeared to be preparing to test-launch a ballistic missile.
To: NYTRNG Editors Re: Chairman's Award deadline It's time once again to honor people in your newsrooms by nominating them for a NYTRNG Chairman's Award. There are two winning entries each month and winners receive $500 each. Look back on your September papers, and nominate your best work. Nominations must be to the judges and in New York by Tuesday, Oct. 12. (Oct. 11 is a postal holiday.) Last month, entries were considered from Lakeland, Santa Rosa, Sarasota, Spartanburg, Tuscaloosa and Wilmington. The award guidelines -- and judges' addresses -- are below. If you have questions, call Steve Reed at (212) 556-1518 or send e-mail to stevernytimes.com. --- GUIDELINES FOR THE CHAIRMAN'S AWARDS NEW YORK TIMES REGIONAL NEWSPAPERS CATEGORIES: News reporting, Feature writing, Columns, Editing, Photography, Graphics CONTENT/ELIGIBILITY:ENTRIES MUST BE RECEIVED
10th falls on a weekend or holiday, the first business day thereafter.
The judges' committee will recommend two entries to Arthur Sulzberger Jr. If accepted, the winners will be notified directly by him. After the winners have been notified, a poster will be sent out to all executive editors and bureaus for posting in newsrooms
For information, contact Steve Reed at (212) 556-1518 or stevernytimes.com
Barry Larkin played Friday night. Barry Larkin will play Sunday. Strangely and bizarrely, he will not play tonight when the Great American Ball Park seats are stuffed with people who purchased tickets early this season when they thought tonight would be Barry Larkin Night.
Larkin, of course, canceled it because he knew, deep in his heart, he wasn't, and isn't, ready to retire.
But why wouldn't they play him tonight?
Larkin walked to a podium in an interview room Friday afternoon prior to his first starting assignment in the Cincinnati Reds lineup since Sept. 18.
The press conference was not called by him. It was staged because several media outlets wanted a piece of him after his on-the-road announcement in Pittsburgh last Sunday that he wanted to play for a 20th season in 2005.
Asked if he felt this was his last weekend as player, he said, "It's the last weekend of this season, but I don't know if it's my last week. We'll see."
Larkin is as clear as the whistle that sounds every day in Great American when the gates open -- he wants to play and it is up to management to say yes or no.
And management maintains its stance that decisions and negotiations with free agents come after the season, which ends Sunday.
Organizational meetings begin Tuesday in Sarasota and chief operating officer John Allen said Larkin is on the agenda, along with everything else about the team.
"I respect the fact that Barry wants to play and I appreciate that he came out and said so. It will be talked about by (general manager) Dan O'Brien and (assistant general manager) Dean Taylor and myself."
Larkin, though, worries that his status diminished while he sat most of September.
"I'm concerned that my lack of playing time the last month has affected my playing ability," he said after going 0-for-September, 0 for 24. "I'm not very happy about that."
Larkin said his inability to perform as a pinch-hitter and role player could affect his thoughts on what he will do in the future.
"I do have a taste of that role, of whatever I was in, and I wasn't successful in doing it," he said. "I have to take into account what I might be asked to do."
Asked if he had been talked to about playing another position -- third base, second base, outfield, first base -- Larkin said, "Nobody has talked to me during a week of inactivity about taking ground balls at third, second, first, outfield ... nothing. If there is something they'd like me to do, they need to talk to me about it."
Larkin, though, should be able to read the silence. Most likely, he isn't wanted back by the Reds. And he is prepared for that, saying other teams have shown interest.
"I would consider it (switching positions), but as far as I'm concerned I've had a successful season (at shortstop) until I hurt my stomach," he said. "I feel I can be a very good shortstop. If not here, then somewhere else. And I can be quite competent at any position."
Larkin remains mystified why the team won't talk during the season to a guy who is captain of the team, has played for the team for 19 years.
"After Sunday's game, I'm going home," he said. "Nothing surprises me over the way things transpire around here. I don't understand the way they do the things they do. It always seems to come down this way.
"There are some guys in the clubhouse affected, too," he said. "Fans in all the cities on the last trip (Atlanta, Pittsburgh, Chicago) know of my situation and make a joke of it and that's unfortunate for the organization.
"I want to be proud of this organization, but its track record just hasn't been good," Larkin added. "My family is really upset about how things have gone here the last month. There are other guys in our clubhouse who are free agents and they're frustrated. There are some good players who did some good things this year and they haven't heard anything from the organization.
"And those guys are not thinking about retirement and are going to play somewhere, probably for pretty good money," Larkin said.
And so he waits.
Hal McCoy writes for the Dayton Daily News. hmccoyDaytonDailyNews.com
The rankings for hard-cover books sold in Southern California, as reported by selected book stores: Nonfiction 1''The Family: The Real Story of the Bush Dynasty,'' by Kitty Kelley (Doubleday: $29.95) A critical look at an insular, powerful dynasty that has spawned two presidents, two governors and a senator. 2''Unfit for Command,'' by John E. O'Neill and Jerome R. Corsi (Regnery: $27.95) Vietnam vets accuse presidential nominee John F. Kerry of misdeeds regarding his wartime service. 3''Confessions of an Heiress,'' by Paris Hilton (Fireside: $22) The do's and don'ts of beauty, fashion, etiquette -- and life in general -- from the hotel-chain heiress, model and current it-girl. 4''Chain of Command,'' by Seymour M. Hersh (HarperCollins: $25.95) Investigative reporter traces the nation's path from Sept. 11 to abuse at Iraq's Abu Ghraib prison. 5''Family First,'' by Phil McGraw (Free Press: $26) A day-by-day guide to raising cooperative, caring and competent children through effective parenting and putting family first. 6''Between a Rock and a Hard Place,'' by Aron Ralston (Atria: $26) How a climber freed himself after six days trapped between a boulder and a canyon wall in Utah by amputating his right arm. 7''In the Shadow of No Towers,'' by Art Spiegelman (Pantheon: $19.95) In cartoon format, a chain-smoking Manhattan pessimist is convinced that the world ended with the Sept. 11 attacks. 8''Eats, Shoots & Leaves,'' by Lynne Truss (Gotham: $17.50) A British novelist and journalist offers her zero-tolerance approach to bad punctuation, drawn from her pioneering BBC series. 9''The Purpose Driven Life,'' by Rick Warren (Zondervan: $19.99) How the ''God ordained'' principles of worship, community, discipleship, ministry and evangelism bring fulfillment. 10''Bushworld: Enter at Your Own Risk,'' by Maureen Dowd (Putnam: $25.95) A decade of the New York Times op-ed columnist's collected works, especially those on Bush pere and fils. End adv sun oct 03
One of the year's biggest pop music hits is also one of the unlikeliest. It was recorded three years ago by an unknown artist in an unremarkable studio on the tiny Caribbean island of St. Vincent.
This summer, Kevin Lyttle's ''Turn Me On'' became an international smash. It went to No.1 in the States and became a Top10 single in much of the rest of the world. Lyttle's self-titled debut album, released by Atlantic Records in July, has reached gold here and sold an additional 350,000 copies worldwide.
''I have always prayed to be where I'm at,'' says Lyttle, an earnest 27-year-old with a friendly smile. ''It's a blessing from the Almighty.''
But it may take more than a blessing to reach the top. It also takes practice. Lyttle honed his vocal skills long ago by singing in the shower.
This was not the private endeavor it is in most places. Lyttle grew up in a small boathouse he shared with his mother, grandmother and great-grandmother. There was no room for washing indoors: The shower and washroom were outside under a mango tree. The semi-open structure was built with concrete blocks and galvanized metal roofing.
There, as water streamed down on him, he strived to hit the high notes in his favorite Boyz II Men songs. ''Every time I'm in the shower, I'm in there for, like, an hour and a half,'' he says. ''I was doing that consistently for five, six, seven years strong.''
Neighbors and passersby couldn't help but hear him. ''People used to be, like, stonin' down the damn shower -- throwin' stones on it and makin' noise and cursin' and sayin' ... '(We're) fed up, every day it's the same thing with you.' But nobody understood what I wanted to do.''
Part of what makes ''Turn Me On'' an unusual global hit is that it is essentially a soca song. Soca, the up-tempo style of calypso that originated in Trinidad nearly 30 years ago, rarely attracts mainstream audiences outside the Caribbean. But then, ''Turn Me On'' is also a pop song and an R&B song, with elements of reggae dancehall as well.
''My thing is to create Caribbean music in a way that it becomes appealing to the world in general, not just the Caribbean,'' says Lyttle. ''So what I decided when I did 'Turn Me On' is to do a song that had the feel of everything in the world in terms of music.''
In 2003, Lyttle was signed by Atlantic, the same label that teamed with the independent reggae label VP Records to launch the remarkable stardom of reggae dancehall star Sean Paul. The labels also collaborated effectively on promoting two other dancehall artists, Elephant Man and Wayne Wonder.
''Last year we had tremendous success breaking dancehall ... a genre of music that's been around for decades,'' says Atlantic Records Co-Chairman Craig Kallman. ''Now we're trying to do the same thing for music coming out of the islands of Trinidad, Barbados and St. Vincent.''
So far, Atlantic has signed two soca artists -- Lyttle and a more established performer from Barbados known as Rupee. In a move sure to annoy longtime soca fans, Kallman says Atlantic has ''branded'' their music ''the new soul of soca.''
Soca was developed in the mid-'70s by a calypsonian known as Lord Shorty. With its galloping 4/4 beats, it is more danceable than calypso and less focused on the satiric commentary that has long characterized that genre. Soca is ''jump-up'' party music, meant to wind up carnival crowds. Almost every island in the Caribbean has a carnival, and soca is the soundtrack for the annual festivals.
''It's like the national music of all the islands, except Jamaica, which has reggae,'' says Von Martin, a Trinidadian who lives in Washington, D.C., and whose ''Caribbeana'' radio show has been broadcast Saturday nights on WPFW since 1977.
Although reggae dancehall has intermittently worked its way onto the American charts during the past two decades, soca has been less visible outside the Caribbean. Before ''Turn Me On,'' the soca song that garnered the most attention here was Arrow's 1983 ''Hot, Hot, Hot,'' which was later covered by Buster Poindexter.
Far away from his mother's recently rebuilt and refurbished house in St. Vincent, Lyttle sits in an Atlantic Records office in midtown Manhattan, praising the wonders of his homeland. ''St. Vincent is a very beautiful country,'' he says. ''We have so much natural attractions. We have the second biggest volcano in the world. We have a lot of black sand beaches because the whole island is volcanic.''
He notices a bottle of water on the table. ''We have our own spring water, too,'' he adds.
Growing up, Lyttle listened to calypso and soca, attending carnival with his mother. At home, she had a transistor radio -- ''it was all we could afford at the time,'' he says -- and the government AM radio station played American pop. The music inspired him. ''I started singing from the time I know myself,'' he says. As a teen-ager, he performed in a dance group originally called the Young Turks and later known as the Creation Culture Club with all of his uncles. ''We did cultural dances, folk dances, modern dances -- all the dances that you could possibly think of, we would try to do. I'm pretty much rounded in entertainment because I was a radio announcer also.''
He also emceed karaoke nights, worked in a supermarket as a storeroom manager and earned a two-year college degree in electronic engineering. ''Any kind of work you want to do in life, you've got to make sure you have a Plan B, and you gotta make sure that Plan B is always your education,'' he says. ''That's what my mother made me realize.''
Lyttle was employed as a customs and excise officer in the spring of 2001 when he recorded ''Turn Me On'' in St. Vincent's Sky Studio with a local producer. ''I had to get sponsors to help me to pay for it because it cost, like, $1,300 to do the song, which I was already funding out of my own pocket,'' he says. ''But because it's a small island and everybody knows everybody, you could walk up to these ... little businesses and say, 'Yo, I need $100. I'll put your name on the CD to give your company some promotions.' ''
As ''Turn Me On'' became a carnival hit throughout the West Indies, Caribbean radio deejays in New York and other U.S. cities started playing it, and soon Lyttle was playing shows here. ''They were sending for me to come and perform in these little clubs in Brooklyn, and that helped my popularity a lot in America,'' he says.
It wasn't long before his shows were drawing Americans alongside people from the Caribbean. In 2002, a Providence, R.I., hip-hop station that had given ''Turn Me On'' regular rotation added Lyttle to a promotional concert headlined by 50 Cent. When Lyttle performed ''Turn Me On,'' it seemed like the audience knew every word. Within weeks, says Lyttle, the major labels started calling.
Lyttle says he chose Atlantic because of its experience with Caribbean music. The label suggested a remix of ''Turn Me On'' featuring dancehall artist Spragga Benz, and it is that version that is featured on MTV and on most radio stations.
''That remix is just me being cautious and the label being cautious about urban America liking the music to be heavy-hitting,'' says Lyttle. ''The remix has more bass line, it has more bottom end. It doesn't have as much high end as the original, which is very much more closer to soca. ... To make sure that we were able to make the song appeal to everybody, we did that version.''
Some soca fans are disappointed by Lyttle's willingness to dilute the music with elements of American R&B and pop. ''This music ... is much different from the traditional calypso and soca that we have at home,'' says WPFW's Martin. ''The traditional soca folks don't like it. But what you're looking at is a form that is trying to emerge on a world stage. And on a world stage where you have plural societies with each cultural form trying to emerge, you're going to have a blend.''
Lyttle bristles at the notion that perhaps he is promoting soca lite. '' 'Turn Me On' was a No.1 hard-core soca song,'' he says. ''It didn't become a soca hit in America before it became a soca hit in the Caribbean. It was the biggest soca song in the carnivals for 2001-2002.''
He suspects that he's getting these criticisms mostly because he's not from Trinidad. ''All of the islands is very proud of what they have, and Trinidad is the place that started soca,'' he says. ''Trinidadians deserve respect because they're the inventors of this music. But what I want ... Trinidad to realize is that soca music not only belongs to Trinidad, it belongs to the rest of the Caribbean.''
Some Trinidadians dismiss other Caribbean countries as ''small islands,'' he explains. ''They say we the small islanders. But I always say to them, 'small ax cut down big tree.' That's always been St. Vincent's motto.''
The government's effort to consolidate federal agencies' 12 terrorist watch lists into one has all but failed, partly because the Department of Homeland Security has abandoned its responsibility to take the lead on the project, according to a report released Friday by the department's internal watchdog.
The report by the Homeland Security Department's inspector general, Clark Kent Ervin, said the government's botching of the watch list assignment follows a disturbing pattern in the war on terrorism.
''In the years since the September 11 terrorist attacks, just as in the past, the government has continued to implement solutions in an uncoordinated manner,'' the report said. ''The manner through which the watch list consolidation has unfolded has not helped the nation break from its pattern.''
President Bush, Congress and many terrorism experts have for years considered the integration of the watch lists a crucial priority in the effort to identify terrorists as they try to enter the country, board airplanes and open bank accounts, and when they are pulled over for traffic stops.
The inspector general was blunt in accusing his own department of refusing to take responsibility for the job of combining the 12 watch lists, an assignment he said belonged to the department under the law that established it two years ago.
''DHS has not fulfilled its leadership responsibility,'' Ervin wrote in the report. '' 'Connecting the dots' and ensuring better communications (among agencies) ... is a large part of why DHS was created. If DHS ... does not assume this interagency coordination responsibility, the question remains, who will?''
Homeland Security officials reject the assertion, which has also been made for years by members of Congress, that the department has been too passive in staking out its congressionally mandated role to take the lead in a number of intelligence analysis tasks such as merging watch lists.
Homeland Security spokesman Brian Roehrkasse pointed out that last year Bush gave the FBI and Justice Department, not the Department of Homeland Security, the job of establishing and running the Terrorist Screening Center, to blend the various watch lists.
''We disagree with the report's premise that says DHS has the lead in the government for consolidating watch lists,'' Roehrkasse said. ''The department is playing a strong partnership role with the FBI to consolidate watch lists.''
Juliette Kayyem, executive director of Harvard University's Belfer Center for Science and International Affairs, pinned responsibility for the failure to combine watch lists on the Bush White House, saying it undercut Homeland Security's ability to play the central role in counterterrorism intelligence that Congress intended.
''This is an administration that didn't want a Homeland Security Department, and has insured it's as dysfunctional as this report suggests,'' she said. DHS Secretary ''Tom Ridge has to play the weak hand he's been dealt.''
The 10-month-old Terrorist Screening Center handles requests round the clock from employees of numerous agencies, including immigration officers at U.S. airports, State Department consular officers who issue visas at overseas embassies, and local law enforcement officers.
The combined database is designed to include names compiled by nine agencies, including the CIA, the FBI, various components of Homeland Security and the State Department, which has a huge database called TIPOFF.
The screening center has enjoyed modest success in combining the various watch lists, the report said, by beginning the arduous job of filtering various lists so they can be shared with other agencies that have access to the screening center's 100,000-name database.
But Ervin noted many problems: The screening center has had trouble hiring enough analysts with high security clearances, and as of a few months ago it had only about half its assigned complement of 160 staff members.
The databases are vastly different. The Justice Department's National Crime Information Center can handle names of up to 30 characters, a stumbling block in integrating it with other lists. It uses relatively unsophisticated software that allows street cops to access it immediately, while the State Department's lists, for example, allow for more laborious searches of names using different spellings in Russian, Chinese, Spanish and Arabic.
The US military said early Wednedsay it had launched two air raids overnight on the rebel-held Iraqi flashpoint town of Fallujah, but it was not immediately clear if there were any casualties.
The first raid, staged late Tuesday, targeted an arms stash in the town, located 50 kilometers (30 miles) west of the Iraqi capital Baghdad.
The second raid, early Wednesday, was aimed at a rebel command post, the military said in a statement.
Both raids on the southeast part of Fallujah were carried out by planes backing the 1st Marine Expeditionary Corps, the US military said.
"Marine Expeditionary Forces will continue to conduct operations and will not cease until Fallujah is free of foreign terrorists and insurgents," the statement said.
Thousands of residents have fled the Sunni Muslim bastion since the US military began a campaign of air strikes during the summer in the hunt for the Islamic militant Abu Musab al-Zarqawi and his followers who are believed to use the city as an operating base.
Zarqawi, a Jordanian national who is Iraq's most wanted man, is blamed for some of the worst bombings and kidnappings in the country since last year's US-led invasion.
US ground troops have encircled Fallujah since mid-October, and Iraqi Prime Minister Iyad Allawi issued an ultimatum to the city on Sunday to surrender insurgents holed up inside or face an all-out military assault.
Violent clashes flared on Monday in the sister city of Ramadi, to the west of Fallujah, leaving at least six people dead, including a cameraman working for the London-based Reuters news agency.
Californians voted overwhelmingly Tuesday to become the first US state to fund controversial embryonic stem cell research that was effectively banned by President George W. Bush, US media reported.
The emotionally- and politically-charged Proposition 71, which allows nearly three billion dollars to be put aside for stem cell research over 10 years, passed by 64 percent against 36 percent opposition, CNN reported, citing early poll results.
Supporters of the measure say the decision could help find cures to diseases including cancer, AIDS, spinal cord injuries, Parkinson's disease and Alzheimer's disease more quickly than had been expected.
They also claim that the measure will make California, already the United States' leading hub for biotech industries, a world hub of stem cell research too.
Bush in 2001 effectively banned further federal funding for the science citing the killing of human embryos that occurs in the process.
The California measure is seen as a way of circumventing federpe to be able to learn using human embryonic stem cell cells," he said.
Richard Avedon, the revolutionary photographer who redefined fashion photography as an art form while achieving critical acclaim through his stark black-and-white portraits of the powerful and celebrated, died Friday. He was 81.
Avedon suffered a brain hemorrhage last month while on assignment in San Antonio, Texas, for The New Yorker, taking pictures for a piece called "On Democracy." He spent months on the project, shooting politicians, delegates and citizens from around the country.
He died at a hospital in San Antonio, said Perri Dorset, a spokeswoman for the magazine.
"We've lost one of the great visual imaginations of the last half century," said David Remnick, editor of The New Yorker.
Avedon's influence on photography was immense, and his sensuous fashion work helped create the era of supermodels such as Naomi Campbell and Cindy Crawford. But Avedon went in another direction with his portrait work, shooting unsparing and often unflattering shots of subjects from Marilyn Monroe to Michael Moore.
"The results can be pitiless," Time magazine critic Richard Lacayo once noted. "With every wrinkle and sag set out in high relief, even the mightiest plutocrat seems just one more dwindling mortal."
As a Publishers Weekly review once noted, Avedon helped create the cachet of celebrity _ if he took someone's picture, they must be famous. His fun-loving, fantasy-inspiring approach helped turn the fashion industry into a multibillion-dollar (euro) business.
Scores of imitators struggled to replicate his signature style, known simply as "The Avedon Look."
"The world's most famous photographer," trumpeted a 2002 story on Avedon in The New York Times. It was a title he wore for decades; back in 1958, he was named one of the world's 10 finest photographers by Popular Photography magazine.
Prestigious institutions as the Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York City and the National Gallery of Art in Washington, D.C., staged major Avedon retrospectives, and his list of honors stretched across more than 50 years. In 2003, he received a National Arts Award for lifetime achievement.
During his career, Avedon worked for such photograph-driven publications as Vogue and Harper's Bazaar, and served as The New Yorker magazine's first staff photographer. His skill also earned him another title: He was reputed to be the world's highest paid photographer.
"He's the most wonderful man in the business because he realizes that models are not just coat hangers," famed model Suzy Parker once said. An Avedon shot of Parker from 1959 was credited with igniting the bikini boom.
Avedon said his view of the world was literally affected by his nearsightedness. "I began trying to create an out-of-focus world _ a heightened reality better than real, that suggests, rather than tells you," he once told The New Yorker in an interview.
Among Avedon's best-known work was "Nothing Personal," a 1964 collection of unflattering photographs of affluent Americans. He collaborated with author James Baldwin, a former classmate at the Bronx's DeWitt Clinton High School.
Time magazine called his photos of former President Eisenhower, Adlai Stevenson, Marilyn Monroe and other celebrities "a subtler, crueler instrument of distortion than any caricaturist's pencil."
In 2002-03, his portrait work was again highlighted at the Metropolitan Museum of Art. He chose his subjects among people who interested him, instead of photographing people on commission. All were shot against a white background, without any of the typical poses or smiling faces.
Born in New York City in 1923, he experienced a strict upbringing in which his father _ the founder of a dress shop called Avedon's Fifth Avenue _ made him account for every penny of his five-cent weekly allowance.
In 1940, at age 17, Avedon dropped out of high school to run errands for a photographic company. Two years later he joined the U.S. Merchant Marine, receiving a Rolleiflex camera as a going-away gift from his father.
He was assigned to the Merchant Marine photo branch, taking personnel identification photos. Later, he went on several missions to photograph shipwrecks.
Following wartime service, Avedon became a professional photographer for the tony Bonwit Teller department stores, then moved to Harper's Bazaar, where he stayed for two decades.
His breakthrough approach to fashion photography included extravagant settings such as NASA launch pads and the pyramids of Egypt.
"There's always been a separation between fashion and what I call my deeper work," Avedon said in a 1974 interview. "Fashion is where I make my living. I'm not knocking it; it's a pleasure to make a living that way. Then there's the deeper pleasure of doing my portraits."
Avedon's reputation spread to Madison Avenue, where advertisers ranging from Revlon to Douglas Aircraft sought his services. By the mid-1960s, his studio had upwards of $250,000 in annual billings.
He also developed relationships with some of the world's most sought-after models including Dorian Leigh; Dorothy Horan, best known as Dovima; Sunny Harnett; and Leigh's younger sister, Suzy Parker.
Avedon left Harper's Bazaar in 1966 to join rival Vogue as a staff photographer. In 1970, his work filled several galleries at the Minneapolis Institute of Arts in what was called the largest one-man photo exhibit ever.
His early career was fictionalized in the 1957 Hollywood musical "Funny Face," starring Fred Astaire as the fashion photographer "Dick Avery."
Avedon was married in 1944 to Dorcas Nowell, a model known professionally as Doe Avedon. They divorced after five years. In 1951, he married Evelyn Franklin. The pair later separated.
"If a day goes by without my doing something related to photography, it's as though I've neglected something essential to my existence, as though I had forgotten to wake up," he said in 1970. "I know that the accident of my being a photographer has made my life possible."
NEVER FAR FROM HOME: DEEP NOSTALGIA FOR CUBA ANCHORS NILO CRUZ'S POPULAR PLAYS -- INCLUDING THE PULITZER PRIZE-WINNING 'ANNA IN THE TROPICS' For about a decade, Nilo Cruz's plays have been produced at some of the country's most respected regional theaters: San Francisco's Magic Theatre, the New York Theatre Workshop and Chicago's Victory Gardens Theatre, to name just a few. By the late '90s, Cruz had become the country's most-produced Cuban-American playwright, with his works published in drama anthologies.
So it's not as if winning the 2003 Pulitzer Prize for drama, for "Anna in the Tropics," plucked him from obscurity. But it has made him a lot busier.
"In terms of what the Pulitzer has done for me," he says in a call from Miami, ""Anna" is getting 16 productions in the United States this year. It's also being donein Canada, Spain, England. And I've gotten more commissions (than usual), some that I've had to turn down."
"Anna in the Tropics" was originally produced at the New Theatre in Coral Gables, Fla., and was a surprise Pulitzer win because it had never been mounted in New York, making it only the second play ever to win the Pulitzer without having had a New York production. (The first was Robert Schenkkan's "The Kentucky Cycle" in 192. "Anna" did get a subsequent Broadway production in the fall of 2003.)
If that Pulitzer sparks a trend of regionally produced plays winning major honors -- "I think it is important to acknowledge that there is very good theater outside of New York," says Cruz -- it'll be just one more groundbreaking feather in the playwright's cap. He is also the first Latino to win dramatic writing's highest honor.
Not bad or a 43-year-old playwright whose shoe-salesman father became a political prisoner in Cuba when Nilo was only 2. Because the family immigrated to the United States when Cruz was 10, he has been back to his homeland only once, in 1979. But his plays, including "Night Train to Bolina, Two Sisters and a Piano" and "Lorca in a Green Dress," nevertheless invoke the intense passion and turbulent political history of Cuba.
"That's where I'm from, and it' part of my idiosyncrasies," Cruz says. "You write what you know, and I'm very interested in writing about my culture. (Cruz mentor Gabriel Garcia) Marquez writes about places in Colombia and life in Latin America. When I left Cuba I came to Florida and lived in Miami, and in Little Havana the (Cuban) culture is very much alive. It's just part of who I am."
Richard Hamburger, who's directing the first major post-Broadway staging of "Anna"for the Dallas Theater Center, a production that will move from Dallas to Arizona Theater Company and then Pasadena Playhouse, adds: "The Cuba that is alive inside of him is truer than any real Cuba. I think he has retained something in him that is very rich source material, about lost worlds, at the same time not being nostalgic and moving forward as all life must, and the tension that one retains from one's past as one moves forwad."
Cruz was born in Matanzas, Cuba, just after the revolution began. In 1962, after his father was taken as a political prisoner, his mother, Tina, and her sisters were forced to eke out the family's meager living in sewing shops.
Tina had plans of getting her family to the States, but until that opportunity came, she had to pretend to embrace communist beliefs to avoid government interference. She eventually delivered her familyto Miami, where Nilo would attend community college and become involved in a theatrical troupe. That's when playwright Paula Vogel offered him a scholarship to her graduate playwright program at Brown University. He later taught playwriting there and at Yale University, while his plays began getting produced around the country.
When Hamburger speaks about Cruz retaining the past while moving forward, he's specifically referring o "Anna in the Tropics," which tells a story of workers in a Cuban cigar factory in 1929. The workers hand-rolled the cigars, and the owners hired lectors to come in and read newspapers and novels to them as they worked. It was a tradition that would slowly fade as machines took over rolling duties. It didn't completely die, however. To this day, the lector tradition is alive in Cuba. In "Anna," the reading material is Tolstoy's "Anna arenina," a novel that Cruz chose after considering works by Victor Hugo and Emile Zola.
"I think he has always been a delicate writer, and concerned with Cuba and those traditions," Hamburger says of Cruz. "He has always had a wonderful sense of the character and humanity, and a kind of unsentimental compassion towards people, so you see people from all sides."
Cruz is careful to make sure that his characters are at the heart of his plays. Even when themes and situations become something much bigger -- Cuba's turbulent poliical history in "Two Sisters and a Piano" and "A Park in Our House," the idea of the power of literature affecting life in "Anna" -- it always comes back to his vividly written characters. Their motivations, emotions, foibles, sexuality and personal histories drive the story being told.
"I'm not one of the writers who writes about a particular theme and then looks at it from different perspectives," he says. "If the subject matter happens to be in the play, it's because the characters are dealing with it. Politics function in my plays in the periphery, never in the center."
That character-driven style, often steeped in naturalism, means that Cruz's work does not fall into the genre in which he, and many Latino writers, are often grouped: magic realism. Even so, there's no denying that there is often a mystical and dreamlike quality to his work.
"I think writers from Latin America write from another center, a more emotional center," h says, "and I think that a lot of us take into consideration the environment and the world of Catholicism and the influence of African religions in our ways of life. So I think those elements might make it seem like it's magic realism.
"I think it's a reality that is magical."
Kind of like Cruz's reality, post-Pulitzer. That is, if magic sprang from hard work, talent and an intense connection to one's homeland. (Mark Lowry covers theater for the Fort Worth Star-Teleram. He can be reached at markl star-telegram.com.) nn
French President Jacques Chirac and German Chancellor Gerhard Schroeder met Friday in the eastern French city of Strasbourg for informal talks focused on Turkey's bid to join the EU and Iraq.
Foreign ministers Michel Barnier of France and Joschka Fischer of Germany attended the talks, part of a series of informal bilateral meetings held every six to eight weeks in order to coordinate policy on European issues.
The French and German leaders were expected to hold a joint press conference at about midday (1000 GMT).
Chirac and Schroeder were then to attend a reception at Strasbourg city hall commemorating the 60th anniversary of its liberation from Nazi rule, which took place on November 20 and 21, 1944, followed by a private lunch.
Turkey's bid to join the 25-nation European Union could top Friday's agenda, with the bloc's enlargement commissioner Guenter Verheugen due to release a key report on Ankara's progress toward the start of EU entry talks next week.
Chirac and Schroeder have both backed Turkey's eventual EU membership, but a majority of the French people is opposed to its entry in principle, an opinion poll released this week showed.
Chirac's ruling center-right Union for a Popular Movement (UMP) party is also against Turkey's bid. French Finance Minister Nicolas Sarkozy and Foreign Minister Michel Barnier have backed the idea of a referendum on the issue.
In Germany, opposition Christian Democratic Union chief Angela Merkel has recently tried to rally support among European conservatives against Turkish EU membership, calling instead for a "privileged partnership" with the bloc.
The financing of the EU's 2007-2013 budget was also expected to be discussed, according to Chirac's office.
"Unfortunately there are limits as to how much we can spend. We have to be reasonable," Chirac said in September at a summit in Madrid with Schroeder and Spanish Prime Minister Jose Luis Rodriguez Zapatero.
On Iraq, Chirac and Schroeder were likely to discuss a planned international conference on organizing elections in Iraq. Egypt is a leading candidate to host the meeting in November, US Secretary of State Colin Powell told AFP.
Barnier said earlier this week that any conference ought to address the questions of whether US-led forces should leave Iraq, and should include representatives of the armed opposition.
ATTN. NYTRNG EDITORS The Washington Bureau is not sending a budget for its weekender today. We plan to send it on Wednesday, after the election. Anyone with questions or comments or suggestions for other stories should contact Cory Reiss in the Washington Bureau of the New York Times Regional Newspaper Group at 202-862-0382.
'THE NEW BEST RECIPE'
The Editors of Cook's Illustrated
Illustrated. 1,028 pages. America's Test Kitchen. $35.
One thousand recipes from the kitchen nerds at Cook's Illustrated magazine, and further proof that practice makes perfect, if not transcendent. With recipes that have been subjected to dozens upon dozens of tests, there is little risk to making pad Thai or brisket the Cook's Illustrated way, and there is even a little reward: if an intermediate cook follows the directions exactly, the results will be better than takeout or mom's.
'THE GOURMET COOKBOOK'
Ruth Reichl.
Illustrated. 1,040 pages. Houghton Mifflin. $40.A plus-sized compendium of the best recipes Gourmet has published since its inception in 1941. Even deadened by the nearly invisible yellow typography in the recipe headings, there is much to admire and cook here, particularly when it comes to Asian food, which the magazine has embraced to great effect in the past few years. Still, it is probably best to think of the book as "How to Cook Everything Fancy." Which makes it a must-have for both the Viking-range set and anyone who aspires to the Epicurean ideal.
'JAMIE'S DINNERS'Jamie Oliver
Illustrated. 321 pages. Hyperion. $34.95.
His television persona may be closer to Alfie than Mr. C on "Happy Days," but Jamie Oliver is at heart a family man, and there is nothing about his cooking that wouldn't please a child, grandmother or anyone else between. Gone at last (praise be!) is much of the mockney English slang that infected his earlier, also excellent efforts; what remains are his spectacularly well-styled photographs and enough good recipes to make Sunday nights at home with the kids the culinary equivalent of date night without them.
'FAST FOOD MY WAY'Jacques Pepin
Illustrated. 240 pages. Houghton Mifflin. $30.
The food elite will tut-tut the master's occasional use of canned ingredients, skinless chicken breasts and microwave ovens. But Americans pressed for time after a long day at work, hellish lines at the market and a future full of more of the same may enjoy these simple, not simplistic, recipes: French food with only a hint of an accent now, basically American, just A-OK fine.
The Florida Gators likely will be without star linebacker Channing Crowder and No. 2 tailback DeShawn Wynn for Saturday's game against Vanderbilt in Nashville, UF coach Ron Zook said Monday night.
Crowder is wearing a cast on his injured right foot and will be re-evaluated by doctors Wednesday. Zook said the doctors think he has a sprained arch, but the extent of his injury will not be known until Wednesday. There's a possibility he could miss the remainder of the season.
"I don't know. I wouldn't want to speculate on that," Zook said. "I don't know that. I know if anybody can come back he can."
Crowder was injured on UF's second defensive series in last Saturday's loss to Georgia.
Wynn also was injured in the Georgia game, straining a groin muscle. He underwent an MRI on Monday afternoon and the extent of his injury was unknown Monday night.
"I would say that Channing and DeShawn are doubtful (for Saturday's game)," Zook said.
Another starting linebacker, senior Travis Harris, played on a sprained ankle in the Georgia game and is back in a protective boot and will miss practice time this week.
"I would say Travis is probable," Zook said.
UF's other starting linebacker, sophomore Earl Everett, practiced Monday and will play in Saturday's game. He was knocked out of the Georgia game from a blow to the head, but is fine, Zook said. GATORS GAIN COMMITMENT: Even though the Gators' recruiting effort will be somewhat in limbo until a new head coach is hired, Florida has managed to pick up an oral commitment from one of the top players in Georgia.
Tony Wright, a running back from Peach County High in Fort Valley, Ga., has announced he will sign with the Gators in February, regardless of who the new coach turns out to be.
The 5-11, 187-pound Wright rushed for 2,155 yards and 20 touchdowns his junior season and is rated the No. 1 running back prospect in Georgia by Scout.com.
"In my opinion, Tony Wright is one of the top running back in the nation," recruiting analyst Jamie Newberg said. "He's a versatile back who can run and catch. He can make you miss and he can run right through you. He's a nice addition for the Gators." ESPN2 FOR GATORS-GAMECOCKS: The Nov. 13 Florida-South Carolina game in The Swamp has been picked up by ESPN2 and will have a 7 p.m. kickoff. The game, which is UF's homecoming, was originally scheduled to have a 1 p.m. start. GATORS STILL HAVE BITE: Coming off another tough loss, the Gators appear down and almost out, but Vanderbilt coach Bobby Johnson doesn't expect them to play like it Saturday in Nashville.
"Those football players have enough personal pride and pride in their team and coaching staff that they are going to come play their very best whether it is against Vanderbilt, Georgia, Florida State or whoever," Johnson said Monday. "I don't expect any drop-off in their play." LEAK IMPRESSES JOHNSON: Johnson said the Commodores will be facing a much different Chris Leak than the one they saw last season in Gainesville.
"You can tell the experience helps him," Johnson said. "He's seen defenses, and when you run that kind of offense you're going to see every kind of defense and blitzing scenario that is because they force you to do a lot of stuff.
"I think it helps him a lot making good decisions. He seems a lot more comfortable in the pocket now, though hopefully we can disrupt that."
(ROBBIE ANDREU writes for the Gainesville (Fla.) Sun.)
Presidents of China and the United Arab Emirates (UAE) exchanged congratulatory messages Monday to mark the 20th anniversary of the establishment of diplomatic relations between the two countries.
The establishment of diplomatic ties is a right decision made by leaders of China and the UAE, and opened a new chapter in the relations between the two countries, Chinese President Hu Jintao said in a message to his UAE counterpart Sheikh Zayed bin Sultan Al Nahyan.
Over the past 20 years, friendly cooperation between China and the UAE has steadily developed and mutual understanding and trust gradually increased, Hu said, adding that the two countries have had fruitful exchanges and cooperation in fields such as trade, aviation, culture, health and international affairs.
In the new situation, consolidating and developing friendly relations and expanding and deepening mutually beneficial cooperation between China and the UAE not only serve the common interests of both countries, but will also contribute to world and regional peace and stability, Hu said.
The Chinese president said he is willing to work side by side with his UAE counterpart in deepening the Sino-UAE friendly cooperation in an all-around manner.
In his message to Hu, UAE President Sheikh Zayed bin Sultan Al Nahyan said that after 20 years of concerted efforts, relations between his country and China have had a sound foundation, and fruitful friendly cooperation has been strengthened in various fields.
Chinese Premier Wen Jiabao and UAE Prime Minister Sheikh Maktoum Bin Rashid al-Maktoum, Chinese Foreign Minister Li Zhaoxing and his UAE counterpart Rashid Abdullah also exchanged congratulatory messages.
Chile's ruling party, center-left Coalition of Parties for Democracy, won strong support from voters in the nationwide local elections on Sunday.
With 93 percent of polls counted, the ruling party got 45 percent of votes, while the opposition Alliance for Chile (right wing) had 39 percent.
Meanwhile, in the key municipal race, the right ring retained the mayor's position in Santiago, capital of Chile.
Chilean Interior Minister Jose Insulza said the nationwide local elections ran smoothly.
A total of 31 mayors and town councilors will be elected in 345 municipalities.
Share prices on Malaysia Stock Exchange closed higher on Monday supported by strong gains on key heavyweights amidst some selling following last Friday's solid rise.
At the close, the benchmark Composite Index kept above the 860- barrier and added 2.9 points to 864.04. It opened 0.16 point lower at 860.09.
The Emas Index rose 0.56 point to 204.39, the Second Board Index eased 0.42 point to 105.86, the Industrial Index gained 8.72 points to 1,859.62 and the Finance Index added 8.12 points to 7, 039.31.
Losers led gainers by 387 to 295, while 293 counters were unchanged, 294 counters untraded and 49 others suspended.
Total turnover stood at 342.91 million shares valued at 613.58 million ringgit (161.46 million US dollars) against 340.47 million shares worth 672.54 million ringgit (176.98 million US dollars) last Friday.
For years, Leon Lim did not want to talk about what he saw in the killing fields of Cambodia. He wanted to focus on his new life in America, not the torture endured under the Khmer Rouge and the loved ones lost.
"About two million people died _ and it's just too much," said Lim, a former refugee camp medic.
Dary Mien's starkest memory from the killing fields is being six years old and walking through rice fields littered with bodies.
The pain from that period of their lives is still strong, but both Mien and Lim are sharing their experiences through Chicago's new Cambodian American Heritage Museum and Killing Fields Memorial. Officials with the Cambodian Association of Illinois opened it in October in hopes of preserving the history and helping heal the emotional scars left by the Khmer Rouge.
"The Cambodian community has just been so silent about its pain. But when it comes to this museum, that reminds them of their sense of culture, identity _ and perhaps there's a way for us to connect better with each other," said Mien, associate director of the Cambodian group.
Survivors of the killing fields have donated items to the museum, from shackles used by the Khmer Rouge, to Lim's medical equipment, to decades-old books made with pressed palm leaves that contain Buddhist teachings.
But the museum's greatest treasure is its Killing Fields Memorial.
Museum organizers say it is the only public memorial in the United States that honors victims of the Khmer Rouge. The glass memorial has 80 panes, each at least six feet (two meters) tall, representing those who died when the Khmer Rouge ruled in the late 1970s. Names of the dead are etched into the panes in the Khmer language.
In the center of the memorial is a wall that has a lotus flower carved into it with the words: "We continue our journey with compassion understanding and wisdom."
Nearly two dozen of Lim's family and friends are among the names engraved in the glass.
"When you have the name of a loved one etched on the glass panel, it makes you feel like they're with you," Lim said. "It helps you to heal your wounds from the past. It becomes a place for the community to come together to unify and say let's move on."
But organizers say that when they first brought up the idea of a memorial, many in the Cambodian community didn't want it built.
"We are trying to bring up the past that speaks about a genocide that some feel should be forgotten," Mien said. "Their concern was that, 'I don't want to hear about it because it brings up such pain, and it'll cause the community to be chaotic again.'"
It took patience and persistence, but the Cambodian Americans began to support the museum, said Kompha Seth, the Cambodian Association's founder.
"You can see the healing of the project, but the process to get here was painful," Seth said.
He believes building the museum has pushed more people to talk about the Khmer Rouge.
The Khmer Rouge, a Cambodian communist group, began a large-scale insurgency in 1970 and overthrew the Cambodian government five years later. It evacuated cities, closed schools and factories, and forced the population into labor camps, where hundreds of thousands died from starvation, disease, overwork and execution.
Lim was a medical student in the capital of Phnom Penh at the time. On April 17, 1975, he was forced from his home and into a labor camp, where he stayed until 1979.
Then the Vietnamese invaded, essentially ending Khmer Rouge rule. Lim, his wife and her family walked for six weeks to the border of Thailand, and Lim spent the next three years in refugee camps working as a medic.
The family moved to the United States in 1981, and Lim now teaches at Northside College Preparatory High School.
At the museum on Chicago's North Side, Lim pulls out his old brown medicine bag and gingerly lays each instrument on the floor _ a knee reflex hammer, an instrument to check blood pressure.
"It brings all of the memories back," Lim says quietly. "This was worth more to me than anything else. ... At that time, these tools were the only medical equipment we had available to me to save lives."
Members of the Cambodian Association, which provides services and cultural programs to the community, say the museum will preserve Lim's story and others that will help further teachings about the country.
"I just want people to be aware of our history and our story _ that there were other genocides other than the Holocaust and Rwanda," says Lim's 23-year-old daughter, Thea, who helped do research for the memorial. "I want them to know how much they struggled in the killing fields _ and here they are, standing tall and together again. And they survived."


Cambodian Association of Illinois: http://www.cambodian-association.org/
The day will dawn frigid across the upper Midwest as a large Canadian high pressure zone crosses the region. Despite ample sunshine, temperatures will climb only into the 50s across the area, several degrees below seasonal levels. A front marking the leading edge of the cool air will sweep through the interior Northeast and Tennessee Valley later on Saturday. A 50- to 100-mile-wide band of showers and thunderstorms will accompany the front, a few of which will be strong. The highest risk of strong storms will occur on Saturday afternoon from North Carolina to southern Pennsylvania.
Scattered showers and thunderstorms will also erupt from the western Gulf Coast to New Mexico as moist winds from the east intercept an approaching disturbance. The Western states will be mainly sunny and warm, with temperatures reaching the 80s as far north as the Columbia Valley.
FOCUS: ABSENCE OF HEAT
Although September was unusually warm in the Eastern and Central states, the summer of 2004 had a distinct absence of heat. For the first time since the late 1800s, the temperature did not reach 90 degrees at Indianapolis this summer. In Pittsburgh, it marked the second consecutive summer that the temperature failed to reach 90 degrees, the first time on record the city had back-to-back years without having a 90-degree day. Farther south, the city of Nashville set a record for the fewest number of 90-degree days this summer, with only 19 such occurrences.
This editorial appeared in Saturday's Los Angeles Times:
Last June, the U.S. Supreme Court ruled that the 600 foreign terror suspects held at the Guantanamo Bay naval base were entitled to lawyers and the chance to challenge their imprisonment. But in the months since, Pentagon and Justice Department officials have simply acted as if the high court's decision didn't exist, blocking efforts by detainees to meet with their lawyers and insisting on onerous conditions for those meetings.
Last week, U.S. District Judge Colleen Kollar-Kotelly spelled it out to the Bush administration -- again. You must let detainees confer with their lawyers, she said, and you cannot monitor their conversations.
Kollar-Kotelly's decision could not be clearer. The government's foot-dragging, appeals and prevarication, she wrote, are ''attempts to erode this bedrock principle'' of attorney-client privacy with a ''flimsy assemblage'' of arguments.
The judge scoffed at administration claims that detainees can adequately represent themselves before military tribunals or rely on non-lawyer advisors. Many of these men need interpreters to communicate, she wrote, and certainly ''can't grapple with the complexities of a foreign legal system'' without a lawyer, access to a law library and English fluency.
The judge's rebuke is all the more stinging because she is a former federal prosecutor. The Justice Department's reaction should have been a humble, ''Yes, your honor.'' Instead, a department spokesman mumbled, ''We are reviewing the decision,'' a past signal for more stalling and appeals.
In some respects, the Supreme Court spawned this stalemate. The justices upheld the general principle that terror suspects are entitled to due process. But they were short on specifics, opening the way for challenge on every ambiguity and forcing lower courts to spell out exactly what sort of lawyer is acceptable and what conditions the Pentagon may impose on the proceedings.
Because President Bush insisted early on that detainees had virtually no rights, the administration now finds itself with no good options, even in the most troubling cases. Pentagon officials already have freed 200 or so men, concluding that they were wrongly arrested or had no further intelligence value.
But some former detainees have joined insurgent groups in Afghanistan and Iraq that are fighting U.S. troops. Holding the remaining men indefinitely is no solution either. The longer they stay penned in Guantanamo Bay, the higher the cost to taxpayers and the more radicalized the men become.
The opening proceedings last summer of the ad hoc military tribunals Bush ginned up to sort out who's dangerous and who's not proved a disaster. The interpreters were incompetent and even commission members were confused about the rules. The Pentagon is now scrambling to reorganize and restaff the panels in a doomed effort to salvage any credibility.
As the administration continues to stonewall judges doing what the founding fathers intended -- ensuring that the president doesn't overstep his authority -- it is not a stretch to say that Americans are witnessing the makings of a constitutional crisis.
Years of paltry oyster harvests have left Bill Beck, a waterman on Maryland's Eastern Shore for 21 of his 39 years, wondering if the business will exist by the time his 9-year-old son reaches adulthood.
Harvesting oysters, crabs or rockfish for 10 to 15 hours a day earns Beck just $25,000 a year. The dwindling supply of oysters in the Chesapeake Bay -- last season's haul was about 24,000 bushels, less than 1 percent of what it was three decades ago -- has hurt him the most.
''It's getting worse. There's no oysters. There's nothing there,'' Beck said.
Last weekend, three generations of the Beck family -- Bill, son Craig and father John, 76 -- boarded their boat with renewed optimism as nearly 4,000 bushels of disease-free oysters were made available for harvesting for the first time since they were hatched and planted three years ago.
The Becks were among two dozen watermen, some scuba-diving and some using hand tongs, who set out to get their share of the disease-free oysters from three managed reserves, known as Emory Hollow and Blunts Bar in the Chester River and Bolingbroke Sands in the Choptank River. The oysters were spawned at the University of Maryland's Center for Environmental Science, then planted in the managed reserves, where they grew under the supervision of scientists. Almost 200 million oysters have been planted since 2001, officials said.
While watermen have been able to harvest oysters elsewhere, they agreed not to harvest in the managed reserves for several years until the majority of the oysters grew to four inches, one inch bigger than the state's legal size. Those oysters command a higher price and have a better chance of reproducing, organizers said. In return, state officials promised to open up the oyster bars periodically, particularly around the holidays when demand is higher. The watermen will next be able to harvest oysters, which also help filter the water, at the three sites Nov. 13.
''It's a beautiful concept in a sense because it's brought commercial interests and environmental interests together,'' said William Goldsborough, a senior scientist at the Chesapeake Bay Foundation.
Yet not everyone left with big bundles of oysters Saturday. At Emory Hollow, the seven participating watermen collected just 10 to 15 bushels. The nine watermen at the Blunts Bar site fared better, collecting 97 bushels.
''Terrible,'' Bill Beck said. ''It took us over an hour to catch a bushel.'' The Becks had worked diligently along the Chester River, Bill Beck dragging a hand tong through the water as his son and father sorted and measured their catch.
Mathilde Egge, program administrator for the Oyster Recovery Partnership, one of the project managers, said many Emory Hollow oysters were smaller than four inches and couldn't be harvested. Organizers would try to determine how to ensure that oystermen take home a bigger haul before the next harvesting, Egge said.
Several organizations and federal agencies worked together to manage the project, including the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration and the Oyster Recovery Partnership, a nonprofit group whose mission is to restore the bay's oyster population.
The managed reserve program is one of many efforts to reverse what scientists have called a disturbing trend. Once the Chesapeake Bay's premiere species, native oysters have been virtually wiped out due to over-harvesting and disease. In addition to the managed reserve program, some researchers have turned to creating sanctuaries filled with oysters that watermen are barred from harvesting. The Maryland Department of Natural Resources also is considering introducing a nonnative -- and, they hope, disease-resistant -- species to the bay.
Federal funding for oyster restoration efforts in Maryland and Virginia exceeded $4 million this year, organizers of Saturday's event said.
The managed reserve method is ''the beginning of a new approach to managing oysters and oyster disease,'' said Goldsborough of the Chesapeake Bay Foundation.
David Phillips, 42, a waterman from Wittman, Md., said he welcomes any effort to increase the oyster supply. Phillips drove his boat 20 miles to Emory Hollow, a nearly two-hour trip, to participate.
''I think it's a great opportunity,'' said Phillips, who hopes such efforts will save his profession.
''It's a dying breed,'' Phillips said. ''Everybody that was on the water got off the water because you can't make a living.''
In the 19th century, explorers risked their lives to collect orchids from remote and perilous jungles. Today, orchids are raised in test tubes for mass propagation and sale as $20 houseplants.
This remarkable plant journey is the focus of an annual orchid show on the Mall that begins on Saturday and runs until May 1.
''The Orchid Express, From Mountaintop to Tabletop,'' features orchids in the permanent collections of the Smithsonian Institution and the U.S. Botanic Garden. It is being staged this year at the National Museum of Natural History.
The displays are arranged in a series of vignettes that track the discovery and commercial development of orchids, and the show, which covers 5,600 square feet, is tied together with a model railroad exhibit. The trains ''add some whimsy,'' said Nancy Bechtol, of the Smithsonian's horticultural services division, though orchids remain the primary focus.
At least 200 -- and probably more -- will be on display. Once plants are finished flowering, they are replaced with others. ''The variety literally does change from week to week and I know a lot of the orchid enthusiasts love that aspect of the show,'' Bechtol said. In addition to appealing to tourists, the show will offer a lunchtime respite for downtown workers, she said.
At 12:30 p.m. daily, specialists will lead tours and explain different aspects of the show. The experts include horticulturists, model makers and model train buffs. The tours are by reservation; call (202) 633-9239.
National Museum of Natural History, 10th St. and Constitution Ave., NW. Free. 10 a.m. to 5:30 p.m. daily except Dec. 25. (202) 633-1000, www.mnh.si.edu.
The story CONGRESS-ETHICS-ANALYSIS (Birnbaum, Post) has been killed. Please be certain the story is not published. A sub will not be filed later.
Los Angeles Times-Wasington Post News Service
Where: PBS
When: Wednesday night
Rating: TV-PG/L. Strong language.
Robert MacNeil -- Reporter/Host
Executive producers, Susan L. Mills and Jody Sheff. Director, Willliam Cran. Writers, Robert MacNeil and William Cran.
Providing women with easy access to the emergency contraceptive Plan B did not lead them to engage in more risky sexual behavior, a study of more than 2,000 young California women has concluded.
The study did find that women given a supply to keep at home were almost twice as likely to use the drug after unprotected sex as those who had to pick it up at a clinic or pharmacy. The findings led the study authors to conclude that easy access to Plan B, also called the morning-after pill, could cut the number of unwanted pregnancies while posing no apparent risk to women.
The study contradicts a key claim made by opponents of easier access to Plan B at a time when the Food and Drug Administration is preparing to decide on a second application to allow nonprescription sales of the drug.
In an indication of the strong feelings on both sides, advocates of Plan B plan to sit in Friday at FDA headquarters in suburban Bethesda, Md. Some protesters have called for civil disobedience if the FDA official who rejected the first Plan B application, Steven Galson of the Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, refuses to meet with them.
The FDA turned down the initial application last May, saying there wasn't enough information on how easy access would affect the sexual behavior of young teens.
''Our findings were that women don't change their sexual behavior when the drug is easily available, but rather that they're more likely to use it if access is easier,'' said lead author Tina Raine of the Center for Reproductive Health Research and Policy of the University of California, San Francisco.
The study looked at 2,117 San Francisco-area women ages 15 to 24 who were randomly put into one of three groups. One third were given the drug to take home, one third were told it could be picked up without a prescription at a clinic, and the final third could get it without a prescription at a pharmacy.
The study found that roughly the same percentage of each group had unprotected sex over a six-month period, that incidence of sexually transmitted disease was equal, and that about the same percentage became pregnant.
Nonetheless, about 37 percent of women in the group given Plan B to take home used it at least once during the six months, compared with 21 percent in the clinic-access group and 24 percent in the pharmacy-access group.
The FDA's initial decision to reject nonprescription sales touched off sharp criticism -- from FDA's staff and members of its expert advisory panel, among others -- that the agency was bowing to political pressure from social conservatives. In a letter to President Bush, 49 members of Congress asked that the application be rejected.
The medical profession does not consider emergency contraception to be an abortion pill like RU-486, or Mifeprex, because Plan B works by preventing a pregnancy from starting rather than ending an existing one. But some critics of Plan B consider it an abortifacient.
The new study, being published Wednesday in the Journal of the American Medical Association, supports the position taken by much of the FDA review staff and 23 of 27 members of the FDA advisory panel that the drug could be safely and properly used without a prescription.
After the FDA rejected its initial application, the maker of Plan B, Barr Pharmaceuticals, resubmitted a modified application to address the concerns about teen-age users. The company's new application would make the drug available over the counter for women older than 16, and by prescription-only for those who are younger.
Barr spokeswoman Carol Cox said the company still believes the drug can be safely sold on open shelves but would accept a compromise to place Plan B behind the counter. That would require a pharmacy employee to retrieve the drug, making enforcement of an age restriction easier.
Plan B consists of the synthetic progestin levonorgestrel and is most effective when used within 24 hours of an unprotected sexual encounter. While the FDA has approved it only for prescription use, six states have passed laws that allow pharmacists to dispense the drug without a prescription after a discussion with the woman.
The University of California study was initiated in part to see whether getting the drug from a pharmacy would be more acceptable to women than getting it from a clinic, and Raine said the results appear to show it was not. The study was funded by grants from a number of private foundations that invested in the Women's Capital Corporation, which initially developed the drug. Raine said neither the foundations nor Barr Pharmaceuticals, which supplied the drugs for the women, had any influence over the study.
When Priyanthi de Silva asked me for a new pair of glasses, I was naturally sympathetic. My own glasses had been swept away during the tsunami, and I knew what it was like to wander around in a blur. Priyanthi was obviously deserving. She had also lost her mother-in-law, her house and most of the possessions she had ever owned.
After all the other requests I had been receiving since my return to Sri Lanka to try to help out with the relief effort -- a fishing boat, a house, a new school building -- this one seemed easy enough to fulfill. It would cost just a few dollars -- money I had in my pocket. I was in a position to bypass the difficulties that normally bedevil aid operations and give a needed object directly to the person who needed it. But little about the aid business is simple, and certainly not in Sri Lanka two months after the tsunami that had devastated much of the southern and eastern coastline.
As I was talking to Priyanthi, a neighbor rushed up, reeking of arrak, a potent coconut brew much loved by Sri Lankan fishermen. He was full of Dutch courage, willing to say things he might normally have kept to himself. ''She's cheating you,'' he screamed. ''All these people here'' -- he gestured at a group of villagers who had gathered around me -- ''they're just trying to fleece the foreigner, and get what they can out of you. Go away.''
I was dumbfounded. I was back in Sri Lanka with the best of intentions. When the tsunami struck on Dec. 26, I had been staying with my family on a tiny island owned by my hotelier brother, Geoffrey. Like many other Western holiday-makers caught up in the world's worst natural disaster in living memory, I wanted to contribute somehow to the recovery operation. But here I was, blundering into a situation I didn't fully understand, stirring up enmities and jealousies among the very people I wanted to help.
This was the first time I had gotten involved in anything like this. During the course of a 30-year reporting career, I have witnessed more than my share of human suffering, from wars to earthquakes. I have always cultivated a sense of professional detachment, taking the view that reporters can contribute most by sticking to reporting.
But the tsunami was different. I wasn't simply an observer; I was a participant. When the waves came in, I was swimming in the sea. I survived by grabbing hold of a fishing boat, less than 100 yards from Priyanthi's house. As I clung to the catamaran, I could hear the desperate cries of people drowning in their houses.
I am pretty sure there was nothing I could have done to help them at the time. But those screams still echo in my head, and I continue to feel a sense of personal obligation that I've rarely felt as a journalist.
After I got back to Washington, I asked my bosses at The Post for a month's leave of absence so that I could assist in the relief work. Somewhat to my surprise, they agreed, while stipulating that any articles I wrote would disclose my personal involvement and would not be presented as news stories.
Over the past few weeks, I have been helping Geoffrey raise funds for a charity he launched called Adopt Sri Lanka. I have also been working on a blog (www.washingtonpost.com/weligama) that is tracking the reconstruction of Weligama, a fishing community of 30,000 people next to Geoffrey's island. The result has been a worm's eye view into the disaster relief business that has caused me to revise many of the rather naive ideas with which I came to Sri Lanka. If dispensing aid were mainly a matter of helping needy individuals, life would be very simple. But everything turns out to be much more complicated than I had imagined.
An army of would-be philanthropists descended on Sri Lanka and the other tsunami-affected countries in the wake of the disaster. There were, of course, the big relief agencies like CARE and Doctors Without Borders, known in the aid business as NGOs, or nongovernmental organizations. And then there were private individuals, like me, who simply showed up wanting to help.
Some of the assistance has been extremely effective. Some of it has been next to useless. And some of it is spawning new conflicts and rivalries, upsetting the local power structure in ways that are often incomprehensible to outsiders.
Consider what happened to a group of German divers who arrived in Weligama soon after the tsunami, intending to retrieve boat engines that had been washed into the bay. Since they were on a humanitarian mission, they offered their services free of charge. They thought they were doing everyone a favor until one day someone threw a stick of dynamite into the water after them. The explanation favored by aid workers: The Germans were stealing business from local divers who had been charging fishermen $50 for every engine they recovered from the bay.
There are several hundred fishing boats in Weligama bay, around half of which were damaged beyond repair by the tsunami. Among the various donor groups, there should be enough funds available to replace all the boats that were damaged. But it's tough to decide where to begin. Some fishermen are claiming replacements for boats they never had, while others have submitted duplicate claims to different donors.
What's more, part of the fishing fleet is controlled by relatively rich individuals, who have succeeded in intimidating the poorer fishermen and are trying the same tactic on the donors. The other day, one of these richer fishermen threatened to burn all the boats on the beach unless his own claim for a new engine was satisfied immediately. He was taken aback when the donor filed a police report.
So many foreigners are passing through Weligama -- the southern Sri Lankan coast had become a magnet for Western tourists even before the tsunami -- that playing one against another is a simple enough exercise. From a local fisherman's point of view, submitting multiple claims for the same boat is perfectly rational behavior. Only half the foreigners deliver on their promises, anyway.
The obvious solution is for the donors to cooperate with each other much more closely. But this is difficult when no one person, or organization, is in charge.
I quickly discovered that there is little love lost between the ''professional'' aid workers and the ''amateurs.'' The professionals speak disparagingly of the amateurs as ''disaster tourists,'' with no idea of how to run a proper relief operation. The amateurs wonder why so little of the money collected in Western countries after the tsunami has yet to reach the disaster areas.
It's true that some of the amateurs can be clueless, pushing aid packages out of the back of a van to whoever is around to grab them. But the fact remains that most of the relief that flowed into Weligama in the weeks immediately after the tsunami was provided not by NGOs but by local businessmen, both Sri Lankan and foreign.
The big aid agencies have been practically invisible on this particular section of coastline, at least until now. The first time I became aware of a USAID presence in Weligama was last week, when teams of laborers wearing USAID caps showed up in the town, frantically shoveling away rubble in advance of a visit by presidential tsunami envoys George H.W. Bush and Bill Clinton.
Of all the challenges confronting aid workers in this part of the world, the biggest and most debilitating in my view is envy. If you buy a fisherman a boat, the next fisherman is likely to be upset, both with you and with the first fisherman. The answer, you might think, is to buy boats for an entire community of fishermen. But then the neighboring communitywould be angry. And so on.
Such envy is self-defeating because it scares away people who truly want to help. A wealthy foreigner who lives in Weligama told me he was racking his brains to devise a way to help his four immediate neighbors, whose homes were destroyed. He doesn't want his name in the paper for fear of drawing attention to himself. He is afraid that the moment he helps his neighbors, he will start a chain reaction of envy all along the coast.
Does this mean that we should throw up our hands in despair, and conclude that it is impossible to do anything to alleviate human suffering? Of course not. These are the kinds of difficulties that are familiar to anyone who launches a relief project in a Third World country. There are solutions to these problems, but they require patience and persistence and a willingness to adapt to local ways.
After my encounter with Priyanthi's neighbor, I began rethinking my approach. I felt uncomfortable in the role of the bountiful foreigner dishing out presents. I decided that it was not for me to determine who needed a new pair of spectacles and who didn't. I also concluded that working with communities and institutions is more productive than working with individuals.
A total of eight people -- four women and four young children -- were killed in Priyanthi's tiny 10-house community in the space of 15 minutes. All this happened within my earshot, and I wanted to do something for all the survivors, not just one or two. At present, they are all living in tents, pitched on the rubble of their former houses.
It could take years to provide permanent housing for everybody. The Sri Lankan government has banned construction within a 100-yard buffer zone from the sea, and has yet to announce a long-term building project for Weligama. So the short-term solution is temporary housing.
In order to provide Priyanthi and her neighbors with shelter, I turned to a local tire company called Loadstar, which has been leading relief operations in the most devastated section of Weligama.
I have every confidence that the company can manage my little project well, something I realize I cannot do myself. As a local company, Loadstar can draw on the resources of a large factory, as well as the knowledge and contacts of its Sri Lankan employees. By contrast, most foreign NGOs have been obliged to start from scratch.
We hope the temporary houses will be finished for the community within the next two weeks, before the villagers' tents are washed away by the springtime monsoon.
Dobbs is on the national staff of The Post. He has reported from many of the world's trouble spots and was swimming off Sri Lanka when the tsunami hit.
GETTING THERE: By car, California's Santa Ynez Valley is about 45 minutes north of Santa Barbara, 2 1/2 hours north of Los Angeles and 4 1/2 hours south of San Francisco. You can find a cheap fare to San Francisco or Los Angeles and enjoy the scenic ocean drive on Highway 101.
WHERE TO STAY: Fess Parker's Wine Country Inn (2860 Grand Ave., Los Olivos, 800-446-2455, www.fessparker.com) has doubles starting at $265 per night on weekdays and $365 on weekends. Or, for $995, a limousine will take two people to three wineries featured in ''Sideways,'' with champagne and a picnic lunch provided. The package also includes a two-night stay, breakfast and dinner. At the Days Inn at the Windmill (114 E. Hwy 246, Buellton, 805-688-8448), rooms run $49.99 double weekdays, $69.29 weekends. The Wine Valley Inn & Cottages (1564 Copenhagen Dr., Solvang, 800-824-6444, www.winevalleyinn.com) has 51 guest rooms and six private cottages. Rates start at $89 double during the week, $119 weekends. A ''Sideways'' package for $145 for two people includes one night's lodging, a bottle of local wine, a gift certificate for lunch at the Solvang Resturant, a pair of movie tickets and breakfast buffet.
WHERE TO EAT: The Hitching Post II (406 E. Highway 246, Buellton, 805-688-0676 ) is open daily at 4 p.m. for cocktails and wine-tasting and dinners only from 5 to 9:30 p.m. Entrees range from $19 to $45; wines range from $6 to $10 a glass. At the Los Olivos Cafe and Wine Merchant (2879 Grand Ave., Los Olivos, 805-688-7265, www.losolivoscafe.com), entrees range from $9 to $27. Or try the $29 ''Sideways'' menu: a glass of house chardonnay or pinot noir, soup or butternut squash salad, and salmon, pot roast or Florentine ravioli, followed by ''chocolate scream'' dessert. Paula's Pancake House (1531 Mission Dr., Solvang, 805-688-2867) features thin Danish pancakes, buttermilk pancakes, waffles, etc. Lunch (burgers, sandwiches and salads) is also served. At the Solvang Restaurant (1672 Copenhagen Dr., Solvang, 805-688-4645), the aebleskiver (pancake balls) are dusted with powdered sugar and served with raspberry jam. Open until 3 p.m.
INFORMATION: The Santa Barbara Conference and Visitors Bureau (800-676-1266 www.santabarbaraca.com) has a free self-guided tour map of the movie's sites, or download a map from the ''Sideways'' Web site at www.foxsearchlight.com/sideways. Santa Ynez Valley Visitors Association, 800-742-2843, www.syvva.com.
PACEMAKERS
Certain types of implants may raise the risk of heart failure.
THE QUESTION A pacemaker implanted in the chest can help a person whose heart beats too slowly. Some devices do this by sending electrical impulses to one of the heart's chambers; others stimulate two. Does their effect vary?
THIS STUDY analyzed hospital records and death certificates of 11,426 older people with implanted pacemakers and 11,756 people with similar cardiac histories and risks who did not have the devices. Over a three-year period, more people with pacemakers than without were hospitalized for heart failure, which occurs when the heart cannot pump adequate amounts of blood. Within the pacemaker group, those whose devices stimulated both right chambers of the heart were 36 percent more likely to be hospitalized with heart failure than people without pacemakers; people whose pacemakers stimulated only one chamber had a 59 percent increased risk.
WHO MAY BE AFFECTED BY THESE FINDINGS? Anyone who needs a pacemaker. About 3 million people worldwide use the devices.
CAVEATS The authors suggested the higher rates of heart failure could be the result of pacemakers' causing the heart chambers to contract in an abnormal order. The study did not account for family history of heart failure, and it was not randomized. One author is associated with a pacemaker manufacturer.
BOTTOM LINE People needing a pacemaker may want to talk with a cardiologist about the most appropriate device and should contact a doctor if they develop shortness of breath and fatigue, typical symptoms of heart failure.
FIND THIS STUDY March 1 issue of the American Journal of Cardiology; abstract available online at www.sciencedirect.com (search for ''Freudenberger'').
LEARN MORE ABOUT pacemakers at www.fda.gov/hearthealth and http://patients.uptodate.com.
Bayern Munich have lost their bid to have Brazilian World Cup winner Lucio's red card rescinded with the German Football Federation (DFB) confirming a one-match ban for the defender here on Monday.
Lucio was red carded in the 54th minute of Saturday's 2-0 defeat by Borussia Monchengladbach for kicking out at Czech opponent Vaclav Sverkos.
Referee Knut Kircher consulted his assistant Thorsten Schiffner before opting to send Lucio for an early bath.
"The referee's assistant (Schiffner) should be an official for school matches," raged president Franz Beckenbauer.

The fate of a statewide proposition mandating health insurance coverage -- assumed to have been defeated in the Nov. 2 election -- was thrown into confusion Tuesday night after the secretary of State's office reported that late-counted ballots had given Proposition 72 a narrow margin of victory.
But state elections officials, who had posted the results on the secretary of State's Web site after the close of business Tuesday, removed them a few hours later, fearing that a clerical error was responsible for the surprising turnaround.
Officials said they would verify the information Wednesday.
''We had updates from 17 different counties today, but we are suspicious that one did not report something right,'' said Caren Daniels-Meade, a spokeswoman for Secretary of State Kevin Shelley. ''So we have to get in touch with them all.''
If the late results prove accurate, however, it would make for one of the most remarkable come-from-behind victories in California's election history.
Proposition 72, which would require all employers with 50 or more workers to provide health insurance, was the subject of one of the most intense battles in this year's election. It pit doctors, unions and consumer advocates against California's business sectors.
Election night reports had the measure narrowly losing, but counties had until Tuesday night to tally up all their absentee and provisional ballots. As of Sunday, the proposition was losing with 49.2 percent, 157,462 voters behind.
But late Tuesday, as 17 counties submitted results -- many electronically -- to meet the deadline, the number suddenly shifted, and the proposition was listed as winning, with 50.5 percent of the vote.
The change took the supporters of Proposition 72 by great surprise. ''We've been monitoring this for about a month, and there have been ebbs and flows,'' said Josh Pulliam, the campaign manager for the proposition. ''We're going to be patient and hopeful that pretty soon, 1 million Californians are going to wake up and have access to health care.''
However, Daniels-Meade cautioned against concluding that the new results were correct. ''This has happened before in almost every election, in some race in some level,'' she said. She also said that Proposition 72 was not even among the close races the secretary of state's office was tracking.
The office has until Dec. 11 to certify the election results. Daniels-Meade said the office hoped to have an unofficial tally to release today.
As of 9:50 a.m. Monday, the secretary of State's Web site reported an estimated 224,000 absentee or provisional ballots uncounted in the state. The most votes believed outstanding were in Contra Costa County, where an estimated 57,000 votes still had to be tallied. Los Angeles County had about 26,000 votes to report, and Monterey County had about 26,000.
Counties, which have 28 days to count all votes, have been reporting updated totals since election day.
''Everybody was updating today, and it sounds like there might have been some glitch,'' said Elaine Ginnold, a spokeswoman for the Alameda County registrar of voters. Ginnold said such totals are first placed on a computer disc and then transmitted to the secretary of state's office through a dedicated computer.
Times staff writer Megan Garvey contributed from Los Angeles.
In the latest twist in what Mayor Dick Murphy called a civic soap opera, an appellate judge blocked the registrar of voters from certifying Tuesday that Murphy had beaten Councilwoman Donna Frye in his bid for a second term.
The order signed by Presiding Justice David G. Sills came just hours before county Registrar of Voters Sally McPherson was set to declare Murphy the winner by slightly more than 2,000 votes.
Sills ruled that a hearing should first be held on a lawsuit by San Diego business attorney John Howard that alleges Frye's write-in candidacy was illegal and that a runoff -- without Frye -- should be held between Murphy and county Supervisor Ron Roberts.
Howard's suit contends the City Charter defines the winner of a general election as the candidate who receives a majority of votes. McPherson, however, was set to declare Murphy the winner with less than a majority, based on rulings by the city clerk and city attorney that Frye's candidacy was legal.
The order by Sills says a hearing could come Friday at the Santa Ana, Calif., courtroom of the 4th Appellate District's Division 3.
The new mayor is slated to be sworn in Monday during a special session of the City Council. But the city attorney's office has declared that Murphy can remain mayor while the court challenges are settled.
Murphy told a council meeting that he mentioned the court's order ''just so that you know where the soap opera sits today.'' Councilman Jim Madaffer, sitting between Murphy and Frye, had his own description of the machinations: ''Comedy Central.'' Frye expressed her frustration at the drawn-out process. While she has not filed a lawsuit, her attorney has supported a suit aimed at forcing McPherson to count so-called ''empty oval'' ballots, in which voters wrote in Frye's name but did not darken the oval on the same line.
''I am trying to protect the public's ability to support my write-in candidacy and have their votes counted,'' Frye said. ''It's just that simple. Unfortunately, it's gotten a little out of control.'' Unofficial results from the county registrar's office show Murphy with 157,938 votes (34.66 percent), Frye with 155,851 (34.2 percent) and Roberts with 141,874 (31.13 percent).
Frye supporters allege there are several thousand empty oval ballots, enough to help her overtake Murphy. Frye has declined to concede to Murphy, though the two remain cordial. The registrar has refused to count the empty oval votes because state law requires that the ovals be darkened.
The lawsuit seeking to have those votes counted, filed by the San Diego League of Women Voters, was rejected last week by a visiting jurist from Tulare County, Calif. The league decided not to appeal.
Howard's lawsuit was similarly rejected by a visiting jurist from Imperial County, Calif. The visiting jurists were assigned to the cases after all 124 judges on the San Diego County Superior Court bench were recused to avoid the appearance of favoritism toward Murphy, a former judge.
Howard's client, his law partner Thomas McKinney, decided to appeal.
The lawsuit alleges that the city attorney and city clerk were wrong in allowing Frye to enter the contest as a write-in just five weeks before Election Day. The suit says the City Charter does not permit write-in candidacies in runoff elections, even though the municipal code does.
Howard says the City Charter should take precedence over the municipal code. Retired Imperial County Judge Charles Jones rejected that idea.
The appeal was shifted from San Diego to Santa Ana when several San Diego justices recused themselves.
A nationwide campaign encouraging Taiwan people to turn in illegal firearms and ammunition concluded fruitfully Thursday with 428 citizens voluntarily surrendering weapons, police reported Friday.
National Police Administration (NPA) officials said that over the past three months, a total of 428 people voluntarily approached the police, investigators, military police or coastguard officials to surrender their illegal weapons, including 428 firearms and more than 9,000 rounds of ammunition.
The firearms included two assault rifles, 43 pistols or revolvers, 155 modified guns, 121 home-made guns and 16 air pistols, NPA officials said.
The weapons also included 77 controlled sabers, knives and swords, as well as 108 firearm components and parts.
During the same July 1 - Sept. 30 period, the law enforcement authorities also raided organized crime rings or individuals and seized 226 rifles and pistols, 812 modified guns and some 16,000 rounds of ammunition, NPA officials said.
Amid growing concerns about the stability of Iraq, the Pentagon Wednesday announced that it was boosting the number of troops there to the highest level since the start of the war as US-led ground forces continue attacking insurgents while they attempt to secure polling places in time for January elections.
The announcement means that 1,500 members of the elite 82d Airborne Division will be spending the holidays on the front lines instead of at their home base at Fort Bragg, N.C., and 10,400 soldiers and Marines who were expecting to rotate out of the war-torn nation will instead see their tours of duty extended by as long as 60 days. For 3,500 soldiers from the Army's First Calvary Division, it will be the second time their tour was extended since October.
The Bush administration had originally predicted that by this time the number of US troops in Iraq would be well under 100,000, but violence there has been escalating. In November, 135 American troops were killed, matching the record number killed in April.
Military leaders who spoke on condition they not be named acknowledged that the third extension of Army tours in Iraq was expected to draw a new round of complaints that the service was stretching troops and their families too thin, but they said temporarily pushing troop levels from 138,000 to 150,000 was essential to combating insurgent forces who are determined to undermine the new Iraqi government.
Secretary of Defense Donald H. Rumsfeld approved the request from top ground commander General George W. Casey after strategists concluded that the American troops and estimated 115,000 newly trained Iraqi security forces were not enough to protect polling places and continue the offensive against insurgents that began last month when US and Iraqi forces stormed the insurgent stronghold of Fallujah, officials said Wednesday.
"The purpose is mainly to provide security for the election, but it is also to keep up the pressure on the insurgency in the wake of the Fallujah operation," Army Brigadier General David M. Rodriguez, deputy director for regional operations on the Joint Chiefs of Staff, told reporters at the Pentagon.
Rumsfeld and President Bush have warned on that the period leading up to the Iraq elections could see even more attacks on coalition troops and Iraqis. Indeed, military officials have said for months that more troops would be needed to secure the Iraqi elections.
But Army General John P. Abizaid, head of the US Central Command, had expressed hope in October that new Iraqi troops would be able to fill the gap and that more US forces would not be necessary. New Iraqi police and soldiers are still being trained, and military commanders concluded that they had to send more US reinforcements.
Senator Jack Reed, Democrat of Rhode Island, a critic of the administration's handling of the war, said the Pentagon's announcement confirmed that the effort to stabilize Iraq would take years, with no certainty of success.
"This announcement makes it clear that commanders in Iraq need more troops and that this will be a long and very expensive process for the United States," Reed said. "It is still not clear whether Iraq will emerge from this chronic violence as a viable and stable country."
All of the 8,100 Army troops whose tours are being extended will end up serving either 13 or 14 months before they return home, beyond the 10 to 12 months they expected. Meanwhile, the 2,300 Marines ordered to remain longer will be overseas for more than nine months, two months longer than the normal Marine Corps tour, Pentagon officials said.
The 1,500 soldiers from the 82d Airborne will arrive in Iraq by the middle of this month and are from the same division that beefed up American forces for Afghanistan's national elections in October.
The troops whose tours have been extended include: 4,400 soldiers from the Second Brigade of the 25th Infantry Division, based in Hawaii; 3,500 soldiers from the First Calvary Division, headquartered in Texas; 2,300 Marines from the 31st Marine Expeditionary Unit, from bases in Okinawa, California, and Hawaii; and 160 members of the Army's 66th Transportation Company in Germany.
They were informed of the decision Tuesday, officials said.
For the Second Brigade of the First Calvary Division, the extension comes after their original 10-month deployment had been extended once. "They were supposed to be coming out in November, and then when we extended in the first time, for two months, they were supposed to come out in January 12th," Rodriguez said. They will now come home at the end of February or early March.
But the soldiers who have spent considerable time in Iraq are best suited to help ensure the Iraqi elections, planned for Jan. 30, can be as successful as possible, Pentagon officials said.
"They're the ones who know the ground best, who have worked with the people closest," said Rodriguez.
Earlier this fall the Pentagon extended the tours of the First Calvary unit as well as 3,000 soldiers from the First Infantry Division and Second Armored Division. Earlier in the year it extended the tours of 1,500 soldiers from a dozen units, igniting complaints from soldiers' and their families enduring long and frequent deployments to Iraq, Afghanistan, and the wider war on terrorism.
Officials said Wednesday that their goal is to make sure those soldiers whose tours are extended can remain at their home base for at least as long as they were deployed initially before being sent overseas again.
Senior military officials said Wednesday they have not yet seen any impact from extended tours on the military's ability to keep veteran soldiers in the ranks, but worry they may run into problems.
"For the obvious reasons, we're monitoring that very closely," said Brigadier General Robert B. Neller, the Marine Corps' director of operations.
Material from wire services was used in this report. Bender can be reached at benderglobe.com.
COOSA CHRISTIAN HIGH SCHOOL -- 2 phots. Coosa Christian High School students head to chapel from temporary classrooms set up at the Abundant Life Church Wednesday. The students are attending class at the church for the first time after a fire at the school made it uninhabitable. Tammy McKinley/Gadsden
A Croatian animal protection group condemned Wednesday the country's traditional practice of slaughtering hundreds of thousands of pigs, notably in December, and demand it be banned as it is contrary to European Union regulations.
"Although such a cruel, primitive and unhygienic practice is banned in the EU, which Croatia wants to join, the Croatian authorites are trying to retain it," the Prijatelji Zivotinja (Animals' Friends) group said in a statement.
The group called for the adoption of a law which would ban the traditional slaughter by individual farmers who do not sedate the animals before killing them.
"Croatia's practice of slaughtering the animals results in hundreds of thousands of blood-spattered farmyards," it said.
Croatia's farmers traditionally kill pigs on their farms from the last week of November through to December, while roast pig is a traditional meal for New Year's Day.
The EU, which Croatia hopes to join in 2007, has strict regulations on pig breeding and slaughter according to which the animals have to be sedated or put to sleep before being killed.
Ukrainian Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych led the presidential elections by gaining 45.5 percent of the vote with about 50 percent of the votes counted, said the Ukrainian Central Elections Commission Monday.
His main challenger, opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko, received 34.3 percent, said the commission.
If both of them fail to score the 50 percent needed to win outright in the first round, a winner-take-all runoff between the two will be held on Nov. 21.
But Sergei Kivalov, chief of the commission, said no definite conclusion should be made" until we get a fuller picture of the vote."
Altogether 24 candidates compete in the elections in the former Soviet republic, and about 75 percent of the 37.6 million eligible Ukrainians cast ballots, breaking the required 50 percent barrier, said the commission.
However, two exit polls conducted by two Ukrainian research institutes, put Yushchenko ahead of the prime minister, but both fell short of 50 percent of the vote.
According to one poll, Yushchenko scored 45.2 percent and the prime minister netted 36.8 percent. The other survey gave Yushchenko a narrow lead, 41.98 percent to 40.11.
Early Monday, in a live television broadcast, Yushchenko declared victory, saying he won more than 50 percent of the vote, citing his campaign observers.
Meanwhile, Russia's Itar-Tass news agency quoted Yushchenko's aides as saying that an independent count of 55 percent of votes showed Yushchenko won 49.9 percent and Yanukovych got only 30.6 percent.
Yanukovych, 54, supports closer ties with Russia and vows to make Russian the second official language.
His rival, 50-year-old Yushchenko, champions Ukraine's integration into the European Union and the North Atlantic Treaty Organization.
An Italian wanted for attempted homicide, robbery and international cocaine trafficking has been captured in Lima and will be extradited to his home country, Peru's Interior Ministry said Wednesday.
Giannulli Guisseppe, who had been sought by Interpol since February 2000, was captured in Lima on Tuesday, said Interior Ministry spokesman Lewis Mejia.
An investigating judge in Bologna, Italy, issued the international arrest warrant for Guisseppe on charges of "attempted homicide, robbery, personal assault, illicit weapons possession, as well as his participation in international cocaine trafficking," the Peruvian Interior Ministry said in a statement.
Guisseppe "put up tenacious resistance" when police arrested him, the communique said, but was subdued without serious injury and delivered to Interpol agents.
In a bid to prevent a resurgence of severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS) , the Cabinet-level Department of Health (DOH) announced Monday that passengers from Greater China will have their temperatures taken upon arrival, starting the same day.
The decision was made based on a conclusion reached in a DOH meeting held Oct. 21, as peak winter season of epidemics approaches, a spokesman for the DOH's Center for Disease Control (CDC) said.
Although no any SARS case has been reported anywhere in the world this fall, the spokesman said that the CDC is on a high alert against the spread of the potentially deadly disease by requiring visitors coming from mainland China, Hong Kong and Macau to fill a questionnaire upon their arrival and conduct self-health management by having their temperatures taken for 10 days in a row.
In line with the move, the CDC asked personnel and medical staffers at countrywide nursing homes, halfway houses and residences for the disabled across the country to report to health authorities if they find anyone with symptoms, such as fever, the spokesman said.
The CDC also encouraged kindergartens and elementary and junior high schools to fully abide by a rule of having children with a fever to stay at home, he added.
According to a SARS response level designated by an inter-ministerial SARS Committee, the current "0" SARS response level imposed by the CDC refers to a situation in which no cases have been reported globally.
The response level will be lifted to "A" by the DOH when the world's first confirmed case is reported.
A "B" level signals a situation in which the first confirmed case of primary transmission is reported at home, while a "C" level points to a development when the first confirmed case and a secondary transmission are reported domestically. The SARS Committee will be in charge of all arrangements at the "B "and "C"response levels.
Complaint sheets in hand, a voters' bill of rights in their kit, a small army of volunteers has descended on the battleground state of Florida to watch over Tuesday's voting and help avert a repeat of the 2000 election debacle.
One group, Election Protection, says it is deploying 25,000 volunteers nationwide, thousands of them in Florida, the state that delayed the outcome of the last presidential vote by 36 days before the US Supreme Court halted vote recounts.
"The 2000 elections were a wake-up call," the watchdog group says in its welcoming letter handed out to volunteers streaming in from around the country.
"I was unhappy about what happened in Florida in 2000," said Chris Ott, a 51-year-old house painter who flew thousands of kilometers (miles) from Vashon, Washington to help monitor the voting.
"I know they'll try dirty tricks again," he said, without specifying who "they" are.
"We're also here to help people who don't know what their voting rights are," said Ott, who attended a recent poll monitor training session.
Civil rights lawyer Reggie Mitchell explained the oddities of the Florida voting system to the audience, some of whom were wearing the group's distinctive black T-shirts.
The volunteers were told that, unlike the poll watchers sent by the parties and the candidates, they must stay at least 15 meters (50 feet) from the polling area, unless a voter asks for their assistance.
Several of the watchdog group's member organizations, which include the giant AFL-CIO trade union and black civil rights groups, support Democratic candidate John Kerry, but Mitchell stressed that volunteers must steer well clear of any partisan issues.
Ott agreed this was crucial to the volunteers' mission. "We are here to help people vote for Bush, Kerry or whoever they chose and make sure their vote counts," he said.
Mitchell also pointed out that the volunteers were not there to do electoral officials' work. "But it's our job, if they get it wrong, to help them get it right."
Some of the volunteers have already been working for several days during early voting that started on October 18 and has drawn almost 20 percent of Florida's 10-million-strong electorate.
Several problems have already cropped up, particularly from voters who said they never received the absentee ballots they requested weeks ago. Thousands of those ballots apparently got lost in the mail.
The poll monitors are also on the lookout for "challengers" who approach voters, telling them they are not eligible to cast a ballot. Democrats claim many of those individuals are sent out by the Republicans to intimidate voters.
Mitchell claimed a sheriff's deputy in West Palm Beach, "at the instigation of a certain party," challenged voters waiting in line. The group was considering filing a lawsuit because police officials are not allowed in the immediate vicinity of polling stations unless there is a disturbance.
In another incident, a deputy tackled, punched, handcuffed and arrested a journalist who took photos of the line of voters outside a West Palm Beach polling office on Sunday, local media reported.
Police claim Palm Beach County electoral authorities have banned journalists from talking to or photographing voters, though this had not been previously announced.
Barcelona have played some of the most entertaining football in Europe this season, but the Catalan club's fans were warned that they may have to settle for something less for once on Tuesday.
Barcelona play host to Milan in their Champions League group F match on Wednesday, which the home side need to win to ensure they progress without any undue worries towards the last 16.
"The result is the only thing that matters against Milan. We are going out there with this in mind. We need the support of our fans but I want them to know what type of game to expect," said the Dutch coach here Monday.
Rijkaard said that he expected his Brazilian right back Belletti to start, after being given green light to play by club medical staff after recent problems with his left achilles tendon.
However Rijkaard has worries over another Brazilian in his dressing room, the mesmerising World Cup winner Ronaldinho.
"He's got ankle worries and but they are getting better day-by-day. And I would want a player like Ronaldinho playing because even if he is not 100 percent he still gives us a whole range of possibilities.
"The problems have been there for a while but I think you saw against Athletic Bilbao at the weekend that he played better than he has done for a few games," added Rijkaard.
Rijkaard said that he didn't expect Milan to offer too many surprises, after all he is a former Milan player and still has many friends at the club.
"They've got a very tough defence and I expect them to play to their strengths and play defensively, even though they have plenty of quality up front."
Ronaldinho shrugged off his chronic ankle niggles to reassure Barca fans that he wasn't going to let the side down against the Italians visitors, who beat Barcelona 1-0 in their San Siro stadium two weeks ago.
"I am not playing at the level of last season and every game brings its share of pain but I'm not worried because I'm not far from my best."
"The small problems I've got are stopping me being at my very best so I'll be very happy when I get there."
"Actually, I'm happy at the moment as well, but I have to admit there is just a little something missing," added the ever-smiling Barcelona number 10 who is a prime candidate for the FIFA World Player of the Year.

Fbl-Eur-C1-SPA-ITA-Barcelona-ACMilan-Rijkaard
A bomb explosion Monday evening destroyed a discotheque in the city of Bastia on the French Mediterranean island of Corsica, but the building was empty and there were no casualties, police and judicial sources said.
"The building was completely leveled by a powerful blast and debris was scattered for about 100 meters (yards)," a judicial source said.
A fire caused by the blast was extinguished by firefighters.
A police official in Ajaccio, Corsica's main city, confirmed that the explosion at the Stella Marina disco, located in a residential area, was caused by a bomb.
Corsica has been prey to a campaign of separatist violence for nearly 30 years, punctuated by occasional ceasefires.
Years of clinical trials have yielded promising results for a vaccine that would protect women from a virus that causes colon and cervical cancer, researchers said Monday.
Four years after being vaccinated, 94 percent of the 755 women who participated in the study were protected against the human variant of the papilloma virus 16 or HPV, according to a report presented at the world conference on American Society for Microbiology in Washington.
Only seven of the women in the study were infected with the HPV virus, but none showed any precancerous symptoms, according to the study.
In comparison, in the group of 750 women injected with a placebo, 111 were infected by the virus and 12 developed precancerous cells.
The research was financed by Merck pharmaceutical laboratories, which expects a green light from US government regulators to start production in 2005.
Colon and uterus cancer affects 500,000 women around the world each year, and half of them die of the illness, researchers said.
British laboratories Glaxo-Smith Kline are also working on an anti-HPV vaccine, and is hoping for approval from US and British regulating agencies.
US troops overseas have voted by mail, fax and even email in the US presidential election, acting on their private judgments about who should lead them in a time of war.
Pentagon and military spokespersons said they do not keep tallies of how many absentee ballots have been requested by US military personnel overseas or how many have been returned through the military postal system.
But Stars and Stripes, a Pentagon-funded newspaper for military servicemembers, reported over the weekend that about a quarter of the esti	     In 2000, absentee ballots by US military personnel may have been enough to decide the bitterly contested results in Florida, shining a spotlight on a portion of the vote that in a normal election would have a negligible impact.
Even when they are not stationed or deployed overseas, many of the military's 1.4 million active duty force and 1.3 million voting age dependents must cast absentee ballots because they are stationed away from their home states.
This year, the military has mounted an intensive effort to enable US military personnel to register to vote and cast ballots in their home state.
Units throughout the military designated voting assistance officers to help others register, obtain ballots and vote.
They were advised to vote by the week of October 11 to ensure their ballots arrived in time to be counted.
"At this late date, we're encouraging people to use federal write-in absentee ballots," said Lieutenant Colonel Ellen Krenke, a Pentagon spokeswoman.
She said 23 states allow ballots to be returned by fax. Missouri and North Dakota are the only two states that allow email voting, and in Missouri's case it is limited only to military personnel in a combat zone.
Pennsylvania, a fiercely contested battleground state, extended its deadline for receiving absentee ballots by 10 days to November 10 after late mailing of absentee ballots to two countries where troops are stationed.
Although the active duty military is largely beyond the reach of pollsters, analysts believe the military tends to vote for conservatives.
A survey of military attitudes by the Annenberg Public Policy Center last month found that 68 percent of active duty service members approved of President George W. Bush handling of Iraq, but a majority (58 percent) also believed the administration had underestimated the troops needed.
The ''Unfinished Business'' between Jay-Z and R. Kelly just turned ugly.
The rapper and the R&B star have a new album of that title in stores, but it's a good bet their partnership will be ending right there. After a bizarre sequence of events over the weekend, the platinum-selling stars have severed their concert-tour partnership and unleashed their publicists and attorneys on one another.
The 40-city Best of Both Worlds tour was imploding by the hour Monday, and if the tour goes on at all it will be without Kelly.
The tour, which began Sept. 29, has been a volatile one from the get-go, and before it arrived at Madison Square Garden in New York Friday Kelly had reportedly infuriated his tour-mate by canceling three performances on short notice and delaying others. On Friday at the sold-out Garden, Kelly cut short his set and said he saw guns being waved in the crowd.
Jay-Z's camp dismissed that as fiction. ''Jay-Z sees that statement as the equivalent of screaming `fire' in a crowded theater,'' the rapper's publicist said in a statement, ''and was unable to continue with someone whose actions could potentially create a dangerous situation.'' Jay-Z said Kelly called the show short because the fans were more appreciative of the rapper.
Kelly did try to return to the stage, but was rerouted to St. Vincent's Hospital after a member of Jay-Z's entourage reportedly hit him with pepper spray.
''The fans deserve better than this,'' Kelly said in a statement. ''I'd like the show to go on. It's really disappointing that Jay-Z and the promoter don't.''
The Jay-Z and R. Kelly tandem has a snake-bitten history. Their album ''The Best of Both Worlds'' came out in 2002 just as Kelly was being charged with child pornography. The poor showing of that project inspired the ''Unfinished Business'' title of the new CD.
The Supreme Court met Monday without Chief Justice William H. Rehnquist, who revealed that he is undergoing chemotherapy and radiation treatments for his recently diagnosed thyroid cancer and called plans for him to return to work this week ''too optimistic.''
The disclosure signaled that the court's 80-year-old leader likely is suffering from the least common and most deadly form of the disease, doctors said. It also spurred speculation that Rehnquist's retirement could be imminent, all but ensuring that whoever wins Tuesday's presidential election could reshape the aging and closely divided court.
Rehnquist, who announced his cancer diagnosis a week ago, was expected back on the bench Monday morning when the justices reconvened after a two-week break. Instead, Justice John Paul Stevens presided, and court officials released a written statement in which Rehnquist said he was ''continuing to recuperate at home.''
The chief justice gave no indication that he intended to leave the court. He also did not say what type of thyroid cancer he has or what prognosis doctors had given him.
''While at home, I am working on court matters, including opinions for cases already argued,'' Rehnquist said in the statement. ''I am, and will continue to be, in close contact with my colleagues, my law clerks, and members of the Supreme Court staff.''
Rehnquist was nominated to the court in 1971 by President Nixon and elevated to the chief post in 1986 by President Reagan. He has been the subject of frequent retirement speculation in recent years, along with justices Sandra Day O'Connor, 74, and Stevens, 84.
Legal scholars said the court could function efficiently with Rehnquist participating from home, at least in the short term. But the uncertainty surrounding his health raised questions about how long he could remain off the bench -- and the potential ramifications if the court is asked to get involved in a disputed election outcome, as it was four years ago.
Historically, a justice who was not on the bench for oral arguments in a case would not participate in deciding it, said Arthur D. Hellman, a University of Pittsburgh law professor. Now, however, justices can listen to oral arguments on audiotape and confer with other justices through faxes or e-mails.
There are unique logistical problems for the chief justice, who oversees the daily administrative business of the court and also assigns which justices will write which opinions after each two-week argument session.
''At some point, I think, an institution as important as the court, it would be hard to run it from home,'' Hellman said.
If Rehnquist were not able to participate in cases, the eight remaining judges could act without him. Tie votes would mean that the lower court's decision would stand. The justices also could decide to rehear cases that are not urgent later in the term or next year.
The news that Rehnquist was undergoing chemotherapy and radiation treatments, after undergoing a tracheotomy a week ago, reinforced suspicions raised last week by thyroid specialists that the chief justice had an aggressive -- and possibly incurable -- form of thyroid cancer.
''Using chemotherapy and radiation is akin to saying this is extensive and beyond surgical intervention,'' said Dr. Rodney Taylor, a head and neck surgeon at the University of Maryland Medical Center.
By all appearances, he said, Rehnquist probably has anaplastic thyroid cancer, an uncommon condition that is fatal in virtually all cases. It is widely regarded as one of the most aggressive of all cancers, thyroid or otherwise.
Anaplastic cancer accounts for about 5 percent of the 22,000 cases of thyroid cancers diagnosed each year in the United States, according to the American Cancer Society. Patients live an average of two to six months after diagnosis, although doctors noted that rare patients survive a year or longer.
If the cancer was treatable, surgeons most likely would have removed the thyroid to keep the cancer from spreading, doctors said. The fact that Rehnquist had sounded hoarse in recent court proceedings and then had a breathing tube inserted most likely meant the tumor was impinging on his windpipe.
''There's no getting around the fact that this turn of events makes it appear much more serious, and potentially dire,'' said David Garrow, an Emory University law professor and Supreme Court scholar. ''You don't have to agree with his caseloads to feel sort of sad that he didn't make it back this morning.''
The car's wiper blades swung to the right, then to the left, as ambivalent as an undecided voter.
Her mind, however, was made up.
Neither candidate, in her eyes, is the incarnation of FDR. But she watched the presidential debates with interest and reached her decision about the race well before a cream-colored envelope appeared in her mailbox last week.
Now she was on her way to the polls to vote.
"My duty," she said.
A little rain couldn't stop her.
A thought struck her as she gazed out a window, and her thin, sweet voice rose a note. "What if everybody sat home on their rear end? Why, we wouldn't have a country."
Her driver, Bill Koberg, said, "Mother as voted in every presidential election since 1928."
Ruth Koberg of Fort Worth will turn 100 on Election Day.
Back straight, posture perfect, the small gray-haired woman looked like a Norman Rockwell depiction of Americana on the cover of "The Saturday Evening Post." She wore a purple suit, her Sunday best. And shoes, sensibly heeled, to match.
Her pale, veined hands -- hands she used expressively when recounting her happy childhood or talking about her late husband, who she knows is waiting fr her on the dance floor in God's heaven -- rested in her lap.
"I used to vote straight Democratic," she said. "But as I got older, I decided to split the ticket. I don't see anything wrong with that. There's lots of good Republicans and lots of good Democrats. And thre's some not worth a dime."
She stepped from the car, 5-foot-2, 108 pounds, and entered the early-voting site, shoulders back, head high. Election clerk Jean Moulder welcomed her with a smile.
"I never did drink, smoke or cuss," Ruth announced loudly, as if reading the minds of those who wonder about her secret to longevity.
"Time you start!" the clerk joked.
Another clerk led her by the elbow to a voting booth.
As a girl she drove her brother and sister to a little schoolhouse in West Texas, their buggy bouncing over ruts, Ruth calling out "Go, Buck!" to her horse, urging him across a rushing creek, swollen by rain.
During her lifetime, she has seen the dawn of television. She was there for the birth of radar, fluorescent lighting, jet aircraft, fiber-optic cable and compact discs, and for the marvel of the electric toothbrush. Since she was born, scientists discovered a polio vaccine -- and developed the atomic bomb.
When she was 22, Charles Lndbergh crossed the Atlantic. Astronauts walked on the moon when she was 64.
At 99, alone, in private, she made her choice, exercising a right that women didn't have when she was born.
A few days later, coincidentally, a greeting card arrived by mail.
Happy 100th. From the president and first lady.
GROWING UP
In the early 1930s, a family huddled around the radio at their home in Seymour, a town 135 miles northwest of Fort Worth. Guy Farmerwas a cattle rancher and store owner, and his family never met Franklin Roosevelt, but when the president spoke to the country, they felt as if they knew him.
His voice was made for hard times. Measured. Earnest. Reassuring.
"My friends," he called them, as he did all Americans.
Ruth Farmer admired FDR and voted for him four times. But it was Oscar Koberg, the handsome young dentist in town, who occupied her daydreams an thoughts about the future.
After her first dental visit, which cost almost half of her bookkeeper's monthly paycheck, she floated home and announced that she had met her future husband.
The couple married in church in 1936. That same day, bride and groom drove to Fort Worth, where they spent the next 62 years together, honoring their vows, devoted, inseparable.
They were partners, literally. At home "Doc" and Ruth danced to "Now Is the Hour" and he "Tennessee Waltz." They owned every phonograph record made by Guy Lombardo and his band.
In 1939, Ruth gave birth to their only child. Shortly thereafter, her husband developed phlebitis after surgery and was unable to work for an extended time. As bills mounted and worries grew, Oscar Koberg suggested that they move back into their parents' homes temporarily.
"Doc," his strong wife said, "if you never get out of bed, I'll mak a living for all three of us, and we'll live together as a family."
He recovered. Fourteen years later, they bought their first Cadillac.
They spent their 25th anniversary at the Roosevelt Hotel in New York City. Tipped off by their son, Lombardo introduced the Fort Worth couple to the crowd and played the "Anniversary Waltz" in their honor.
The floor was theirs. They danced alone.
When the song ended, Doc twirled his partner with aflourish, and they bowed, as one, to a rousing ovation.
An astute businesswoman, Ruth bought and sold real estate, purchasing her first duplex, a foreclosure, for $5,300 on the courthouse steps. She worked for years as her husband's receptionist and later as his dental assistant.
When Oscar Koberg retired in 1989, at 84, he was believed to be the oldest practicing dentist in Texas.
The Depression and that period early in their married life when they had little money forever shaped her attitudes about spending. Ruth Koberg reembers the cost of the dress she bought in Wichita Falls and wore to Fort Worth on her wedding night.
"I gave him a $50 bill, and he gave me back $10," she said. "Can you imagine? Forty dollars."
The dress, which still fits her, hangs in a closet.
For years she thumbed through the "Fort Worth Star-Telegram," searching the store ads for half-price offers and clearance sales. She shopped on double-S&H Green Stamp days. She was, and is, rugal, but generous with her love.
Her hands tell a story.
Her son has studied those hands.
They cooked meals, washed dishes, changed diapers, wiped tears, made deals, cast votes. They still balance her checkbook and hold a hymnal every Sunday at University Christian Church, where she is the oldest member.
When she was 96, Bill Koberg took those hands and gently asked whether she had given any thought to leaving her home and moving into a retirement center.
"Yes, I have," she said. "But I thought I'd wait 'til I got a little older"
Her son laughed.
"Mother, did you have a number in mind?"
She drove her car until she turned 98, and she moved into her apartment, taking her priceless treasures, her family photos, her memories with her.
On the way to the polling site last week, she asked, "Bill, don't you think I've accepted old age pretty good?"
He thought of the night four years ago when they celebrated her birthday with dinner and dancing at Ridglea Country Club inFort Worth. As the evening wore on, Bill, concerned that his mother might be tiring, asked her if she wanted to rest or dance a while longer.
The elderly are often stereotyped as out of touch, addled, cantankerous, slow. We tolerate more than appreciate those who ave lived a long, long time.
After the contested 2000 presidential election, comics skewered senior voters in Florida. Some Palm Beach County residents had difficulty understanding the new ballot system. The arrows and punch holes confused them.
"Electile dysfunction."
Old folks jokes.
"Just hit Al Gore instead of B-9," comedian Jay Leno instructed, a reference to Bingo. Leno slapped a flattened palm against his forehead. "How hard is that?"
Ruth Koberg calls herself an "old lady," but she is active, agile and quck-witted. She knows whom she voted for in every election.
Last week, when she walked into a hair salon in the Arlington Heights neighborhood for her shampoo and set, both hands flew to her cheeks in girlish surprise. Her stylist, Chuck Petty, had arranged a birthday party to celebrate No. 100.
She is a favorite at Salon One. Every Friday, clients such as Marion Snow and Audrey Wheat look forward to watching her step out of the retirement-center van and come through the door, light on her feet, beaming.
"She dances when she walks," one said.
"And she sings when she talks," the other said.
If Ruth Koberg were to meet the man who wins Tuesday's election, she would tell him, as she tells everyone, how lucky she is to have lived so long and to have been blessed with the best of everything.
"The best Mama and Daddy. The best husband. The sweetest boy ..."
Even houseplants perk up, wlcoming her sunshine.
(Visit the Star-Telegram's online services at www.star-telegram.com) nn
The Nicaraguan government and the Organization of American States (OAS) Monday signed an agreement on granting privileges to OAS electoral observers.
The agreement was signed by Nicaraguan Foreign Minister Norman Caldera and Santiago Murray, head of the OAS electoral-observation mission.
Murray said in a statement that "with satisfaction the OAS is observing another token of the political maturity reached by Nicaragua over the past years."
The OAS will send 30 members to oversee the municipal elections in Nicaragua to be held on Nov. 7.
The foreign minister said the agreement represents the commitment of the Nicaraguan government to provide transparency and legitimacy to the electoral process and guarantee the free and full exercise of the political rights of Nicaraguans.
The agreement will facilitate the OAS observers to perform their duties without interference, he said.
Roberto Rivas, president of the Supreme Electoral Council of Nicaragua, said several other international institutions will also observe the municipal elections together with the OAS.
Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych led the high-tension presidential race in this post-Soviet republic with about 48 percent of the vote, not enough for a first-round victory, the Central Elections Commission said early Monday.
With almost 22 percent of the precincts counted, the main challenger, opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko, had nearly 33 percent, the commission said. Yanukovych started the count with an overwhelming 67 percent lead, but his margin was falling with every incremental announcement of results.
An array of exit polls put the two top candidates within a few percentage points of each other, and both below the 50 percent needed to avoid going into a Nov. 21 runoff.
Hong Kong health authorities are stepping up the hunt for the source of a deadly influenza strain previously found only in birds which has caused a global alert.
The "bird flu" has claimed four victims here, killing two, including a 54-year-old man who died Friday.
At least seven staff who had contact with the victims were experiencing flu-like symptoms, but it was not clear if they had also contracted the H5N1 strain, local health officials said today.
Investigators fanned out across the territory Monday, checking poultry farms for traces of the disease amid the speculation that it could have been passed to humans by chickens.
All hospitals and clinics in Hong Kong have been ordered to test patients for the flu.
A number of the patients' relatives were also found developing flu-like symptoms and were undergoing tests.
A three-year-old boy and a man died earlier this year after catching the "bird flu", or H5N1 strain of influenza, and a 13-year-old girl is in hospital with the disease.
Another victim, a two-year-old boy, who was hospitalized with fever in November, later fully recovered.
World Health Organization (WHO) officials in Geneva said leading researchers would this week decide whether a vaccine should be developed, according to reports reaching here.
Macao experts today warned residents to be careful but not panic over the bird flu that has killed children in neighboring Hong Kong.
No bird flu case has been found in Macao and people should stay calm, experts from the Macao Nurses' Association and the Public Health Department said.
But they did urge people to be careful in contacting birds, take care of proper personal and environmental hygiene and cook their food thoroughly.
Leung Iok Va, deputy-secretary-general of the Macao Nurses' Association, told the Macao Daily News today that there is no effective way of prevention as the cause and way of transmission of the bird flu on human beings have not been found.
Meanwhile, local dealers of imported fowls said imported chickens, ducks and geese are safe to eat because they have passed strict examinations before they are put on the local market.
The poultry imported from China's inland areas are from a different source from those imported by Hong Kong, they said. While Hong Kong's imports mostly come from Shenzhen, Macao's are mainly from Zhuhai, Zhongshan and Jiangmen cities.
The experts want local residents to buy poultry only at licensed food stalls, saying those sold by illegal mobile vendors might be unsafe.
The government of the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region (SAR) set up an inter-department working group today to coordinate efforts towards the prevention and control of the spread of a mysterious "bird flu" that has killed two people.
A SAR government spokesman said the group, which comprises representatives from various government departments, will hold its first meeting Tuesday.
The group will coordinate measures necessary for the prevention and control of the "bird flu," or H5N1 virus, the spokesman said.
Chickens have been identified as the most likely source of a new strain of the flu.
The move came after three more people were suspected last week to have been stricken with the H5NI virus, bringing the number of confirmed or suspected cases to seven.
A 5-year-old child died in May in the first known case of a human contracting the virus. A 54-year-old man died early this month, and a 2-year-old boy recovered after hospitalization in November.
Three more people remained hospitalized.
The government also announced today that authorities in the neighboring Guangdong Province have agreed to step up the monitoring of chicken diseases at farms there.
A statement said Guangdong also plans to restrict chicken exports to Hong Kong.
Experts say they are baffled by the virus, and the hospital authority has issued guidelines to the public and hospitals to treat the potentially deadly flu.
There has been no evidence of human-to-human transmission of the virus, and no infected chickens have been found at the market, according to a source from the local health department.
Three more experts from the Centers for Disease Control in Atlanta in the United States arrived in Hong Kong Thursday to help in the investigation, the source said.
The World Health Organization has reportedly been asked to alert vaccine production centers worldwide to follow developments with a view to preparing the necessary vaccine.
The bird flu in Hong Kong, which has killed two people, has not become an epidemic, a local senior health official said today.
Speaking at a news conference here, Director of the Health Department of the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region (SAR) Margaret Chan said that the SAR government would take "a number of  preventive measures to protect public health."
"The present cluster of cases detected in Hong Kong has not reached epidemic proportions," she said. "The efficiency of transmission from human to human should not be high or there should be hundreds and thousands of such cases in the SAR by now, according to past experience with other types of influenza," she added.
However, "the transmission of the virus both from bird to human and human to human is possible," Chan said.
She stated that the SAR health authority has been working very closely with the World Health Organization and the Centers for Diseases Control in the United States in dealing with the investigation and study of this new strain of influenza A H5N1 virus.
For the public, she advised that the best way to combat influenza infection is to build up body resistance by having a proper diet with adequate exercise and rest.
"Good ventilation should be maintained," she said, urging the public to maintain good personal hygiene.
Chan told reporters that initial assessment made by a Special Working Group on Influenza A H5N1 noted an association with poultry in some of the cases under investigation.
The inter-department Special Working Group was set up yesterday to coordinate efforts toward the prevention and control of the spread of the mysterious bird flu after three more people were suspected last week of having been infected with the H5NI virus, bringing the number of confirmed or suspected cases to seven.
A 5-year-old child died in May in the first known case of a human contracting the virus. A 54-year-old succumbed to the virus early this month, but a 2-year-old boy recovered after hospitalization in November.
Three more people remain hospitalized for the illness.
Moreover, two more cases were classified as "suspected" by the Department of Health, increasing to nine the total number of H5N1 cases in human, Chan said.
The sales of chicken have dropped about 30 percent since bird flu killed children in Hong Kong this month, the Va Kio newspaper reported today.
Macao residents are eating less birds these days although there has been no report of bird flu cases in Macao. Compared with normal days, the daily sales of chicken has dropped by some 2,000.
A spokesman for the Nam Yue (Group) Co. LTD., which imports birds from China's inland areas for Macao, said that the company's daily chicken shipment to Macao has dropped about 30 percent. But the shipment of ducks, which total 3,000 a day, has not been affected.
The spokesman stressed the imports from the inland areas are all strictly examined and quarantined, and are safe. He warned local residents not to buy birds smuggled in without quarantine.
Related authorities in Macao said that they have increased inspections at Macao chicken farms and chicken markets, but nothing abnormal has been found.
Local chicken farmers say that sales have dropped between 30 percent to 50 percent over the past weeks.
Meanwhile, local doctors say that there is no evidence that people may be infected with the flu by eating chickens.
"It will be better if you cook your food thoroughly, and wash your hands before taking meals," the report quoted a doctor as saying.
The Public Health Department of Macao has called on residents to avoid contacting birds, and take proper protective measures if they have to.
In a notice issued through the Macao Daily News Thursday, the health department said that residents should avoid contacting birds in case they might be infected with the deadly virus of bird flu known as H5N1.
Although several cases were reported in Hong Kong, none was found in Macao so far. It is still unclear in which way human being catches the virus.
The department said that people who have to contact birds should wear disposable gloves and protective suits, and wash their hands thoroughly after finishing their work.
In addition, it reminded people to avoid staying with birds for a long time in a closed space where ventilation is poor.
People should also see doctors immediately for proper treatment if they have fever or respiratory diseases. They should tell doctors of their contacts with birds.
But it said the risk of infection is low because the H5N1 virus was only found in imported chicken so far.
Hong Kong is trying to persuade tourists that it is safe to come to the city because the bird flu is not so serious as to trigger an outbreak.
The Department of Health prepared a fact sheet to explain to tourists the avian flu, which is caused by a virus H5N1 that is only found in poultry. Seven people have been infected so far, with two dead and two in critical conditions.
The present cluster of cases in Hong Kong has not reached the scale of an outbreak, the fact sheet quoted the World Health Organization's statement as saying. There is no need for travel restriction or quarantine.
The sheet of paper provided information of Influenza A H5N1, cautioning tourists to keep up a good body immunity. But it said that eating chicken and other poultry would not pose a risk of H5N1 infection.
Hong Kong's Department of Health (DH) announced Wednesday three more new Influenza A H5N1 cases, which brings the total number of cases to nine confirmed and six suspected.
And, with the death confirmed by the DH Wednesday of a 60-year-old woman who was suspected of contracting the H5N1 virus, the death toll caused by the avian flu has increased to four.
The virus is believed to be transmitted through contact with chickens or their feces.
The new suspected cases involve a 19-year-old girl who is in critical condition, a three-year-old boy and a three-year-old girl who are at present under treatment and in satisfactory condition, the DH said in its daily update on the influenza Wednesday afternoon.
Of the nine confirmed cases, a three-year-old boy, a 13-year-old girl and a 54-year-old man have died. And of the six others confirmed of being infected of the H5N1 virus, two have recovered and been discharged from hospital and four others are still under treatment with their condition satisfactory, according to the DH update.
Of the five other cases suspected of being infected of the H5N1 virus, four are under treatment in satisfactory condition and one, a 19-year-old girl, is in critical condition, the department said.
Hong Kong's Department of Health (DH) on Thursday reported four more suspected cases of Influenza A H5N1, bringing the number to 10 in addition to nine confirmed cases.
The four new cases involve a three-year-old boy who is in satisfactory condition, a 25-year-old woman who is in critical condition, a one-year-old boy who has been discharged and a seven-year-old boy who is in a stable condition.
The death toll from the avian flu remained unchanged on Thursday at four, including the death of a 60-year-old man, who was suspected of being infected with the virus, according to the DH daily update on the influenza.
Of the nine confirmed cases, a three-year-old boy, a 13-year-old girl and a 54-year-old man have died. Among the other six confirmed cases, two have been discharged from hospital, and four others are still under treatment with three in satisfactory condition and one in critical condition.
Of the other nine suspected cases, one has been discharged from  hospital, six are under treatment with their condition satisfactory or stable and two are in critical condition, according to the DH update.
Hong Kong's neighbor city of Shenzhen has not discovered any case of H5N1 virus infection at its 200 poultry farms, according to a local official in charge of animal epidemics.
"There is no report of H5N1 cases among chickens so far, so eating chickens is safe," Zhao Changwang, director of the Shenzhen Institute of Veterinary Epidemic Prevention, told Shenzhen citizens today.
Moreover, the H5N1 virus has not been found in 15,000 chicken blood samples that were taken randomly throughout Guangdong Province, Zhao said.
The virus, known to cause "bird influenza" among chickens, apparently has been transferred to humans in Hong Kong. The virus is believed to be transmitted through contact with birds or their feces.
Because strict preventive measures have been taken for a long period, Zhao said, there has been no bird flu epidemic in recent years among Shenzhen's 168 chicken runs and 38 pigeon farms. Zhao said that procedures for breeding and transporting poultry are always under intensive monitoring to avoid an epidemic.
A top Chinese official in charge of animal quarantines confirmed on Thursday that the H5N1 virus has not been found among chickens shipped to Hong Kong and Macao.
Yu Dahai, director of the Administration of Animal and Plant Quarantine under the Ministry of Agriculture, said he was satisfied with the disease control measures adopted by poultry farms and ports in Shenzhen.
Inspections are under way to prevent a bird flu outbreak, such as random screening of chickens and checks on all poultry farms, said Yu, who is on a fact-finding tour in Shenzhen.
Partial official results in Ukraine's bitterly fought presidential election Sunday gave Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich the lead, but key exit polls showed a pro-West opposition leader on top.
Amid allegations of fraud in the vote-counting, the discrepancy between the exit polls and the official results seemed likely to add to questions about the legitimacy of the election and raise fears of clashes over the outcome.
With about 50 percent of voting districts counted, official results showed Yanukovich with 46 percent of the votes. The prime minister has called for stronger ties with Moscow.
Viktor Yushchenko, regarded as a pro-Western democrat and free-market reformer, was second with nearly 34 percent in a field of 24 candidates.
But high-profile exit polls -- financed in part by the U.S. Embassy and other Western diplomatic missions and conducted by four of Ukraine's most respected polling companies -- put Yushchenko in first place, as did a vote count conducted by his campaign observers.
Yushchenko rushed to claim victory.
''The democratic forces have won in Ukraine,'' Yushchenko told journalists and supporters early Monday. ''I'd like to thank the Ukrainian voters. ... I thank you for this victory which we have today in Ukraine. It's a matter of great importance. We have been waiting for it for many years, and tens of millions of Ukrainians have been waiting for it.''
Yushchenko said the vote count conducted by his supporters showed him with 50 percent to Yanukovich's 28 percent, with 31 percent of voting stations tabulated.
One of the exit polls, conducted with a secret ballot, showed Yushchenko with 45 percent and Yanukovich with 37 percent. The other, conducted through interviews, showed Yushchenko with 43 percent and Yanukovich with 39 percent. Many foreign observers and Yushchenko supporters were looking at exit poll data to evaluate the credibility of the official count.
If no one wins more than 50 percent of the vote, the two top finishers will face each other in a Nov. 21 runoff.
The winner will succeed President Leonid D. Kuchma, who has been in power for 10 years. Kuchma's election to a second term in 1999 was criticized by Western human rights groups for violating standards of fairness, as was Ukraine's 2002 parliamentary election.
For 13 troubled years since the collapse of the Soviet Union, this nation of 48 million has been torn between a desire for full acceptance by the West and a centuries-long tradition of integration with Russia.
Yushchenko has indicated that, as president, he would push the country toward warmer ties with Western Europe and the United States, whereas Yanukovich has pledged to make Russian a second official language and boost ties with Moscow.
Yushchenko supporters scheduled a rally Monday to back their candidate and demand a fair vote count.
''We shall not surrender our victory to anyone,'' Yushchenko told reporters after voting at a polling station in Kiev, warning authorities to count votes ''honestly and in accordance with the law.''
''If this procedure is violated by the authorities, we shall act accordingly,'' he said. ''We shall not yield to threats. ... God and justice are with us.''
Yanukovich, speaking with reporters after casting his ballot, said the government had done all it could to ensure peaceful voting. He also cited his own record in boosting pensions, which increased his support among the elderly but led to criticism that he was trying to buy votes.
About 150,000 police officers were reported on duty across the country. Crowd-control equipment, including water cannons, and some military vehicles were stationed at the Central Election Commission building in Kiev. In the last week, amid widespread fears of post-election violence, authorities put up a 10-foot metal fence and a lower temporary fence to protect the building.
Yushchenko, 50, a former prime minister, enjoys strong backing among younger and more educated voters in Kiev and citizens of the country's rural western region, a stronghold of Ukrainian nationalism.
Irina Konchakovskaya, 66, a retired university professor, said she favors Yushchenko because she believes he can be trusted. She also expects him to try to put corrupt businessmen and politicians in jail, she said.
''Yanukovich means going back to the past,'' she added.
Yanukovich, 54, is most popular in Ukraine's industrialized and largely Russian-speaking eastern region, where many favor the restoration of strong ties with Russia.
''I support Yanukovich because he's very businesslike. He does what he says,'' a middle-aged government employee who gave only his first name, Nikolay, said after leaving a polling station.
A factory manager and Communist Party member in the Soviet era, Yanukovich had a troubled youth, serving prison time for robbery and assault. A court expunged his criminal record decades ago, but the opposition questions the reasons for that action and has repeatedly called attention to his record.
Yushchenko's strongly pro-Western team would be willing to make difficult decisions and economic sacrifices to win NATO and European Union membership, predicted Mikhaylo Pogrebinsky, director of the Kiev Center of Political Studies and Conflictology.
The following photos and graphics have moved this week and may be downloaded from www.latwp.com. The photos/graphics editors are Kay Coyte and Tom Lachman in Washington and Diana Mitchell in Los Angeles. If you have questions, please call 202-334-7666 or 213-237-7832 or e-mail latwp(at)washpost.com or latwp(at)latimes.com. National: CAMPAIGN-ELECTORAL -- Six states with 79 electoral votes are considered tossups and could determine the winner of the presidential election. Map highlights the tossup states and the electoral votes needed to win. Stand-alone graphic. One Freehand graphic (Post), 36 by 48 picas; 2.1 MB. CAMPAIGN-VOTERS -- Stand-alone graphic addresses voter registration, which has increased a ''moderate'' 3 percent nationally since 2000, with most of the increase in the battleground states, according to a study. Charts show voter registration rates. One Freehand graphic (Post), 34 by 45 picas; 352 K. CHERNIN-HOLLYWOOD -- Insiders see News Corp.'s Peter Chernin as an improved version of Michael Eisner, the man he could replace. 1,590 words, by Sallie Hofmeister (Times). (a). Moved. With one graphic in Freehand 9 (Times), 13 by 37 picas; 132 K. Financial: INTERNET-EXTORT -- High-tech protection rackets in which gangs of computer hackers choke off traffic to Web sites whose operators refuse their demands are fast becoming the scourge of Internet-based businesses; but in one case, a California man helped nab one ring's members. 1,720 words, by Joseph Menn (Times) (f). Moved. With one graphic in Freehand 9 (Times), 34 by 21 picas; 186 K. Science and Medicine: CAVES -- DUNLAP, Tenn. -- Most of Tennessee's caves are part of a network -- extending under Alabama, Georgia and Kentucky, and beyond into Indiana, Virginia and West Virginia -- that have never been surveyed for their biodiversity. Some scientific experts estimate that as many as 1,000 species are yet to be discovered. 945 words, by Juliet Eilperin (Post) (a). Two photos; one Freehand graphic (Post), 11 by 17 picas; 1.3 MB. Arts and Entertainment: MUSEUM-MADRID -- MADRID, Spain -- ''The Spanish Portrait from El Greco to Picasso,'' a major show recently launched by the Prado Museum, is the world's first significant overview of one of the richest, most important and most coherent traditions in Western art. It runs through Feb. 6. 1,800 words, by Blake Gopnik (Post) (e). Five photos. Travel: TRAVEL-AUSTRALIA -- Aussie stomping grounds: In South Australia, the wines have funny names -- and go down easy. 2,500 words, by Nancy Lewis (Post) (t). Two photos, one Freehand graphic map; 6.6 MB. TRAVEL-TEXAS -- The Marfa lights -- spontaneous bursts of illumination that materialize, year-round, on clear nights over the Chihuahuan Desert in west Texas -- are a bona-fide unexplained natural phenomenon. They've defied scientific rationalization for more than a century. 1,745 words, by Zofia Smardz (Post) (t). With TRAVEL-TEXAS-INFO; three photos; one Freehand graphic map; 976 K. Food: NUT-PERSIMMON -- Weekly, self-contained Nutrition Facts graphic looks at persimmon. Freehand 8 graphic (Everett Herald); 1 col. by 6.4 inches; 744 K.
In ''Moolaade,'' six African girls refuse to undergo ritual circumcision and unwittingly cause a revolution in their village. In Senegalese director Ousmane Sembene's hands, what could have been merely exotic spectacle becomes something astonishing, timely and deeply moving.
Like a set of talking drums, the film's polyrhythms capture an abundance of themes: the emancipation of women, the perennial divisions between generations, the tumult between the old, spiritual world and the new, secular one. ''Moolaade,'' in short, is a movie to rock the soul.
Terrified at the prospect of genital mutilation, the preadolescent girls break into two groups. Two escape the unnamed West African village for destinations unknown. The remaining four take refuge in the house of Colle Gallo Ardo Sy (Fatoumata Coulibaly), an independent woman with mystical powers who has already stood up to the village imams. Seven years earlier, she refused to submit her daughter Amasatou (Salimata Traore) to what their tradition called ''purification.'' Consequently, Amasatou has become declared bilakoro@ (unpurified), a state that prevents sexual or marital union with any man. Amasatou looks determined to continue her mother's individual path. She intends to marry a sophisticate known as Ibrahima (Moussa Theophile Sowie), who is due back from Paris. He also happens to be the chief's son.
These two women are the pariahs of the village, but Colle is a mystical woman who has the powers of moolaade@, the ancient spell of protection. She's a force, too.
Without hesitation, she invokes the spell for the four girls. Tying a tassel across the entrance of her home, she forbids them to cross it. No man or woman of any authority in the village dares to step over the rope either. The children's sanctuary will be undone only when Colle utters the correct words.
Colle's defiance provokes an impressive show of force, from the red-gowned women whose duty it is to perform the gruesome mutilation to the male elders. Colle must resist direct intimidation from the village leader, an adamant brother-in-law and her own husband, a decent man who is not bold enough to resist the patriarchal dictates of his world.
What starts out as a seemingly minor domestic affair becomes a turning point for the whole community. Will it retain the old ways and the medically dangerous practice (which often results in death)? Or will it embrace the outside world, whose existence is known through the radios the women own and the wares of a traveling peddler known as Mercenaire (Dominique Zeida)?
Colle is not alone; it's clear she has the tacit support of most of the women, especially when the men collect and destroy all those radios. ''They want to lock up our minds,'' complains one woman.
''Moolaade'' culminates in a scene of public whipping that is shocking and unforgettable. Even though the violence occurs out of the frame, we are nearly as shaken by it as if we were experiencing it ourselves. And the implications are immense, with one side encouraging this punishment and the other screaming for resistance and, ultimately, freedom.
A brilliant visualist, Sembene provides a telling metaphor as the bilious smoke from a pyre of burning radios rises and engulfs the mosque tower of this village. ''Moolaade'' is also a riot of colors that almost rivals the vivid hues of Chinese filmmaker Zhang Yimou. The bold garments, the richness of the earth, the gorgeous greens and browns of this corner of the world, all attest to the beautiful world that can only be appreciated if one has the freedom to do so.
Despite the movie's unmistakable criticism of draconian tradition, however, Sembene never lets anyone lapse into easy categories. Mercenaire -- who represents the material, Western world -- is a wonderfully dual character. He's a womanizer and a scales-tipper, hardly a figure of morality. But he represents a freedom far more appealing than the present dystopia.
As for the men who are willing to risk killing for their traditionalist beliefs, they are more alarmed that Colle would undo their society than they are pantomimically evil. They are pawns in their own belief system, cocooned in a sort of earnest blindness. And anyone who doesn't see multiple levels of timeliness in all this probably isn't concentrating.
MOOLAADE (Unrated, 124 minutes) contains sexual scenes, nudity, obscenity, violence and overall intensity. In Jula and some French with subtitles.
The story CONGRESS-ETHICS-ANALYSIS (Birnbaum, Post) has been killed. Please be certain the story is not published. A sub will not be filed later.
Opinions are by Los Angeles Times reviewers. Ratings by the Motion Picture Association of America are: (G) for general audiences; (PG) parental guidance urged because of material possibly unsuitable for children; (PG-13) parents are strongly cautioned to give guidance for attendance of children younger than 13; (R) restricted, younger than 17 admitted only with parent or adult guardian; (NC-17) no one younger than 17 admitted. ''After the Sunset'' -- A holiday treat that's arrived early, this sleek romantic adventure has a welcome touch of classic screwball comedy, a throwaway wit and sophistication, a light touch and lack of pretension fairly rare today in most Hollywood movies. Pierce Brosnan is the most dashing and daring of jewel thieves who finds retirement in Bahamas-resort luxury a trifle boring, even though his partner in love and crime is Salma Hayek. Deceptively zany but dogged FBI agent Woody Harrelson turns up, still trying to nail the couple, yet he strikes up a friendship with the charming Brosnan. Director Brett Ratner and writers Paul Zbyszewski and Craig Rosenberg know exactly what they're doing from start to finish. With Don Cheadle, Naomie Harris, Chris Penn. (1:33) PG-13 for sexuality, violence and language. ''Alexander'' -- The real Alexander, a pre-Christian prototype of the ''live fast, die young, leave a good-looking corpse'' lifestyle, conquered huge chunks of the known world by the time he died just shy of his 33rd birthday. When you throw in a pan-sexual lifestyle and loads of exotic locales, this could have been a film worth remembering. What we get is an indifferent epic that tells us more about the inside of writer-director Oliver Stone's head than we really want to know. This is not a knock on star Colin Farrell, who throws himself into the part of the charismatic leader and actually comes off as someone men might follow into battle. But Stone never convinces us why we should care. With Angelina Jolie, Val Kilmer and Anthony Hopkins. R for violence and some sexuality/nudity. ''Bridget Jones: The Edge of Reason'' -- Bridget Jones in the book by Helen Fielding is a tart-tongued loudmouth with roller-coaster moods and an insecure streak as Homeric as her outlandish self-confidence. In the movie, Renee Zellweger plays Bridget like being Bridget is a flaw. There's something shamed and apologetic about Zellweger's performance that undercuts what is otherwise a gleefully indulgent satire of chickdom. You get the sense she doesn't believe her character could ever get the likes of Colin Firth and Hugh Grant to fight over her. The movie might be British, but its attitude toward girls is still pure Hollywood. This is a shame, because the script is wickedly smart and unabashedly silly at the same time, and Grant gives what must be his funniest and most sexy performance ever. Directed by Beeban Kidron. (1:48) R for language and some sexual content. ''Brother to Brother'' -- Anthony Mackie stars as a gay writer who finds inspiration in the legacy of the Harlem Renaissance. Written and directed by Rodney Evans. terial, disturbing images/terror/violence, some sensuality.) ''House of Flying Daggers'' -- Tang dynasty police investigate a dance suspected of ties to the revolutionary group of the title. Written by Lin Feng, Wang Bin and Zhang Yimou. Directed by Zhang Yimou. ''The Incredibles'' -- Writer-director Brad Bird has created the unprecedented film that is not just a grand feature-length cartoon but a grand feature, period. And he's done it by working within the confines of one of the staples of cartoons and comic literature, the superhero. Mr. Incredible (Craig. T. Nelson), a superhero driven to abandon his profession after a series of lawsuits, masquerades as an ordinary man with thinning hair and an expanding gut. He's married to the former Elastigirl (Holly Hunter) and works as a claims adjuster for the heartlessly corporate Insuricare. When he gets a secret communication hinting at the need for an old-school superhero, it leads him to some of the funniest, most human and most adventurous situations computer animation has yet put on the screen. Voices by Samuel L. Jackson, Wallace Shawn, Jason Lee, Sarah Vowell, John Ratzenberger and Brad Bird. (2:01) PG for action violence. ''The Motorcycle Diaries'' -- Though it links future charismatic revolutionary Ernesto ''Che'' Guevara, criminally attractive Mexican actor Gael Garcia Bernal and a Norton 500 motorcycle, this might be the quietest, most meditative motorcycle movie ever made. Brazil's Walter Salles directs from a script by Jose Rivera, based on books written by Guevara and his friend Alberto Granado, who were changed by the eight months they spent in 1952 going 8,000 South American miles, but not in the way they expected. Because Bernal has the sense and skill not to play Guevara like the great man in training, we get to see an individual learn and expand from experience, to tag along as purpose gradually reveals its inexorable hand to him. In Spanish with English subtitles. (2:06. R for language.) ''National Treasure'' -- Is it even possible to make a Jerry Bruckheimer movie with a straight face anymore? Technically, yes, as Disney demonstrates with its high-octane tear through the wildly unsubstantiated side of American history. But it has all the soul, wit and originality of a major co-branding campaign. Nicolas Cage laconically plays Benjamin Franklin Gates, a fifth-generation treasure-hunter searching for a massive treasure stash hidden, forgotten and rediscovered by the crusading medieval knights who eventually spawned the Freemasons. The film hits every action-adventure beat, zinger and emotional trope right on cue -- although, it is as doggedly hokey and ham-handed as a Disneyland ride. With Harvey Keitel, Jon Voight, Diane Kruger, Sean Bean, Justin Bartha and Christopher Plummer. Directed by Jon Turtletaub. (2:11 PG for action violence and some scary images.) ''Notre Musique'' -- Hell, purgatory and paradise are co-existing kingdoms in writer-director Jean-Luc Godard's reflection on Europe, war, culture and Middle East chaos. With Godard, Sarah Adler, Nade Dieu and Georges Aguilar. ''The Polar Express'' -- Director Robert Zemeckis' adaptation of Chris Van Allsberg's modern classic is something of a bipolar experience. There is wonder for us to cherish, courtesy of a spectacular visual sense. But there are also sequences of such exhausting, turbo-charged jeopardy that it seems like we've wandered into a Jerry Bruckheimer movie tailored to toddlers. Tom Hanks stars in five roles, including the young boy who gets to take a magical Christmas Eve train ride to the North Pole and that train's balding conductor. The film's performance capture technology that creates virtual characters in a computer-generated environment is striking, but the characters have a chilling, zombie-like aura. (1:37) G. ''Ray'' -- The story of Ray Charles, who was born dirt poor, went blind from glaucoma at age 7, then went on to a musical career that included 12 Grammys, 76 singles on the best-seller charts and more than 75 albums is presented as a proudly conventional film that combines irresistible music and a charismatic performance in a way that makes us not only forgive but actually almost relish how standard it is. Jamie Foxx does an uncanny job duplicating the singer's physical mannerisms, but his performance goes well beyond impersonation. Foxx takes this role and runs with it, emerging as a full-blown dramatic star. Director Taylor Hackford believes passionately in the value of the well-worn conventions of the script, which makes the film wholly entertaining despite its shortcomings. (2:32. PG-13 for depiction of drug addiction, sexuality and some thematic elements.) ''Saw'' -- The Jigsaw Killer in director James Wan and co-writer and star Leigh Whannell's film hates people who don't fully appreciate life. So he plucks them from their routine, sticks them in a painstakingly engineered death-trap and forces them to mutilate themselves or others to survive. His methods are undeniably grisly, but his concept isn't quite nailed down. Wan and Whannell's psycho suffers so much anxiety of influence (Dario Argento, David Lynch and David Fincher are quoted obsessively and indiscriminately) that his game is a hybrid mess. The film is so full of twists it ends up getting snarled. Cary Elwes, Danny Glover, Monica Potter, Michael Emerson, Tobin Bell and Leigh Whannell star. (1:40. R for strong grisly violence and language.) ''Seed of Chucky'' -- A chintzy-looking gore-bore in which Jennifer Tilly plays herself, voicing a new Chucky movie, in which she again voices his wife Tiffany. A ventriloquist's dummy that seems to have a life of its own concludes that it is the spawn of Chucky (voice of Brad Dourif) and Tiffany and winds up bringing alive the animatronic dolls his parents have become. A torrent of slaughter and bloodshed swiftly follows but little else. With Redman, John Waters. (1:27 R for strong horror violence/gore, sexual content, and language.) ''Shall We Dance?'' -- The wryly delightful 1997 Japanese film has been deftly transposed to Chicago, where an attorney (Richard Gere), beginning to chafe at his enviable yet routine existence, is lured into taking weekly ballroom dancing lessons when he notices an instructor (Jennifer Lopez) staring pensively out a dance studio window. Despite a Hollywood-sleek surface, ''Shall We Dance?'' remains true to the original's romantic spirit. With Susan Sarandon, Stanley Tucci, Lisa Ann Walter. (1:45. PG-13 for some sexual references and brief language.) ''Shark Tale'' -- This underwater fish tale does not have as much invigorating freshness as audiences have come to expect in computer animation. Not that the film doesn't try hard, especially in the look of the visually lively undersea Manhattan setting. Some of the biggest stars in the business (Will Smith, Renee Zellweger, Jack Black, Robert De Niro and Angelina Jolie) tackle this story of the unlikely friendship between two undersea dwellers unhappy with their stations in life, but it's composed of too many standard components. It doesn't have the kind of effortless sophistication that marked ''Finding Nemo'' at its best. (1:30. PG for some mild language and crude humor.) ''Sideways'' -- Director Alexander Payne turns seven days with scoundrels Miles and Jack (Paul Giamatti and Thomas Haden Church) into a completely satisfying movie that quietly, gently blows you away. Exactly written, directed with a surgeon's precision and transcendently acted, the film brings emotional reality to a consistently amusing character comedy, making it something to be cherished. Giamatti plays an eighth-grade English teacher taking his soon-to-be-married actor friend (Church) out for a trip to the area just north of Santa Barbara, intent on indulging in fine dining, great scenery, unforgettable golf and wine. Lots and lots of wine. Inevitably, romantic complications insinuate themselves into this jaunt. Giamatti and Church, along with Virginia Madsen and Sandra Oh as the women who enter their lives, have never given the kind of rich enduring performance they do here. (2:04. R for language, some strong sexual content and nudity.) ''The SpongeBob SquarePants Movie'' -- The quirky residents of Bikini Bottom now have a motion picture to call their own, and that is pretty much a good thing. SpongeBob's world is better suited to the comfy confines of TV than the more demanding environs of the big screen, but the experience is a breath of playful good humor anyway. The plot centers on SpongeBob's dreams of being named manager of Krab 2, a branch of the popular fast food restaurant, the Krusty Krab, and the schemes of Plankton, owner of the rival restaurant, the Chum Bucket. The film balances the TV show's voice talent (including Tom Kenny as SpongeBob) with celebrity names (Alec Baldwin plays a hit man named Dennis). Its instinctive, unstoppable cheerfulness can be something of a tonic if you're in the mood. Directed by Stephen Hillenburg. (1:39) PG for some mild crude humor. ''This Girl's Life'' -- An international porn star ponders her life. Juiette Marquis, James Woods, Michael Rapaport, Rosario Dawson and Isaiah Washington star. Written and directed by Ash. End adv sun dec 5
The German federal police, the BKA, was once famous for its relentless, coolly efficient pursuit of terrorists. Hundreds of BKA agents eliminated the first three generations of the Red Army Faction, a terrorist organization that killed scores of politicians and civilians in the 1970s and 1980s. Then the hunt was on for the fourth generation. Hundreds of millions of dollars were invested; again, legions of agents were dispatched.
But finally, in 1997, BKA experts admitted there may never have been a fourth-generation Red Army Faction. The experts had been hunting a phantom. Lone-wolf terrorists or isolated veterans had committed the few, random attacks that occurred.
It was a striking example of how a police force -- and a whole nation -- fell for propaganda from the terrorists, which was pumped up by almost obsessive media hype. Looking at the current reporting on al-Qaida, the question is: Is history repeating itself?
This month, at the BKA's annual conference, Germany's top investigators and international experts discussed what they had discovered since Sept. 11, 2001, about al-Qaida and the international Islamist terrorist network. The main thing they have learned is that there is less than meets the eye.
Yes, al-Qaida was once centralized, structured and powerful, but that was before the United States pulverized its camps and leadership in Afghanistan.
In other words, this battle in the war on terrorism might already be over. It's as an ex-CIA agent once said: ''I quit the agency at the end of the Cold War because I was tired of politicians making me describe the Soviet Union as a 20-foot giant -- when it was really only a dwarf.''
For more than three years, al-Qaida has been described by investigators, academics and self-styled experts as an almost uncontrollable menace. It was said to work closely with organized crime, to have access to unlimited funds, to have hidden those funds in gold and diamonds, to be capable of moving its money with a sophisticated finance system to whatever country Osama bin Laden chose to attack next.
The media tended to believe the worst and amplify it. The general idea was that a perfect crime such as the 9/11 attacks on the World Trade Center and the Pentagon needed a perfect organization behind it. Most of the descriptions of al-Qaida proved more legend than fact.
Al-Qaida never had a ''macro-financing'' structure, said Judge Jean-Louis Bruguiere, the dean of Europe's anti-terrorism investigators. In fact, analyzing the clusters of activists, he found that there were never large flows of external money financing any attack. In nearly a decade of searching, all Bruguiere was able to find was ''micro-financing'' activists raising the little money they needed to survive and commit their crimes through credit card or debit card fraud. They turned out to be petty thieves, not grand gangsters.
The terrorists did not need a lot of money to finance the attacks in Madrid, Bali and Tunisia. ''They could carry around the money they needed in cash,'' said Nikos Passas of Northeastern University in Boston.
There is, according to Passas, no evidence that al-Qaida ever invested in the gold market or in African diamonds. It never moved money around the world through the traditional and untraceable informal money transfer systems known as hawalas. It used Western Union.
That didn't stop the United Nations and the United States from harnessing the hawalas with rigid controls, which hurt the hundreds of small businesses in the United States, the Middle East and Pakistan that rely on them.
Meanwhile, authorities pay little or no attention to much simpler ways to transfer money globally. PayPal, for example, which has become the de facto international bank of the Internet, is open to anyone with a credit card.
All too often investigators have fallen for myths -- many times fed by the terrorists themselves. The BKA has constructed profiles of 60 radical Islamists. ''There was no pattern, no model ... every activist had individual motives to become radical,'' a German investigator said.
But being less structured doesn't mean the terrorists are less dangerous or easier to stop. Quite the contrary. The smaller the fish, the tighter the net needed to catch it. ''We take every case seriously now precisely because there is no pattern,'' one German investigator said.
Investigators admit that 31/2 years after 9/11, they know next to nothing about the motives of Islamic terrorists. Knowing so little means they have few means to predict -- or prevent -- future acts.
The multifaceted Snoop Dogg has myriad projects going at one time. Here's what's new in his world:
-- ''R&G (Rhythm & Gangsta): The Masterpiece'' released last month.
-- Debut of satellite-radio show ''Welcome to Da Church With Bigg Snoop Dogg.''
-- T-Mobile commercial.
-- Launch of Doggy Biscuitz sneaker line.
-- Premiere of ''VH1 Driven'' installment.
-- Hosts MTV2's ''Sucker Free Sunday.''
Need for Speed video game by Electronic Arts featuring Snoop remix of the Doors classic ''Riders on the Storm.''
-- New Snoop cellphone ring-back tones by Zingy.
-- Debut of ''Let's Get Blown'' video.
-- Hosting Spike TV Video Game Awards Dec. 14.
-- Debut of special Snoop WRFF bike available online for Christmas.
-- Launch of clothing line next year.
-- Developing Fear and Respect urban video game with director John Singleton.
-- Developing Snoop Youth Football League for next year.
-- Monthlong U.S. and European tour to promote ''R&G.''
-- Developing animated and reality series and feature films.
Letters from readers for this column have taught me that many of you have dreams of striking it rich.
This fantasy usually revolves around selling an antique -- whether inherited or bought for practically naught -- for a fortune . As an appraiser I am constantly subduing clients' dreams of auctioning a so-called Renoir painting or a dubious Tiffany stained glass lamp.
This antiques-pie-in-the-sky story happens occasionally, so here is a gleeful tale I want to share with you.
On Nov. 19, Skinner Auction of Boston sold a painting by American artist Fitz Hugh Lane (1804-1865) for $5.5 million. This sale established a record for the Gloucester, Mass., artist and is the most valuable artwork sold in New England. The previous high price for a Lane picture had been $4 million.
The 1853 oil on canvas, entitled "Manchester Harbor," 24 inches by 36 inches in original gold frame, had a pre-auction estimate of $650,000 to $850,000. Those figures are what Skinner experts thought the painting would fetch based upon previous sales of comparable paintings by Lane. What added greatly to the desirability of the marine scene was it had never been sold publicly.
It also possessed quite an ancestry.
A West Coast family descenced from the first owner had consigned the painting. Its stellar history detailed that Thomas J. Herring (1825-1895) of Boston, who was married to Winifred Bunker Folger (1830-1868), was the original owner. She was a descendant of Peter Folger, the grandfather of Benjamin Franklin. Adding even more appeal to its pedigree was the fact that the canvas had been exhibited at the 30th Exhibition of Paintings and Statuary at the Athenaeum Gallery in Boston. A photocopy of the catalog for the 1857 exposition listing the work was included with the painting.
Another strong selling point was that much information about Fitz Hugh Lane was available. The artist spent much of his youth sketching the Cape Ann shore, north of Boston. He apprenticed in the early 1830s with William S. Pendleton, the Boston printing firm specializing in countryside views.
By the 1840s, Lane decided to concentrate on painting. His works until the early 1850s reflected earlier graphics training along with the influence of the marine artists. In "Manchester Harbor," the artist detailed figures, piers and land in the foreground while accentuating the vast view. The low placement of the horizon line allowed the artist to depict an expansive sky. Lane captured the warm hues of sunrise as reflected in the calm waters, which is called Luminism.
Now here is the most enticing part of this antiques story; a member of the trade purchased the $5.5 million painting. This is a fancy way of saying a dealer may resell the picture to a collector or perhaps even to a museum.
Possibly the Fitz Hugh Lane painting sold at auction may establish a record retail/gallery price when put on the market for a second time. How interesting to see if other works by Fitz Hugh Lane, long hidden in attics or basements, will surface creating additional antiques fantasies.
Here is an inquiry from a reader who may be on the verge of an antiques adventure.
QUESTION: Nine months ago I inherited a silver cuspidor that was probably manufactured around 1843 in France or Portugal and at one time it belonged to Marie Antoinette (so I have been told). Assuming that is the truth, I could have a very valuable antique in my possession. But I need to have some kind of verification. I have asked everyone I could find in the antique silver business including those in the "Antique Roadshow" organization without success.
If you know what steps I must take to accomplish this need please inform me. If you cannot help me but you know someone who can, please advise me. -- George, Stone Mountain, Ga.
ANSWER: Thanks for writing. I hope your silver cuspidor is worth money, but first I must be honest with you. If it had been made in 1843 it could not have belonged to Marie Antoinette. French revolutionaries executed the queen in 1793.
The marks you sent me are rather difficult to decipher without actually seeing them. Why don't you contact the appropriate curator at the High Museum of Art in Atlanta to authenticate marks etc? Always remember that museum curators do not do appraisals but gladly verify information such age, quality and other pertinent information. If you get encouraging news, why don't you contact the capable folks at Skinner in Boston at 617-350-5400.
Frank Loomis IV is the author of new book "Secrets to Affordable Antiques" by Krause Publications. If you have any antique questions, write to him at Middletown Journal, Attn: Frank Loomis IV, First and Broad Street, Middletown, Ohio, 45044 or e-mail RMcCrabbcoxohio.com.
This is how the government works these days.
After the U.S. Food and Drug Administration discovered unsanitary conditions at a plant producing flu vaccine for the U.S. market, the agency refused to order a cleanup, nor did it inspect the plant to ensure that a cleanup was actually carried out. Instead, the FDA allowed the plant to "comply voluntarily." The vaccine later produced by the plant -- 50 million doses, or half our expected supply -- was so contaminated it was unusable.
The FDA also relies on "voluntary compliance" in asking drug companies to report evidence that their products might be harmful, and to withdraw drugs they believe might cause problems. Tragically, when the pharmaceutical giant Merck began to see evidence that its highly profitable arthritis drug Vioxx ($2.5 billion in sales in 2003) might be causing widespread heart problems, it ignored those findings. Dr. David Graham, associate director at the FDA's Office of Drug Safety, recently told Congress that by the time Merck withdrew the drug, Vioxx may have caused as many as 55,000 fatal heart attacks, or 18 times the death toll of the attacks of Sept. 11.
That behavior is hardly unique. The Environmental Protection Agency, the Occupational Health and Safety Administration and every other federal agency charged with protecting consumers, patients, workers and customers have also become far less aggressive in enforcing the law.
For example, when the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration discovered this summer that the suspension system of the Saturn Vue collapsed during rollover testing, the NHTSA did not require a recall. Instead, by asking Saturn to conduct a voluntary "service campaign," NHTSA allowed the company to continue selling unrepaired Vues. It didn't even require Saturn dealers to notify potential buyers that the problem existed.
And then, of course, there's New York Attorney General Eliot Spitzer, who continues to prosecute startling cases of systemic white-collar crime on Wall Street and elsewhere, crimes that federal authorities found beneath their notice. Spitzer has been accused by some of pursuing the cases to advance his political career, and that may be true. It is also true, however, that every charge brought by Spitzer has proved accurate. He hasn't had to reach to find serious cases that federal authorities ignored; he has simply picked the low-hanging fruit.
What we're witnessing, it seems, is the culmination of a conscious, long-term effort by business and its conservative allies to emasculate government protection of its citizens. Except in cases where they're pressured into it by publicity, federal agencies rarely enforce the law any longer. And without fear of enforcement, respect for the rules begins to erode and greed takes over. "Voluntary compliance" is a useful concept, but only when companies know that it's not really voluntary, and that they'll get punished if they get caught cheating.
The sole remaining restraint on corporate misbehavior may be the fear that unless businesses meet their public responsibilities, they may be dragged into court and told to justify their behavior to a jury. Merck, for example, now faces class-action lawsuits filed by Vioxx users that could cost the company hundreds of millions of dollars, a sobering reality that no doubt makes other drug companies a little leery about pushing the envelope.
However, even that last bit of protection is now under attack by the so-called "tort reform" movement, which seeks to dramatically limit the financial penalties that juries can impose in cases of gross corporate misconduct or negligence. Corporate America has made passage of those bills its highest priority at the state and federal levels. With government agencies already defanged, removing the danger of large court awards would leave private citizens with almost no recourse.
But that seems to be where we're headed.
Jay Bookman is deputy editorial page editor of The Atlanta Journal-Constitution.
The Dalai Lama Wednesday left Russia's Buddhist region of Kalmykia after a three-day visit that prompted sharp criticism from China, officials in a Buddhist monastery near Kalmykia's capital Elista said.
The 69-year-old spiritual leader of Tibet left from an airport outside Elista for the flight back to New Delhi, officials said.
It was the Dalai Lama's first trip to the sleepy southern province since 1992, when he made a tour of Russia's Buddhist regions that also included Buryatia and Tyva in Siberia.
Kalmykia's flamboyant leader  and chess fanatic Kirsan Ilyumzhinov has held regular visits with the spiritual leader and has tirelessly campaigned for his visit to Russia.
The Dalai Lama has not been allowed onto Russian territory since 1996, when he passed through on his way to Mongolia, because of pressure from China.
China, which has ruled Tibet since 1951, regularly protests over the frequent travels of the Dalai Lama, whom it accuses of being a separatist.
Former executives of Japan's UFJ Bank were arrested Wednesday on suspicion they tried to hide the true extent of the bank's bad loans position and lied to government investigators.
Former UFJ Bank vice-president Kazuyoshi Okazaki, 56, and managing directors Sen Hayakawa, 55, and Masayuki Inaba, 51, were arrested by Tokyo district prosecutors who alleged they had either hid, destroyed or altered documents related to hard-to-recover loans at the bank.
The bank has already admitted to wrongdoing and punished the employees involved in obstructing a probe begun last year.
In 2003, the three suspects removed crucial documents, hiding them in boxes at other locations or on a computer server not used by the bank's Tokyo office, the Tokyo District Prosecutors Office said.
"They made false statements during questioning by inspectors and evaded the inspection," it said in a statement.
The arrests follow criminal complaints filed in October by the Financial Services Agency against UFJ Bank on the grounds that its officials had tried to hide the true extent of its bad debt position from government inspectors.
The financial watchdog said the conduct of UFJ Bank, Japan's fourth-largest banking group, had been both "vicious" and "serious" in obstructing efforts to investigate its bad loans problem.
UFJ Holdings plans to merge with second-ranked Mitsubishi Tokyo Financial Group to create the world's biggest bank by October 2005.
Danish Foreign Minister Per Stig Moeller expressed Denmark's concern over violent human rights abuses in Darfur when meeting with Sudanese Foreign Minister Mustafa Ismail, the Ritzau news bureau reported on Wednesday.
Per Stig Moeller used the meeting on Tuesday in Khartoum to demand the prosecution of those responsible for reported mass killings, rapes and other human rights abuses in Sudan's Darfur region.
"Denmark is concerned about the situation," Moeller said, adding that the country would await the results of a UN commission report on Darfur in January.
Per Stig Moeller's visit to Sudan with Defense Minister Soeren Gade is part of government preparations to assume a temporary seat in the UN Security Council, which has passed several resolutions on the situation in Sudan and its troubled province of Darfur.
"It's not important whether what's going on in Darfur is genocide. What's important is stopping these attacks and bringing those responsible to justice," said Moeller, who pledged that Denmark would provide soldiers if a UN response force is deployed to Sudan on a peacekeeping mission.
The Israeli parliament voted Wednesday against Prime Minister Ariel Sharon government's 2005 budget, plunging the ruling coalition into turmoil.
The budget, which envisaged welfare spending and social program cuts, was killed on its first reading by a 69-43 vote among the 120-seat Knesset (parliament).
Under Israel's law, if a state budget could not pass by the end of March, early elections should be held to select a new government.
The vote also raised the spectre of a stalled disengagement plan Sharon has been spearheaded.
After the vote, a source in Sharon's office said the prime minister would sack the five ministers in the Shinui party, a senior coalition partner in Sharon's government, because the Shinui party voted against the budget.
Sharon said Tuesday that he would tap the Labour party if Shinui ministers vote against the budget.
"We will not agree to any party imposing its views against the will of the public," Sharon said at the Likud Knesset faction session.
Sharon's comments came following a threat by Shinui to vote against the budget.
Shinui made the threat Sunday following an agreement between Sharon's office and the ultra-Orthodox United Torah Judaism (UTJ), under which UTJ will back the budget in return for financial recompensation for its educational institutions.
Shinui chairman Yosef Lapid, who also holds the portfolio of Justice Minister, told Sharon that his party will not support the budget if the ultra-Orthodox party receives financial recompensation for its support to the budget.
Following are the results of English League Cup quarter-final soccer matches played on Wednesday (II denotes team from second division of English soccer): Manchester United beat Arsenal 1-0 Tottenham Hotspur tied Liverpool 1-1 after extra time (90 minutes: 0-0. Liverpool won 4-3 on penalties) Played on Tuesday: Chelsea bt Fulham 2-1 Watford (II) bt Portsmouth 3-0
Year after year, Ken Kellerhals resolved to lose weight. Year after year, his candy factory did him in.
Bissinger's Handcrafted Chocolatier makes hundreds of confections in chilly, bare-floored kitchens here. Workers stir copper pots of caramel with long wooden spoons, decorate creams and truffles and toffees by hand, and brush each milk-chocolate bunny to a gloss before wrapping it in foil.
When buying the company a decade ago, Kellerhals promised his wife he'd eat just one chocolate a day. The reality? ''Let's just say, I sampled a lot more than I should have,'' he said.
As 2005 approached, Kellerhals once again resolved to diet. But he wanted to do it without giving up the best his factory had to offer.
And so Spa Chocolates were born.
''Shed your guilt,'' the slim yellow box urges. ''Treat yourself to good health.''
Inside are seven chocolates, one for each day of the week, each accompanied by an upbeat promise: The almonds in Wednesday's dark chocolate acorn might stave off heart disease. The antioxidants in Thursday's sugar-free cherry cordial will keep you looking young.
Each ingredient has been chosen by a dietitian, the package assures, ''to give you a week's worth of health benefits and enjoyment.''
The claims astound -- and distress -- some nutrition experts. True, blueberries are packed with antioxidants, but there aren't nearly enough folded into Monday's dark chocolate cup to count as a single serving of fruit, much less improve anyone's health.
''Candy is candy,'' says Marion Nestle, a professor of nutrition at New York University.
But Kellerhals is undaunted. And he has the force of a trend behind him.
Supermarkets these days are full of enriched and fortified products, known in the industry as ''functional foods.'' Certain brands of margarine, popcorn and even orange juice promise to lower cholesterol. Cereals, although studded with marshmallows, contain whole grains to stave off cancer. Eggs are boosted with omega-3 fatty acids to improve heart health.
Sales of such products in the United States topped $10 billion last year, according to the market research company Mintel International. Bakery and cereal products are the top sellers, by far. But sweets and treats are coming on fast. In the last five years, manufacturers have introduced 56 snack foods and 42 confections marketed primarily for their health benefits.
Too worn out to work through the evening? Snickers offers up a Chewy Chocolate Peanut Marathon bar, fortified with 16 vitamins and minerals plus soy protein for a long-lasting energy boost.
Feeling your years, and hating it? Chug a few cans of b-well, a carbonated soda spiked with grape-seed extract that Hansen's promises will help you fight off aging. Or try a chocolate Instant Bliss Beauty Bar, from Ecco Bella; it's supposed to lift your spirits and make your skin look radiant, thanks to antioxidants derived from cranberries, marigolds and algae.
And how's this for chocoholic heaven: Masterfoods USA has developed a candy bar, called CocoaVia, that it says can lower your cholesterol and improve your blood pressure. But it works best if you eat two a day, every day. Imagine feeling guilty for skipping a snack.
The U.S. Food and Drug Administration regulates only nutritional claims that draw an explicit connection between a particular product and a specific disease. More general claims that an ingredient is healthful -- or that it will curb the appetite or soften skin or make you look younger -- are not subject to FDA approval.
That loophole troubles some nutritionists, who fear that families will mistake fortified junk food for good nutrition.
''It's the whole foods that really make you healthy -- the fruits and vegetables and whole grains,'' said Roberta Anding, a dietitian based in Houston.
As for ''healthful'' candy? It's fine once in a while -- if you really enjoy it, Anding said. But if you prefer a gooey caramel cream, make that your once-a-week indulgence. Most confections have so few health benefits that, ''You might as well go with your absolute favorite instead, as long as you eat just a small amount,'' she said.
Such advice does not seem likely to slow the torrent of functional food products.
Nearly half of all women, and one in four men, are dieting at any given time. Candymakers don't want to lose their business. ''They're looking at ways they can allow consumers to have their indulgences but also get a health benefit,'' said Stephanie Childs, a spokeswoman for the Grocery Manufacturers of America.
(Begin optional trim)
Or, as Kellerhals put it: ''I wanted to have my cake and eat it, too. Only, in this case, it was my candy.''
Kellerhals, 47, grew up with a box of Bissinger's on the table each Christmas -- a tradition for many St. Louis families. In 1995, after a career in investment banking, he bought the company with other investors. Since then, he has expanded sales.
He made the doldrums of July more profitable than Valentine's Day by joining forces with a farmer who grows enormous raspberries, bigger than cherries. Flown to the candy factory the day they're picked, the berries are hand-dunked in chocolate -- then sold at $34 a pound.
Kellerhals also wooed the corporate market, producing white-chocolate lollipops etched with business logos. He recently hired a chief chocolatier, Terry Wakefield, to invent flavors for the 300-year-old company, such as a Champagne Truffle that fizzes in the mouth.
(End optional trim)
Bissinger's annual sales have tripled, to more than $6 million, in the past decade.
But along the way, Kellerhals put on some pounds -- not just from too much candy, although he does love the vanilla caramels, but also from too much fast food and too little exercise.
He tried just about every fad diet that came along but was easily discouraged. ''I'd eat one piece of chocolate and then figure, `Oh, I've blown it,''' and keep munching away, he said.
Then last fall, Kellerhals had a brainstorm.
He would invent a product that would allow him a daily chocolate fix, but in a carefully moderated dose. He would forgo the empty -- although oh-so-luscious -- calories of buttery creams and sugary caramels. Instead, he'd fill his chocolates with fruits and nuts to sneak in a little extra nutrition.
Dietitian Connie Diekman drew up a list of wholesome ingredients, from apples to turnips. Then company chocolatier Terry Wakefield went to work.
The seven recipes he came up with include tried-and-true confections such as a dried apricot (rich in beta carotene for healthy eyes) coated in dark chocolate (containing flavonol for healthy blood vessels). A few were new to Bissinger's: The dark chocolate cup studded with whole blueberries (for antioxidants) impresses many customers as the most flavorful and original in the box.
The chocolates, which hit the market in mid-October, average 54 calories and 2.7 grams of fat apiece. Kellerhals is quick to emphasize that they're not diet foods: ''We've never said, `Eat these and you'll lose weight,''' he said.
''There's no magic here. Eating a few blueberries is not going to make you healthy,'' Diekman added. ''What we're saying is if you're going to have a treat, why not a treat with healthy ingredients?''
Customer Pat Boerner has a ready answer: because that's not the point of treats.
When she wants to indulge, she wants to indulge. ''If I'm going to eat chocolate, I'd just as soon have it be all chocolate,'' she said, pondering the selection at a Bissinger's store the other day.
''Chocolate is fine just the way it is,'' Connie Kroemung agreed. ''Healthy chocolate is an oxymoron.''
''A marketing ploy,'' said Nancy Browning, an unabashed chocoholic.
Despite such detractors, Kellerhals is ramping up production, anticipating a surge in demand from New Year's dieters. He has sold more than 3,500 boxes, at $15.95 apiece. Most are sold online or by catalog, although a woman recently demanded 40 boxes at once -- to take her through bikini season, apparently -- from the Bissinger's counter in a St. Louis mall.
(Begin optional trim)
In Tampa, Fla., plastic surgeon Dr. Bruce Landon received a box as a promotion for New Beauty magazine. He tasted a chocolate and wasn't too impressed -- ''I ate it on the fly, so I don't even remember if I liked it'' -- but he loved the concept so much, he plans to give them to his patients.
''Sending a big box of chocolates to a liposuction patient is not the right thing to do. This is a better thank you,'' he said.
Spa owner Peggy Mitchusson also promotes the collection to clients; she eats them herself as well, finding that the one-a-day format helps prevent bingeing. (although she admits sometimes it's difficult to wait for Sunday to enjoy the chocolate apricot, her favorite.)
''I could easily eat the whole box right now,'' said Mitchusson, who owns three Face & Body spas in suburban St. Louis. ''But if someone is telling me, `No, this is the one you're supposed to have on Monday,' that helps.''
(End optional trim)
Kellerhals started a harsh new diet this fall: Under medical supervision, he eats just 1,600 calories a day. That means mostly vegetables and protein shakes. But he saves 55 precious calories a day for his Spa Chocolate.
He eats it in the evening, slowly, savoring every morsel. He still is tempted by the heaps of chocolate at the factory -- the very air in his office smells fattening -- but he says it helps to remind himself that he can dip into the yellow box when he gets home.
''The holidays were tough,'' he said. ''I kind of wanted to eat Thursday's and Friday's chocolates together. But I didn't.''
Kellerhals has lost 44 pounds so far. And he and Wakefield are toying with ideas for a second spa line. This time they'd like to see if they could sneak in some vegetables -- maybe a chunk of dense carrot cake coated in chocolate.
Or maybe something even bolder, to prove once and for all that healthful chocolate is not a contradiction in terms.
''We could half-dip an asparagus spear in chocolate,'' Kellerhals suggested
''You know,'' Wakefield said, mulling it over, ''that wouldn't taste half-bad.''
The packing boxes scattered throughout Room 454 are filling with books, videos, clothes and gifts -- the amazing amount of things that piled up during eight months at the hotel. They will be shipped home first.
A few days later, Trish Autery will gather her suitcases, take some tissues to dry her tears and walk out the door that has a tiny American flag hung near its number.
And that will leave just Marine Lance Cpl. Ryan Autery, 20, the son she has cared for all these months, to pack what remains, close the door for the final time and catch a plane home, from Washington to Nashville.
His luggage will contain an artificial left arm -- a spare to accompany the one with which his body and mind have made peace here.
Nobody ever wants to stay at Mologne House.
Soldiers who escape dying in battle by the narrowest of margins find their way here, to this hotel on the grounds of Walter Reed Army Medical Center in Northwest Washington.
The lobby, with illuminated chandeliers and oriental carpet, can be crowded with amputees. Peepholes in most room doors are at wheelchair level. And the snazzy maroon and gray hotel shuttle goes to the hospital around the corner, not the airport.
Mologne House is a place where grievous wounds can heal, where awful recollections can be put in some context and where residents prepare to go back into the world physically and psychologically changed.
Once Autery departs, Room 454, with cream-colored wallpaper, blue and yellow bedspreads and a view of the telecom towers nearby, will be readied for its next guest. More than 90 percent of the 199 rooms are occupied by soldiers and Marines wounded in Iraq or Afghanistan and members of their families.
In the end, because everyone is there for the same reason, checking out of Mologne House can be emotional.
''It's sad,'' Trish Autery, 47, said. ''I've cried many a time watching (other people) leave. But you're so happy for them.... You're ecstatic that they're going, but you may not see them again.''
Soon, it will be the Auterys walking out the lobby doors, leaving behind the hell of their past 11 months, and others waving goodbye.
Ryan Autery's calamity was scarcely noted when it happened last August.
The headline was: ''Marine injured in bomb explosion that claimed life of another.''
The 236-word, nine-paragraph Associated Press report out of Murfreesboro, Tenn., announced that the then-19-year-old from LaVergne, near Nashville, ''lost a limb'' when his Humvee hit a land mine in Najaf, Iraq. Another Tennessee Marine, Cpl. Brad P. McCormick, 23, had been killed, the report said.
Autery doesn't like to talk about that day. Asked what he remembers, he replies: ''Everything.'' But it's depressing, he said. ''A very touchy subject.'' He's been trying to forget it, though he has McCormick's surname tattooed above the cross on his right arm.
''Some people have the ability to block out traumatic events,'' he said. ''I, apparently, do not have that ability.''
The attack happened Aug. 19 in Anbar province, ''out in the middle of ... nowhere.'' He had just checked his watch. It was 11:15 a.m.
A Marine rifleman right out of high school, Autery was in the back of an open Humvee when it was rocked by an explosion. The blast shredded whose left arm was amputated just below the elbow at a combat support hospital nearby. He had been in Iraq five months.
He was taken to a hospital in Baghdad, then to one in Germany, then to the National Naval Medical Center in Bethesda, Md., then to Walter Reed for its amputee rehabilitation program.
The wounded are sent to Mologne House when they are well enough to leave the hospital, said general manager Peter A. Anderson, but still need help and treatment for their injuries.
Except for a few more hospital stays and a couple of excursions, Ryan Autery has been there the whole time.
Autery's mother and father, Rick, who served in the Marines in the 1970s, arrived the day their son was flown to Bethesda, and his mother has been with him almost nonstop since. In the hotel room, she slept across the night table from him, in the bed nearest the door, while he bunked nearer the TV set.
Autery's recovery did not go smoothly. The amputation was complicated to treat. One operation took 10 hours. At another point, a skin graft failed, and he had to have his stump sutured to his side to promote a new graft. He also suffered a bacterial infection and then a reaction to antibiotics, his mother said.
In addition, ''he was very emotionally damaged,'' his mother said during an interview in the Mologne House dining room last week. ''He'd come down here for formation, go to the hospital, do his therapy, come straight back here around lunchtime and you wouldn't see him the rest of the day. He'd lock himself in that room.
''So I didn't feel like I could leave him at that time,'' she said.
Weeks passed, then months. Out the window of 454, mother and son watched fall and winter come and go. Spring arrived, then summer again. ''We have officially been through leaf changes, blizzards and heat waves and some pretty hellacious thunderstorms,'' he said.
In November, his father went back to his job at a Nissan plant in Tennessee. Trish lost her job and started taking college accounting courses online, doing homework with a laptop computer on her bed, beneath a framed drawing of the Lincoln Memorial. Ryan turned 20 in December.
As time went by, Room 454 got messy. The two argued over the TV. He loved the safety of the Cartoon Network, where there was little to trigger bad memories. ''I didn't want to watch that 24 hours a day,'' she said.
''Thank God we get along,'' she said. He was ''the baby'' of her three children. ''She and I have always been close,'' he said. He was glad to have her near.
''I basically needed her here,'' he said. ''I wanted to be by myself, so I could learn to live by myself. But at the same time, I would get really lonely.... Also, in the beginning, having to deal with a lot of the emotional aspects of what happened to me, it was a big help having her here because I had a shoulder to cry on and somebody to talk to.''
And the hotel was a godsend, with the Marine Corps paying the bills, she said. ''If I had to worry about where I was going to be in relation to him, I don't think I could handle that.''
In the spring, he got his first artificial arm: He ordered one done up in Marine Corps camouflage with a Purple Heart badge attached. ''They can pretty much do whatever you want,'' he said.
He learned to tie his shoes with his right hand and his left hook. And he adopted the grim Mologne House humor. ''You lost a limb,'' he said. ''What are you going to do? It ain't going to grow back.''
He and his fellow amputees would joke and have T-shirts made with outrageous slogans about their injuries. ''If you can find humor in your own tragedy, then you're definitely a lot better off,'' he said.
As he came out of his shell, he and his mother began visiting newer hotel guests to reassure them that everything would be all right.
''You sit there and cry with them,'' Trish Autery said. She would tell others: `It'll be okay. He's going to come through it. You'll come through it and probably be in a better place when you get to the other side.' ''
The Auterys have almost reached the other side. ''I'm perfectly fine,'' Ryan Autery said, ''with the exception of carrying around a big hook.... I can run, swim, jump, play, whatever, I can still do it.'' He joked: ''I swim in circles, though.''
And it is time to go. He hopes to leave a week or so after his mother. He will return to his parents' home and has thought about going back to school to become a history teacher. Mainly, he said, he needs to get home and be back around civilians.
As for the past year, he said he would do it all again, except for one thing. ''Knowing what I know now.... I would just change what happened Aug. 19.''
One day last week, he flopped on his bed in Room 454 beneath a drawing of the Capitol framed on the wall. The floor was cluttered with jeans, comic books, boxes and his spare, battery-powered artificial arm. His mother sat on her bed, beside a white teddy bear, a laptop and an open accounting book and prepared him a ready-to-eat tuna fish snack. He reminded her to include the relish.
''I like this place,'' he said, yawning as he lay on his back. ''It's a nice place. It's beautiful. But I will not be upset at all about leaving.... I know when I check out of this room my next stop is my actual room at home.''
His mother agreed. She will definitely miss the people of Mologne House, she said. ''But not the place.''
It has barely rained for a year, the scant corn harvest of six months ago is long exhausted and the regional hospital here is again filling with near-starving children -- 18 admissions in August, 30 in September, 23 by mid-October.
And what people here routinely call the hunger season -- the season with no corn -- has barely begun.
"We used to have six, seven children in the unit," said Emily Sarima, the district nursing officer. "We expect the number to increase by December, because that's when the hunger is critical."
Malawi is the epicenter of Africa's second hunger crisis in five months, and the second in which the developed world has responded with painful slowness.
Drought is only the surface explanation for why millions of Malawians and other southern Africans are hungry. The real reason is poverty, aggravated by regional shortages and even Hurricane Katrina, which have helped drive up the price of corn, the regional staple, to more than double last year's.
As a result, more than 4.6 million of Malawi's 12 million citizens need donated food to fend off malnutrition until the next harvest begins in April. In Zimbabwe, at least 4 million more need emergency food aid. Zambia's government has issued an urgent appeal for food, saying 1.7 million are hungry; 850,000 need food in Mozambique, 500,000 in Lesotho and at least 300,000 in Swaziland.
The World Food Program, which will feed most of the needy, has asked the developed world for $400 million toward that goal. It remains $165 million short. The U.S. contribution, $48 million of corn bought from American farmers, will not arrive until late this year.
Much like July's crisis on southern Niger's narrow band of grasslands, the food shortage in southern Africa is taking its toll. Growing malnutrition has led to scattered reports of disease-related deaths among young children weakened by hunger.
That said, problems here are not yet as acute as they are in Niger, where thousands of malnourished children still flock to treatment centers, months after international aid began arriving.
This region's emergency, however, is far larger -- more than 12 million hungry people, versus 2.5 million in Niger. And if the death toll is likely not to be as high, the suffering here is no less real.
"I went to a village today in rural Zambia where there was a lady eating some kind of bark, in boiled water," Michael Huggins, the World Food Program's regional spokesman, said in a telephone interview. "In three years in southern Africa, I've heard a lot about that sort of thing. But I'd never seen it until today."
In Chikwawa, a district of about 400,000 in southern Malawi, half the population was already hungry in May, when the last harvest netted only about two-fifths of the nation's corn requirement. The British charity Oxfam estimated then that the district's needy were getting about 30 percent of their food requirements.
Six months later, many are calling this Malawi's worst hunger crisis since 1993, when drought destroyed nearly half of the corn crop. "At this point, most of the households in Malawi have run out of food, particularly in the south," Schuyler Thorup, the Malawi representative for Catholic Relief Services, said in a telephone interview. "They're having to rely exclusively on the market" for corn and other staple foods.
But few can afford to pay market prices. Just 500 miles south of Malawi, South Africa is sitting atop a surplus of five million metric tons of corn from this year's bumper harvest. But it is mostly out of reach for both Malawi's government and ordinary Malawians, 60 percent of whom survive on a dollar a day or less.
The same is true of most of Malawi's needy neighbors. War wrecked Mozambique's economy; socialism and plunging copper prices reduced Zambia to penury; Zimbabwe's economy collapsed after the government seized its richest farms, which were owned by whites.
In Malawi, 20 years of shifting political rule and economic policies have turned an already poor nation into a basket case. The AIDS pandemic -- the rate of infection is about 15 percent among all adults, but perhaps 25 percent in Chikwawa -- has cut down family breadwinners and left 900,000 children without one or both parents.
Most Malawians survive on plots of a couple of acres, often lacking even oxen for plowing. Irrigation is unheard of, leaving them dependent on good rains for survival.
Lately, rains have been spotty. There were severe hunger crises in 2002 and 2003, and this year's disaster was brought on when good rains in late 2004 dried up in 2005, just as the corn crop was ripening.
But even in good years, Malawians are incapable of feeding themselves. A recent report by the U.S. Agency for International Development said the nation "is now in a near constant state of food shortage, with persistently high levels of nutritional deprivation." Most Malawians cannot finance even a minimally adequate diet. Half of all children are stunted -- and 40 percent of those are severely stunted, the marker of deep, prolonged malnutrition.
Corn prices are at the root of this year's crisis. In the past, after most poor harvests, Malawians have bought cheap corn from traders in Mozambique, Zambia or Zimbabwe. This year's spotty rains caused a regional shortage, driving up prices in Malawi's markets. In mid-October last year, a kilogram of maize in Chikwawa, 2.2 pounds, cost about 13 cents. This year, it cost nearly 32 cents.
Even Hurricane Katrina has worsened matters. When the storm closed New Orleans to shipping, depriving Japan of its normal source of corn, the Japanese turned to South Africa, and in weeks the price of South African corn in Malawi jumped nearly 20 percent.
For months, the charities and international donor groups that effectively keep Malawi afloat operated on "Scenario 1," projecting that corn prices would remain affordable for most, and that the destitute would need only 272,000 metric tons of donated corn.
Donors have pledged almost that much. But now, with prices skyrocketing, the number of Malawians who cannot afford food is rising as well.
"Scenario 2" calls for finding 413,000 metric tons of donated food, at considerably higher prices.
Especially in the south, where harvests were the worst, high prices have brought growing malnutrition and sometimes unrest at sites where donors try to distribute too little food to too many desperate people.
(STORY CAN END HERE. OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS.)
A recent visit to the rehabilitation center at the regional hospital in Chikwawa City, a hub of about 10,000 people, made it clear why.
Camped on the sidewalk in the unit's square courtyard, 29-year-old Samson Hanock watched his 2-year-old son, Ben, while his wife, Ester, 20, cradled their newborn son, born at the unit in September. Ben was brought there from Mtobwe village, about two hours distant, with malnutrition and severe anemia.
Hanock is a gardener. Working six days a week, four weeks a month, brings a salary of $6.65, from which his employer deducts $5.85 to buy the Hanocks a 110-pound bag of corn meal.
Hanock spends the remaining 80 cents on sugar. "I bake some sweets that I ask my wife to sell," he said. "And with that, we get some money to buy soap and other things."
Across the courtyard, Severia Karunga looked after Precia Yaka, a somber 9-year-old orphan from Badueza, 90 minutes away by car, who had come to the unit in July with malnutrition, malaria, edema and, it turned out, tuberculosis.
Precia's father died four years ago. Her mother died at 21, a month after Precia arrived here. Karunga, Precia's aunt, now cares for Precia, her brother and her own seven children. She lives with her mother, who cares for her dead brother's two orphaned children.
"My husband is divorcing me because he isn't happy that I am caring for this child," she said, gesturing toward Precia. "He left last month."
Mother, daughter and 11 children, aged 6 to 18, get by on less than $50 a month. Most comes from the $9 weekly salary the mother draws from a charity's self-help program. The family has an eight-acre garden, "but this year," Karunga said, "I don't think I will be able to cultivate it, because I am spending all my time at this hospital."
Nationally, admissions of malnourished children to Malawi's 95 nutritional rehabilitation centers were up 15 percent in September from last year. Continuing increases are all but certain. Most children will spend a few weeks in rehabilitation, said Sarina, the district nursing officer. Then, healthy once more, they will be sent home.
And the cycle will begin anew.
"The problem," Sarina said, "is that when they go back, there's nothing to depend on."
Syria's foreign minister went before the U.N. Security Council and angrily rejected a resolution that had been passed unanimously just an hour before demanding that Damascus cooperate more fully with a probe into the assassination of Lebanon's former prime minister.
Diplomats expressed shock Monday at Farouk al-Sharaa's response to the resolution that threatened possible "further measures" if Syria doesn't start cooperating fully with the probe into the Feb. 14 bombing that killed Rafik Hariri and 20 others. They said his statement underscored Syria's isolation and highlighted the necessity for the warning to Damascus.
The resolution, co-sponsored by the United States, Britain and France, requires Syria to detain anyone whom U.N. investigators consider a suspect in Hariri's assassination. The investigators, led by German prosecutor Detlev Mehlis, had concluded that Hariri's slaying was unlikely to have occurred without senior Syrian approval.
It marked the culmination of council pressure on Syria to loosen its grip on Lebanon further in the months since Hariri's assassination prompted Damascus to withdraw its troops in April, after 29 years.
Mehlis, whose mandate has been extended to Dec. 15, has also been given new authority by the council, and could seek to use it immediately. He is likely to seek to question Syrian President Bashar Assad's brother-in-law, who has been implicated in the killing, and Assad's brother, who is also under suspicion.
"I would like to say that the message of the Security Council is particularly clear: Syria must cooperate with the Security Council otherwise there will be consequences," France's Foreign Minister Philippe Douste-Blazy said. "Justice shall prevail."
The three co-sponsors had to drop the explicit threat of economic sanctions to win unanimous support for the resolution at a rare meeting Mondy of the foreign ministers from most of the council's 15 members. Russia, China, Brazil and others had strongly opposed the sanctions threat.
Though the resolution was significantly weakened, al-Sharaa was defiant in his response to the council. He accused Mehlis' earlier report to the council of essentially convicting Syria before it had faced trial.
"It proceeds from the presumption that Syria is accused of committing this crime rather than a presumption of innocence," al-Sharaa said.
He then claimed that accusing Syrian security forces of having advance knowledge of Hariri's killing was tantamount to charging that U.S. officials knew ahead of time about the Sept. 11 attacks, Spanish authorities knew in advance about the 2004 Madrid train bombings and the British government about this summer's London subway and bus bombings. And he went a step further, raising questions about why Britain had trained for similar scenarios soon before the attacks occurred.
The comment visibly angered British Foreign Secretary Jack Straw, who called it "the most grotesque and insensitive comparison," "appalling," and "absurd." He said any council member concerned about adopting the resolution under Chapter VII of the U.N. Charter, which is militarily enforceable, should have had their misgivings allayed by al-Sharaa.
U.S. Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice told reporters afterward that al-Sharaa's outburst was "a tirade which made the most bizarre connection."
"It sends a very strong signal to Syria of its isolation, but of course that signal was simply reinforced by the really unbelievable tirade of Syria's Foreign Minister, Mr. al-Sharaa," Rice told reporters after the council vote.
She noted al-Sharaa himself was accused of lying in a letter to the Mehlis commission and said his intransigence showed that Syria wanted to discredit the U.N. investigation even after a Security Council vote strongly supported it.
Rice was asked whether putting the resolution under Chapter VII would give the United States unilateral authority to use force against Syria, as it did in Iraq.
"This Chapter VII resolution is very explicit in what it means, which is that Syria must cooperate with the Mehlis report and then, if necessary, the council can come back and consider other measures, or other action. ... That is what we intend to live by," she replied.
Seeking to rally regional support, Assad's government called Monday for an emergency Arab League summit. But Arab diplomats said it was unlikely that many of the group's 22 member nations would agree to a meeting, for fear of harming ties with the U.S., Britain and France.
Syrian troops occupied much of Lebanon for nearly 30 years, until Hariri's assassination triggered widespread street protests and intensified international pressure that forced Assad to order a complete military withdrawal last spring. Syria has denied any involvement in Hariri's assassination.
Boutros Assaker, the acting secretary-general in Lebanon's foreign ministry, told the Security Council his country had entered a new phase in its history and was trying "to consolidate its political independence" and enhance its sovereignty.
What the Lebanese people want, he said, "is the truth, the whole truth ... of this heinous, terrorist crime."
At the end of his speech, al-Sharaa reiterated the importance of the presumption of innocence and insisted Assad's regime would "fully cooperate with the international commission until conclusive evidence is found of the perpetrators of this heinous crime."
"I look forward to the full cooperation by the government of Syria in substance as well as form," Straw retorted, then added: "But I have to say after what I've heard I'm not holding my breath."
Assad on Saturday ordered that a judicial committee be formed to investigate Hariri's assassination _ a point stressed by al-Sharaa. A presidential decree said the committee will cooperate with the U.N. probe and Lebanese judicial authorities.
Spanish and Catalan leaders said Thursday that power over collecting taxes is shaping up as their biggest dispute as they digest a divisive proposal to give the northeast region much greater autonomy.
Meanwhile, Basque leaders _ who are also seeking more self-rule for their region _ weighed in, wondering why their blueprint for more say over their own affairs was voted down in parliament earlier this year.
"Why 'yes' to Catalonia and 'no' to the Basque region?" Basque regional President Juan Jose Ibarretxe said.
Spain's parliament agreed early Thursday to take up the Catalan blueprint for formal consideration, sending it to the committee stage in a process that might take several months.
It has infuriated conservatives who say it might lead to the break-up of Spain.
The proposed new Catalan charter also seeks to give the Barcelona government power to change laws passed by the Spanish parliament and a status of peer in its dealings with the Spanish government. It would also give the Catalan region exclusive say over areas ranging from culture to immigration to airports.
But both sides say money is the main point of disagreement.
The Catalan plan calls for the region around Barcelona to raise and spend its own taxes. But in a debate Wednesday at the Congress of Deputies, the lower chamber of parliament, Prime Minister Jose Luis Rodriguez Zapatero said the Spanish state must retain its power to raise revenue around the country.
"I am convinced that the toughest battle, the core of the negotiations that will take place in congress, will be the system of financing," said Joan Puigcercos, a leader of a Catalan nationalist party that helped write the plan.
Spanish Industry Minister Jose Montilla, who is from Catalonia, agreed that money "will be the issue that causes the most problems."
The early morning vote, with 197 votes in favor and 146 against, followed more than 10 hours of intense debate.
Only the conservative Popular Party voted against the proposal, arguing that it put Spain on a path to dissolution.
Zapatero said he was willing to negotiate the proposals, adding that the wealthy region has a constitutional right to seek more self-rule.
He did not mention the fact that the Basque region and neighboring Navarra already have their own tax-collecting mechanisms, which stem from special rights that both regions enjoyed as far back as the times of King Ferdinand and Queen Isabelle in the 15th century.
In a country where domestic air travel meant free whiskey in coach class only a few years ago, an airline born from a bus company is attracting travelers in droves to flights where such frills are non-existent.
The low-cost phenomenon launched by Gol even extends to the company's executive domain _ a squat, four-story building with no elevators where visitors trudge up the stairs to meet with the airline's management team.
Four years after scrambling to get six planes flying in time to profit from Brazil's busy summer travel season, Gol has carried 23 million passengers in Latin America's most populous country and is spreading its wings abroad.
Gol, which took to the skies in 2001 serving just seven Brazilian cities, now has nearly 30 new Boeing 737s traveling to 38 destinations across this country almost the size of the continental United States.
The family-controlled company introduced Brazilians to online sales, ticketless travel and cold sandwiches and soft drinks instead of hot meals and booze. Forget about first class, business class or frequent flier miles: They're not offered.
And the airline is spreading its wings abroad, starting its first international route to Argentina in December and pledging to start service to Bolivia by June. Analysts predict the carrier's next stops could be Colombia, Ecuador, Paraguay, Peru or Uruguay.
Growth for Gol, which translates as "Goal" in both Portuguese and Spanish in soccer-crazed Latin America, has come with plenty of challenges. The company got off the ground with a big marketing splash just nine months before the Sept. 11 travel drop-off.
Then Brazil's aviation industry was hit in 2002 by a huge devaluation of the Brazilian currency that pushed other domestic carriers to the verge of bankruptcy because airline costs like fuel and aircraft leasing payments are linked to the dollar.
Brazil, which has South America's largest economy, went on to flirt with recession in 2003 amid sky-high interest rates.
But Gol, whose full name is Gol Linhas Aereas Inteligentes SA, managed to steadily increase its Brazilian market share by offering passengers lower fares than its rivals during the bad economic times.
"We thought people would be more price sensitive in those environments," chief executive Constantino Oliveira Jr. said in an interview. "So we converted the crises into opportunities for growth."
Gol says its fares are typically 20 percent less than its competition, but frequent business flier and software company executive Miguel Garcia says he sometimes gets a 30 percent discount flying Gol instead of other airlines.
"The service is more basic, but it's worth it for the price," Garcia said after a dawn flight from Sao Paulo to the southern city of Porto Alegre that included a boxed cold breakfast and apple or grape juice. There was no orange juice and no coffee.
In keeping with Gol's mantra to do everything on the cheap, the carrier outsources phone reservation call centers and uses one type of plane to save on maintenance and pilot training costs. Children get toy planes as presents _ but the planes, made of paper, look like bookmarks.
Cost-cutting runs in Oliveira's blood, courtesy of his father, a former long-haul trucker who started a bus company in the 1950s that became one of the country's biggest.
"He always said 'When you can save on costs, why spend? There's a cost benefit every time,'" Oliveira said of his father.
The younger Oliveira, who became a licensed pilot at age 17 and rose through the ranks at the bus company before starting Gol, said his father always wanted to offer a low-cost air travel alternative in Brazil. But he held back because of the country's tight regulation over the industry, including government-set prices for tickets in the 1980s and '90s.
The regulatory climate eased in the late 1990s just as Internet use mushroomed in Brazil. And one of the country's major airlines, Vasp, started laying off workers and slashing routes, creating a ready labor pool of experienced airline executives and pilots.
The Oliveiras sensed the timing was right in the summer of 2000, snagged talent from Vasp and launched the airline seven months later with an initial investment estimated by analysts at US$12 million (euro9.2 million). The first flight came one month later than the elder Oliveira wanted, but in time to capitalize on the annual passenger demand crush in Brazil during South America's summer.
Focusing on business travelers and Brazilians who had never flown before, Gol's domestic market share grew from 12 percent in 2002 to 24 percent by 2004, putting it in the No. 3 position behind Varig and Tam _ and far ahead of Vasp, whose market share declined to less than 1 percent by the end of last year.
Investors have taken notice, snapping up shares during Gol's initial public offering last summer in Sao Paulo and New York, which raised $280 million (now euro215 million). The company's American depository shares are up 60 percent since the IPO, amid analyst predictions they could go 20 percent higher this year.
"We view Gol as one of the best long-term investment stories in the airline universe today," Morgan Stanley analyst William Greene said in a note to investors.
Analysts say Gol's expanding presence in South America will put pressure on traditional carriers to keep prices down, but believe the airline will keep up with competition from other low-cost airlines like Chile's Sky, Uruguay's Uair and Brazil's OceanAir.
"The only risk, which in Constantino Jr.'s case I don't see, is believing they can walk on water," said Robert Booth, a Miami-based aviation consultant and editor of an aviation newsletter focusing on Latin America.
Frank Liberto, father of St. Petersburg Times reporter Jennifer Liberto, is alive and well and made contact with his family Thursday morning.
Jennifer Liberto wrote a story about her missing father, who stayed in their New Orleans home during Hurricane Katrina, in Thursday's Times.
Frank Liberto, it turns out, was rescued by boat from the second floor of the family home in the flooded Lakeview neighborhood on Wednesday afternoon. He was transferred overnight to the Houston Astrodome.
Twenty-one senior citizens on a boat tour on Lake George in northern New York were killed and more than two dozen others where injured Sunday when the boat capsized and sank, Warren County authorities said.
The wake from another larger tour boat that passed nearby apparently struck the glass-enclosed tour boat The Ethan Allen as it was turning, causing it to take on water and flip about 3 p.m., according to witnesses in the village of Lake George.
Warren County Sheriff Larry Cleveland said 49 people had set out on the 40-foot Shoreline Cruises boat for an hourlong tour of the lake on the crisp, calm afternoon. ''Of those 49 people, we do know that 21 people have perished,'' Cleveland said. ''We will, of course, conduct an investigation in to this.''
It was unclear whether the 49 people included the captain of the boat, who witnesses said was among the survivors.
Ten or more ambulances lined up to help the injured as authorities set up a makeshift morgue at a campground. Some survivors, brought to shore by rescue boats, as well as pleasure craft in the area, sat shivering on Adirondack chairs as volunteers put dry coats and blankets over their shoulders while they awaited transportation to Glens Falls Hospital.
The hospital, which is about six miles south of the lake, said in a statement that it had treated 27 survivors from the accident but expected to keep only a few overnight. Some of the survivors were short of breath, and some were treated for broken ribs. The hospital had called in all its emergency personnel when word of the accident came at 3:26 p.m.
Frank Sause, the 53-year-old owner of a motel by the lake, said he and other local residents helped the elderly survivors off the rescue craft onto a dock as 30 boats patrolled the waters where The Ethan Allen sank. ''Some were complaining of chest pains. All were in shock,'' Sause said.
Sause said one man ''turned around and said, `They just took my wife. She's dead.' ''I told him, `Don't jump to conclusions,' '' Sause said.
He said some of the people who were on the boat said The Ethan Allen was turning and another boat had come by, ''and with the wake of that, combined with the turning, it kind of rolled over.''
''It went down quickly,'' Sause said.
The sheriff's department said the victims were part of a group from Michigan visiting the lake, about 50 miles north of Albany in the Adirondack Mountains, during one of the last busy weekends of the tourist season.
Sause said some of the group said they were staying at the Georgian Resort Hotel and Conference Center in Lake George.
Although it had not been determined which boat may have caused the wake cited by witnesses, one operating at the time was the Lake George Steamboat Company's paddle-wheeler Mohican, which has been taking passengers on the lake for 98 years. The boat's schedule lists a 2-hour, 15-minute cruise starting at 2:30 p.m. during the fall season, which runs through October.
Heather Gilchrest, whose family has operated a marina nearby for 50 years, said her son, Ken, went by boat to the scene to help but they arrived just as the The Ethan Allen was going under. ''People were jumping in and pulling people in as best they could, but it's 70 feet of water,'' she said.
Though life vests are routinely provided, passengers are not required to wear them on any boat longer than 26 feet, Gilchrest said. ''If the boat went sideways and down and you're behind the glass, you would have a hard time getting out,'' she said. ''It went down like the Titanic.''
By the time Mark Shapiro and Daniel Snyder rolled into the 21 Club in Manhattan a couple of weeks ago to meet with about 30 investors, they had made the same presentation dozens of times.
Over the past four weeks, Shapiro, a former ESPN programming executive, and Washington Redskins owner Snyder have gone wherever they were welcome -- Los Angeles, Chicago, Nebraska -- to tell investors how they plan to turn around Six Flags Inc., the nation's second-largest chain of theme parks. So while their ''21 Burgers'' got cold, they booted up PowerPoint one more time, ran through their litany of the company's failings and offered their prescription:
Six Flags needs Dan Snyder.
Six Flags needs Mark Shapiro.
Their sales pitch had plenty of the standard corporate turnaround fare about lost shareholder value and the need to upgrade and modernize.
But ultimately it was about Snyder and Shapiro, complementary talents wrapped in similar personalities -- Snyder the marketing impresario, Shapiro the hands-on producer, both hard-edged salesmen used to being the boss. To win control of the company, they must convince Six Flags shareholders that experience running an NFL franchise and success developing sports television shows can carry over to theme parks.
It is not a conventional strategy. Instead of simply trying to buy the company, Snyder -- Six Flags' largest investor -- has offered himself as chairman of the board, offered Shapiro as chief executive and tried to convince stockholders they would do well to fire current management.
''Typically you don't get to put in a new management team unless you buy the company,'' said Rajesh Aggarwal, a merger expert and finance professor at the University of Minnesota. ''I am not really sure what he is trying to accomplish.''
Snyder has offered to pay $6.50 a share to increase his stake, but only if Six Flags shareholders agree to turn the company over to his team. But since he launched his proxy fight, the stock has been trading at $7 or more. In SEC filings, Snyder maintained he wouldn't budge from his $6.50-per-share offer, which he thinks is a fair price considering Six Flags has more than $2 billion in debt, as well as provisions that would make a takeover more difficult and more expensive.
Snyder has hinted at ambitions beyond the amusement park business, perhaps building an entertainment conglomerate.
Whatever the motivation, he is convinced he has found gold in Shapiro, enough to pay him what Shapiro confirmed was several million dollars to leave a top position at ESPN for a job he might never get to fill.
Shapiro is ''one of the brightest, most energetic, creative businesspeople I've ever met,'' Snyder said during an August appearance on CNBC. Given the chance, Shapiro ''would be the perfect chief executive officer for a family entertainment company.''
Shapiro and Snyder met a few years ago at an NFL broadcast television meeting.
Before going into business together, the two men vacationed together, introduced their wives and took time to make sure the fit was right.
People who know both men have a theory about why they get along.
''Two peas in a pod,'' said Steve Bornstein, Shapiro's former boss at ESPN.
Snyder is 40 years old; Shapiro is 35. Snyder built a $2 billion advertising business by the time he was 34. Shapiro started as a production assistant when he was 23 and became a top programming executive eight years later.
Like Snyder, Shapiro is a workaholic who, when he is not on the road, is in the office by 7 a.m. and not out until 9 p.m. He lives close to ESPN headquarters in Connecticut with his wife, Kim, and their two sons. But ''no one asks about his family because they assume he doesn't have one,'' said Dick Glover, a former executive of ESPN owner Walt Disney Co. who is now vice president for broadcasting and new media for NASCAR.
Both men are known as tough bosses, with little patience for those who can't keep up. Shapiro's manner nearly got him fired during his first weeks at ESPN, when he demanded colleagues fetch his lunch.
Both men are known as candid to a fault. Shapiro once referred to the National Hockey League as ''a damaged brand,'' a statement he defends as truthful after the league's year-long strike. Others view such comments as impolitic.
(begin optional trim)
''He's a hip shooter, and when you shoot from the hip you're going to make some mistakes,'' said veteran sports agent Barry Frank, a self-described fan of Shapiro.
Shapiro got into trouble with the NFL when he approved ''Playmakers,'' an original series that offered a gritty, behind-the-scenes look at pro football. The image-conscious NFL pressured ESPN to yank the show.
Despite the criticism, ''we took risks, we put ourselves out there,'' said Shapiro.
''Mark is all about what he thinks is the right thing and what he wants. In that way he is really pure and genuine. Sometimes it drives some people nuts,'' said Lee Ann Daly, former ESPN vice president of marketing.
(end optional trim)
Those who know Snyder and Shapiro wonder whether it's just a matter of time before they bang heads. But Shapiro said Snyder would be a ''non-executive chairman'' who gives him room to operate.
The Six Flags board has put the company up for sale as a defensive move and is lobbying shareholders to reject Snyder's proposal.
Snyder ''doesn't get it,'' the board said in material sent to shareholders. His ideas are ''foolish'' and ''uninformed.'' ''Ownership of (a) professional sports franchise (is) not comparable to managing theme parks,'' the board said. Ditto for ''managing programming at a cable sports network.'' It said all Snyder and Shapiro have to offer is a ''Trust Me Plan.''
To Snyder and Shapiro, that should be all that's necessary.
They note Six Flags' debt and say the company's revenue, stock and public reputation have all plummeted. Six Flags operates 30 parks in North America. In submissions to stockholders, Snyder and Shapiro included news clips with such headlines as ''Magic Mountain -- Security To Be Tightened After Two Weekends Of Violence.''
''It's about what's not being done. It's about low-hanging fruit,'' Shapiro said on a recent visit to Washington. ''Right now (Six Flags) is known more for long lines and broken rides than anything else.''
Simple things could be improved, he said -- such as dumping Bugs Bunny and other cartoon characters he considers not ''culturally relevant'' for the company's merchandise and rides -- and ''doing more for children under 48 inches tall'' to attract more families.
''Kids today don't know Daffy Duck,'' he said. '' 'Bob the Builder' is on at my house. 'Dora the Explorer' is on at my house.''
More important, the two men say, they will do for Six Flags what they did for ESPN and the Redskins.
As programming chief, Shapiro said, he ''stretched the brand to make ESPN synonymous with anything sports'' by pioneering original entertainment, bringing the NBA and ''Monday Night Football'' to the network and developing such shows as ''Around the Horn'' and ''Pardon the Interruption,'' which features two Washington Post sports columnists.
Shapiro said he could stretch Six Flags ''into a family brand,'' allowing him and Snyder to ''start playing in different fields.''
He rattled off corporate role models: Nickelodeon, which has expanded into movies, video games and merchandise, and Starbucks, which in addition to coffee now sells music.
''The idea is once you get people in your space, you got to find other ways to empty their pockets beyond mocha frappuccinos,'' Shapiro said.
No one knows better how to squeeze money out of people in a confined space than Snyder, who has built the Redskins into one of the most valuable U.S. sports franchises. In their pitch to shareholders, Snyder and Shapiro include ''the Washington Redskins Case Study,'' which lays out the strategies Snyder used to double concession revenue at FedEx Field to nearly $15 million: outsourcing operations and using technology to make it easier for fans to buy food and beverages.
''There are so many parallels here,'' Shapiro said. Amusement parks are a ''marketing and content business. ... It's the emotional transportation business,'' just like movies or a baseball game or a novel, he said. ''Same thing.''
They are selling to a tough audience. Among Six Flags' major shareholders are Microsoft Corp. founder Bill Gates, Nebraska fund manager Wallace Weitz, and New York investor and diamond merchant Simon Glick.
None has made public statements about his intentions. Shareholder voting is expected to be finished by about the end of the year.
As Supreme Court nominee Samuel Alito made his courtesy calls to senators Tuesday, Republicans got a taste of what Democrats could make life like should the conservative jurist's nomination touch off a nuclear meltdown of the Senate.
By invoking an obscure Senate rule to force an unexpected closed session on intelligence matters Tuesday afternoon, Democrats not only confronted Republicans on vulnerable issues, but also showed how they can use procedural maneuvers to tie up the Senate on the Alito confirmation.
This tactic amplified an undertone that followed Alito as he made his rounds on Capitol Hill -- Democrats might try to block his confirmation vote with a filibuster.
''This is a shot across the bow,'' said Thomas Mann, a government expert at the Brookings Institution think tank.
Jim Thurber, director of the Center for Congressional and Presidential Studies at American University, added, ''It's a maneuver that's likely to show what the Democrats are capable and willing to do in their fight against Alito.''
The tactic occurred as top Republicans and Democrats began negotiating the ground rules for the confirmation process, including how quickly to hold hearings and a Senate vote.
The White House is pushing the fast track.
''We should begin later in this month, if possible, and have a markup and floor vote before the Senate adjourns for the year,'' said lobbyist Ed Gillespie, who is helping Alito.
Democrats say they doubt that schedule is possible.
''When there is a controversial nominee for a pivotal swing vote on the high court, the procedure should not be short-circuited, shortchanged or rushed,'' Sen. Charles Schumer, D-N.Y., said Monday.
Democrats said they must read and evaluate 15 years of rulings by Alito as a judge on the Third Circuit Court of Appeals, and will seek documents from his years as a Reagan administration lawyer.
Much depends on Sen. Arlen Specter, R-Pa., the Republican chairman of the Senate Judiciary Commitee. He and ranking committee Democrat Patrick Leahy of Vermont are discussing how to proceed.
On the day after Alito was nominated, questions about a Democratic filibuster already dogged him.
Democrats control just 45 votes in the Senate, too few to defeat a nominee outright since only a majority vote of 51 is necessary to confirm, but enough to block a confirmation vote with a filibuster, which requires 60 votes to end.
Senate Majority Leader Bill Frist, R-Tenn., said Tuesday he would not hesitate to invoke the ''nuclear option'' by using the Republican's 55-vote majority to change rules and ban judicial filibusters.
If Frist goes nuclear, Minority Leader Harry Reid, D-Nev., has in the past made clear that Democrats will use procedural tactics -- as they did Tuesday -- to tie up the Senate.
''If Frist decides to detonate the nuclear option on judicial nominations, he can expect continuous disruption of the Senate and a major battle carried to the American public,'' Mann said.
Democrats say it is too early to talk about a filibuster.
''I don't think we should assume that's going to happen at all,'' said Sen. Dick Durbin, D-Ill., on CBS' Early Show.
Yet Democrats might also be signalling they are unsure they can win support of moderate Republicans in the Alito fight.
After Frist threatened to ban judicial filibusters in May, the so-called Gang of 14 -- seven moderate Republicans and seven moderate Democrats -- avoided a showdown by reaching an agreement to preserve the filibuster in ''extraordinary circumstances.''
But after meeting with Alito Tuesday, Sen. Mike DeWine, R-Ohio, one of the 14, said, ''It's hard for me to envision that anyone would think about filibustering this nominee.''
Glenn Thrush contributed to this story
Sheets of white paper covered windows in the courtroom where a grand jury met Thursday to pursue its two-week-old investigation into the murder of JonBenet Ramsey.
But the white sheets were only symbolic screens in a week when major characters in the almost two-year-old murder mystery waged a war of leaks and letters, battling for the hearts and minds of the 12 jurors.
''The Ramseys did not do it,'' Lou Smit, a homicide detective, said in a resignation letter dated Sept. 20 but released on Sunday.
Smit reviewed police reports on the case for 18 months for the Boulder County prosecutor's office. ''The `case' tells me that John and Patsy Ramsey did not kill their daughter, that a very dangerous killer is still out there and no one is actively looking for him,'' Smit said in his letter.
Accusing the Boulder Police Department of ''going in the wrong direction,'' Smit, a detective for 32 years, added, ''There is substantial, credible evidence of an intruder and lack of evidence that the parents are involved.''
The detective's resignation letter prompted Ramsey to make a rare public statement in the 21-month-old case on Monday.
Praising Smit as ''the only experienced homicide detective who has ever been assigned long term to find the killer of JonBenet,'' Ramsey, in a written statement, lambasted the Boulder Police Department as ''little more than a lynch mob.''
''The killer could never have guessed that he or she would be so lucky as to have the resulting investigation conducted by such closed-minded police,'' continued Ramsey, the father of the 6-year-old beauty pageant contestant whose body was found on Dec. 26, 1996. ''You have wasted almost two years trying to prove your original theory. Meanwhile, my family knows a vicious killer still walks the streets.''
Yet others critical of how the investigation has been handled do not support Ramsey.
Before the grand jury started work on Sept. 15, Steve Thomas, the lead police detective in the case, wrote a resignation letter denouncing the office of Alex Hunter, the Boulder County district attorney, as ''thoroughly compromised.''
Under grand jury rules in Colorado, jurors may not discuss testimony outside the courtroom but are permitted to read news reports about a case they are investigating.
Referring to the recent leaks and letters from acquaintances of the Ramseys, Craig Silverman, a former Denver prosecutor, said, ''They are playing to the grand jury.''
(STORY CAN END HERE. OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS)
In recent days, as a succession of Boulder police detectives have appeared before the grand jury, court observers say the Ramseys and their defenders are trying to score a counterpunch with the jurors.
''So many people are looking and saying, `Hey, there is a forum here, let's use it,'' said Bob Grant, the Adams County district attorney.
Responding to Ramsey's criticism that Boulder police had not investigated alternative theories, Mark Beckner, the Boulder police chief, noted that his detectives had interviewed about 600 people and investigated 122 suspects.
Ramsey, in his statement, addressed ''the killer,'' saying, ''We have been told that the authorities have your DNA.''
If that is true, it was presumably leaked to the Ramseys or their lawyers. The release of Smit's confidential resignation letter also constitutes a leak.
In the past, Hal Haddon, Ramsey's lead lawyer, has demanded police investigations of leaks that seemed to implicate the Ramseys. This round of leaks, favoring the Ramseys, has been met by silence from Haddon.
The leaks seemed to be timed to counteract a report Sunday on the ABC news magazine ''20/20'' that cast an unfavorable light on the Ramseys.
But, on Sunday, only hours before ''20/20,'' The Associated Press ran Smit's week-old resignation letter. Taking the bloom off the ABC report, Smit was quoted in Boulder newspapers on Monday, saying, ''I believe that justice is not being served, that innocent people are being targeted and could be charged with a murder they did not commit.''
Prosecutors received nearly $80,000 Thursday to help finance the grand jury investigation into the JonBenet Ramsey slaying through March.
''If it goes beyond that date, we will be back looking for more money,'' Assistant District Attorney Bill Wise said. ''It is not meant to predict when the grand jury is going to end''
JonBenet was found beaten and strangled Dec. 26, 1996, in the basement of her family's elegant home in Boulder. Authorities said JonBenet had a fractured skull and may have been sexually assaulted.
No arrests have been made. Police say her parents, John and Patsy Ramsey, remain under suspicion. The Ramseys have maintained their innocence.
The grand jury, whose work is kept secret, began meeting in mid-September.
Boulder County, which funds the district attorney's office, approved the new money despite a bill for the case that already had reached nearly $390,000. It is the most ever spent by the office on an investigation.
The city already has spent more than $1 million in its investigation.
Prosecutors posted a photograph of a white, furry bear dressed as Santa Claus on an Internet site Thursday in a plea for public help with the JonBenet Ramsey slaying investigation.
District Attorney Alex Hunter said investigators are hoping someone can identify the stuffed animal's manufacturer and retailers where it was carried in 1996 or before.
Suzanne Laurion, Hunter's spokeswoman, said investigators had been unable to find that information despite trying retailers, Internet sites and manufacturers.
She refused to say anything more about the toy, including what role it may play in the investigation, how the bear came to the attention of police and whether police had it in their possession.
The indistinct photograph, which may have been cropped from a larger image, shows the bear on crinkled paper or material, but not posed in a manner to enhance identification.
The toy is about a foot long, with a red hat, bolero jacket and pants all trimmed in a curled white wool material.
''I make this public request for assistance, knowing that it will give rise to considerable speculation about the status of the Ramsey case,'' Hunter said in a statement.
''I intend to let this speculation take whatever course it will since to confirm or deny theories about what this all means would most certainly damage the ongoing investigation,'' he said.
The toy was reportedly among stuffed animals found in JonBenet's room, but family members said it did not belong to the little girl.
''It wasn't hers,'' the child's aunt, Pam Paugh, told the Denver Rocky Mountain News. ''I believe it was on the other (twin) bed in JonBenet's room.''
JonBenet was found beaten and strangled in the basement of her family's home Dec. 26, 1996, about eight hours after her mother discovered a ransom note demanding $118,000 for her safe return.
There have been no arrests, although police have said JonBenet's parents, John and Patsy Ramsey, are under suspicion. They have denied involvement.
*------
EDITOR'S NOTE -- A picture of the bear is available at Internet site: http://www.co.boulder.co.us/da/bear.htm
The teddy bear sought by authorities in the JonBenet Ramsey case first emerged as a clue in an interview last summer with her mother, Patsy Ramsey, The Denver Rocky Mountain News reported Saturday.
The toy was reportedly among stuffed animals found in JonBenet's room.
The newspaper quoted two investigators as saying that Mrs. Ramsey claimed the toy did not belong in her slain daughter's room when she was shown crime scene pictures by police in June.
''She stiffened,'' said one investigator, speaking on condition of anonymity. ''The way it was described she went white. ... She was saying, `Where did it come from? I've never seen that before.'''
Last week, Boulder District Attorney Alex Hunter posted a photograph of a stuffed toy bear dressed in a Santa Claus suit on the Internet and asked for the public's help in finding information about the bear.
Hunter refused to comment on how the toy might be connected to the investigation of the 1996 slaying of 6-year-old JonBenet. Investigators say they now know the manufacturer, distribution and sale points of the bear, but won't say why they need this information.
The little girl's parents remain under suspicion as a grand jury investigates the crime. The Ramseys have proclaimed their innocence.
Nearly two years after JonBenet Ramsey was murdered in her home here on Christmas night, a grand jury investigation moves at a pace that many outsiders call leisurely.
The second anniversary of the strangulation death of the beauty princess will find the 12 grand jurors on a five-week Christmas break. This comes after the jurors took one week off for Thanksgiving. During a 10-week stretch this fall, the panel met only 18 times to investigate the case, a murder mystery that has fascinated the nation and much of the world.
''It's pretty amazing that they are taking a full month off, it seems more like a vacation than an investigation,'' said Craig Silverman, a Denver trial lawyer who is not involved in the case. ''They are still moving at this incredibly slow, Boulder pace. It is amazing the lack of urgency.''
On Sept. 15, six months after the grand jury was impaneled for a one-year term, District Attorney Alexander Hunter of Boulder County took the case before the grand jury. If the grand jurors investigate the case into the spring, as expected, their term will be extended for an additional six months.
This fall, the jurors heard testimony from a series of law-enforcement witnesses _ Boulder police detectives and officers and a state handwriting analyst. They also toured the Tudor-style house here where the Ramseys lived until JonBenet's death.
After the jurors reconvene in January, they are expected to hear from neighbors and employees of the Ramseys in Boulder, as well as many members of the Ramsey family, including the 6-year-old girl's parents, John and Patsy Ramsey. In the summer of 1997, they sold their house here and moved to an Atlanta suburb.
Hunter took the JonBenet case to the grand jury shortly after a former Boulder police detective on the case and three former friends of the Ramseys publicly demanded that Colorado's governor, Roy Romer, replace Hunter on the case with a special prosecutor.
On Tuesday, Bill Owens, Colorado's governor-elect, said he would resist calls for a special prosecutor.
''I think a special prosecutor would have been necessary, had the grand jury not been called,'' Owens, a Republican, said. ''At this point, I am willing to await the results of the grand jury.''
Critics of prosecutors here said that they had little experience investigating and trying homicides in Boulder, a college city that has about one murder a year. Indeed, in an unrelated case, Hunter's office on Friday won its first murder conviction here since 1992. To push the Ramsey case along, prosecutors from neighboring counties have lent to Hunter's office prosecutors with experience in homicides and grand juries.
''Alex has gotten what many people feel he didn't have _ extremely competent grand jury prosecutors, prosecutors with a great depth of homicide experience,'' Bob Grant, district attorney for Adams County, said Tuesday. Noting that he had lent his chief trial deputy, Bruce Levin, to the case, Grant added, ''There really isn't any way to predict how long an investigative grand jury will go on.''
As the grand jury has proved leak proof and as the murder case has grown cold, interest among news organizations has tapered off.
''Starting in January 1997, at least one of the tabloids had JonBenet on their cover for 55 straight weeks,'' said Stan Oliner, manuscripts curator for the Colorado Historical Society. Noting a dwindling flow for the society's JonBenet Ramsey Manuscript Collection, he added: ''It has become an occasional story. The Lewinsky story has replaced the pounding, week after week, coverage of JonBenet.''
Indeed, last week's headlines seemed to speak of a case frozen in time.
Last Friday evening, Ramsey attacked a free-lance photographer who tried to take his picture on a Boulder sidewalk, the photographer, Frank Coffman, said Tuesday.
''He charged right at me and grabbed hold of me with both hands and tried to throw me around a bit,'' Coffman said in an interview. Coffman said he did not intend to file charges.
Mike Bynum, a lawyer and business partner of Ramsey who witnessed the encounter, did not return telephone calls Tuesday. Another business partner of Ramsey, Jay Elowsky, pleaded guilty earlier this year to misdemeanor assault charge after he brandished a baseball bat at two men he thought were newspaper reporters.
A Denver newspaper also headlined last week: ''Ramsey Family DNA Sought.'' Five members of the Ramseys' extended family agreed to give Boulder police palm prints and DNA samples last week.
As part of the ongoing investigation, detectives reportedly are trying to identify a mystery palm print found in the Ramsey basement and stray bits of DNA found under the little girl's fingernails. Knowing that unidentified DNA could bolster the theory that his daughter was murdered by a mysterious intruder, Ramsey wrote in a public letter Sept. 28: ''We have been told that the authorities have your DNA. They will know it is you.''
''If the DNA is not identified, it does weaken the prosecution's case,'' said Scott Robinson, a Denver defense lawyer who follows the case for several Denver news outlets. JonBenet's parents have already provided police with DNA samples, largely snippets of hair. The five family members who were scheduled to provide samples last week all have alibis placing them far from Boulder on the night of the murder.
With the threat looming of a grand jury inquest into the murder of JonBenet Ramsey, the parents of the murdered beauty princess Thursday completed three days of questioning by prosecutors here, breaking their 16 months of official silence.
John and Patsy Ramsey, who last talked to Boulder investigators on April 30, 1997, were questioned separately, and in videotaped interviews by prosecutors, according to Alex Hunter, Boulder's district attorney.
''Mr. and Mrs. Ramsey have been cooperative,'' Hunter said after questioning ended Thursday afternoon. ''Questioning was not restricted in content or length. The Ramseys have agreed to continue to cooperate and to provide certain documents.''
In addition, investigators from Hunter's office traveled two weeks ago to the Ramsey's new home in Atlanta and conducted three interviews with Burke Ramsey, the little girl's 11-year-old brother. The Ramseys and their two children were the only people known to be living at the Ramsey house on the night of the murder, 18 months ago.
Although the Ramsey's have long declined to be interviewed by police, whom they characterized as biased in the case, their attorney said recently the couple would cooperate with the grand jury.
A new grand jury was impaneled here two months ago. Early this month, Boulder police spent two days detailing the case to Hunter. At the end of the closed-door sessions, Hunter indicated that he would decide whether or not to call a grand jury by early July. On Thursday, he said: ''I do not know when I will make this decision.''
On Thursday, Boulder's new police chief, Mark Beckner, urged the prosecutor to convene a grand jury for the case. Earlier this month, Beckner, who has directed the murder investigation since October, said that there were ''30 reasons'' why a grand jury investigation was necessary.
''I have an idea who did it,'' he continued, conceding: ''It's certainly a circumstantial case.''
At the same time, Beckner said he was ''excited'' about new evidence. According to news reports, this new evidence came from laboratory tests on clothes the parents wore the night of the murder. In addition, tests recently confirmed that a felt pen found in the Ramsey house was used to write the ransom note. Boulder police already had said that the ransom note was written on a pad found in the house.
Although the police chief and district attorney both have said that the Ramseys fall under ''the umbrella of suspicion,'' they have not formally named any suspects.
So far, the investigation has cost this small city $1 million in additional police and prosecution expenses. In an accounting, Boulder police said that, as of early June, they had interviewed 590 people, investigated 122 suspects and taken 1,058 pieces of evidence. The public had come forward with 700 telephone tips and 3,400 letters.
By talking to prosecutors now, the Ramseys may be trying to head off grand jury appearances later this summer. When talking with prosecutors, the Ramseys are not under oath, can refuse to answer questions, can benefit from considerable advice from their defense attorneys, and can avoid running a media gauntlet to enter a courthouse. These conditions do not generally apply in a grand jury setting.
''You only use a grand jury to compel evidence: testimony or documents,'' said Craig Silverman, a former Denver prosecutor who is now a defense attorney. ''They may prefer to testify in a relaxed setting, not under oath. They knew of Hunter's deadline to decide on a grand jury. This is a game of chicken.''
(STORY CAN END HERE. OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS)
While JonBenet is now a household name from here to Finland, not everyone in this quiet college town is enamored of the case.
Last month, two men rented the Ramsey family's Tudor-style mansion, which had remained empty since the murder. To discourage gawkers, the men promptly planted three large spruce trees to block the street view.
Also last month, John Eller, the first police commander of the JonBenet investigation, was in Key West, Fla., trying unsuccessfully be hired as police chief of that town, 2,000 miles from here.
Joseph Bellipanni, the Boulder District Court chief judge who was expected to preside over a JonBenet grand jury, resigned last month, after 15 years on the job. He is moving to Cairo to take a U.S.-government-funded job as an adviser to reform Egypt's court system. His move to the far side of the globe prompted The Denver Post to headline: ''Trading Ramseys for Ramses.''
When John and Patsy Ramsey hired lawyers after their daughter, JonBenet, was killed and then distanced themselves from police, it didn't sit right with Nancy Gordon.
''The fact that they did not work with police from the beginning led me and my family to place a cloud of suspicion over the family,'' said Gordon, an Acworth schoolteacher and mother of three.
So when the Ramseys had three days of interviews last week with investigators from the district attorney's office, Gordon wondered, ''Why the wait? What has changed? If they have nothing to hide, they have nothing to hide.''
But Susan Gordy of Atlanta said the Ramseys' stated reason for waiting makes sense. The Ramseys say they broke off talks with the police 14 months ago because they felt the police were out to get them, said their attorney Hal Haddon. They waited for the case to be handed over this month to the district attorney, whom they trusted more, he added.
''I don't think I'd be talking either,'' said Gordy. ''Everybody kind of jumped on them in the beginning.''
The Ramsey interviews arrive as Boulder, Colo., District Attorney Alex Hunter decides whether to take the case to a grand jury. After conducting full-day sessions of videotaped interviews Tuesday through Thursday, Hunter said he is leaning toward convening a grand jury. Recent developments, he said, might delay his decision beyond his original early July estimate.
''Mr. and Mrs. Ramsey have been cooperative,'' said Hunter, who declined to discuss the specifics of the conversations held in Colorado, except to say the family handed over some important documents. Their 11-year-old son, Burke, also was interviewed over three days in Atlanta, where the family now resides.
Burke was in the family's Boulder home when 6-year-old JonBenet was found beaten and strangled Dec. 26, 1996. While his parents are among those under ''an umbrella of suspicion,'' police say the boy is not a suspect.
Legal experts say the interviews allowed the family and authorities to feel out each other. Denver legal analyst Andrew Cohen said he also sees some posturing for the public.
''The Ramseys can say, `The cops were incompetent, so much so that we didn't want to talk to them. As soon as the case went to the district attorney, we did go in,''' said Cohen.
Haddon, the Ramsey attorney, said the family's communication with the district attorney actually began over a year ago and included handing over records regarding medical, phone, bank and business matters. John and Patsy Ramsey were interviewed simultaneously in separate rooms last week, each accompanied by an attorney and a private investigator, and no restrictions were placed on the questioning. The only condition demanded by the Ramseys was that ''police not be in the room,'' said Suzanne Laurion, a district attorney spokeswoman.
The interviews can have benefits for both the investigators and the Ramseys, said Christopher Mueller, a law professor at the University of Colorado. The investigators can probe the family members' knowledge and look for any important inconsistencies in their stories. A family member can, if innocent, offer more tidbits to help the probe and, if guilty, persuasively lie to prevent a prosecution, he said.
''They may be posturing; they may be trying to help,'' Mueller said.


The parents of JonBenet Ramsey, the six-year-old murdered American beauty queen, break a 14-month silence in a British television interview Thursday night proclaiming they are innocent and vowing to find her killer. 	   ''I don't know what happened,'' her mother Patsy Ramsey said in a Channel 4 documentary, according to highlights published in The Times of London on Thursday. ''God knows, and He's not telling.'' 	   JonBenet was found beaten and strangled Dec. 26, 1996 in her home in Boulder, Colorado. There have been no arrests, and authorities have said only that Patsy and John Ramsey are under suspicion. The Ramseys have denied any involvement. 	   Newsweek reporters Sherry Keene-Osborn and Daniel Glick, who are associate producers of the documentary ''Who Killed JonBenet?'', previewed the show in The Times, saying the Ramseys accused the media of convicting them of JonBenet's murder. 	   The reporters noted that the child, dressed in a pink cowgirl outfit singing ''I Wanna Be A Cowboy's Sweatheart,'' or posing in elaborate clothes, wearing make-up and high heels, has become known throughout the United States through coverage of her unsolved murder. 	   ''The American public has been led to believe that, after a wonderful Christmas, we brutally beat JonBenet, sexually molested her, strangled her, went to sleep, got up the next morning, wrote a ransom note, called the police, sat around the house for four hours, then I went downstairs and discovered her body and was able to act distraught,'' Ramsey said. 	   ''Patsy was able to throw up that morning because of gut-wrenching anxiety. Help me to understand that. Where is our commonsense as a society, as a race of people?,'' he asked. 	   ''The single most important thing to us, from that day until even now, is to find the killer of our daughter,'' Ramsey said. ''This ... creature.'' 	   The Newsweek reporters wrote that the Ramseys displayed a range of emotions in the interview in the two-story home in suburban Atlanta where they moved after JonBenet's death. 	   ''Everything in our lives has been scoured,'' Patsy said. ''They talked with my fourth-grade teacher, my friends from elementary school. There's nothing. I'm not saying I've been perfect my whole life, but there is no history of any activity like this. It's ridiculous.'' 	   Ramsey said that when he was told that police had tried to withhold his daughter's body for burial in order to force an interrogation, he lost all confidence in them, the reporters wrote. 	   ''They were not there to help us, they were there to hang us,'' he said. 	   The Ramseys denied allegations that John was an avid consumer of pornography and that he had abused his other children, a view supported by the children of his first marriage and his first wife, the reporters wrote. JonBenet's pediatrician also said he never suspected she was being abused. 	   (eml-mj)
Three former friends of the parents of JonBenet Ramsey have asked for a special prosecutor to take over the stalled 20-month-old investigation into the slaying of JonBenet, the 6-year-old Colorado beauty princess.
The three former friends, all residents of Boulder, have broken off their friendships with John and Patsy Ramsey, parents of the slain child. In two separate letters, they accuse Boulder District Attorney Alex Hunter of unwarranted delays in prosecuting the case and of being overly accommodating to the Ramseys.
Hunter ''has provided evidence to Ramsey defense attorneys at their request'' but denied requests by other witnesses for transcripts of their own statements to the police, wrote Fleet and Priscilla White, a couple who had the Ramsey family to their home for dinner on Dec. 25, 1996, a few hours before JonBenet was found dead. ''He has thoroughly alienated police detectives and key witnesses whose cooperation is vital to the investigation and prosecution,'' the Whites wrote.
A few hours after the dinner, White and Ramsey were searching the basement of the Ramsey house when Ramsey emerged from a room with his daughter's battered body. In a brief interview on Thursday, White, an oil and gas entrepreneur, described himself as ''a frustrated witness in a horrible murder case.''
Questioned by the Boulder police as suspects and eventually cleared, the Whites became estranged from the Ramseys, who moved to Atlanta a year ago.
In their 15-page letter, released on Wednesday ''to the people of Colorado,'' the Whites alleged that ''Alex Hunter and those advising him have no intention of seeking indictment from a grand jury.''
The couple faulted prosecutors for allowing a ''chummy'' atmosphere to build with Ramsey lawyers and charged that prosecutors and police leaders deliberately delayed the case by ''killing time'' with well-publicized busy work and ''task lists.''
Turning to their former friends, the Whites concluded, ''We must be mindful, however, of the first cause of the investigation's failure _ the refusal of John and Patsy Ramsey to cooperate fully and genuinely with those officials charged with the responsibility of investigating the death of their daughter, JonBenet.''
Emboldened by this letter, Judith Phillips, a photographer who had taken pictures of the Ramsey family, wrote an open letter on Thursday calling for a special prosecutor and charging that Hunter was ''willing to obstruct the justice he swore to uphold.''
Neither letter gave an opinion about the possibility of the Ramseys' involvement in the death.
These calls for a special prosecutor come two weeks after similar calls from a former police detective in the case and from Denver's two daily newspapers, The Rocky Mountain News and The Denver Post. In response to these calls, Hunter cut short a vacation in Alaska, returned to Colorado, met with Gov. Roy Romer and announced that he would take the case to a grand jury soon, probably next month.
Hunter has declined to respond to the charges against him, saying a response could prejudice the case. Romer has stood fast in face of the new calls that he take the case away from Hunter and appoint a special prosecutor.
''The case is going to the grand jury,'' Jim Carpenter, the governor's spokesman, said on Thursday. Referring to the Whites' letter, he added, ''There was nothing in the letter that has changed that view.''
One legal analyst found it interesting that both the Whites and Steve Thomas, the former police detective, had warned publicly that a grand jury would not indict. ''This is the second time that people have said this grand jury is going to be a fix,'' said the analyst, Craig Silverman, a former Denver prosecutor who is now a defense lawyer. ''It's unusual to hear stuff like that.''
On Friday, both Denver newspapers published articles that appeared to open a window on the Ramsey household in the early morning of Dec. 26, 1996.
According to these reports, Mrs. Ramsey failed to hang up the telephone for a few moments after calling 911 to say that she had discovered a ransom note on her back stairs. A California laboratory reportedly digitally enhanced snippets of conversation picked up at 5:52 a.m. from the Ramsey kitchen.
According to these newspaper accounts, Mrs. Ramsey can be heard screaming, and JonBenet's brother, Burke, then 10, can be heard asking what she had found. Ramsey can be heard telling his son to go back to bed. The Ramseys have said their son was asleep in bed when Mrs. Ramsey found the note and called 911.
Hal Haddon, the Ramseys' lead lawyer, broke his general silence about the case to issue a statement denouncing the news articles.
''This vicious leak is one more example of the pattern of official misconduct which has characterized this investigation,'' Haddon said. ''Police sources leak what they claim is critical evidence and spin it against the Ramseys. The Ramseys are helpless to reply because they do not have access to the evidence.''
The Ramseys have denied any involvement in their daughter's death. Boulder Police Chief Mark Beckner has said they are under an ''umbrella of suspicion.''
The district attorney in Colorado overseeing the JonBenet Ramsey homicide case on Friday appointed two new special prosecutors to present evidence to a grand jury.
Boulder District Attorney Alex Hunter appointed Bruce Levin and Mitch Morrissey, in part, because of criticism he has mishandled the Ramsey case.
''Given all the recent questions ... public confidence demanded absolutely that we have the most experienced prosecutor we could get,'' said Suzanne Laurion, spokeswoman for Hunter.
Levin and Morrissey together have 32 years of experience prosecuting homicide cases. They work in Colorado counties outside of Hunter's jurisdiction, but will answer to Hunter on the Ramsey case. The grand jury will begin hearing evidence later this month, Laurion said.
Last month, Colorado Gov. Roy Romer refused to appoint a prosecutor who could have taken the case over from Hunter.
Romer made his decision after a police detective who investigated the slaying of the 6-year-old girl resigned and claimed Hunter bungled the Ramsey case.
Romer also considered a Ramsey family friend's claim that Hunter's friendship with lawyers representing John and Patsy Ramsey clouded his judgment on the case.
The friend, Fleet White, criticized the Ramseys, saying their refusal to cooperate with detectives hurt the investigation of their daughter's death. The Ramseys remain under suspicion in the homicide.
White was with John Ramsey when he found JonBenet's battered and strangled body in a basement room of the Ramseys' Colorado home Dec. 26, 1996.
The Ramseys now live in Atlanta.


Not quite 24 hours after American cruise missiles hit a factory in a decrepit industrial area of this capital, clouds of white smoke and acrid smells still hovered over the site Friday night.
About a dozen Sudanese soldiers lounged on the ground at the entrance of the destroyed factory, which the Sudanese say made pharmaceuticals, but which the Americans contend was a cover for the making of chemical weapons. Deep puddles of water on the muddy ground attested to the fire-fighting efforts after the strike.
The Islamic government, accused by the Clinton administration of assisting in the terrorist activities of Osama bin Laden, used these fiery remnants of the factory as a backdrop for a well-organized anti-American demonstration during the day.
After Friday prayers in the city's mosques, worshipers were urged to attend rallies, including a particularly vocal one at the plant, where leading figures of the government accused the United States of being a ''terrorist'' state.
At one rally, pictures of President Clinton and Monica Lewinsky were on prominent display, a juxtaposition of a man and his mistress that is interpreted in this very conservative society as the ultimate mockery.
Foreign Minister Mustafa Osman Ismail said that Sudan would remain a ''tomb for its enemies whatever this costs us in human lives.''
But the most important Sudanese leader, Hassan al Turabi, who is the speaker of Parliament and the ideological power behind the ruling National Islamic Front, remained silent Friday. American intelligence officials have called Turabi a close comrade of bin Laden, whom the administration has accused of being the mastermind of the bombings of two American embassies in East Africa that left hundreds dead.
Turabi has been a mysterious figure of the fundamentalist government, which grabbed power in the coup in 1989.
Gen. Omar Hassan al-Bashir, the Sudanese president, made up for Turabi's silence. Bashir said that he would prove that the pharmaceutical plant hit by the American missiles was not a cover for making the precursors of nerve gas as Washington claimed. ''We have undeniable proof'' that the plant was only used for pharmaceutical products such as children's and anti-malarial medicines, he said. International companies that had provided equipment for the plant that opened two years ago would back him up, he added. The general did not name them.
In describing the reasons for destroying the plant, Sandy Berger, Clinton's national security adviser, said bin Laden had given key financial help for the plant that was part of the ''Sudanese military industrial complex.'' Bin Laden lived in Sudan from 1994 to 1996, a period when Washington says he invited international terrorists to train at camps here.
He was forced to leave Sudan in 1996 when the government decided that he was too much of an embarrassment and his presence too costly. After telling bin Laden to leave, the government hoped to win some concessions from the Clinton administration, including economic aid, but failed to do so.
As part of its case that the plant was a benign operation, government officials said that it was owned by a Sudanese businessman, Salah Idrisse, who is also a citizen of Saudi Arabia.
The heart of the factory where most of the smoke was still billowing was off bounds to reporters Friday and it was impossible to tell what was made there. In the rubble at the front of the compound were wrappers from a veterinary solution made at the plant and leaflets on how to take Profenil, a trade name for ibuprofen, a widely used pain reliever. Trays of small empty brown bottles, apparently used for medicine, were scattered about on the ground.
Mohammed Hussein, 23, a builder who lives about a mile from the plant, said he saw bright lights and then heard the swoosh of about six missiles during the attack. At first, he thought the nearby power station had been struck, he said. Then he thought a plane had crashed. Then, he said, it occurred to him that John Garang, the leader of a southern rebel group that has been waging a civil war for more than a decade, had finally struck the capital.
According to the plant's managing director, Sayed Hamed, the factory employed 360 workers. He said the enterprise made 30 varieties of drugs for humans, and 23 kinds of veterinary medicines. A hospital spokesman said earlier that 10 people wounded from the strike were admitted to the wards. Four of them were critically hurt, he said. The plant does not operate at night and there were apparently few workers around during the attack.
A spokesman for Sudanese opposition political parties based in Cairo, Faruq Ahmed Adam, said he agreed with Washington that the plant was a cover for the manufacture of chemical weapons. He said that another factory in the suburb of Kafouri also made chemical weapons. He added that Sudanese security forces were investors in the plant.
Relations between Washington and the Sudanese government have gone from bad to worse in the nine years of the fundamentalist regime. But even so, ordinary people seem to be bewildered why American should send cruise missiles here.
Some said they were skeptical that the pharmaceutical plant was a cover for preparing chemical warfare agents. ''Most people here, even those who are anti-government, do not believe this particular factory was making chemical weapons,'' one man said.
But another longtime opposition supporter, a lawyer, said he believed the Americans knew what they were doing. ''Bin Laden has never built a factory for medicines in his life,'' said the lawyer. ''He's only interested in killing and terrorism.''
Hundreds of Sudanese trudged through the mud on a rainy Friday to gather by the twisted rubble and concrete of the factory heavily damaged by U.S. missiles. 	   Civilians in trucks heading toward the plant chanted ''Down USA'' in English. White smoke still rose from the rubble of the four-story building, which the United States said was making chemical weapons agents. 	   Many of the people said they were shocked that the United States struck a factory in the heart of the capital. Police tried to block many of the civilians, mostly women and children, from entering the factory compound. 	   ''Are these people crazy? Do you think this is really a weapons factory?'' said a young woman who worked at the factory. She refused to give her name. 	   Officials at Khartoum Teaching hospital said 10 people were injured in the raid, including four in critical condition. 	   Workers at the site said they feared that some people may be trapped under the debris. 	   Early Friday, Sudanese demonstrators stormed the empty U.S. Embassy compound in Khartoum and pulled down the American flag to protest the attack. 	   The State Department ordered local staff to leave the U.S. Embassy after the Aug. 7 bombings of embassies in Nairobi, Kenya, and Dar es-Salaam. American diplomats were pulled out of Khartoum in 1996. 	   Sudanese officials charged that President Clinton ordered the missile attack to distract attention from his troubles in the Monica Lewinsky sex case. 	   President Omar el-Bashir said on state-run Sudan Television that Clinton was a ''liar and morally decrepit.'' He said Sudan was recalling its diplomats from Washington. 	   He also warned that Sudan ''reserves the right to respond to the American attack using all necessary measures,'' Egypt's Middle East News Agency reported Friday. 	   ''We will retain the right to protest, and will ask the Security Council to investigate the truth ... about this factory,'' el-Bashir said on Sudanese television. 	   He said he would call for an emergency meeting of the council to discuss the U.S. attack and asked U.N. Secretary-General Kofi Annan to send a delegation to Sudan to investigate whether the plant was used to produce chemical weapons. 	   The television said the factory produced about 50 percent of the country's pharmaceuticals.   El-Bashir also, 14th graf   pvs-lm-ggl
Libyan leader Moammar Gadhafi _ still on crutches from a recent hip operation _ led hundreds of chanting Libyans in a Friday rally condemning U.S. missile strikes on Sudan and Afghanistan. 	   ''Down, Down USA!'' and ''God is Great, Oh Sudan!'' the crowd chanted as Gadhafi punched the air with his fist in Martyrs' Square in the Libyan capital Tripoli. 	   The sentiment was echoed around the Middle East, where leaders and many citizens roundly criticized Thursday's American attacks on a factory in Sudan and camps associated with Muslim radical Osama bin Laden in Afghanistan. 	   Much of the harshest criticism came from countries opposed to the United States, but even in perceived U.S. allies like Saudi Arabia, some people said the attack would add to and not lessen the threat against Americans. 	   U.S. President Clinton said the strikes were ordered to avenge the Aug. 7 bombings of U.S. embassies in East Africa and because of reports that more anti-American attacks were being planned. U.S. officials said the factory in Sudan made chemical weapons agents; Sudan maintains it's a pharmaceutical plant. 	   Clinton's actions were widely seen by Arabs as an effort to distract public opinion in the United States from his travails over a relationship with former White House intern Monica Lewinsky. 	   ''Clinton tries to cover up his scandal with attacks against Sudan and Afghanistan,'' the main headline in the leftist As-Safir daily in Lebanon said. 	   A front-page editorial in Beirut's Al Kifah Al Arabi paper said that ''Lewinsky's dress is no longer the preoccupation of the world after Clinton has discovered Osama bin Laden's dishdasha (Arab robe).'' 	   In Saudi Arabia, Abeer Hamza, a 26-year-old homemaker, said the American campaign ''is not self-defense, this is a senseless action.'' 	   She added: ''This violence will only beget more violence.'' 	   Mohammed al-Turki, a Saudi visiting the neighboring island of Bahrain, criticized Clinton but added that bin Laden _ who is himself a Saudi was ''no better.'' 	   In Cairo, Shaaban Ahmed Mohammed, 34, owner of a newspaper stand, was among a minority who said he believed the United States attacks were justified. 	   ''It has the right to protect itself. If it remains silent after the last attack (in Kenya and Tanzania) it will be the victim of numerous blows,'' he said. 	   Kuwaiti Najeeb, 12th graf pvs   vars-ggl
President Omar el-Bashir on Friday recalled Sudan's diplomats from Washington to protest the U.S. missile strike on a factory in the Sudanese capital a day earlier. 	   After an emergency meeting with his Cabinet, el-Bashir also announced that Sudan would file complaints with the United Nations, the Arab League and the Organization of African Unity. 	   He said Sudan could ''prove that the factory is specifically for pharmaceutical production'' and not the chemical weapons facility described by U.S. officials. 	   El-Bashir later spoke at a rally outside his office. Sudanese who poured to the rally from Friday prayers at the city's mosques chanted ''Down, Down USA!'' and burned an American flag. 	   The final casualty toll in the missile strike remained unclear. 	   Khartoum Hospital officials said 10 people were being treated for injuries, including four in critical condition. 	   Workers at the site said there was still concern that some victims could be buried under the rubble. They told The Associated Press that the factory's janitor and his family still hadn't been accounted for. 	   Sidahmed Hajj Hamad, administrative director at the factory, estimated the damage at dlrs 100 million. 	   Clinton ordered the attack on the factory in Khartoum in retaliation for the Aug. 7 bombings of the American embassies in Kenya and Tanzania. U.S. missiles also struck suspected camps of Muslim militant Osama bin Laden in Afghanistan. 	   El-Bashir said that the factory _ the El-Shifa Pharmaceutical Industries Co. in the North Khartoum neighborhood _ was hit by six Tomahawk missiles. 	   He said a seventh fell short of the target but did not indicate if it did any damage. 	   State-run Sudan television said that the factory, which opened in 1996, produced about half of the country's medicines. Its main products were reported to be antibiotics and drugs to treat malaria and tuberculosis. 	   Sudan continued to charge that Clinton took the action to divert public attention from the grand jury investigation into his relationship with former White House intern Monica Lewinsky. 	   A statement issued by the Sudanese Embassy in the Kenyan capital Nairobi said that ''the timing was chosen to serve the wish of a sexual pervert and maniac to divert attention away from his crumbling credibility and reputation.'' 	   The podium at the rally el-Bashir addressed was decorated with pictures of Clinton and Lewinsky and bore the slogan ''Clinton: Screw Monica, not Sudan.'' 	   El-Bashir said that ''Clinton and America will have to pay. ... Sudan is for Islam, and we will not be bullied by Americans.'' 	   He pledged to ''pursue all diplomatic channels'' over the missile attack but also said the government was ''opening all training camps'' for volunteers for the national militia. 	   Overnight, Sudanese demonstrators stormed the empty U.S. Embassy compound in Khartoum and pulled down the American flag to protest the attack. 	   The State Department ordered local staff to leave the U.S. Embassy after the bombings of embassies in Nairobi, Kenya, and Dar es-Salaam two weeks ago. American diplomats were pulled out of Khartoum in 1996. 	   Earlier in the day, hundreds of Sudanese trudged through streets made muddy with rain to view the twisted steel and concrete rubble of the four-story factory. 	   Police tried to block the civilians, mostly women and children, from entering the factory compound. 	   ''Are these people crazy? Do you think this is really a weapons factory?'' said a young woman who worked at the factory. She refused to give her name.   mo-eap
In mosques and in McDonald's, Arabs on Friday criticized U.S. missile strikes in Sudan and Afghanistan as driven more by President Bill Clinton's need to escape scandal than by a battle against terrorism. 	   Many said, too, that the attacks would only increase hatred and violence by Muslims against the United States. 	   Even among the few Arabs interviewed who defended the U.S. attacks, some questioned whether the targeted Sudanese factory really made chemical weapons ''precursors'' as U.S. officials say _ or medicines as Sudan maintains. 	   ''The U.S. ... has the right to defend its interests, but it must be certain,'' said Egyptian airline clerk Somaya Farouk, 23. ''If there was a 1 percent chance that this was a pharmaceuticals plant, then it should have held off.'' 	   Clinton said the missiles hit terrorist camps in Afghanistan run by Osama bin Laden, the Saudi millionaire blamed by Washington for the Aug. 7 bombings of U.S. embassies in Kenya and Tanzania, and a factory linked to bin Laden in Sudan. 	   The reaction to the attacks from U.S. opponents in the Middle East was predictable, and American allies mostly remained silent. The Cairo-based Arab League condemned the attack in Sudan, calling it ''an unjustified and flagrant aggression on ... an Arab country.'' 	   Libyan leader Moammar Gadhafi _ still on crutches from a hip operation _ led a protest early Friday in the capital Tripoli, thrusting his fist in the air and shouting, ''Down, down USA.'' 	   The strikes were harshly criticized by both Iraq and non-Arab Iran which _ along with Libya and Sudan _ are on the U.S. list of terrorist sponsoring states. 	   ''We condemn terrorism, but nothing justifies these attacks, especially these random American attacks against Muslim nations,'' Iran's Foreign Ministry spokesman Mahmoud Mohammadi told state-run radio. 	   In newspapers, and from Arabs on the street, the repeated theme was that Clinton ordered the attacks to draw the spotlight off his affair with former White House intern Monica Lewinsky. 	   Reading a newspaper in a McDonald's branch in Bahrain, 25-year-old Saudi citizen Mohammed al-Turki called the American missile strikes ''a plot to divert public attention from Clinton's wrongdoings.'' 	   But asked if he sympathized with bin Laden, he said ''he's no better.'' 	   Shaaban Ahmed Mohammed, 34, owner of a Cairo newspaper stand, was the only Arab interviewed who saw the strikes by the United States as likely to decrease, not spur, violence. 	   ''It has the right to protect itself. If it remains silent after the last attack (in Kenya and Tanzania), it will be the victim of numerous blows,'' he said. 	   More typical was the view of Hussein Rashid, 41, a bookkeeper from the sprawling Cairo neighborhood of Boulaq. 	   ''When you wash your hands in blood repeatedly, they will never be clean,'' he said. ''Clinton and the U.S have for years been killing indiscriminately, so this is not new. But it certainly won't go unanswered by the Muslim world.''
Sudan will ask the Security Council to consider authorizing a U.N. investigation into the U.S. airstrikes on a Khartoum factory, Sudan's ambassador said Friday, calling the attack a breach of international law. 	   Ambassador Elfatih Mohamed Ahmed Erwa said he would deliver a letter of formal complaint requesting the investigation later Friday to the council president, Danilo Turk of Slovenia. The letter was from Sudan's foreign minister, Erwa said. 	   The Arab Group of states would support Sudan's request for an investigation, said Ali Sulaiman R. al-Saeid, the deputy ambassador of Kuwait. 	   The group, chaired by Kuwait, met Friday to discuss Sudan's options. 	   Non-aligned states were also meeting Friday and Sudan hoped they would support the investigation as well, Erwa said in an interview with The Associated Press. 	   U.S. forces carried out the strikes in retaliation for the bombings at U.S. embassies in Nairobi, Kenya and Dar es Salaam, Tanzania, which killed over 250 people. 	   In a statement, Sudan's mission said ''the aggression is a flagrant violation to the sovereignty and territorial integrity of Sudan,'' that violated Article 2 of the U.N. charter, which says member states must refrain from using force against other states. 	   U.S. officials have said the cruise missile attack on the Khartoum factory was designed to wipe out a terrorist chemical plant linked to Osama bin Laden, whom U.S. officials accuse in the embassy bombings. 	   Erwa told the Arab Group on Friday that the factory was a pharmaceutical plant that had no links to bin Laden. 	   The United Nations confirmed Friday that it had contracted the el-Shifa plant to supply 100,000 liters of veterinary pharmaceuticals for Iraq under the oil-for-food program. The pharmaceuticals haven't been delivered, U.N. officials said. 	   Sudan's efforts to rally an investigation came as Pakistan criticized Washington for acting unilaterally on what it described as an international problem. 	   ''The problem here is not the right of self-defense. It is how the scourge of terrorism can best be eliminated from the world,'' said Pakistan's U.N. ambassador, Ahmad Kamal. ''And that requires an international consensus and that requires all of us sitting on the same side of the table.'' 	   U.S. Ambassador Bill Richardson defended the air strikes in a letter Thursday to Turk that said the moves complied with the rights of states to self-defense as enshrined in the U.N. charter and international law. 	   Repeated threats by Bin Laden's terrorist organization left Washington ''no choice but to use armed force to prevent these attacks from continuing,'' Richardson wrote. 	   He cited Article 51 of the U.N. charter, which states that nothing ''shall impair the inherent right of individual or collective self-defense if an armed attack occurs against a member of the United Nations.'' 	   China's U.N. ambassador, Shen Guofang, said Beijing was waiting for more information before deciding whether the United States had violated any U.N. norms. 	   Secretary-General Kofi Annan spoke to U.S. Secretary of State Madeleine Albright about the raids Thursday by phone from Mali, where Annan is vacationing, Eckhard said. 	   Annan repeated his condemnation of terrorism and said the attacks on the U.S. embassies ''illustrate the need for the international community to come together to combat this menace,'' Eckhard said.
Diplomats from more than a dozen nations were taken on a tour Friday of the Sudanese factory struck a day earlier by U.S. missiles. 	   Firemen still rushed about, their faces covered with surgical masks to keep out the smell of burning plastic as they tried to put out blazes that persisted more than 24 hours after the attack. 	   ''We ask the American people to push their government to stop interfering in our internal affairs,'' said Bishop Gabriel Rorej, minister of state for foreign affairs who showed the diplomats around. ''We are innocent people, and we renounce terrorism, and we are not a safe haven for terrorists and we will never be so.'' 	   President Clinton ordered the attack on the El-Shifa Pharmaceutical Industries Co. on Thursday on grounds the factory was producing precursors for the deadly VX chemical weapon. American missiles also struck suspected bases of Muslim extremist Osama bin Laden in Afghanistan. 	   The factory complex is in an industrial zone that is surrounded by mud and brick houses, mainly for factory workers. 	   At least three dozen anti-riot police guarded the road leading to the site to try to keep away gawkers. 	   The pharmaceutical factory complex consists of a half-dozen buildings, two of which _ a cafeteria and a storage building _ were still smoldering on Friday. 	   Two floors of the four-story administration building were flattened in the missile attack, and half of the main two-story factory was destroyed. A warehouse also sustained heavy damage from a missile hit. 	   One missile that landed between buildings left a crater about 2 meters (yards) in diameter and two meters deep. It was quickly filling up with water from the fire-fighting efforts. 	   Pills, smashed plastic medicine bottles and paper cartons were scattered over the ground, along with concrete rubble and shards of glass. 	   Sidahmed Hajj Hamad, administrative director at El-Shifa, estimated the damage to the 2-year-old factory at dlrs 100 million. He said the owner was Sudanese businessman Salah-Eddin Ahmed Idriss, who lives in Saudi Arabia. 	   He described El-Shifa as ''the largest pharmaceutical factory we had in this country'' and added: ''We never produced any chemical material.'' 	   As the diplomats toured, about 100 Sudanese women _ most in the head scarves of devout Muslims _ protested outside the factory gate, shouting ''America should be destroyed!'' and ''The factory should be rebuilt!'' 	   Khadisha Ali, a sophomore from an Islamic university who led the chanting, told The Associated Press: ''We condemn this American aggression on our country. We call on the world community to come to the aid of Sudan.''
Sudanese Foreign Minister Mustafa Osman Ismail asked the United States on Friday to send a fact-finding committee to inspect the alleged chemical weapons factory in Khartoum. 	   The foreign minister spoke to reporters after arriving in Baghdad a day after U.S. missiles devastated a factory in the Sudanese capital. The United States said the plant produced the ingredients of chemical weapons. Sudan said it produced pharmaceutical products. 	   ''We, as Sudanese, are ready to receive a specialized committee from the American administration to come and freely investigate whether this factory ... has anything to do with chemical (weapons),'' Ismail said. 	   Such a committee could also check whether the factory was owned by Osama Bin Laden, the Afghanistan-based extremist whom the Americans have blamed for the bombings of its embassies in Kenya and Tanzania on Aug. 7, the foreign minister said. 	   If the Americans proved the factory was producing chemical agents, ''we will accept the attempt (attack),'' Ismail added. 	   Addressing the same press conference, Iraqi Foreign Minister Mohammed Saeed al-Sahhaf condemned Thursday's attack on the north Khartoum factory, in which hospital officials say 10 people were injured. 	   The attack in Khartoum and the simultaneous strike on Bin Laden's camps in Afghanistan were a ''totally unwarranted act of aggression,'' al-Sahhaf said. 	   ''They (the Americans) are behaving like international mercenaries.'' 	   Ismail, who is making a three-day visit to Iraq, crossed into the country from Jordan. U.N. sanctions imposed after Iraq's invasion of Kuwait in 1990 ban flights to and from Iraq.   ms-jbm
President Omar el-Bashir launched a diplomatic offensive Friday to protest the U.S. missile strike on a factory in the Sudanese capital. 	   After an emergency meeting with his Cabinet, el-Bashir said Sudan would file complaints with the United Nations, the Arab League and the Organization of African Unity. 	   He said Sudan could ''prove that the factory is specifically for pharmaceutical production'' and not the chemical weapons facility described by U.S. officials. 	   El-Bashir later spoke at a rally outside his office. Sudanese who poured to the rally from Friday prayers at the city's mosques chanted ''Down, Down USA!'' and burned an American flag. 	   The final casualty toll in the missile strike remained unclear. 	   Khartoum Hospital officials said 10 people were being treated for injuries, including four in critical condition. 	   Workers at the site said there was still concern that some victims could be buried under the rubble. They told The Associated Press that the factory's janitor and his family still hadn't been accounted for. 	   Sidahmed Hajj Hamad, administrative director at the factory, estimated the damage at dlrs 100 million. 	   Clinton ordered the attack on the factory in Khartoum in retaliation for the Aug. 7 bombings of the American embassies in Kenya and Tanzania. U.S. missiles also struck suspected camps of Muslim militant Osama bin Laden in Afghanistan. 	   El-Bashir said that the factory _ the El-Shifa Pharmaceutical Industries Co. in the North Khartoum neighborhood _ was hit by six Tomahawk missiles. 	   He said a seventh fell short of the target but did not indicate if it did any damage. 	   At the factory, enveloped in a white haze caused by smoldering fires, brown glass jars sat in piles amid bricks and twisted sheet metal. Soldiers and civil defense workers in surgical masks milled around the site. A white box for latex gloves and blue cartons for anti-biotics were piled next to the building. 	   There was little security late Friday and visitors were allowed to enter the deserted factory unhindered. 	   Earlier in the day, a young woman who worked at the factory had asked The AP: ''Are these people crazy? Do you think this is really a weapons factory?'' 	   State-run Sudan television said the factory, which opened in 1996, produced about half of the country's medicines. Its main products were reported to be antibiotics and drugs to treat malaria and tuberculosis. 	   Sudan continued to charge that Clinton took the action to divert public attention from the grand jury investigation into his relationship with former White House intern Monica Lewinsky. 	   A statement issued by the Sudanese Embassy in the Kenyan capital Nairobi said that ''the timing was chosen to serve the wish of a sexual pervert and maniac to divert attention away from his crumbling credibility and reputation.'' 	   The podium at the rally el-Bashir addressed was decorated with pictures of Clinton and Lewinsky and bore the slogan ''Clinton: Screw Monica, not Sudan.'' 	   El-Bashir said that ''Clinton and America will have to pay. ... Sudan is for Islam, and we will not be bullied by Americans.'' 	   He pledged to ''pursue all diplomatic channels'' over the missile attack but also said the government was ''opening all training camps'' for volunteers for the national militia. 	   Overnight, Sudanese demonstrators stormed the empty U.S. Embassy compound in Khartoum and pulled down the American flag to protest the attack. 	   The State Department ordered local staff to leave the U.S. Embassy after the bombings of embassies in Nairobi, Kenya, and Dar es-Salaam two weeks ago. American diplomats were pulled out of Khartoum in 1996.   mo/as-eap/jbm
Sudan asked the Security Council to convene an urgent meeting to authorize a fact-finding investigation into the ''barbaric, unjust'' U.S. airstrikes on a Khartoum factory. 	   The Security Council was expected to take up the matter on Monday, council sources said Friday. 	   Washington's justification that Thursday's bombing raids were an act of self-defense were ''very naive, lacking in logic and baseless because Sudan did not carry out any act or threat against the United States,'' said a letter from the state minister at the ministry of external relations. 	   The minister, H.E. Bishop Gobrial Roric, urged the council to ''condemn this barbaric, unjust aggression and make the United States responsible for the human and material damage.'' 	   The letter, sent to council president Danilo Turk of Slovenia, was intended to lodge Sudan's formal complaint that Thursday's U.S. airstrikes on a Khartoum pharmaceutical factory were a breach of the U.N. charter and a violation of its sovereignty. 	   U.S. officials have said they were targeting a terrorist chemical plant linked to a suspect in the U.S. embassy bombings in east Africa. 	   Bahrain, the lone Arab on the council, was expected to raise the issue at the council meeting Monday. The Arab Group of states and another group of Islamic states met Friday at the United Nations to express support for Sudan's effort. 	   The United States hadn't decided what it's response would be, said a U.S. official. 	   U.S. forces carried out the strikes in retaliation for the bombings at U.S. embassies in Nairobi, Kenya and Dar es Salaam, Tanzania, which killed over 250 people. 	   U.S. officials have said the cruise missile attack on the Khartoum factory was designed to wipe out a terrorist chemical plant linked to Osama bin Laden, whom U.S. officials accuse in the embassy bombings. 	   In his four-page letter, Roric denied that bin Laden owns the pharmaceutical factory and described accusations that the factory produces chemical weapons as ''untrue,'' adding ''the United States government does not have evidence.'' 	   The United Nations confirmed Friday that it had contracted the el-Shifa plant to supply 100,000 liters of veterinary pharmaceuticals for Iraq under the oil-for-food program. The pharmaceuticals haven't been delivered, U.N. officials said. 	   Roric called for an ''emergency Security Council meeting to discuss this aggression, and send a technical fact-finding mission to investigate the American claims and take the necessary measures to guarantee (the attack) won't be repeated and guarantee the safety and security of my country.'' 	   Sudan's efforts to rally an investigation came as Pakistan criticized Washington for acting unilaterally for what it said was an international problem. 	   ''The problem here is not the right of self-defense. It is how the scourge of terrorism can best be eliminated from the world,'' said Pakistan's U.N. ambassador, Ahmad Kamal. ''And that requires an international consensus and that requires all of us sitting on the same side of the table.'' 	   In a statement, Sudan's mission said ''the aggression is a flagrant violation to the sovereignty and territorial integrity of Sudan,'' that violated Article 2 of the U.N. charter, which says member states must refrain from using force against other states. 	   U.S. Ambassador Bill Richardson defended the air strikes in a letter Thursday to Turk that said the moves complied with the rights of states to self-defense as enshrined in the U.N. charter and international law. 	   He cited Article 51 of the U.N. charter, which states have the right to self-defense if attacked. 	   Afghanistan's U.N. ambassador, Raban Farhadi, in an interview with the AP called for a formal investigation into the strikes and was consulting with council members to raise the issue before the council. 	   ''We insist on the necessity of diplomatic action because military action may lead to harming civilians,'' said Farhadi, who represents the ousted government of President Burhanuddin Rabbani, ousted by the Taliban in 1996.
Cal coach Jeff Tedford hasn't wavered in his resolve to stay away from the BCS politics involved with Saturday's game at Southern Miss.
The Bears are No. 4 in the current BCS standings. In order to stay in line for a Rose Bowl berth, they need to win at Hattiesburg, USC to beat UCLA and to stay ahead of Texas in the BCS standings.
The Longhorns are No. 5, separated from Cal by a narrow margin -- so small that a handful of votes in the coaches' or writers' polls could knock Cal out of the Rose Bowl and into the less prestigious Holiday Bowl. Presumably a decisive Cal win Saturday could influence poll voters, although the margin of victory is not a factor in the computerized elements of the standings.
"We can't control any of that," Tedford said. "The only thing we can do is prepare our best this week to go play a very good Southern Miss team in a hostile environment and let everything else take care of itself."
The BCS is under fire again. After Texas beat Texas A&M on Saturday, Longhorns coach Mack Brown went so far as to issue a public plea to voters. And some coaches have suggested the system forces them to run up scores to influence voters.
"We have not done that," Tedford said. "Our philosophy is we play the game to win, and when the game looks like it's in control it's our obligation and it's our thought to get new players in the game to gain experience and not try to run the score up."
Later, speaking in the context of how Cal prepares for every game, Tedford may have offered some hope to fans fretting over Cal's BCS dilemma.
"Obviously we'd like to start fast and finish strong," he said. "That's something we'd like to do."
Buddies again: After the Southern Miss game, originally set for Sept. 16, was postponed because of Hurricane Ivan, Golden Eagles coach Jeff Bower grew angry with Cal officials.
He said Cal was "unprofessional" in announcing the postponement while Southern Miss officials were exploring the possibility of moving the Thursday game to the weekend.
The Bears were unable to change air travel plans or secure hotel rooms. In any event, Tedford said he was concerned primarily with the safety of his players because Hattiesburg was in the projected path of the hurricane. He also noted he tried to talk to Bower early on about his concerns, but Bower didn't return his call.
Ivan subsequently missed the area. And Tedford and Bower subsequently talked.
"Everything is fine," Tedford said. "Jeff and I have a good relationship."
Bower also said this week he had no hard feelings.
"No, not with me," he said. "I just didn't agree with how the decision was made."
Wide out in, maybe: Wide receiver Jonathan Makonnen, out since the Oct. 23 Arizona game with a liver contusion, could return this week.
Tedford said Makonnen was given "half a thumbs up" in his most recent medical evaluation. "We'll see how he feels through the week ... how he responds to more contact in practice."
The Bears will probably be without receiver Burl Toler III, who saw limited action in the Big Game after missing four games with patella tendinitis in both knees.
"Burl continues to be hampered by his knees," Tedford said. "And that is unfortunate for Burl, unfortunate for us."

In the center of a forest of oil rigs that ooze petrol, thousands of Albanians have become victims of the pollution that has devastated the county's main communist-era oil field, Patos-Marinza.
"We are all ill. A generation of our children is poisoned," said Hassan Grevi, 42, who has been on unemployment benefits for years and lives near the platform of an oil rig which is swimming in black liquid.
Some 2,000 oil wells were in action in the late 1970s near this southeastern town, in a region known as Patos-Marinza. Only 700 remain in working order today, most having been abandoned due to negligence during the communist years.
"The level of pollution in Patos-Marinza is very worrying for the inhabitants," said Adrian Jasimi, an adviser to the ministry of energy.
"We drink water but we don't even know if it's drinkable. In fact, we don't know what we're really drinking," said Agif, a 70-year-old pensioner who worked for 40 years in the oil industry.
"We've asked the authorities to intervene but nothing has been done."
Of 400 tonnes of oil extracted daily, up to two percent or eight tonnes leaks from the oil rigs' rusted networks of pipes. The air is choked by thick clouds of gas.
Albanians were barred from living in the area during the communist regime from the late 1940s until 1990. But those restrictions have been relaxed and around 4,000 people now live beneath the oil field's toxic clouds.
Children play among the wells and many locals complain of respiratory illnesses and headaches.
"Many kids have been injured while playing near the derricks. One of them was killed as he fell into a well," said Grevi, whose nephew had a leg amputated after such a fall.
The chemical tang of petrol and gas makes the air difficult to breathe.
"I often have headaches. In summer, the odour is unbearable. Many kids are contaminated and have respiratory illness," said Roudina, a 30-year-old mother of two.
"The government does nothing and aid that we receive is insufficient," said another local.
"Patos-Marinza is a sinister place. It will be so difficult to remove the damage and it will require a serious investment. Without foreign investment the problem will never be solved," said another.
For Albania, considered the poorest country of Europe, the rehabilitation of Patos-Marinza would appear to be all but impossible.
Since 1990, foreign companies including Austria's OVM and American West have invested 430 million dollars (324 million euros) to restart petrol production in Albania. The country's oil reserves are estimated at more than 440 million tonnes.
Oil productiion has fallen from two million tonnes a year in the late 1970s to about 400,000 tonnes now. Albania has to import 600,000 tonnes annually.
Foreign companies have also shown an interest in exploring for new fields and modernizing the existing infrastructure.
Share prices on the Jakarta Stock Exchange closed higher Wednesday on buying spree targeting bank shares.
Turnover totaled 3.47 billion shares worth 2.19 trillion rupiah (242.46 million US dollars).
Advancers outnumbered decliners 74 to 58 while 93 other issues were left unchanged.
British Prime Minister Tony Blair said Saturday that the long-term effects of the Asian tsunami would need attention from the international community for months, if not years.
Speaking of his horror at the "global catastrophe," Blair said the impact of the tsunami that struck last Sunday would be long lasting.
"At first it seemed a terrible disaster, a terrible tragedy. But I think as the days have gone on, people have recognized it as a global catastrophe," Blair said in an interview with Britain's Channel Four News.
"The consequences of this are not just short-term and immediate but long-term and will require a great deal of work by the international community for months, if not years, to come," Blair said when he is still on a family holiday in Egypt.
Blair also told the Channel Four that he has been in contact with US President George W. Bush over the disaster and Bush made it very clear that he wanted the United Nations to be in the lead in driving the global aid efforts.
Blair's comments came as donations from the British public to a disaster fund reached 60 million pounds (about 115.8 million US dollars), exceeding the government's 50 million pledge.
President of the Peruvian Congress Antero Flores-Araoz condemned Saturday the violent occupation of a police station by ultra-nationalist Entocacerista Movement, at the city of Andahuaylas, southeast of the country.
"This is to be absolutely condemned, and it is an offense against people," said the legislator to the press, after indicating that in a democratic system "a police station cannot be attacked."
The rebel group, made up by some 150 militants and led by Antauro Humala, a former captain of the Peruvian army, occupied Saturday the Andahuaylas station, resulting in six injured, including four police agents (one of them seriously hurt) and two rebels.
Andahuaylas is a province of Apurimac department, some 1,000 kilometers southeast of this capital.
Humala said the attack went against the authority of Peruvian President Alejandro Toledo, whose resignation was demanded by the rebels.
The Interior Ministry sent a 400-strong contingent from Lima and other neighboring regions to the Andahuaylas police station.
Antauro Humala and his brother Ollanta - an army commander who recently retired- had headed an insurgency in south Peru against disgraced president Alberto Fujimori (1990-2000).
Secretary-General Kofi Annan appointed a new chief of staff, the first of what he described as a "series of changes" among senior United Nations personnel.
Mark Malloch Brown, currently the administrator for the U.N. Development Program, will begin his new job as Annan's right-hand man on Jan. 19. He replaces Iqbal Riza, who retired Dec. 22.
Annan said he intends to make other new senior appointments, but declined to give details. "This is the first in a series of changes," he said.
Annan said Malloch Brown would help him lead initiatives to improve the performance of the United Nations and overhaul its management.
Because of the current tsunami crisis in Asia, Malloch Brown, a British citizen, will also continue in his role as UNDP administrator until a replacement can be found, Annan said. "There is clearly a need for continuity at this critical moment," he said.
Annan said he had a long list of candidates to head the UNDP but those candidates do not include an American because U.S. citizens held the position for more than 40 years before Malloch Brown's appointment. Americans also held the top posts in two of the U.N.'s most prominent agencies _ UNICEF and the World Food Program.
Annan said he had known Malloch Brown for 25 years since working with him at the U.N. High Commission for Refugees, and described him as an "immensely capable leader and manager."
Malloch Brown said the United Nations was "at a difficult moment." In addition to coordinating relief and reconstruction aid for the countries hit by the Dec. 26 tsunami, he listed several challenges the United Nations faces in the coming months.
These include an initial report into alleged corruption in the U.N. oil-for-food program, which is expected this month, and the fact that the United Nations this year will try to push for progress on targets to reduce poverty and illiteracy, and improve health care worldwide.
He also noted that "it has been the subject of wide commentary that staff morale has not been at its highest at this time."
Annan paid tribute to Riza, a Pakistani, who worked for him for seven years. "He has offered wise counsel and advice throughout, through thick and think. He well deserves his long-deferred retirement, but I am sure I will continue to rely on his advice," he said.
Annan refused to comment on a report in The New York Times that one of his top advisors, Kieran Prendergast, a British national, is being considered for the post of special envoy to the Middle East, which was vacated by Terje Roed-Larsen, a Norwegian.
"Kieran is still the undersecretary-general for the Department of Political Affairs, but I must admit that I do intend to make further changes _ changes that would affect senior people in the building and maybe some who are outside headquarters," Annan said. "So this is the first in a series of changes or reshuffling that may happen."
He said that as he appointed Americans, he would maintain the tradition of bringing aboard both Republicans and Democrats.
Three New Zealanders have been confirmed dead in areas devastated by Asian tsunamis and five remain missing in Thai tourist resorts, Prime Minister Helen Clark said Tuesday.
The third victim, a 74-year-old Canadian resident vacationing in Sri Lanka, was confirmed dead by relatives after being identified by fellow travelers.
June Kander was New Zealand-born but had lived in Canada's Quebec province for almost 40 years, her family said. Her remains had been cremated and would be returned to Canada, her nephew said Tuesday.
Clark said there were grave fears for five New Zealanders missing since waves engulfed Thai beaches on Dec. 26. Another 106 New Zealanders, known to be in Thailand at the time of the disaster, remained unaccounted for, she said.
Clark and Foreign Minister Phil Goff will fly to Jakarta for Thursday's summit in Jakarta, where Asean leaders which will discuss relief and reconstruction.
U.S. Secretary of State Colin Powell and U.N. Secretary General Kofi Annan will also attend.
Clark said the summit would focus on aid efforts, but would also consider the need for rehabilitation in devastated areas and the possibility of establishing tsunami warning systems.
"One of the sad things on this terrible day (is that) clearly the earthquake was detected by centers in the Pacific and detected elsewhere, but there were no systems to link people up and give warnings," she said.
"For the future we need to be looking at that, and whether some places should not be rebuilt, although there may not be a choice for some communities."
New Zealand Defense Force aircraft and personnel were operating in the worst-hit parts of Indonesia, and New Zealanders have rushed to support relief appeals.
A former top Romanian spy who defected to the United States in the late 1970s had his rank restored as a general in Romania's foreign espionage agency, media reported Thursday.
Ion Pacepa, deputy head of foreign intelligence under the late dictator, Nicolae Ceausescu, defected in 1978, shaking the pillars of Romania's communist regime. He was subsequently sentenced to death on charges of treason and desertion and all his property was confiscated.
After the fall of the Communist regime in 1989, Pacepa filed a lawsuit seeking to clear his name and recover his assets. In 1999, Romania's Supreme Court canceled his death sentence and ordered the government to return his property. His assets included a gun collection, paintings and rare wines.
Before ending his term as president last month, Ion Iliescu signed a decree reinstating Pacepa as a reserve general in Romania's foreign espionage agency, the daily Evenimentul Zilei reported.
Romania's Culture Minister Mona Musca said she agreed that Pacepa's paintings must be returned. The government would also have to pay him a pension as a retired general.
Pacepa lives currently in a secret location in the United States. He is also known for his book "Red Horizons," which showed intimate aspects of Nicolae and Elena Ceausescu's life and their oppressive regime.
More than 25 years after his defection, Romanians have mixed views on Pacepa's role.
People who held high positions under Ceausescu were reluctant to see the full rehabilitation of Pacepa, whom they still view as a traitor. But others admire him as a pro-democracy figure who hastened the fall of communism in this Balkan country.
Vacancy rates dropped for Los Angeles County's industrial and office markets in 2004, and further tightening is expected this year thanks to continued strong demand, a regional commercial brokerage firm said Tuesday.
The North Los Angeles market, which includes the San Fernando, Santa Clarita and Antelope valleys, as well as the Conejo Valley in Ventura County, had the tightest office market and one of the strongest industrial markets, according to the year-end report from GVA Daum's Los Angeles office.
Industrial vacancy rates hovered around 4 percent by the end of last year, and office vacancy rates dipped to their lowest level in four years.
"The broad office market performed very well in 2004," said Chad Jacobson, the company's vice president for research and marketing.
And demand for industrial space in the Los Angeles area is expected to escalate this year, in part because construction will dip to its lowest level in four years.
Developers are faced with high costs for land and construction materials, Jacobson said.
Last year area industrial markets were basically flat as the vacancy rate inched up to 4 percent from 3.9 percent in 2003's final quarter.
But this submarket had the highest rents, 67 cents a square foot, 11 cents higher than the regional average.
"For the last few years rental rates in the Valley have out-performed the other areas, and I think it (reflects) a desire to be in that marketplace," Jacobson said.
For all of Los Angeles County, the industrial vacancy rate decreased to 3.7 percent from 4.4 percent. That helped propel a 5.7 percent rent increase to 56 cents a square foot.
The numbers suggest a market at capacity, and lack of space is a concern because it could crimp economic expansion.
"I term the low industrial rate we've been seeing for the past couple of years one of the wonders of the Western world," said Jack Kyser, chief economist at the Los Angeles County Economic Development Corp.
"People want to be in Southern California and Los Angeles despite the higher costs."
But it might be time to think about recycling some of the marginal industrial sites, like auto-wrecking yards, to bring in more manufacturing and logistics jobs, essential to nurturing the middle class.
"If people took a drive along I-5 in the the Northeast Valley in a double-decker bus so they could look out, they would be horrified at some of the land uses you see there," Kyser said.
Office vacancy rates are higher than those in the industrial sector, but the market is still strong, Jacobson said.
The Valley area had the tightest market as the vacancy rate fell to 11.8 percent from 14.3 percent at the end of 2003. And this market had the highest asking rent, $2.23 a square foot.
For the broader market, the vacancy rate fell to 15 percent from 17 percent. But the average rent across all submarkets fell 2.4 percent to $2.04 a square foot.
Vacancy rates have been falling for two years, a trend that's expected to continue this year for two reasons: the improving economy and a constrained construction sector.
"Construction activity went way down, and it allowed the market to absorb space that had been built over the last few years," Jacobson said.
X X X
The U.S. Congress is gearing up for a fight about whether to ease restrictions on military ties with Indonesia.
Last week, Republican Sen. Kit Bond, speaking on the Senate floor, praised Indonesian President Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono as a reformer and urged improved military ties between the two countries.
On Tuesday, Democratic Sen. Patrick Leahy responded that the restrictions were reasonable and should not be lifted until Indonesia has proved its commitment to human rights.
While democratic changes have reduced the Indonesian military's influence in politics, "a key gap remains regarding justice for the victims of atrocities, including crimes against humanity," Leahy said on the Senate floor.
Officials of the Bush administration have suggested that the restrictions be reconsidered.
In a visit to Indonesia last month, Deputy Defense Secretary Paul Wolfowitz said the United States needs to consider how it can strengthen Indonesia's democracy. He said closer contact with the U.S. military would strengthen the Indonesian military's commitment to human rights.
Alan Larson, the undersecretary of state for economic affairs, said at a congressional hearing last week that the Indonesian military could have responded better to December's tsunami "if they had had more operational experience in working with the United States, stronger English capabilities, and if they had had more capable equipment."
Congress severed military aid to Indonesia in 1999 when Indonesian soldiers were blamed for widespread killing and destruction of property in the separatist East Timor region. Congress later prohibited resumed military ties until the U.S. government has determined that Indonesia is cooperating fully with an FBI investigation of the Aug. 31, 2002, killings of two American teachers in Papua province.
The Wall Street Journal reported this week that aides to Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice are recommending she report to Congress that Indonesia is cooperating.
State Department spokesman Richard Boucher said Monday no decision has been made. "It's a situation, though, that is under review, and we have been looking at it," Boucher said.
In his Senate speech, Bond said Yudhoyono has made "a strong commitment to reform, to a recognition of human rights and to fighting corruption. "
Bond said the restrictions have hurt Indonesia's ability to relieve suffering in the aftermath of the tsunami. He said Indonesia could not buy spare parts for C-130 transport planes, and the U.S. military had difficulty communicating with its Indonesian counterparts because they speak English so poorly.
"If our forces are to participate in military or relief operations with those of friendly nations, we must train together," Bond said.
Leahy, the top Democrat on the Senate subcommittee that oversees foreign aid spending, said the restrictions do not prevent the Indonesian military from participating in some training programs and military exercise. He said the United States allowed Indonesia to buy C-130 spare parts for humanitarian purposes.
"Our law, which was narrowly written to provide an incentive for reform while allowing military contacts to continue, strikes the right balance," Leahy said.
IOC president Jacques Rogge defended the Vancouver Organizing Committee on Tuesday, saying the Olympic brand needs to be protected from improper use.
Rogge, who was making his first visit to Vancouver since the Canadian city was awarded the 2010 Winter Olympics, said the organizing committee was right to ask local business' to stop using Olympic names and logos.
"We want to work to make this Olympics as pure as possible," Rogge said. "We want the Olympic rings to keep their symbolism and their value."
Rogge also called the Olympics hypocritical for not going after corporate involvement prior to 1960.
"Once upon a time, the Olympic movement did not want to be associated with the corporate world. The Olympic Committee was working in isolation," he said. "It was hypocritical at that time because the games were very elitist. Only the rich countries could participate."
Rogge, who met with Canadian Prime Minister Paul Martin and other dignitaries earlier in the week, said television has made the games more inclusive.
Security also remains a major concern, Rogge said.
"No one can hide the fact that we are living in a different world where security is of paramount importance," he said. "We are extremely pleased by the preparations and the close cooperation between the (Vancouver) organizing committee and the public authorities."
Rogge also spoke about the new steroid designed to avoid detection in standard doping tests, which was uncovered by Canadian scientists.
"It's a step in the right direction," Rogge said of the substance _ called desoxy-methyl-testosterone, or DMT. "The fight against doping will be eternal."
Vancouver will be the third Canadian city to host the Olympics. Montreal was the site of the Summer Games in 1976, and Calgary hosted the Winter Games in 1988.
President Martin Torrijos defended on Monday his administration's granting of a consular job to a daughter of former dictator Manuel Noriega, on the grounds that "children cannot be made to pay for the sins of their fathers."
Torrijos _ himself the son of late strongman Omar Torrijos, who ruled Panama before Noriega _ said Sandra Noriega was qualified for the US$800-per-month (euro600) administrative post at Panama's consulate in the Dominican Republic, where she went to live after her father was overthrown by a U.S. invasion in 1989.
"It is unjust to foster hatred or rancor, or try to discriminate or blame children for the sins of the fathers," Torrijos told reporters.
"She has as much right as any other Panamanian to aspire to a government job," Torrijos said, noting that the government was saving money because the younger Noriega already lives in the Dominican Republic. Dispatching somebody from Panama for the job would have been more costly.
Omar Torrijos seized power in a 1968 coup and ruled Panama until he was killed in a plane crash in 1981. Manuel Noriega subsequently took control of the army and used rigged elections to remain in office for eight years.
The elder Noriega is currently serving a 30-year term in a Miami federal prison for protecting Colombian cocaine shipments through Panama in the 1980s. He is scheduled for release in 2007 after deductions in his sentence for good behavior.
Crude futures inched toward US$52 a barrel Tuesday as cold weather in the United States threatened to drive up consumption and exhaust an already-thin heating oil supply market.
Light, sweet crude for April delivery rose six cents to US$51.81 a barrel on the New York Mercantile Exchange, mid-morning in Asia. Heating oil trading was suspended Tuesday.
Traders fear that the colder-than-normal weather in the United States, expected to last more than a week, will drive up heating oil demand_and prices, further straining supplies. U.S. inventories of heating oil are running more than 7 percent below year-ago levels at about 41 million barrels.
Victor Shum, oil analyst at Texas-headquartered Purvin & Gertz in Singapore, said the weather was a short-term factor in driving up prices, and a that more critical factor will be whether the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries adjusts output at a meeting March 16 in Iran.
"The likely consensus is that there'll be no change in production ceilings from OPEC," said Shum.
The president of the OPEC, Sheikh Ahmed Fahad Al Sabah, said Monday that the cartel was likely to maintain its production ceiling at the March meeting, according to Dow Jones Newswires. If prices continue to rise, the group may consider raising output, Al Sabah said.
Al Sabah, who is also Kuwait's oil minister, said "almost all" members of OPEC agree that the cartel does not need to cut production, Dow Jones reported.
However, Qatar's Oil Minister Abdullah bin Hamad said on Sunday that OPEC might "cut supply to stop inventories from building" in the second quarter, when demand typically tapers off.
Shum said he expects prices to "remain between the high US$40s to the low US$50," until the March 16 meeting.
Crude futures are roughly 43 percent higher than a year ago. Prices have risen sharply in recent week on concerns about cold weather, the world's tight supply-demand balance and the declining value of the dollar.
A Syrian official said Tuesday that President Bashar Assad did not tell an Italian newspaper that he believed the United States might attack his country after the war in Iraq.
An "official source" denied to the state-run news agency SANA "what some news agencies mentioned, reporting from the Italian La Repubblica newspaper, that Mr. President Bashar Assad expects an American attack on Syria after the war in Iraq."
Monday's Rome-based La Repubblica quoted Assad as saying that "Washington has imposed sanctions and isolated us at other times. But each time the circle hasn't closed in on us."
"However, if you ask me if I am expecting an armed attack, well, I've seen it coming since the end of the war in Iraq," the paper quoted the Syrian president as saying.
The official source told SANA that "such talk did not appear in Mr. President's conversation with the Italian newspaper."
A federal judge on Tuesday ordered that an American student accused of conspiring with al-Qaida be held without bail after authorities said he had admitted discussing assassination plots against President Bush and other U.S. leaders, along with suicide hijackings and other terrorist attacks on U.S. soil.
Ahmed Omar Abu Ali, 23, admitted on ''multiple'' occasions that after leaving his northern Virginia home to study in Saudi Arabia in 2002, he joined an al-Qaida cell and discussed a wide range of attacks with other operatives, FBI agent Barry Cole testified during a bail hearing in U.S. District Court.
Cole and Assistant U.S. Attorney David Laufman told the court that both Abu Ali and a second alleged al-Qaida operative in Saudi custody had confirmed having many conversations about killing Bush -- including using three snipers to ensure success -- and kidnapping or killing members of Congress, administration officials and U.S. soldiers.
The two men also talked about blowing up warships and fighter planes at American military installations, freeing Islamic militants at the U.S. detention facility at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, and launching another ''Sept. 11-type attack,'' Cole testified.
In that last scenario, Cole said, Abu Ali and the second man concluded that they could board U.S.-bound jetliners in Britain or Australia and wait for the planes to enter U.S. airspace before hijacking them and flying them into landmark buildings. Laufman said the targets were along the East Coast, but did not identify them.
''There is clear and convincing evidence that this defendant presents an extraordinarily grave danger to this community and to this nation,'' Laufman said in opposing defense motions that Abu Ali be released on bail.
U.S. Magistrate Judge Liam O'Grady agreed, and ruled after a three-hour hearing that Abu Ali must remain behind bars until his trial on charges of providing material support to a terrorist organization and conspiracy. If convicted on all counts, Abu Ali faces up to 80 years in federal prison.
Defense lawyer John Kenneth Zwerling did not contest the specifics of the government's case. Instead, he said Abu Ali had been tortured by Saudi authorities into confessing to things he did not do or even discuss.
Zwerling also said the Justice Department ignored Abu Ali's alleged confessions to Saudi authorities for more than a year, and that one FBI assistant director, Michael Mason, even told community members last year that U.S. authorities were not interested in detaining Abu Ali if the Saudi government ever released him.
Zwerling contended that Justice Department only sought a grand jury indictment against Abu Ali as a way of shutting down a civil lawsuit his family filed against the U.S. government, alleging it was partially responsible for him being tortured and illegally detained by Riyadh.
The prosecution denied Tuesday that Ali had been tortured while in Saudi Arabia or that the United States did anything to put him in danger of being tortured while there.
Abu Ali was arrested in June 2003 while attending the University of Medina in Saudi Arabia but was never charged with a crime by Saudi authorities. He was returned to the United States last week and indicted by a federal grand jury.
(Optional add end)
Legal experts said that the case will be closely watched because it will test the Justice Department's ability to prosecute a case based on evidence gathered by another government.
Abu Ali allegedly made his incriminating statements to Saudi interrogators and jail officials in 2003. He also wrote a confession that was approved by two Saudi magistrates, and then allowed himself to be videotaped reading it, according to court records filed in the case.
And that raises the question of whether Abu Ali's statements are admissible as evidence in a U.S. court, especially since he is claiming that they were made under duress, several legal experts said.
''For a criminal case, it has to be first-hand evidence. They'd have to fly the Saudi guys over here to present it in court,'' said one former federal prosecutor who has counseled the Bush administration on terrorism issues.
Even the signed confession could be ruled inadmissible unless prosecutors prove that Abu Ali did not make it under any kind of pressure, said the former prosecutor, speaking only on the condition of anonymity given the sensitivities of the ongoing case.
On the flip side, the former prosecutor said, the murky legal statutes regarding such matters could force the U.S. government to free Abu Ali despite its belief that he poses a grave danger to U.S. citizens.
''In American law at the moment, until and unless you have admissible proof beyond a reasonable doubt, you cannot restrain a citizen in any fashion,'' the former prosecutor said. ''Now they have to prove the case. Absent that, they are back to having the guy out on the streets.''
Abu Ali, dressed in a green prison jumpsuit and showing no emotion, remained silent during the hearing. Dozens of family members were present to show support, but were told by a bailiff that they could not attempt to speak to Abu Ali, as they had in a previous court session last week.
Most comedians wouldn't attempt to conduct a cross-examination any more than most lawyers would try to headline in a comedy club.
And while no one will mistake the San Fernando Valley courtroom -- where jurors are considering whether actor Robert Blake killed his wife -- for the Laugh Factory, both sides have exploited humor as a tool for making their cases.
Amid gruesome testimony on blood-spatter patterns and ballistics, defense attorney M. Gerald Schwartzbach and prosecutor Shellie L. Samuels have waxed comedic on a variety of subjects, including the pitfalls of modern marriage and musings on why some people claim they buy Playboy magazine only for the articles.
Moments of levity serve an important purpose within the staid confines of the courtroom by relieving tension, putting witnesses at ease and allowing lawyers to connect with a jury, according to attorneys and legal scholars.
''Humor is not going to change a case,'' said San Diego criminal defense attorney Charles Seville, co-author of two books on courtroom humor.
But if you can make the jury laugh, Seville said, ''you are going to be more persuasive.''
Humor can also hammer home a point or deflect an opponent's argument.
Schwartzbach was sparring recently with an expert on crime scene reconstruction who had studied the trajectories of the bullets that struck and killed Blake's wife, Bonny Lee Bakley, in a parked car in Studio City four years ago.
It was important for Schwartzbach to undermine the testimony. He wanted jurors to conclude that there was no reliable way the height of the killer could be deduced.
With the timing of a stand-up comic, Schwartzbach asked whether jurors could conclude that Bakley could have been shot by either ''Gary Coleman or Shaquille O'Neal.''
The lawyers aren't the only courtroom cutups.
University of California, Los Angeles professor Ronald Siegel is an expert on the sustained use of hard-core drugs, which several key witnesses for the prosecution admitted using. He drew laughs when he described some of the research upon which his credentials are based: tending a cage with crack-smoking monkeys in a basement on campus.
''I crawled into the cage with the monkeys and played monkey to make sure that the smoking tube was working,'' Siegel said. ''I didn't become a crazy monkey from any of that. I do like bananas.''
Even Blake, whose tears in and out of court have been the subject of much debate, laughed during a reference to his lack of home-decorating skills, and again when Schwartzbach described his purple-and-gold van as ''hideous.''
In the Blake trial, each attorney has displayed a distinctive style of humor while vying for the hearts and minds of the jury.
Schwartzbach, soft-spoken and formal in ever-present bow ties, tends toward wry and self-deprecating one-liners.
''Stipulate to being married,'' the Mill Valley lawyer interjected when a witness testified she had ignored her husband at dinner at Vitello's, the Studio City restaurant where Bakley and Blake had dined immediately before Bakley was slain.
Samuels, a hard-nosed veteran prosecutor who has won 48 out of 49 murder cases, has been particularly caustic off-the-cuff.
As Schwartzbach was directing jurors to look at a blowup of a headline on the cover of a Playboy magazine, Samuels quipped that she was surprised the attorney hadn't focused on the super-sized image of the scantily clad woman.
At one point in the trial, which began in December, retired Hollywood stuntman Roy ''Snuffy'' Harrison, who said Blake had asked him to kill Bakley, was being pressed by Samuels on a bit of testimony that seemed to suffer from faulty memory. She handed him a transcript of his earlier testimony and asked him to refer to it, as is common in criminal trials:
Harrison: ''I fall on my head for 30 years, and you want me to read this?''
Samuels: ''Whose choice was it to fall on his head for 30 years?''
Harrison: ''My wife's.''
Santa Clara University School of Law professor Gerald Uelman, a member of the O.J. Simpson defense team, said many lawyers avoid humor, fearing it could appear rehearsed, or simply fall flat.
In the Blake trial, both lawyers have steered clear of mean-spirited, derisive and personal exchanges that can turn a jury off or earn a rebuke from the judge.
''If you're ridiculing somebody, the jury generally doesn't like to see that,'' said Laurie Levenson, a professor at Loyola Law School in Los Angeles and a former federal prosecutor. ''Jurors are more likely to identify with witnesses, not with the judge, lawyers or the defendant.''
to Eric Dubin, an attorney who has attended almost every day of the trial on behalf of Bakley's four children, said he hasn't been offended by the lighter moments. ''Cracking jokes during a jury trial is like kissing a girl: You need both timing and permission.''
Robert Blake's lawyer told jurors Thursday that they should discredit the testimony of two aging Hollywood stuntmen who say Blake asked them to kill his wife because they are drug addicts who have lied to authorities.
Each acknowledges he failed to tell police about Blake's alleged solicitations to kill his wife until Bonny Lee Bakley was fatally shot on May 4, 2001, near a restaurant where she and Blake had dinner, the lawyer said.
During his daylong summation of the two-month trial, M. Gerald Schwartzbach also disputed the accounts of several prosecution witnesses that Blake acted oddly the night his wife was killed, and denied that his client was acting when he wailed and moaned at the crime scene.
''Was it acting? Was it real?'' Schwartzbach said. ''It was real.''
Both stuntmen changed their statements about the details of the solicitations, including the type and color of the gun Blake showed them, whether Blake offered money for a hit and possible locations to carry out the slaying.
He said it was a dumb murder plot -- to commit the crime in a place where Blake is well known, near his favorite restaurant.
''I'll kill her in a neighborhood I'm recognized in,'' Schwartzbach said sarcastically. ''How absurd would that have been?''
Blake, 71, faces life in prison if convicted of killing Bakley. He also is charged with soliciting the stuntmen to kill her, punishable by 9 years in prison.
The prosecution had argued earlier that Blake despised his wife, and when he could not get anyone else to kill her, he pulled he trigger himself.
In her summation Wednesday, Deputy Los Angeles County District Attorney Shellie L. Samuels told jurors that Blake, a two-time Emmy Award winner, ''overestimated his acting abilities.''
She said the killing had ''freaked him out,'' causing him to become physically ill and unable to fulfill his plan to create an alibi by returning to the restaurant.
Not only did Blake have the opportunity to kill her, but he had motive, Samuels said, casting Bakley as a small-time scam artist who had tricked Blake -- who considered himself a streetwise tough guy -- into marriage by getting pregnant.
She said Blake fell in love with their now-4-year-old daughter, Rosie, and began scheming to gain sole custody of the child while trying to get rid of Bakley.
Schwartzbach reminded jurors that Gary McLarty testified that Blake never directly asked to kill his wife. He said the stuntman assumed what Blake wanted, and was wrong, the result of a ''very disturbed dysfunctional mind'' because of long-term drug use.
''He (McLarty) testified he was unclear in his mind what Mr. Blake was talking about,'' Schwartzbach said of McLarty who testified about a drug induced breakdown when he hallucinated that police were tunneling under his home and satellites were watching him from the skies.
''I'm sure a lot of things where unclear in Mr. McLarty's mind, using cocaine for 20 to 30 years,'' Schwartzbach said.
Schwartzbach downplayed records from a prepaid phone card and a restaurant where Blake and Ronald ''Duffy'' Hambleton ate, saying they do not confirm the substance of their conversations, only that they took place.
''What does that prove? That they met? Where's the corroboration that they were solicited to commit murder?'' he asked.
The lawyer also ridiculed the idea that Blake would ask these aging stuntmen -- one who had recently had a heart attack and they other missing a kidney -- to kill Bakley.
Schwartzbach also took aim at another key prosecution witness: hoodlum-turned-preacher Frank Minucci, who testified that Blake wanted his wife dead.
Minucci took money from the National Enquirer and testified for publicity, Schwartzbach said.
Travelers with a sense of adventure -- as well as those with shallow pockets -- are embracing hotel alternatives as varied as castles and couches.
Villa rentals abroad, home exchanges and ''couchsurfing'' all have their devotees, who are happy to forgo perks such as room service for the chance to make friends in foreign lands and sleep off the beaten tourist track.
I have yet to do a home exchange or flop on a stranger's couch but with longtime friends have rented villas in France (three times) and in Italy and Ireland. Only one place disappointed -- a shabby French chateau booked directly with the owner rather than through a reputable agency.
Carl Stewart, president of Massachusetts-based Vacanze in Italia, cautions travelers that booking a villa online is not like booking a known quantity such as a flight or a hotel. ''No one's going to put up unattractive pictures.'' (Photos of our ''magnificent'' chateau revealed neither the stained carpet nor the algae choking the moat.)
For a group, a villa offers camaraderie, comfort and the luxury of a large house, often with a pool. Each party pays the same or less than for a first-class hotel room. Factor in breakfasts and some dinners ''at home'' and savings multiply. Rentals may include a housekeeper and/or cook.
But villa rentals are not for everyone. Mara Solomon, owner of Massachusetts-based Homebase Abroad, which books Americans into high-end homes in Italy, has told some potential clients, ''You really need to be at some lovely hotel being looked after by a fleet of people.''
There is a culture gap, and Americans may have unrealistic expectations about such things as plumbing, air conditioning and distances. To an Italian, Solomon observes, every destination is just a ''five-minute walk.'' The reality may be a 20-minute hike along a road with no sidewalk, dodging ''a crazed driver in an Alfa Romeo, talking on a cell phone and smoking a cigarette.''
The first question to ask yourself, Solomon advises: ''What really matters to you? To some, what matters is a firm mattress.'' To others it might be proximity to museums.
Solomon's 45 listings range from $8,000 a week to $50,000 a week, which rents a property that sleeps 31. ''We don't do shabbiness, or too far on a dirt road, or presence of owners. And we look for basically one bathroom per bedroom,'' Solomon says. Unfortunately, European villas commonly have six bedrooms and two baths.
Among Solomon's tips for finding the right villa:
--Speak with someone who has seen the property. (Reliable agents inspect their listings.)
--Decide which is more important -- amenities or location.
Mike Thiel is founder of Hideaways International, a New Hampshire-based travel club for which members pay $185 a year for access to 16,000 rental listings -- villas, condos, apartments -- in 45 countries, as well as hotels offering member perks.
Members contact villa owners directly and negotiate price. Among his tips:
--Book early, up to a year in advance for top properties in popular locations such as Italy or France.
--Make sure you're compatible with your traveling companions. (Togetherness magnifies quirks.)
--Ask for current property photos and brochures and -- above all -- references from a previous renter.
(Begin optional trim)
Hideaways, which Thiel started in 1979, lists properties in a range of prices. His clients, he says, tend to understand that villa renting may include compromises.
The bug-phobic, for example, should know that ''almost no villa in Italy is going to come with screens.'' And, he says, ''there may be a combined washer and dryer with all these funny little hieroglyphics. It becomes a bit of an adventure and one needs to be somewhat flexible.
''The person who expects to get Four Seasons or Ritz-Carlton-type service all the time is not a candidate for a rental.''
If it is a group rental, there are decisions to be made on arrival. For example, who gets the best bedroom? Our group has always solved this issue good-naturedly by drawing cards. Over the years, things have evened out. How to handle household expenses? We always appoint a treasurer to take charge of a group kitty that's replenished as needed.
(End optional trim)
Home exchange is another option, albeit one that requires a certain amount of trust. You turn your home over to strangers and move into theirs. Usually no money is involved.
''Everybody's first question is, `How do I make sure my house isn't going to get trashed or ripped off?' '' says Ed Kushins, president of Hermosa Beach, Calif.-based HomeExchange. But, with 125,000 exchanges over 12 years, he says, his club has ''never had a case of anybody stealing anything (or) a case of malicious damage. We have had cases where people arrived back home and thought it might have been cleaned up a bit more.''
Getting your home ready for an exchange, he acknowledges, ''is more work than taking off to stay in a hotel for two weeks. You do have to clean up. You don't have to clean out your closets'' but should provide some closet space and a bureau drawer.
To take advantage of HomeExchange, www.homeexchange.com, members pay $50 a year and can post their homes and make unlimited exchanges. Annual dues of $25 entitle one to contact a homeowner but not to post. Kushins counts 6,500 full members and 3,000 nonlisting members.
Devotees of exchange like avoiding steep hotel bills but are equally enthusiastic about exchange as a lifestyle. They enjoy the comfort of a home and the opportunity to live among locals. Exchanges are not necessarily like-for-like; Southern Californians might be glad to exchange a large beach house for a Manhattan loft.
Listings may be luxe or modest. Homeowners in desirable tourist destinations are, of course, most likely to make matches. ''All of Los Angeles is pretty much desirable,'' Kushins says, ''though a beach house might be a little more desirable.'' One European family, he says, was delighted with an exchange in Modesto, Calif.
Client Sandra Faleris, a small-business owner living in Del Mar, Calif., has done four successful exchanges. But she doesn't advise it for ''people expecting everywhere they go to be like their own home.''
Her first exchange was a Paris apartment with a great view of the Eiffel Tower. The owner, now a good friend, ''waited for me to get there so she could introduce me to the area. She had cheese and bread and coffee and eggs.''
Traveling as an exchanger, Faleris says, she feels ''like a little ambassador for the United States.'' And because she's not paying for a hotel, she doesn't feel pressured to sightsee at breakneck speed.
Her worst experience with an exchange: ''Someone broke a cup one time, then left a gift.''
(Begin optional trim)
Matthew and Lisa Lindley, visiting from Queensland, Australia, recently with three children younger than 14, stayed in the Southern California communities of Dana Point and Redondo Beach through HomeExchange.
Lisa says a side trip to Las Vegas -- ''two nights in a hotel with three children, having to buy three meals a day'' -- made them appreciate exchanges even more. The Redondo Beach homeowners have children, so the Lindley kids had access to PlayStations, bikes and scooters, while Mom and Dad had use of a car in the deal.
(End optional trim)
Couchsurfing is for the very flexible and the young (average age: 30). Casey Fenton, 26, hit upon the idea while accessing an online university directory to find free lodging in Iceland. He launched the nonprofit CouchSurfing Project, www.couchsurfing.com, last January as a network of adventurous people worldwide looking for or offering free accommodation in homes.
He says 6,500 people have signed up and, he estimates, ''at least 1,000 matches have been made.'' There's no fee, but the project raises some money through a verification system that helps establish a member's trustworthiness. The member's credit card is billed a minimum of $25, and the cardholder is sent a letter verifying that he or she has valid credit and lives at a given address.
A couch may be just a couch or, Fenton says, ''it could be a backyard to pitch your tent in, a room to yourself, a carriage house. Sometimes people say, `You can sleep on the floor of my dorm room.' ''
Fenton, who has couchsurfed in Montreal, Brazil and the Netherlands, says it is as much about ''cultural interaction'' as about free digs. His goal is to ''create a network of people curious about the world around them, to help those people explore, maybe become a broker of adventure, so to speak.''
To date, he's been told of only one bad experience, a surfer who spent hours on the host's Internet connection and cell phone.
Jim Stone, a couchsurfer from Texas, was hosted in Strasbourg, France, by a musician playing a concert that night. ''Their sound guy didn't show up and there was no one to run the board,'' so Stone pitched in. A Toronto man who couchsurfed in Ann Arbor, Mich., reported: ''I wondered how safe a single woman would feel, hosting a single male.'' He stopped wondering when he met ''the two largest dogs I have ever seen outside of horror movies.'' At least one couple who met through couchsurfing has become engaged.
Fenton, whose day jobs have included political campaigning and computer programming, hasn't figured out how his idea can make money. For now, he says, ''I want to remember my life as a string of really interesting experiences.''
When security cameras captured the images of four young Britons sauntering into the London Underground before detonating their deadly backpacks last month, questions arose about whether such homegrown sleeper terrorists could be plotting attacks in the United States.
U.S. counterterrorism officials say there is no evidence that such would-be terrorists exist in large numbers in the United States, or that any of them are in the operational stages of a plot. And some U.S. officials and experts downplay the threat such domestic militants might pose to Americans.
But some senior authorities say there is enough anecdotal evidence to warrant concern, and suggest that whatever radicalized the British bombers could presumably also motivate Americans who have embraced Islamic extremist views expressed on Web sites and chat rooms, in radical mosques and elsewhere.
Terrorism investigators worry particularly about the American-born children of immigrants from countries known to harbor international terrorists or their training camps. Their ability to move easily between cultures, and to travel widely on U.S. passports, would give them a unique set of skills should they pursue terrorist intentions.
''These are second-generation Americans, people who grew up here, were educated here or were raised in this country and are now adopting this extremist view, and are now viewing their home country as the enemy,'' said Joseph Billy Jr., who heads the FBI's international counterterrorism operations.
''You are talking about people who are actually here and living in the country and view us as the enemy,'' Billy said in an interview. ''If the (terrorist) message is so strong that these people are willing to travel overseas and take up weapons, when are they going to be ready to cross the line?''
Efforts to identify and intercept anyone crossing that line have led to at least several ongoing domestic investigations, authorities confirmed in interviews. Some have resulted in arrests and prosecutions, and some have fallen apart or been downgraded to minor immigration violations.
Those not convinced that a significant domestic threat exists said that most Muslim immigrants to the United States don't face the same degree of economic hardship and cultural isolation that their counterparts in Europe have endured for decades and which are thought to contribute to radicalization.
But others noted that several of the alleged London bombers appeared to have come from prosperous homes and had received good educations.
One London bombing suspect, Haroon Rashid Aswat, who was raised in Britain, had worked closely with a U.S.-spawned terrorist operative from Seattle, Earnest James Ujaama, in an abortive effort to establish a terrorist training camp in rural Oregon. Ujaama pleaded guilty in 2003; Aswat is an unindicted co-conspirator in the same case, authorities say.
''In general, terrorism recruiters are using the Internet and not focusing on the individual but rather a shotgun approach that reaches people from Portland, Ore., to Kuala Lumpur,'' said Matthew Levitt, a former FBI counterterrorism analyst who heads terrorism studies at the Washington Institute for Near East Policy. ''We're as susceptible as anyone else, if not more so. We'd be fools to think that what is happening in Western Europe doesn't affect us. In a globalized world, it certainly does.''
But like other current and former authorities, Levitt conceded that it was difficult to know how many homegrown terrorists might be in the United States.
Billy, a deputy assistant FBI director, said he could not discuss the details of any ongoing investigations, or the number of potential suspects.
But authorities from several U.S. agencies confirmed that the FBI is investigating several dozen U.S. militants operating in groups and alone, who have varying degrees of contact with terrorist organizations in the Middle East, South Asia, Europe, North Africa and elsewhere overseas. And they said the potential numbers of such U.S.-born and bred militants have expanded domestically apace with global antagonism toward the United States for its invasion and occupation of Iraq.
Some of the U.S. suspects are believed to have direct ties to al-Qaida or its many affiliate groups, often through training at war camps in Afghanistan, Pakistan and other havens.
Other investigations focus on U.S. suspects linked to other terrorist groups from Central Asia and South Asia and to Palestinian terrorist organizations such as Hamas, the Palestine Islamic Jihad and the Al Aqsa Martyrs' Brigade.
What has the FBI -- and state and local police -- so on edge is that there are ''so many different degrees of connectivity'' between such U.S. suspects and terrorist groups, according to a second senior U.S. counterterrorism official. Some play a peripheral role but are nevertheless of serious concern because of their ability to provide financial, logistical and even operational assistance in the United States, he said.
Authorities say they can never predict which of the potential operatives could suddenly help launch an attack, or do something alone and without prompting.
''That's our focus right now. We continue to look at these would-be jihadists and (try to determine) who is going to be the one who is going to do something,'' Billy said.
Another U.S. official, a top-ranking counterterrorism authority who coordinates overseas intelligence-gathering, agreed that the pool of such potential U.S. militants is probably small. But he said the U.S. intelligence community has grown increasingly concerned about how easily militants with American passports can acquire deadly training overseas in explosives and guerrilla warfare techniques such as assassinations and kidnappings, without the CIA or State Department knowing about it.
Neither agency regularly tracks Americans traveling abroad to find out if they are ending up in the ''madrasas'' of Pakistan or the mosques of Saudi Arabia, Morocco or even the Finsbury Park mosque in London and other Western European bastions of anti-Western radicalization, according to that U.S. official and others.
Only those Americans who have already sparked the interest of the FBI or local law enforcement are likely to be monitored as they make their way around the world. And current and former counterterrorism officials from various U.S. agencies acknowledged that they can't do much of that either.
''You have such large numbers of people going overseas and we don't have the resources,'' said Michael Kraft, who retired last year after many years as a senior State Department counterterrorism official. ''The sheer number of people who go back and forth, it'd be a huge tracking job.''
U.S. officials note that in Pakistan alone there are thousands of ''madrasas'' -- informal schools that often teach radical curriculums. And they estimate there could be tens of thousands more informal recruitment and training facilities around the world.
Additionally, Kraft and others said, most of the U.S. militants found to have gone overseas for such training took circuitous routes there and back to cover their tracks.
Authorities point to Hamid Hayat, a 22-year-old Pakistani-American from Lodi, Calif., who with his father, Umer Hayat, was charged in June with lying to federal agents about the younger Hayat's alleged 2003-04 attendance at a terrorist training camp in Pakistan. That trip, to which Hamid Hayat has confessed, is part of a broader investigation into a potential sleeper cell within the Pakistani-American community in Lodi, according to the FBI.
Hayat was born in Stockton and lived in Lodi with his family. He and his father have pleaded not guilty and denied any ties to terrorism.
But an FBI affidavit alleges in detail how Hayat confessed to spending six months at an al-Qaida-affiliated camp at which he taught paramilitary training and ''how to kill Americans.'' Hayat said he agreed to return home and launch a terrorist attack, the affidavit alleges.
Hayat traveled home by way of South Korea, but his plane was diverted May 29 on the way to the United States because his name showed up on a ''no-fly'' list, apparently because of his connections to others in Lodi under investigation.
Several other groups of young men born or reared in America have been convicted of terrorism-related charges in high-profile cases in the Buffalo, N.Y., suburb of Lackawanna and in Portland, Ore., and Northern Virginia. In the Lackawanna case, six Yemeni-Americans admitted to attending a terrorist training camp in Afghanistan.
(Begin optional trim)
In August 2002, a Miami-based U.S. citizen named Shueyb Mossa Jokhan pleaded guilty to plotting with a local teenager to bomb electrical power stations and a National Guard armory as part of an Islamic holy war.
The two allegedly attempted to find money to buy AK-47 assault rifles and other weapons, night vision equipment, stun guns, pepper spray and smoke grenades.
That summer, authorities arrested U.S.-born Jose Padilla, 34, as he stepped off a plane in Chicago from Zurich, Switzerland. He was accused of plotting with senior al-Qaida leaders to explode a ''dirty bomb'' made up of conventional explosives and radioactive material somewhere in the United States. Padilla remains in custody as an ''enemy combatant.''
(End optional trim)
Last summer, U.S. authorities quietly stepped up their scrutiny of all incoming travelers of Pakistani descent, including U.S. citizens, particularly at airports in Los Angeles; New York; Chicago; Detroit; Newark, N.J.; and metropolitan Washington.
In a confidential warning, Customs and Border Protection agents were told to look for signs of injuries that could have been received during paramilitary training -- such as rope burns, unusual bruises and scars.
Citing information obtained during Pakistani military raids near the border with Afghanistan, the memo also warned that, ''it is reasonable to expect that many of the individuals trained are destined to commit illegal activities in the United States.''
(Begin optional trim)
Several months ago, FBI Director Robert S. Mueller III told the Senate intelligence committee that the FBI has identified various extremists throughout the United States and is monitoring terrorism-related activities in Virginia, Minneapolis, New York and elsewhere.
Mueller testified that al-Qaida had demonstrated the ability to exploit radical American converts ''and other indigenous extremists'' to the point at which they could play a role in future terrorist plots. One, Iyman Faris, an Ohio trucker and Pakistani-born U.S. citizen, admitted to plotting with al-Qaida leaders to destroy the Brooklyn Bridge.
The FBI was especially concerned about peripheral groups, including some radical fundamentalist religious and political organizations, Mueller said. They have even more followers than al-Qaida among the so-called second-generation militants, authorities say. That is because they are perceived as being a more mainstream presence within U.S.-based Islamic communities, and thus less likely to raise suspicions.
(End optional trim)
Authorities also say there is growing evidence that such extremists have tried to obtain paramilitary training inside the United States. There are several ongoing investigations into such alleged activities by small groups who FBI officials say are inspired by the jihadist rhetoric found in radical mosques, in U.S. prisons and on the Internet.
U.S. authorities told the Los Angeles Times that Mohammed Junaid Babar, a Pakistani-American who grew up in Queens, N.Y., has been quietly cooperating with their investigation into the July 7 bombings in London. Babar has been linked to an alleged al-Qaida effort to conduct detailed surveillance on financial institutions in New York, Washington and Newark, N.J., in order to blow them up.
Babar was also indicted on terrorism-related charges; authorities say in court documents that he conspired with top al-Qaida leaders to organize a jihad training camp in Pakistan and to blow up targets in Britain such as Heathrow International Airport.
One of Babar's other alleged associates is Adnan G. El Shukrijumah, born overseas but raised in South Florida. El Shukrijumah is now described as one of al-Qaida's most dangerous operatives and U.S. authorities have made catching him a top priority.
U.S. authorities say El Shukrijumah, who also has been linked to Padilla's alleged dirty bomb plot, has the same kind of organizational and leadership skills as alleged Sept. 11 ringleader Mohamed Atta, but with a U.S. passport and ability to speak and appear like any other youthful American.
(Optional add end)
Also among the FBI's most wanted is a man known only as ''Azzam the American.''
Shortly before last year's presidential election, an - al-Qaida-affiliated group released a lengthy tape in which Azzam warned U.S. citizens that support of their government's policies would cost them their lives.
His face shrouded by sunglasses and a Palestinian head-scarf, Azzam said the Sept. 11 attacks were only the ''opening salvo of the global war on America,'' peppering his speech with American slang and references to pop culture. U.S. intelligence officials believe the tape was authentic, and that Azzam the American could actually be Adam Yahiye Gadahn, an alleged al-Qaida operative who was reared on a goat farm in Southern California.
Gadahn, also wanted by the FBI, allegedly has worked as a translator and aide for some of al-Qaida's senior leaders.
The Macao Police have arrested a male drug smuggling suspect, local press reported Monday.
The Macao Post quoted police sources as saying that the 28-year-old was pinned down at a downtown night club, allegedly selling drugs.
Police later searched his flat where they seized "a large amount of ecstasy pills and ketamine," the newspaper reported.
The drugs recovered from the suspect were estimated to have "a street value" of 100,000 patacas (12,500 US dollars), it added.
Further investigations are underway.
The head of Iraq's constitution committee said on Monday the draft of the country's permanent charter will be ready by Aug. 15.
"I can say that on Aug. 15 we can be able to finish the constitution and hand it over to the parliament for discussions," Humam Hammoudi, head of the 71-member drafting committee told a session of the National Assembly (parliament) in Baghdad.
However, Hammoudi said he hopes that his committee will resolve five or six troublesome issues in the draft.
Following are temperatures and weather forecast for Aug. 2 for 22 Asia-Pacific cities dispatched by the Hong Kong Observatory on Monday: Cities            Temperature (Degree Celsius)    Weather HONG KONG                28             31         FINE MACAO                    26             31         CLOUDY GUANGZHOU                25             32         SHOWERS SHANGHAI                 28             35         THUNDERSTORMS BEIJING                  22             32         THUNDERSTORMS TAIBEI                   27             35         CLOUDY SEOUL                    23             31         RAIN TOKYO                    26             30         CLOUDY MANILA                   25             32         THUNDERSTORMS HANOI                    25             30         DRIZZLE HO CHI MINH CITY         23             29         SHOWERS BANGKOK                  26             32         SHOWERS KUALA LUMPUR             24             33         FINE SINGAPORE                25             33         FINE NEW DELHI                27             36         THUNDERSTORMS MUMBAI                   24             27         SHOWERS KARACHI                  27             32         THUNDERSTORMS JAKARTA                  24             33         RAIN BANDAR SERI BEGAWAN      26             34         FINE SYDNEY                    8             22         FINE MELBOURNE                10             17         FINE BRISBANE                 13             20         FINE
Chief negotiators of the six-party talks will meet on Tuesday to discuss the text of a draft common document, said Cho Taiyong, deputy head of the delegation of the Republic of Korea (ROK), here Monday.
Kansas City Star tentative budget offers for Tuesday, Aug. 2, 2005.
NEWS OFFERS
SPAM: First, the good news. The total volume of spam is down. Now, the bad news. The spam you're getting is far more dangerous than it used to be.
550 by DAVID HAYES in Kansas City, Mo.
BUSINESS OFFERS
BOARDS: Dismissed as passive, obedient and incompetent during a slew of corporate scandals, America's boards of directors are starting to flex their muscles. 1,500 by MARK DAVIS in Kansas City, Mo.
BLOCK: H&R Block Inc. reported that a cluster of minor accounting errors led the Kansas City financial services provider overstate its combined profits for 2003 and 2004 by about 91 million.
450 by GENE MEYER in Kansas City, Mo.
SHACK: RadioShack Corp. intends to jump-start sputtering wireless sales with a new agreement keeping phones from Sprint Corp. and adding those of No. 1 Cingular Wireless to its stores.
360 by JASON GERTZEN in Kansas City, Mo.
CREDIT: Credit unions experienced higher average increases in deposit and asset growth than banks between 1994 and 2004, according to a new Federal Reserve Bank of Kansas City study.
650 by DAN MARGOLIES in Kansas City, Mo..
GRAIN: Kansas City wheat and Chicago wheat and corn futures closed lower Wednesday in a carryover from Tuesday's weaker action.
250 by VICTORIA SIZEMORE LONG in Kansas City, Mo..
Lauren Bacall has a few unkind words to say about Tom Cruise.
In an interview in the latest issue of Time magazine, the 80-year-old actress says, "When you talk about a great actor, you're not talking about Tom Cruise."
"His whole behavior is so shocking," she says. "It's inappropriate and vulgar and absolutely unacceptable to use your private life to sell anything commercially, but I think it's kind of a sickness."
Bacall was alluding to Cruise's displays of emotion and public courting of Katie Holmes in the weeks leading up to the release of his new film, "War of the Worlds." Cruise and Holmes became engaged in June after he proposed at the Eiffel Tower in Paris.
Last fall, Bacall made similar remarks about Cruise's ex-wife Nicole Kidman, her co-star in "Birth." While promoting the movie, Bacall became irritated when an interviewer described Kidman as "a legend."
"She's not a legend," Bacall said. "She can't be a legend at whatever age she is. ... You have to be older."
"Private Screenings: Lauren Bacall" and a marathon of Bacall's films were to air Monday on the cable channel, Turner Classic Movies.


In her first interview since splitting with Brad Pitt, Jennifer Aniston says she was "shocked" by the breakup and is trying to "pick up the pieces in the midst of this media circus."
Aniston broke down twice during the interview for the September issue of Vanity Fair, on newsstands nationally Aug. 9. Mostly, though, the actress comes across as resilient.
"Am I lonely? Yes. Am I upset? Yes. Am I confused? Yes. Do I have my days when I've thrown a little pity party for myself? Absolutely. But I'm also doing really well."
Holed up in her Malibu, California, bungalow, the 36-year-old actress says the media coverage and tabloid rumors have been hard to deal with _ especially reports that she didn't want to start a family.
"A man divorcing would never be accused of choosing career over children," she says. "I've never in my life said I didn't want children. I did and I do and I will!"
Aniston filed for divorce in March, citing irreconcilable differences after 4 1/2 years of marriage. The couple separated in January.
Aniston says she was aware of Pitt's attraction to Angelina Jolie, his "Mr. and Mrs. Smith" co-star, but doesn't blame their split on her.
"It's just complicated," Aniston says. "There are all these levels of growth _ and when you stop growing together, that's when the problems happen."
But when pictures showing Pitt and Jolie together with her 3-year-old son, Maddox, on a beach in Africa were published, the former "Friends" star says, "the world was shocked and I was shocked."
She was also hurt by a fashion spread in W magazine _ a concept of Pitt's _ that showed the actor and Jolie as a 1960's-style married couple.
"There's a sensitivity chip that's missing," Aniston says of Pitt.
Says Aniston: "I just don't know what happened. ... I feel as if I'm trying to scrounge around and pick up the pieces in the midst of this media circus."
Otherwise refusing to talk badly of Pitt, the actress says she doesn't want to mimic the bitterness of her parents' divorce.
"I love Brad; I really love him. I will love him for the rest of my life," says Aniston. "I don't regret any of it, and I'm not going to beat myself up about it."
"The sad thing, for me, is the way it's been reduced to a Hollywood cliche _ or maybe it's just a human cliche."
Another false report, Aniston says, is her relationship with Vince Vaughn, her co-star in the upcoming movie "The Break Up."
"I like a lot of people, but I'm sooo not `in like' with anybody."
Aniston also hasn't lost her sense of humor. On Pitt's recently dyed blond hair, she says, "Billy Idol called _ he wants his look back."


Molson Coors Brewing Co. said its second-quarter profit declined 46 percent, burdened by $87.7 million (euro71.8 million) in special charges and stiff competition, particularly in Britain and Brazil.
The world's fifth-largest brewer also said it would restate first-quarter results to correct accounting for a tax asset. Molson Coors stock initially dropped but closed up 2.1 percent.
"The second quarter represented another difficult quarter for Molson Coors," Leo Kiely, president and chief executive officer, said Tuesday in a call with analysts. "We're clearly not performing where we hope to perform."
Kiely said there were challenges in each market _ the United States, Canada, Europe and Brazil _ that were "more difficult than we anticipated."
Molson Coors said earnings for the three months that ended June 26 fell to $38.5 million (euro31.51 million), or 45 cents (37 euro cents) per share, from $72 million, or $1.90 per share, a year ago.
The latest results included $87.7 million (euro71.8 million) in special charges, including $46.7 million (euro38.23 million) related to transactional tax disputes in Brazil and $34.2 million (euro28 million) mostly related to severance payments and benefits for executives who departed after the merger closed.
Excluding those charges, the company said it would have earned $105.1 million (euro86 million), or $1.22 (euro1) per share.
Analysts surveyed by Thomson Financial were looking for profit of $1.61 (euro1.32) per share.
Net sales, excluding excise taxes, increased to $1.61 billion (euro1.32 billion) up from $1.15 billion last year. Total sales that included excise taxes rose to $2.2 billion (euro1.8 billion) from $1.55 billion last year, primarily driven by the inclusion of Molson Inc. results. Canadian-based Molson and Adolph Coors Co. merged in February.
Consolidated sales volume totaled 12.8 million barrels down 3.1 percent on a comparable basis to the results of the 2004 second quarter.
Kiely said there was some improvement in the Canadian and U.S. markets but weakness in Europe and Brazil.
In the first six months, Molson Coors reported net income of $4.4 million (euro3.6 million), or 6 cents (5 euro cents) a share, compared with $76.9 million, or $2.08 a share, in the first six months of 2004.
Net sales totaled $2.7 billion (euro2.2 billion) up from $2.1 billion in the first six months of 2004.
Analyst Bonnie Herzog, who tracks the company for Citigroup Smith Barney, called the results disappointing. "Overall, pro forma volumes were disappointing on a comparable basis," she said.
Molson Coors plans to file amended first-quarter results later this week to correct an initial recording of a U.S. deferred tax asset as part of the purchase accounting for its British acquisition in 2002. Due to the change, the company will restate its first-quarter 2005 tax provision and earnings.
The change will not affect the fundamental business economics, the company said.
Molson Coors stock was up $1.35, or 2.1 percent, to $65.17 a share on the New York Stock Exchange after ranging from $60.70 to $67.18 throughout the day.
The European Commission warned Wednesday that it could order failing Czech and Polish steel companies to pay back government subsidies if they don't become viable businesses by December 2006.
The Czech Republic and Poland have a temporary exemption from strict European Union rules on state funding to allow them to pump restructuring money into their struggling steel industries.
The Commission said delays in the restructuring process meant some firms "may fail to achieve viability" by the end of 2006, despite growing demand and higher prices for steel. Cost-cutting efforts need to continue, it said.
"As there are only 18 months left before the end of the transition period, the Commission recommendations to companies and authorities are of critical importance," it said in a statement.
Some steel firms in both countries are still underperforming, despite exceptionally favorable conditions on the steel market, the EU head office said.
Most Czech and Polish steel companies benefited from export growth and increased domestic sales in 2004. Demand in the EU for finished steel products increased by 7 percent in 2004.
The Czech Republic and Poland joined the European Union on May 1, 2004.
Hoping to earn money to pay for college, Yulia accepted an offer to work as a nightclub dancer in Moscow, but her new employer beat her, stole her passport and forced her to work as a prostitute.
The 24-year-old's ordeal is increasingly common among citizens of Ukraine, whose country was cited in a recent U.S. State Department report as one of the prime sources of men, women, and children trafficked for sexual exploitation and forced labor.
The report sharply criticized Ukraine's previous government for failing to take decisive action against the problem. The issue could impede new President Viktor Yushchenko's drive to get Ukraine into the European Union.
The Interior Ministry this year put combating human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation of children on its list of key priorities, forming a unit dedicated to the task and beefing up border checks. The country's new government also plans to create a National Bureau to Combat Human Trafficking.
But the low salaries and unemployment that force thousands of Ukrainians to seek employment abroad persist, continuing their vulnerability to exploitation.
Yulia told The Associated Press that she left her hometown of Donestk four years ago for a job in one of Moscow's luxurious night clubs that she heard about through acquaintances, planning to earn money to pay her way through college. But once in Moscow, Yulia's new employer seized her passport and beat her for several days before sending her out to work the Russian capital's streets as a prostitute.
"Now I understand that I could have conducted myself in another way at some points," said Yulia, who spoke on condition that her last name not be used. "But then a terrible fear paralyzed my will and deprived me of any opportunity to resist."
Most Ukrainian victims of trafficking end up in Turkey and Russia. Prostitutes working in Turkey are commonly called known as "Natashas" whatever their country of origin.
Youth and Sport Minister Yuriy Pavlenko said that about seven million Ukrainians live abroad and "many of them are a target for human traffickers." The real number of trafficking victims is unknown as the majority of victims don't want friends and family to know what happened to them, said Mikhaylo Andrienko, the chief of the Interior Ministry human-trafficking unit.
The International Organization for Migration says it has helped more than 2,100 Ukrainian trafficking victims since 2000 _ but estimates that number is only a small portion of the victims.
The Interior Ministry registered 42 cases of human trafficking in 2000 compared with 269 last year and 148 during the first five months of this year. Ministry officials said the increase is due to the new attention being paid to the problem.
But the court system still hasn't caught up _ last year, traffickers were convicted in only 67 cases. Under Ukrainian law, traffickers face sentences of between three to 15 years imprisonment and seizure of their property, Andrienko said.
"This punishment is rather low," said Helga Konrad, the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe's Special Representative on Combating Human Trafficking during a visit in June.
Most Ukrainian officials, however, believe the solution lies not in severe punishment but in preventive measures, including improving awareness this nation of 48 million.
"Each time I talk to victims I am surprised by their trustfulness toward almost unknown people," Andrienko said.
The government is also scrambling to raise living standards and create 5 million new jobs.
A 41-year-old man named Zenoviy, said he left his village last year for Macedonia to earn money doing construction work to support his three children. He expected hard work _ but not the conditions of near slavery that he experienced.
"We had to work about 20 hours a day and received for it only $30 a month," said Zenoviy, speaking on condition that his last name not be used. His health suffered and he couldn't even afford the return ticket home.
"But I went there because I had no chances to feed a family in my native country," he said.
U.S. Health and Human Services Secretary Michael Leavitt met with victims of trafficking during his visit to Ukraine last month and said he was shocked. He told of meeting a 13-year-old child who was sold and taken to an unidentified country, where he was forced to beg. The child's two other siblings were also sold into slavery.
"Their stories were compelling and motivated me to multiply my efforts," Leavitt said.
Yulia says there is hope for victims who make it back home. She is now a businesswoman, running her own hair salon. But Yulia keeps her past a secret _ even from her parents who don't know what happened during the months she spent in Moscow before escaping.
Wendy Lu McGill, spokeswoman for the Ukrainian office of the IOM, said: "People are looking for a better life, but what they find in reality is totally different."
Poland's Irena Szewinska, a former three-time Olympic sprint champion, was elected Wednesday to the executive council of the sport's world governing body.
Szewinska, 59, becomes the third woman to sit on the Council of the International Association of Athletics Federations.
Szewinska received 90 votes, easily defeating Judith Simmons of Bermuda with 35 and Dutchwoman Ellen van Langen with 34.
Nawal El Moutawakel of Morocco and Abby Hoffman of Canada are the two other female members on the 28-member council.
Szewinska competed in five Olympics, winning golds in the 400-meter relay in 1964, 200 meters in 1968 and 400 meters in 1976. She was a 10-time world record holder in the 100, 200 and 400.
Szewinska has been an International Olympic Committee member since 1998.
The World Health Organisation (WHO) warned against complacency in the fight to control bird flu Friday, saying that despite recent positive findings in Vietnam, the risk of a pandemic remained unchanged.
Peter Cordingley, WHO spokesman for the Western Pacific Region in Manila, told AFP the upbeat conclusions drawn this week by a team of international experts in Vietnam should not incite governments to lower their guard.
"This is certainly no time for complacency. Our assessment is that the situation remains perilous -- not only in Vietnam but around the region," he said.
"However, the good news is that we have found no proof of indications that became apparent to us a few weeks ago that the situation in Vietnam had seriously worsened," the spokesman added.
"Checks on findings that suggested the virus was more widespread than we had believed have not confirmed that development. We will be carrying out further checks, but for now the situation is status quo."
The organisation said last year that millions of people could die if the avian virus mutated to become easily transmissible between humans and caused a global pandemic.
In May, WHO said it had gathered findings suggesting that the virus had become more dangerous. More recently, testing of clinical specimens in Vietnam provided further "suggestive" evidence of more widespread infection.
But a team of international experts who left Vietnam this week did not confirm these suspicions.
Wednesday, Hans Troedsson, WHO representative in Vietnam, hailed the information as "very good news".
"The most important thing is that we could rule out that there was an immediate, imminent pandemic," Troedsson said.
But the WHO in Manila was anxious to avoid any perception that the threat of an imminent pandemic was lower than before.
"On the evidence available to us at the moment, we will not be raising the pandemic alert level from level three, where it has been since the outbreak became known to us some 18 months ago," Cordingley said.
"But by the same measure, we are certainly not thinking of lowering it," he added.
China and Myanmar have smashed an international drug-trafficking gang, state media said Friday.
China's National Narcotics Control Commission and its counterpart in Myanmar busted the gang in May, the China Daily said.
After receiving a tip-off from Chinese police, police in Myanmar arrested the alleged ringleaders, two Myanmese brothers, in the capital Yangon. They also confiscated 102.5 kilogrammes (224 pounds) of the drug "ice".
Police in China's southwestern province of Yunnan subsequently caught two other alleged gangmembers, who had escaped to China, and another suspect was captured in late May.
Tin Maung Htay, director of Myanmar's Narcotics Control Commission, was quoted as saying the gang had been involved in drug-trafficking for years.
The destinations for the drugs included Hong Kong, Malaysia and South Korea, with each shipment consisting of at least 200 kilogrammes, the daily said.
British nuclear reprocessing firm British Nuclear Fuels (BNFL) announced Friday it was putting up for sale Westinghouse, its power station building arm in the United States.
State-owned BNFL -- operator of the Sellafield waste reprocessing plant in Cumbria, northern England -- said in a statement there had already been a "number" of approaches for Westinghouse.
The group was being advised on the sale by investment bank NM Rothschild and Sons.
The US unit was a prime asset with "all the skills to prosper in the private sector", BNFL added.
Mike Parker, group chief executive, said: "Westinghouse is a very successful operation in its own right.
"It has reached all its targets, continues to win new business and is in an excellent position to capitalise on the China new build programme."
The sale process would determine whether a disposal would realise appropriate value for the US-based nuclear power station construction and services business, Parker added.
Corporate mergers and acquisitions in Asia outside Japan rose 83 percent from a year ago to 98.2 billion US dollars in the first six months of this year, a report said Friday.
South Korea dominated the merger and acquisition scene for the second quarter to June with 12.6 billion dollars worth of deals, US financial information and database firm Thomson Financial said in a report received here.
China came in second with 11.8 billion dollars worth of deals and Hong Kong was in third place with 8.1 billion dollars, overtaking Indonesia.
The energy and power sector accounted for 32.3 percent of the overall announced deals during the quarter with value totalling 31.7 billion dollars, followed by the financial sector with 19.6 billion dollars.
Japan, which is analysed separately from the rest of Asia, had a record 1,196 target deals in the first half with an aggregate value of 108.85 billion dollars.
Thomson Financial said Japan outpaced Britain for the first time in terms of the volume and value of the announced merger and acquisition deals in the six months to June.
Following are major news items in leading British newspapers on Friday: The Times: -- Millions of pounds raised each year from the five pound tax on airline tickets will be siphoned off to fund a huge aid package for Africa under plans being drawn up by Britain's Chancellor of the  Exchequer Gordon Brown. The Daily Telegraph: -- British Prime Minister Tony Blair was accused Thursday night of "misleading the country" over immigration during the general election as the Home Office admitted for the first time that half a million illegal immigrants may be living in Britain. The Financial Times: -- Bank of America struck a deal to buy MBNA for about 35 billion US dollars in cash and stock Thursday, making it one of the top US credit card issuers. The Guardian: -- British Prime Minister Tony Blair is contemplating an unprecedented rift with the United States over climate change at the G8 summit next week, which will lead to a final communique agreed by seven countries with President George W. Bush left out on a limb. The Independent: -- Six weeks before the planned evacuation of settlements from the Gaza Strip is due to begin, it appear that Israeli Prime Minister Ariel Sharon's patience with increasingly militant protesters has finally snapped.
British Prime Minister Tony Blair hailed Wednesday's decision to award the 2012 Olympics to London as a "momentous day" for the city, but said he couldn't bear to watch the announcement on television.
"This is a momentous day for London. It's very good news," Blair said at the venue for the G-8 summit.
Blair found out the result when the switchboard at his Downing Street office in London called him.
"I couldn't bear to watch the final bit of it," he said with a wide grin. "It's not often in this job that you punch the air and do a little jig and embrace the person next to you."
London beat Paris in the final vote. Moscow, New York and Madrid had been eliminated in earlier rounds.
Blair spoke as world leaders were arriving in Gleneagles for talks on African poverty and climate change, but he admitted he was struggling to concentrate.
"I've been trying to work on the G-8 stuff but I have to say that my mind has been in two places today," Blair said.
He predicted the games would prove to be a "legacy" for both Britain and the Olympic movement, saying London's bid was strong because of the vision it provided for sports and future generations.
"London is an open, multi-racial, multireligious, multicultural city and rather proud of it," Blair said. "People of all races and nationalities mix in with each other and mix in with each other well."
He said sports facilities would remain for years to come after the games, which the prime minister said would stress the importance of sports for youth and society.
Blair flew to Scotland from Singapore where he and others had worked for 48 hours to secure their bid.
The prime minister was expected to meet later in the day with Jacques Chirac _ but said he would go easy on him.
"Britain must be magnanimous in victory and gracious in defeat," Blair said.
Blair brushed aside suggestions that the defeat for Paris would mean that Chirac would be less cooperative going into diplomatic discussions on Africa or climate change.
"Of course, there are four heads of government around the table whose countries were bidding," he said. "In respect of France, on Africa and climate change we are working very closely together.
All passengers and crew aboard a Ugandan helicopter carrying newly appointed Sudanese Vice-President John Garang died when the chopper crashed near the Kenyan border, senior Ugandan officials said Monday.
"All the people on board died somewhere near the Ugandan border (with Kenya) but we have not established the actual location," one official told AFP on condition of anonymity, adding the presidential MI-72 helicopter had a normal capacity of nine.
A second official said Uganda had informed the governments of Kenya and Sudan of the deaths and that the cause of the crash that killed the ex-rebel leader on Saturday was bad weather.
"This was a presidential helicopter and it had enough fuel, the cause was simply bad weather," the official told AFP.
Ugandan Foreign Minister Sam Kutesa declined to confirm the deaths, but said 14 passengers and crew were on board the missing helicopter.
"We had 14 people on board, six were Sudanese and eight were Ugandans," he told AFP. "We are still searching."
Earlier, UN and Kenyan officials said Garang's former rebel group, the Sudan People's Liberation Movement/Army (SPLM/A) had confirmed Garang's death shortly after Ugandan President Yoweri Museveni's office released a statement expressing "anxiety" about his safety.
"The government of Uganda would like to inform the public of our anxiety regarding the safety of our brother Dr John Garang," said the statement issued by Museveni's spokesman Onapido Ekomoloit.
It said Garang, who had been in Uganda meeting with Museveni and EU and US diplomats, had left the Ugandan president's ranch in western Uganda on his helicopter on Saturday afternoon.
After stopping at the Entebbe International Airport to refuel, it said the chopper headed to Garang's base at New Site in southern Sudan where it was forced to abort a landing due to bad weather.
The helicopter then headed southwest and was last heard by villagers over the town of Pirre near the Kenyan border.
"We do share anxiety with the public since it is now 24 hours beyond the estimated time of arrival of the helicopter at this destination," the statement said.
"The search is continuing and we have asked for the cooperation of the brother republic of Kenya whose border is quite close," it added.
Crown Prince Abdullah bin Abdul Aziz, who succeeds the late King Fahd, has effectively ruled Saudi Arabia since 1995, opening the kingdom to outside investment and steering his own foreign policy course despite the dramatic fallout of the September 11 attacks.
Caught in the whirlwind over the role of Saudi fanatics in the 2001 terror attacks on the United States, Abdullah pursued a more independent line, taking the risk of antagonizing Washington.
But when Al-Qaeda suspects hit at home beginning in May 2003, Abdullah launched a relentless crackdown on the militants, who have directly targeted the Al-Saud regime as well as Westerners residing in the oil-rich kingdom.
This policy helped ease strains with Washington, which accused Riyadh of turning a blind eye to terrorists of the kind who carried out the September 11 attacks, in which 15 of 19 plane hijackers were Saudi.
In April, Abdullah -- Fahd's half-brother -- paid his second visit in three years to US President George W. Bush at his Texas ranch, where the two men were pictured walking hand in hand.
A pro-Palestinian policy and refusal to countenance a new US war against Iraq earned Abdullah the wrath of Washington's neo-conservatives, but also the respect of many in the Middle East and Europe.
Outraged at the bloodshed in the Palestinian territories, Abdullah, long considered an Arab nationalist opposed to normalization with Israel, won in March 2002 pan-Arab support for a peace plan offering the Jewish state normal ties in exchange for withdrawal from occupied land.
But privileged traditional relations with the United States, built over the world's largest oil reserves, were not enough to persuade the Bush administration to pressurize Israel into negotiating.
With an eye on Arab public anger, Riyadh let it be known that it would not allow US forces to use Saudi soil to invade Iraq in 2003.
It was perhaps no coincidence that around the same time rumors surfaced suggesting Abdullah was facing a power struggle for the throne. Royal insiders dismissed any such threat to the popular, if austere crown prince.
With King Fahd confined to a wheelchair before his death, Abdullah has been de facto ruler for the past decade.
Prince Abdullah, who himself had heart problems in the late 1980s and took to a strict diet, enjoys the confidence of the country's powerful tribes and religious leaders.
To outsiders it is a closed kingdom, but one which Abdullah is pushing along a path of economic and social reform, balancing conservative Muslim tradition with the need to modernize.
However, post-September 11, the kingdom has been forced to tackle a strong current of discontent among a fringe of Islamist radicals backing Saudi-born Osama bin Laden who want to sweep aside the royal family and return to a so-called pure Islam.
While Abdullah has repeatedly vowed to crush the extremists, he has also responded to calls for political participation by initiating a cautious process of reform.
This has included the launching of a "national dialogue" involving various segments of society, and the holding earlier this year of unprecedented nationwide elections to pick half the members of municipal councils.
However, women were excluded from the polls, and three constitutional reformists were sentenced to harsh prison terms in mid-May, underlining the limits of reform in the ultra-conservative kingdom.
Born in Riyadh in 1923, Abdullah has since 1962 commanded the National Guard, loyal men of bedouin origin who protect strategic resources, especially oil installations, as well as the royal family.
Abdullah is the 13th son of King Abdul Aziz, who founded Saudi Arabia in 1932. His mother belongs to the powerful Shammar bedouin tribe which trained him as a warrior after he completed a religious education.
"Nobody doubts his piety," said a Western diplomat. "He is the most accepted by Islamist detractors of the royal family."
He is also untainted by allegations of corruption or stories of a playboy youth which damage some of the more profligate princes.
Abdullah imposed limits on the expenses of the thousands of royal princes and princesses, notably by fixing a quota on free airline tickets and telephone calls.
In foreign policy, Prince Abdullah has been less tied to the United States than King Fahd and bolstered friendships within the Arab world.
A successful mediator between Syria and Jordan in 1980, he is considered the architect of the Taef accord which ended the 1975-1990 Lebanese civil war, and has stepped up coordination with Egypt and Syria.
The prince has also overseen a spectacular thaw in relations with Iran, which culminated in a May 1999 visit by Iranian President Mohammad Khatami.
He piloted the opening up to foreign investment, in particular deals with international oil companies to invest billions of dollars in gas exploration and production.
He was also behind a privatization plan launched from 1997 in an effort to cut red tape and allow public companies to grow independently of a government whose investment capacity is tied to oil prices.
The prince was named second deputy prime minister in 1975, when King Khaled came to the throne, making him the third most important figure in the kingdom.
On Khaled's death in 1982, Fahd stepped up to the throne and Abdullah replaced him as crown prince.
Budget negotiations between the White House and congressional Republicans and end-of-session shenanigans have left a half-dozen measures important to Arizona hanging in legislative limbo.
Chief among the provisions keeping the state's delegation on tenterhooks are two immigration measures that just a few days ago seemed settled: border crossing cards and an entry-exit documentation program.
Negotiators had worked out a deal to delay for 2{ years a program that would require foreigners to fill out entry and exit forms at the United States' northern and southern borders, a plan that had border businesses fretting that it would create long lines of traffic and interminable delays.
But in the last-minute haggling this week, negotiators decided the program would be on indefinite hold along the Canadian border, but only delayed for a year in the south, a situation that Arizona's congressional delegation says is unfair.
Sens. Jon Kyl and John McCain and other members of the Arizona delegation wrote to Senate Majority Leader Trent Lott asking that the original deal be restored.
Kyl, along with Rep. Jim Kolbe and other members of the delegation, is also involved in trying to straighten out the border crossing-card issue. Congress required the Immigration and Naturalization Service to change border crossing cards _ identification cards used by frequent border crossers _ to make them more fraud-resistant. The cards were going to be expensive for users, and devising them had become controversial, so the INS began requiring visas issued by the State Department.
Arizona members heard complaints that obtaining a full visa is inconvenient for many people crossing the border at Nogales or other ports of entry because the nearest State Department facility is miles away, in Hermosillo.
Until the situation is resolved with INS, Kyl and Kolbe are lobbying for a return to the old crossing-card system.
Most frustrating for Rep. John Shadegg is the hold the Senate placed on his and Kyl's identity-theft bill, which was passed after an Arizona couple spent $15,000 and countless hours trying to restore their good name after a thief destroyed it. A Democratic senator _ it's unknown who it was _ placed a hold on the popular measure, which for the first time makes identity theft a crime. The senator reportedly was attempting to pressure other members to approve some judges.
The bill had cleared the Senate unanimously and the House by a voice vote. President Clinton has promised his signature to make it law.
''I think it's an outrage, and I think it's a particular outrage when they do it to non-controversial, bipartisan legislation concerning the fastest growing crime in America, which causes its victims financial ruin and great emotional distress,'' Shadegg said.
Also caught in the legislative crossfire are:
The Tres Rios sewage reclamation project, a demonstration project to clean effluent through wetlands.
The Wellton-Mohawk water transfer from the federal government to Wellton.
A measure to prohibit the use of federal funds to drain or study draining Lake Powell, an idea under review by the Glen Canyon Institute and approved by the Sierra Club.
The nomination of Jose de Jesus Rivera as U.S. attorney for Arizona. He is the acting U.S. attorney.
Wondering why you didn't get a job offer after that last interview?
So did Bronti Kelly, a retail salesman and former military reservist from Temecula, Calif., who couldn't figure out why he was repeatedly turned down in the early 1990s for dozens of sales positions at department stores _ or dismissed within a week if he did manage to secure a job.
In 1995, after more than four years, Kelly, now 34, finally discovered the problem: He had been denied employment because of an erroneous shoplifting report circulated to retailers who did background checks on him when he applied for work.
The report had been forwarded by one of the stores to which he had applied _ Robinsons-May _ through its parent company, the May Department Stores, to the Stores Protective Association, a nonprofit group in Simi Valley, Calif., that provides background screening, work histories and loss-prevention programs to about 100 retail chains, manufacturers and other businesses.
Members of the association, founded in 1929, share information about employees. The group is a regional affiliate of the United States Mutual Association, an 80-year-old private clearinghouse in Chicago that pools theft case reports from its 10 member groups nationwide _ it currently has about two million such reports _ and operates much like a major credit bureau.
Kelly says he was the victim of identity theft. After his wallet was stolen, he said, a shoplifter who was arrested used Kelly's name and identification; the Los Angeles County Police Department corroborated his account. When he was unable to get work, he ended up filing for bankruptcy and became homeless for a time.
After he found out about the shoplifting report, Kelly sued May and the Stores Protective Association in 1995, complaining that May had failed to correct the report in the association's files even after he had discovered it and provided proof of his innocence. The association was found not liable, and May settled out of court in January, paying Kelly $73,680.
''It cost me my life, really,'' said Kelly, who has since legally changed his name and Social Security number. ''I never knew why I wasn't being hired. That's the insidious nature of this _ there's often no way to know for sure.''
Rhonda West, a spokeswoman for the May Department Stores in St. Louis, said, ''We regret the difficulties this created for Kelly.''
Kelly's story points to a growing conflict between the rights of employers and employees in an age of quick, easy and inexpensive computer access to public information: how to balance a company's need to know about a person it might hire with the individual's need for privacy.
Despite the best efforts of federal regulators and private businesses, workers can be plagued by black marks mistakenly left on public records if they do not pursue their right to discover and correct errors.
''Ten years ago, you had to hire a gumshoe to find out about a person's background,'' said Beth Givens, director of the Privacy Rights Clearinghouse, a nonprofit advocacy organization in San Diego. ''Now you don't have to go any farther than your desk _ what you can find out today for typically under $100 is incredible.''
More public records have been placed on the Internet in recent years as information brokers have linked with public agencies, governments and businesses for computer access that enables them to compile virtual dossiers on anyone, including data like Social Security numbers, property ownership, driving records and nearest relatives.
The services available range from large, blue-chip investigation companies to upstart Web sites that offer data at bargain rates. Checks can be done in days or minutes, usually for a cost of $5 to $200.
Since many employers do not disclose what sort of background checks they use, it is hard to know exactly how they conduct them. But one thing is sure: The scrutiny of job applicants has intensified in recent years, as incidents of workplace violence, and the number of lawsuits charging employers with negligence in hiring, have increased, employment experts say. And that has meant a boom for the companies _ especially Web-based services _ that do such searches.
Technology, of course, has spawned an increase in the number of databases containing background information and has made such information available faster. Some of the services available are www.knowx.com, which uses the Information America database; www.informus.com, which primarily conducts direct public-records searches for 1,000 businesses and employers; Advanced Research Inc. (www.advsearch.com), which offers many checking services on a contingency basis (no hits, no charge), and www.digdirt.com, which says it has access to 325 billion records.
Peoplewise, a 10-month-old privately held company (www.people-wise.com) in Hollister, Calif., has developed what it says is technology that allows the first real-time background checks. Employers can get information within seconds, even during an applicant's interview, said Gary Cornick, president of the company.
Pre-employment screening must be fast, Cornick said. ''In this labor market, you have to act quickly or you'll lose applicants to competitors,'' he added.
But job applicants do have rights, especially under amendments to the Fair Credit Reporting Act that took effect on Sept. 30, 1997, extending the protection of the rules governing credit reports to job applicants.
nn
The changes give consumers more protection by requiring an employer to get applicants' permission before getting credit reports or other background checks on them. And if job applicants are turned down because of credit reports, the employer must tell the applicants about that as well as their right to free copies of the reports. The changes in the law also make it easier for job applicants to correct any errors found.
More employers are doing background checks on job applicants because more courts are finding employers liable for not only the actions of employees, but also of former employees.
''Legal requirements have increased the use of background checks by businesses,'' said Garry G. Mathiason, a senior partner with Littler, Mendelson, Fastiff, Tichy  Mathiason, an employment and labor law firm in San Francisco. ''There are enough horror stories out there about criminal liability that employers feel it's become absolutely necessary.''
A Florida Circuit Court in 1995 found the Allstate Insurance Co. liable for failing to disclose the violent history of an employee it had dismissed. The Fireman's Fund Insurance Co. subsequently hired him, based on Allstate's recommendation, and he killed three co-workers there.
Earlier this year, in Oakley vs. Flor-Shin Inc., the Kentucky Court of Appeals ruled that an employer could be held liable for an attack by an employee against a third party. In the case, a Kmart employee was accused of rape by an employee of Flor-Shin, the company the retailer had hired to clean floors. The victim sued Flor-Shin, saying it had known that the worker had a criminal history.
Thirty-three states now require criminal background checks for workers in positions like health care, child care, schools and housekeeping. But few use Federal Bureau of Investigation records to check potential employees, so workers with criminal convictions can secure new jobs by simply crossing state lines, says a federal report issued Sept. 14 by the federal Health and Human Services Department.
The report, which focused chiefly on nursing-home practices, calls for a national registry of workers with criminal backgrounds that would be accessible to employers.
''Background checks today are more critical than ever before,'' said Lynda Lucas, president and chief financial officer of the Stores Protective Association. ''In a society where the term `going postal' is routinely coined, I think if you asked most employees, they would want to be assured that the person working next to them wasn't a dangerous criminal.''
Of the nearly 300,000 screenings conducted by the association each year, fewer than 2 percent return ''hits'' _ findings that flag the applications as needing further checking _ and 1 percent of the hits turn up applicants with reports on file of criminal offenses, Ms. Lucas said.
''In a day and age where it's hard to find qualified employees, you really don't want to turn people away if there's not a real good reason for doing so,'' said Barry Lawrence, a spokesman for the Society for Human Resource Management in Alexandria, Va.
But checking applicants' records is quickly becoming routine for many companies. In a 1995 Society for Human Resource Management survey of 1,331 human-resource professionals, 92 percent said they spoke to former employers before hiring new employees, 78 percent called references provided by candidates, 61 percent verified educational backgrounds, 42 percent checked driving records, and 25 percent conducted credit checks.
A 1994 survey of 589 members of the American Management Association in New York found that 70 percent conducted background checks on applicants and 48 percent searched criminal records.
Employers do background checks in various ways _ using the telephone, fax or Internet, for example. But Alan F. Westin, a professor emeritus of public law and government at Columbia University and publisher of the Privacy and American Business newsletter, said: ''I don't believe there's any documented place to find out for sure who's relying on the Internet sources and who's not. No one tracks it.''
When employers check applicants' resumes, they find that quite a few are lying. About one-third of all resumes have inaccuracies, and 10 percent of those are serious enough to deny employment, estimated Edward C. Andler, owner and president of the Certified Reference Checking Co. in St. Louis, who has provided reference and resume checking for employers since 1987.
''Over the years, the incidence of resume distortion has continued to creep up,'' said Andler, who is the author of ''The Complete Reference Checking Handbook'' (Amacom, 1998). ''People are more willing to lie and stretch the truth.'' Andler estimated that one of every 12 applicants _ even those who are seeking executive-level positions _ will claim to have college degrees they do not have.
Many employers have adopted a policy of giving only basic employment information when asked for references on former employees because they fear lawsuits. Lawrence said, ''Employers are frustrated because they can't always get the specific information they need to make a hiring decision.''
Westin said background checks were most likely to hurt applicants' chances unfairly when employers conducted hasty checks using sources that were not reliable, many of them inexpensive checking services offered on the Internet. ''No one is tracking what the employer's checking on these Net services,'' Westin said.
nn
Small companies may turn to unreliable pre-employment checking services because they may not know about reputable services or may consider them too expensive, some experts say. ''This is not the way the IBMs of the world check up on people,'' Westin said. ''But it tends to be the impression many employees have. The most potential for problems will be with smaller employers, not the big guys.''
If a check turns up questionable online information, employment lawyers say, it should be corroborated by other sources, like public records. Mathiason cautioned, ''Electronic information can be wrong and to rely upon it blindly is unwise.''
Groups concerned with privacy rights say mistakes in reporting personal data happen routinely. But while Kelly had a hard time countering erroneous information that came up in background checks in the early 1990s, people applying for jobs can easily find out now if inaccurate negative information is keeping them from employment, and they can take steps to correct any errors.
Katrina Haines, 27, a resident of Mission Viejo, Calif., found herself doing just that. She applied in May for a sales job with Good Guys, an electronics retailer in Brisbane, Calif.
She did not get the job because of the results of a criminal records check in California conducted by the Amherst Group on behalf of Good Guys, she said. The check turned up arrest records for criminal prostitution and drug possession, but those records were incorrect.
''It was so ridiculous, it was laughable,'' she said. ''But it was no joke.''
The police record, Ms. Haines discovered, belonged to a person with the same name. She was given a copy of the report, as required by the Fair Credit Reporting Act, so she disputed the errors, which were corrected. She said she was now eligible to reapply to Good Guys.
''If people don't know that they have the right to request the details of their own report and the ability to dispute it,'' Ms. Haines said, ''they'll never know why they didn't get a job.''
The concern over such mistakes in employment records has spawned a cottage industry of do-your-own-search services that, for a fee, will scout out the data available about you from public records and references. Documented Reference Check, for example, at www.badreferences.com, advertises that it will call an applicant's previous employer, asking for a reference as if the applicant had applied for a job.
The company uses one of several corporate names when making such inquiries. It sends the former employee a confidential report, generally for a fee of $87.95. If negative comments are discovered, (justified or not, it says) the company offers to ask the former employer in a letter to stop passing on bad references to prospective employers.
When errors in records are found, said Deirdre Mulligan, a staff counsel for the Center for Democracy and Technology in Washington, ''the only way to correct records is to go back to the original source of the information.'' At times, she said, that can be a lengthy process.
Faced with the problem that background checks sometimes turn up inaccurate information, employers have to try to balance their need to screen job applicants with the rights of prospective employees. The problems have increased with the growth of online background-checking services.
''There is no easy solution,'' said Norman G. Magnuson, vice president of public affairs for Associated Credit Bureaus, a 642-member trade association in Washington whose members generate 650 million credit reports a year, speaking about the growing reliance on electronic databases. ''We're trying to integrate a new delivery method for information, but maybe we're just not ready for it.''
Lawrence, of the Society for Human Resource Management, said: ''Employers can have all that data and still not take away a sense of how a person will perform in the job.''
Sandy Darby is furious.
Last week, a couple masquerading as her company's business associates passed phony corporate checks with her husband's forged signature in laser printing. The thieves' take at two major retail stores: $4,000.
The next day, a man tried to cash more than $600 in fake checks at a cash-checking business. The checks bore her company's name and even sported a counterfeit Bank of America logo, sans address.
A check-cashing business approved a $500 check, which her bank cashed. An employee at another check-cashing business got suspicious and telephoned Darby. But before the police could be called, the suspect left.
''This is killing me,'' said Darby, the owner of a family-run tour business with five employees in suburban Northridge. ''I'm a small business.''
Luckily for her, Darby won't have to pay the money lost on the forged checks. The bank and retail stores will be paying for it. But she must deal with the headache of clearing up credit reports and changing the account number.
Darby is among thousands of Americans confronted with identity thefts.
''Identity thefts are overwhelming credit bureaus, postal inspectors and the Secret Service,'' said Ed Mierzwinski, speaking on behalf of the California Public Interest Group. ''We think the trend is up, up, up.''
It's difficult to estimate the actual size of losses incurred by banks and businesses that grant credit, but estimates run up to $4 billion a year, said Beth Givens, director of the Privacy Rights Clearinghouse, a consumer information and advocacy group in San Diego.
According to a recent report by the U.S. General Accounting Office, the Secret Service estimates that $750 million was lost last year from identity theft, up from $450 million in 1996. Credit reporting companies received 523,000 fraud inquiries in 1997, up from 35,000 in 1992.
The reason is simple: It's so easy to obtain personal information.
For example, people can steal preapproved credit card solicitations in the mail, dive behind dumpsters of office buildings to get corporate documents, or access family Web pages on the Internet to get personal data.
Givens said one woman was victimized because her health insurance company uses her Social Security number as her member identification. Authorities believe that an employee of the insurance company stole her Social Security number.
While consumers usually aren't charged for the fraud, it does tangle up their credit records, Givens said. It takes from six months to several years to fix the record, depending on the severity of the problem, she added.
Check fraud is one of the banking industry's biggest problems, costing banks about $1 billion a year, said Sonia Barbara, a spokeswoman for the American Bankers Association in Washington.
But a new law signed by the president last week should help consumers and business victims. The Identity Theft and Assumption Deterrence Act of 1998 makes it a felony to commit identity theft. While it already is a crime to impersonate someone else for fraud, this law specifically focuses on ID theft.
Last week, the American Bankers Association launched a radio campaign to warn seniors about this crime.
The group's warning: Be careful about giving out personal information such as Social Security numbers and bank account numbers. Carefully monitor your bank and credit-card accounts to spot any activity that wasn't yours, and contact the bank right away if you find any.
You also can have your credit report blocked, to be released only when you call in with your personal identification number, Mierzwinski said.
Consumers who think they might be victims should contact the nation's main credit bureaus right away: Transunion (800) 680-7289, Equifax (800) 525-6285, and Experian, formerly TRW (888) 397-3742.
To be taken off the mailing list for preapproved credit cards, call (888) 5-OPT-OUT.
Although the IRS is making some progress, a new audit says chronic computer system weaknesses continue to place sensitive taxpayer data at risk of theft, fraud and even misuse by hackers.
''They still have a long way to go,'' said Sen. Fred Thompson, R-Tenn., chairman of the Senate Governmental Affairs Committee.
''Personal information on IRS computers is at risk to unauthorized disclosure, destruction or modification, and most alarmingly, to identity theft,'' Thompson said Tuesday.
The audit by the congressional General Accounting Office of six IRS facilities, also found that 397 computer tapes containing taxpayer information had been lost.
The GAO credited the Internal Revenue Service with making some major leaps forward in improving computer security since another critical audit in April 1997. The IRS says it has corrected 75 percent of the problems identified in that report.
But the GAO said ''serious weaknesses'' remain. Among them:
--Computer hackers could access IRS data with relative ease because information isn't encrypted before it is transmitted over telephone lines. IRS says it has no evidence such a crime has occurred.
--Too many IRS employees have access to sensitive computing areas, raising the possibility of information theft.
--Employees without a need to know have the ability to change or delete taxpayer information. Some tapes and disks are not overwritten before being used again, allowing unauthorized access to some of this information, including Social Security numbers.
--The new IRS system aimed at catching employees who illegally ''browse'' through taxpayer files is working on only one of several computer systems, and it cannot detect which activities are legitimate and which are not.
--Few contingency plans are in place in case of disaster, such as an alternative computer processing site or effective backup electric generators.
In a written response, IRS Commissioner Charles Rossotti said he agreed with many of the conclusions and GAO recommendations, but he insisted that the agency is well on the way to a more complete turnaround.
Rossotti, whose background in the private sector focused on information systems, said the initial focus has been on larger data processing systems and it is now moving into other areas. But he noted that making these changes at the agency's more than 1,000 facilities ''cannot be completed in a few years.''
A new centralized IRS systems office completed a review of what needed to be done at all district offices in December and has now begun examining all other offices.
''We believe that managing risk and prioritizing corrective actions and resources is the key to making needed and measurable improvements,'' Rossotti said in his response. ''Protecting taxpayer information and the systems used to deliver services to taxpayers are key to the success of a customer-focused IRS.''
For the last two years, Mari Frank has spent more than 500 hours and $10,000 to clear her name because a Ventura, Calif., woman assumed her identity, stole her credit record and racked up debt along the way.
''She got a red convertible Mustang in my name. ... I think she's still driving it,'' Frank said.
Prosecutors said Frank was the victim of the fastest-growing crime in America: identity theft.
Starting on Friday, California will become only the ninth state to prosecute identity theft as a felony. The new law is the latest in a series of recent local and federal guidelines set up to protect Americans from the misappropriation of a name, Social Security number, driver's license or any other form of identification for monetary gain.
The Secret Service estimates that identity theft cost U.S. citizens $750 million last year, up from $450 million in 1996.
''Identity theft is the fastest-growing crime in America, maybe even the world,'' Los Angeles County District Attorney Gil Garcetti said at a news conference Wednesday to explain the new law.
Penalties will include prison sentences of up to three years and fines up to $10,000.
Until a year ago, there was no legal punishment in California for identity theft. In January, it became a misdemeanor, infrequently prosecuted by most district attorneys' offices in the state.
In July, a new civil law became effective, forcing credit agencies to clear the records of identity-theft victims who can present a police report documenting the fraud.
Garcetti said the law will give his prosecutors the ammunition they need to fight identity theft.
Identity theft also became a federal felony this year, punishable by up to 15 years in prison.
Officials said increased use of computers, along with the ease of getting a credit card by mail, is responsible for the rise in identity crimes. But an identity thief doesn't need to be a master hacker to get sensitive information.
Frank, who suggests people shred discarded mail, said some criminals find personal identity information in a trash bin.
Frank said her alter ego, who was prosecuted under credit card fraud laws and sentenced to a work furlough program, got the credit information from a computer database that private investigators use. Within a few months, the identity thief had obtained checks, a driver's license and even business cards in Frank's name.
After Frank found out about the crime, the Laguna Niguel, Calif., lawyer spent hundreds of hours talking on the phone and writing letters before her record was clean.
''I am the true, real Mari Frank and it was not very easy to prove that,'' she said.
The Nixon administration did it. So did Oliver North. And so does Carole Harris.
Shred, that is.
Every day during the summer, Ms. Harris, 65, opens her mail on the sun porch of her summer cottage in Buchanan, N.Y. She sorts it, then shreds what she doesn't need in her $29 Royal Jaws personal shredder, which sits on top of her wastebasket.
''I had always torn up my charge receipts into pieces before putting them in the wastebasket,'' she said. Then last fall, she said, she watched an NBC News report on how thieves needed only a name and address to steal a person's identity, using that information to set up fraudulent credit accounts.
''I thought, well, if I've got to tear up envelopes and anything with names and addresses, that's a lot'' to do by hand or with scissors, she said.
The popularity of personal shredders has increased tremendously in the past few years, said Jean Papagni, a Staples spokeswoman. After the NBC News report in November, she said, there was an uptick in sales, then steady sales throughout the holidays and into tax season.
Fear of so-called identity fraud _ said to be the nation's fastest-growing type of consumer fraud _ is reason enough for some people to buy shredders, said Todd W. Henreckson, director of the General Binding Corp.'s Shredmaster division, in Northbrook, Ill.
''The public's becoming paranoid _ and not in an unreasonable nature _ about their personal identity,'' he said.
Shredders have been around since the 1930s, and they became part of the public vernacular during the Watergate years in the 1970s. The Iran-Contra affair in the 1980s and a range of scandals in the 1990s drew more attention to shredders. For a long time, only government agencies and corporations could afford them or the space it took to store the shredders, which cost thousands of dollars and took up about six cubic feet apiece.
Then in 1990, Fellowes Manufacturing, the leading maker of shredders, introduced two desktop versions, which sold for $149 and $199. Other companies began making the machines, and prices dropped; some 100,000 shredders were sold in that year in the United States and Canada.
Based on recent sales, manufacturers estimate that 3 million personal shredders will be sold this year in stores like Staples, Office Max, Office Depot, Best Buy, Wal-Mart and Sears, making the machines the fastest-growing home office product.
The buyers of small shredders include schools, people working at home and professionals like lawyers, doctors and tax preparers. Just the thought of someone rifling through their garbage is motivation enough for many people to buy shredders.
The Supreme Court ruled in 1988 that the minute garbage is put out to be picked up, it becomes part of the public domain and is no longer private.
Evan Hendricks, editor of Privacy Times, a newsletter based in Washington, said shredding documents was smart because ''identity theft is a growing problem to the extent of becoming a national epidemic.''
Shredders appeal to people like Carol Story, a member of a co-op board on the New York's Upper West Side who plans to ask the board to buy one. She routinely has to shred by hand or with scissors applications that are two or three inches thick. ''We get people's private information, a lot of it,'' she said. ''What do you do with it? I spend a fair amount of time destroying these papers. I sit in front of the television and shred it myself.''
To protect personal information, shredders aren't the last line of defense. While shredders can help prevent the theft of personal information from garbage, professional thieves often steal things like credit card applications in the mail.
''It's like the wild, wild West out there,'' Hendricks said, ''and to protect your privacy you have to be Jesse James.'' He recommends that you try to keep private any information like names, addresses, Social Security numbers, dates of birth, mothers' maiden names and driver's license numbers. You should also check your credit report once a year.
Perhaps not surprisingly, retired people, like Ms. Harris, seem to be on the leading edge of shredder buying. Tony Storrie, vice president and general manager of the Fellowes Powershred Division in Itasca, Ill., said: ''A lot of retired or elderly people who have a lifetime's worth of documents are also sensitive to the criminal issues. They are more likely to take precautions.''
Ms. Harris enjoys her Royal shredder so much that she bought a shredder for each of her four children, and she plans to take her shredder back home to Harrisburg, Pa., in the fall and use it there for the rest of the year. She shreds the name and address labels that she tears off envelopes and catalogs, along with credit card receipts and credit card applications. ''It's there all the time,'' she said. ''I use it every day.''
Choosing a Shredder
Choosing among personal shredders depends upon how you intend to use the machine and, more important, how much security you feel you need.
WHAT KIND OF MATERIAL DO YOU WANT TO SHRED?
Junk mail, documents from work, tax information? That determines the throat size needed.
HOW OFTEN DO YOU EXPECT TO USE IT?
That will help you decide how many sheets you want the machine to handle at once.
DOES IT MATTER WHICH TYPE OF CUT THE SHREDDER MAKES?
Some shredders cut paper in spaghetti-like strips, while others cross-cut to make what resembles confetti.
The portable Shredmaster Confidential from GBC, for example, weighs two pounds and costs $24.99. It is good for shredding ATM and credit card receipts, but a standard sheet of paper must be folded in half before shredding. More practical for light use is the company's best-selling model, the 40S, which sells for $29.99 and weighs four pounds. In an unscientific test, the unit performed nicely on up to three stapled sheets of regular-sized paper, but it slowed when fed four and five sheets. With the long, thin strips, your wastebasket is likely to fill up quickly (a plus if you need packing material).
If you believe those spaghetti strips could somehow be pieced together, you can spend more for a cross-shredder, which reduces your potentially revealing documents to tiny pieces of paper.
Fellowes's Powershred PS60 CC, a cross-cutter that costs $159.99, works like a paper tiger, chewing up to seven sheets at a pass. The biggest drawback, however, is its size and weight _ it weighs 18 pounds. It is hard to lift the shredder on and off the wastebasket it comes with.
Less impressive is the GBC 55X cross-cutter, which sells for $99, weighs 12 pounds and is supposedly designed for up to three sheets at a time. The machine works noticeably hard to make its confetti. Two sheets are about as much as it can take before getting stuck. Once the shredder sticks, you have to use the reverse and forward buttons to free the paper. If that doesn't work, you have to unplug it and turn it upside down for a good shake.
Speaking of getting stuck, all the shredders display warnings regarding long hair, jewelry and ties: all candidates for getting caught in the machines.

The Clinton administration announced a new privacy initiative Friday aimed at protecting children and medical patients, among others. But while the proposals were ambitious, the administration can enforce few of them without the consent of Congress or private industry.
Calling privacy in the age of electronic commerce ''a basic American value'' that ''must be protected,'' Vice President Al Gore made public a list of a dozen or so new initiatives that seek to tighten the security of financial and medical records and to protect the privacy of children who use the Internet.
Many of the proposals are simply endorsements of bills already wending their way through Congress. Others require new congressional action that is, in some cases, uncertain at best.
But the administration chose not to offer any broad new ideas for protecting the privacy of adults online, an issue important to many in Congress and to public-interest groups. Gore announced instead that, for now, the administration would leave industry to regulate itself.
The government's privacy rules are of special concern now because the European Union plans to enforce a new electronic privacy program in October and has threatened to stop doing business with companies in other countries that have looser rules. In congressional testimony earlier this week, Commerce Secretary William Daley said the administration's new proposals would bring the United States into compliance. But some experts in privacy law disagree.
The administration can enforce only a handful of the initiatives proposed Friday, including two that would tighten the security of medical and banking records.
The White House said the Department of Health and Human Services would propose a new rule next week to enhance the security of electronic medical records, but offered no details.
And federal bank regulators will strengthen the enforcement of a law that sets limits on how easily banks can share information about their customers and their accounts with related business, such as insurance companies, according to a senior administration official.
The goal, Gore said, was ''to ensure that account-holders have the chance to give a thumbs-down or a thumbs-up before banks hand out sensitive information about their accounts.''
Many of the other proposals are just that _ ideas that are up to others to implement. For example, Gore said he wanted to discourage ''profiling'' _ the practice by some companies of building dossiers on the activities of private citizens using a variety of databases and then using or selling that information to other businesses.
''We are working with the Federal Trade Commission to issue a new challenge to companies that use information technology to piece together personal profiles of American citizens and then sell those profiles for profit,'' the vice president said. ''And here is the message to them: If you don't find a way quickly to effectively regulate your own industry, we will take actions to make you protect the privacy of all Americans.''
Similarly, the White House urged Congress to pass pending legislation that would enforce criminal penalties for ''identity theft'' _ stealing someone's Social Security number, credit-card numbers or other identifiers and using them to commit a crime, such as credit-card fraud.
Gore also urged Congress to pass a law that would forbid companies running sites on the World Wide Web to collect information about children under 13 visiting the sites without permission from their parents. ''Before children innocently forfeit personal information, parents should have a say,'' the vice president said.
(STORY CAN END HERE _ OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS)
Experts in privacy regulation found few new ideas in the White House initiative. David Sobel, general counsel for the Electronic Privacy Information Center, a private research group based in Washington, said, ''We didn't hear much here that we haven't heard before, and the gaping hole in their policy continues to be Internet privacy'' for adults.
Evan Hendricks, editor of the Privacy Times newsletter, said: ''In form and ceremony, it's a great day. But in substance this leaves a lot wanting.''
Sobel also said the proposals ''still leave us out of step with Europe.''
Hendricks agreed, saying: ''This does hardly anything to deal with the coming problem with Europe. It leaves us on a collision course with the EU.''
John Santner likes to collect names.
He had 160 them when the police arrested him last October, including Florida driver's licenses with his picture under more than a dozen different names, none of them his own. Most of the identification cards listed people whose names were ''borrowed'' to commit crimes.
The licenses helped Santner and five accomplices scam at least $4 million from businesses and mess up the lives of many innocent people with forged checks and fraudulent credit cards. The police said Santner had masterminded the biggest identity theft scam ever seen in San Francisco, with a ring of thieves who took names and Social Security numbers of other people and then created fraudulent paper trails.
''These guys are artists,'' said San Francisco Police Inspector Earl Wismer.
Santner is a chilling example of one of the fastest-growing crimes in the world. Identity theft accounts for about half of the $1.5 billion in credit card theft in 1995, according to the Secret Service, which monitors the crime. Consumer advocates estimate that up to 350,000 people are victimized each year.
In June, Santner, 33, pleaded guilty to nine counts of fraud and was sentenced to six years in prison. His partner in crime, 29-year-old Eric Shay, received a six-year sentence after pleading guilty to 18 fraud counts. Four co-defendants are at large or awaiting trial.
Identity theft is a crime that evolves with every advance in technology. For the complex international economy to function efficiently, credit must be easy, and money must move quickly and electronically. A skilled thief can take advantage of that system, harvest names, purchase thousands of dollars of merchandise and bill it all to an unwitting victim whose identity has been stolen.
Credit card theft had been the realm of pickpockets for decades. Now, a new breed of high-tech thieves can steal a whole identity and run up charges in the name, sometimes for years, without the victim's knowledge.
A national credit bureau, Trans Union Corp., has seen the number of consumer inquiries and reports to its Fraud Victim Assistance Department jump from 35,235 in 1992 to 522,922 in 1997, according to figures cited by the General Accounting Office.
''Identity theft is a plague right now,'' said Beth Givens of the Privacy Rights Clearinghouse in San Diego, which tracks the problem nationally. ''Every day, charges are being credited to people who have no idea what's really going on.''
Givens and the U.S. Public Interest Research Group, a private consumer advocacy organization, estimate that up to 350,000 people are victimized by identity theft each year.
Most identity fraud starts small, with a few forged checks or purchases on a stolen credit card. The more complicated scheme is total identity assumption, where a thief applies for credit cards, loans, utility accounts and apartments under someone else's name. In some cases, a criminal will electronically graft his or her photo onto a legally valid driver's license under another person's name with correct information.
''The same people in yesteryear who may have gone guns blazing into a bank are now doing identity theft,'' said Alison Koch, an investigator with the California Department of Motor Vehicles who specializes in identification fraud. ''It's a lot safer to do this with a computer. ... Once they steal an ID, they can use false documents to commit a multitude of white-collar crimes. And it's difficult to catch people.''
Typically, one identification card will be used to apply for instant credit at as many as a dozen department stores in a week. The thief can walk in, get credit with the bogus ID and leave with thousands of dollars in computer equipment, stereo components or jewelry. Often, they'll hit different stores in different cities in the course of a few days.
''They move fast to stay ahead of local law enforcement,'' said Inspector Phil Dito, who worked the Santner case.
The police broke the Santner ring because its leader liked San Francisco too much, said Wismer, who spent more than two years pursuing its leader. Santner stayed in the city for two years, even after coming to the attention of investigators in 1995.
Santner and Shay participated in nearly every form of identity theft, the police said. Few scam artists are as sophisticated as Santner, a former chef with a knack for computers, and Shay, a former employee of the credit reporting agency TRW (now known as Experian) who is familiar with consumer databases.
''They mastered every aspect of this crime,'' Wismer said. ''It was just like a business. They kept very detailed records. It was an efficient, well-run criminal enterprise.''

(STORY CAN END HERE. OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS.)

They used an unusual combination of high-tech and low-tech methods to commit their crimes. Sophisticated computer graphic let the duo create bogus driver's licenses from other states. They searched Internet databases for personal information on potential victims.
But they found much of their treasure in the trash can. They sifted through garbage for credit card receipts and paycheck stubs. They broke into mailboxes on the street and in apartment complexes.
''They made master keys to many of the mailboxes in San Francisco ...'' Wismer said. ''They even had a postal uniform.''
The police believe the thieves' favorite pieces of mail were preapproved credit applications, charge card bills, car insurance bills and motor vehicle registration notices, all used as building blocks for false paper trails.
Santner and his accomplices applied for credit cards and loans and set up checking accounts. They put together folders on all their potential victims, including one containing a department store account statement and a garbage bill belonging to Sen. Dianne Feinstein, D-Calif. They had another file under the name of a prosecutor who worked their case.
The police said the suspects had stolen ID cards and checks, altered them with state-of-the-art desktop publishing equipment and reprinted the bogus cards on a color printer. They were able to electronically scan driver's licenses and then change the information and drop in their own photographs, Wismer said.
When the police raided Santner's office last October, officers found extensive records on potential targets along with computers, scanners and a huge amount of equipment. There was a mountain of confidential data, including information poached from voter rolls, credit applications and a master list of thousands of Florida drivers.
''Lots of these names may not have been used _ yet _ but they were always looking for new victims,'' Wismer said.
Marvin Young Jr. got home from work one evening and found a certified letter from the Sacramento police that changed his life.
''There was a warrant for my arrest for check fraud,'' said Young, who lives in Oakland. ''I nearly fainted. I'd never even been to Sacramento.''
That was in 1991. Seven years later, he is still fighting to clear his name, stolen by a former housemate.
''I'm having trouble explaining who I am _ he took over my life,'' Young said. ''I just sold my house and I can't buy another one. I've worked hard and never made a late payment in my life, but this other guy has just messed up everything for me.''
The saga of the real Marvin Young and the impostor using his name illustrates the struggle identity-theft victims face in reclaiming their names and restoring their credit. Identity theft, one of the fastest growing crimes in the nation, is a type of fraud in which a criminal takes another's personal information and uses it to apply for credit. The con artist can then make thousands of dollars in fraudulent purchases and have it all billed to an unwitting victim.
As in Young's case, catching the thief doesn't necessarily stop the crime. The person who stole his identity has been arrested several times, the authorities say, but apparently finds Young's name too useful to resist.
''Once these guys find a good name, they pretty much stick to that and keep it going as long as possible,'' said Andrew Wong, a U.S. Postal Service inspector who has handled numerous cases identity theft. ''Many of these guys are into drugs and can't get regular jobs. They just go back to what they know best.''
Stealing a person's identity requires only a Social Security number and one other piece of identifying information, such as a mother's maiden name. Much of that type of information is now available on the Internet for as little as $15.
Once a thief gets a credit card in someone else's name, it's party time. Thieves normally max out a fraudulent card in less than an hour, leaving the victims to sort out the mess.
In the Young case, he could prove that he was at work at a San Francisco bank the day the fraudulent checks were written. But his problems were far from over.
The man who was Young's housemate for a few months in 1989 had stolen his identity and run up debts around the nation, investigators said.
Now, Young always carries copies of letters from the police and credit agencies confirming his identity. He was never arrested for the crimes committed in his name.
Marvin Young's case began in 1989, shortly after he moved to the San Francisco from Mississippi. His housemate asked to see Young's Mississippi driver's license photo. The man covertly copied some of Young's personal information, including his Social Security number and date of birth.
It wasn't until two years later that Young realized he'd been had. His housemate requested and received a copy of Young's birth certificate from Mississippi, then used that document to obtain driver's licenses in Young's name in several states. The impostor opened credit lines at dozens of stores in different areas.
''There were 60 or 70 accounts in my name that I had to close,'' Young said.
From 1991 to 1993, Young worked to clear his name, writing more than 100 letters and checking his credit report regularly. Eventually, Young settled into a normal life and even bought a house. The impostor became a bad memory.
''He was quiet until August of 1997, then he went on a rampage,'' Young said. ''In one month, he opened up 40 accounts in my name. He was all over _ in Atlanta, Florida, Washington, D.C., and Minnesota.''
Young's housemate was finally arrested. But Young is still slogging his way out of the swamp caused by fraudulent bills.
''It's a year later and I still can't get a drop of credit,'' he said.

(STORY CAN END HERE. OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS.)

The police say that as long as credit cards and checks have existed, criminals have used them for fraudulent purposes. Every advance in technology brings new twists from scammers.
Identity theft wasn't always so well-known, though.
''Back in 1988 when it happened (to me), nobody even knew what I was talking about,'' said Elsie Strong of Los Angeles, founder of the support group Victims of Identity Theft. ''I felt so alone. Now there are thousands of us. People need somebody to talk to. They don't know what to do next. I realized that there needed to be a group for us.''
Since Strong was victimized, there have been thousands of others, often without any knowledge they are victims.
''A lot of these people don't find out about it until they're getting a house. ... By the time they clear their credit, they've missed getting the house,'' said Phil Dito, a fraud inspector with the San Francisco police.
Strong and other victims have testified for legislation to make it easier to clean up credit and get tougher on perpetrators. They share frustration over an economic system that grants credit easily and a criminal justice establishment that puts a low priority on prosecuting fraud.
''The police just don't have time to really go after these problems,'' said Joanne Mankiewicz of San Francisco, whose name was used to amass $80,000 in debt. ''It's easier to go after a bank robber who uses a gun than one who does it with paper and plastic.''
Mari Frank, an Orange County attorney who has worked on cases of identity theft, summed up the odyssey of fraud victims:
''First you get victimized by the bad guy, then you get victimized by the banks that won't believe you, then you get victimized by the credit reporting agencies that won't take off the fraudulent information and then you are victimized by another company that won't give you credit, then you are victimized by government agencies that won't believe you,'' Frank said. ''It's a wound that never gets to heal.''
If someone steals your name and runs up lots of bills with it, how do you clear things up? Slowly.
It took Mari Frank two years and became an obsession.
''I've been through identity-theft hell and I survived,'' said Frank, 50. ''I had to write 90 letters and spent 500 hours working to clear my name.''
But Frank, an attorney in Orange County, Calif., turned her ordeal into a service for other victims: She has compiled a guide to help others avoid the same problems. She has created an ''Identity Theft Survival Kit,'' written a book and pamphlets, and produced computer discs with sample letters to send to banks, creditors and credit reporting agencies.
''I've become a reluctant expert,'' Frank said. ''I found out more than I ever wanted to know about this.''
She had no idea what identity theft was until 1995, when she received a call from the Bank of New York demanding that Frank pay up on her $11,000 credit card balance.
''I said: There must be some mistake. I don't have a credit card with you,''' said Frank, an adjunct professor at the Western State College of Law in Fullerton.
She didn't. She'd been scammed.
''It was technology rape,'' she said.
A Ventura County woman had somehow gotten hold of Frank's Social Security number and other personal data. The woman set up a series of fraudulent lines of credit, ordering credit cards, starting checking accounts and having Frank's mail sent to a different address. The impostor ran up about $100,000 worth of bills.
''She even bought a car using my name,'' Frank said. ''And then she didn't keep up her payments. ... Bills in my name were being sent to Ventura (Calif.). I'd never even stopped there before.''
The scam apparently had been going on for at least a year. After spending thousands of dollars, Frank believes she has finally cleared her name with the Bank of New York and other creditors including Thrifty Rental Car, which was threatening to sue her after the impostor trashed a car.
The impostor, Tracy Lloyd, eventually pleaded guilty to six counts of felony fraud but spent no time behind bars, Frank said.
''This woman stalked me. If she had used the .22 Beretta handgun she had in her possession at the time of her arrest to steal that money, she would still be behind bars. But instead she used a pen, a computer and the telephone. She drove home from the courthouse in the same red convertible Mustang that she bought with my name.''
Repairing the damage can be difficult, time-consuming and frustrating. Frank and other experts said that victims of identity theft often become depressed. There is now a support group called Victims of Identity Theft (310-397-3004).
''It's a fight for your credit and your sanity,'' Frank said. ''There's post-traumatic stress disorder that occurs from this crime. Most of the time you don't know who is doing it, and the perpetrators never get caught.''
UNDATED: DUI vs. DWI?
Q: I remember reading some months ago that the Fuller Brush Co., of Fuller Brush Man fame, still exists. I had assumed that with changing technology and lifestyles, it was long gone. Do you have any information, and where can I order products?
A: The Fuller Brush Co. is still a booming business. Although distributors nationwide still may call on customers occasionally, the legendary ''brush man'' calling door-to-door is little more than a memory, said company spokesman Larry Gray. These days, many customers choose to order products by mail or electronic order, or by phone to a toll-free number, he said. The company manufactures more than 2,000 items, such as household cleaning aids, polishes and wax products, cotton and synthetic mops, floor brushs and brooms, hair care aids, lotions and fragrances, even silk-screen graphics, at its plant in Great Bend, Kan. Information: 1-800-522-0499; or the Fuller Brush Co. Internet site: www.fuller.com
Q: Over the past few years, Dean Johnson, host of ''Hometime'' on public television, has had three women who have helped him build, and all seemed to be his wives. What's the story on these women? What is Johnson's background?
A: Johnson is married, but not to any of the women _ there have been four, not three _ with whom he has co-hosted ''Hometime.'' There's reason for your confusion, though. The program makes it appear as though Johnson and his co-hosts are married ''so we can introduce situations that might realistically occur with a husband-wife team,'' as the program's publicity material states.
Peggy Knapp, the first co-host, started in 1986, but left after the first season. Since then, she been hosting ''Newton's Apple,'' a public TV children's program. JoAnne Liebeler, the second co-host, stayed with ''Hometime'' for four seasons, after which she moved to the West Coast to pursue other acting opportunities. Susanne Egli, who joined the show for one season, has since been acting in regional theater and appearing in commercials.
Current co-host Robin Hartl joined ''Hometime'' in July 1992. She received a real estate license and spent two years selling real estate in Eau Claire, Wis., before moving to Minneapolis, where she worked in the commercial insurance business for eight years while renovating homes in her off-time.
Johnson was an accountant, sales representative and residential contractor before launching ''Hometime'' in 1984. He and his real wife, Kathi, have two children.
Q: How can someone from Jamaica participate in the National Spelling Bee? Isn't it restricted to students of the United States and its territories?
A: The competition, sponsored by Scripps Howard Newspapers, has only these restrictions: contestants must speak English and be younger than 16, and cannot have passed beyond the eighth grade at the time of their school finals. All have qualified by competing in previous spelling bees sponsored by their local newspapers. The 249 contestants this year represented 49 states (no Vermont entry), several U.S. territories, Mexico, the Bahamas and Jamaica.
This year's winner was Jody-Anne Maxwell, 12, a seventh-grader at Ardenne High School in Kingston, Jamaica. The only previous winner from beyond the mainland United States was Hugh Tosteson of Puerto Rico, who won in 1975. In light of Jody-Anne's victory and the foreign participants this year, Scripps Howard officials said they would consider renaming the 71-year-old contest, substituting the world international for national.
Q: I saw a newspaper photo showing a U.S. Army infantry veteran wearing a Combat Infantryman Badge. The caption said he was a veteran of Desert Storm. I thought the badge was given only to those who had been in combat for at least three months, or had been awarded a Purple Heart. Can you clarify?
A: The Combat Infantry Badge is awarded to infantrymen who have been under enemy fire in a combat zone, with no minimum time limit specified, according to the Dictionary of the Modern U.S. Military. The only restriction stated is that generals and support/administrative personnel usually are ineligible to receive it.
Q: I know a lot of people who use the product Ripped Fuel to boost energy. I heard something on the news about a danger associated with it, but I didn't get the details. Do you have any information?
A: You probably heard about concerns expressed by the Food and Drug Administration relating to scores of herbal products and supplements. Government and other experts have warned that a number of such products can be risky. They have said that the pills, tonics and teas are sold with little information for consumers to judge whether they actually work or might have potential side effects. The culprit named in Ripped Fuel is ephedra, also called ma huang, epitonin and sida cordifolia. It contains stimulants known chemically as ephedrine. Several months ago, the FDA reported having 900 reports of side effects, including heart palpitations and psychosis, heart attacks and strokes. Several states have banned ephedrine-containing supplements. Federal limitations are pending.
Q: I saw that Tony Bennett sang ''Ave Maria'' at Frank Sinatra's funeral. Knowing that Sinatra was an admirer of President John F. Kennedy, I wonder if Sinatra sang ''Ave Maria'' at Kennedy's funeral? If not, who did?
A: It was Luigi Vena who sang Gounod's ''Ave Maria'' at Kennedy's funeral service Nov. 25, 1963, at Washington's St. Matthew's Roman Catholic Cathedral. Jacqueline Kennedy had specifically requested him to do so. Vena had sung the same music when she and Kennedy married at Newport, R.I., on Sept. 12, 1953. Another vital participant at both ceremonies was Cardinal Richard Cushing of Boston. He officiated at the wedding and sang the requiem mass at the funeral.
Q: Have the Atlanta Braves ever had a black announcer?
A: Yes. Billy Sample, an outfielder for the Braves in 1986, announced for the team for two years, 1988 and 1989, said Braves publicist Glen Serra. Over the years after that, Sample held jobs announcing for ESPN, the California Angels and the New York Yankees. No longer in the broadcast booth, he now evaluates umpires for the National League.
Q: Some time ago, I heard about a doctor who grows Carolina Gold rice, donating the crop to a church to sell. Can you tell me about this venture, and where I might purchase some?
A: You're referring to South Carolina ophthalmologist Richard R. Schulze who, in an attempt to attract ducks, planted his first rice seeds in 1979 on his 400-acre Turnbridge Plantation on the South Carolina side of the Savannah River. Schulze and his wife switched to Carolina Gold, the original variety grown in the state's Old South heyday, after discovering a source for the seed in Texas. Carolina Gold is the variety that European nobility prized for its sweet, nutty taste and whiter-than-white color after it was washed.
Since the Schulze family couldn't consume all the rice they produced, they have, over the years, given generous amounts to patients and friends. Even so, they still had a surplus, so Schulze first donated it to the Savannah Association for the Blind to sell as a fund-raiser. Now he donates it _ for the same fund-raising purpose _ to the Episcopal Church of the Holy Trinity in Ridgeland, S.C.
The church still has a small supply of the Carolina Gold from last December's harvest, a spokeswoman said Thursday. You can order it by sending a check to Church of the Holy Trinity, Rt. 3, Box 260, Ridgeland, S.C. 29936. The cost is $10 for a 1 1/2-pound bag, plus $1.50 for shipping. Once it is sold out, the next crop will be available for shipping next December, the spokeswoman said. Information: 803-726-3743.


The herb is called ephedra, or ma huang, and it comes from a shrublike plant grown widely in Asia. It can be found in more than 200 diet supplements, in pills and powders, drinks and diet bars, for sale in health food stores and on the Internet.
Its advocates say it decreases appetite, raises metabolism, improves concentration, burns fat and even enhances sexual performance. In thousands of postings on the Internet, users praise it for raising their energy, helping them lose weight and sharpening their muscle tone.
But to its critics, ephedra is a potentially dangerous substance that urgently needs more study and regulation. They point out that its active ingredient, ephedrine, is a central nervous system stimulant similar to amphetamine, and they say reactions to it can vary widely.
Ephedrine has been widely studied over the past few years, and studies suggest that it can produce a wide array of possible side effects, including anxiety, insomnia, hypertension, tachycardia, psychosis, kidney damage, dependency, heart attack, stroke and death. The federal Food and Drug Administration says it has received hundreds of reports from physicians, health authorities and others about adverse reactions to ephedrine-based products.
Critics and proponents alike agree on one thing: ephedra is flying off the shelves. Metabolife International Inc., a 5-year-old San Diego company that sells an ephedra-based pill called Metabolife 356, says this year's sales will reach $900 million.
A critic, Dr. Jacqueline Berning, a professor of nutrition at the University of Colorado, whose clients include many professional athletes, says the use of ephedrine-based products is ''rampant among athletes,'' even though they have been banned by the National Collegiate Athletic Association and the U.S. Olympic Committee.
Ephedra's active ingredient, ephedrine, has been in over-the-counter cold and asthma medications since the 1920s, and the ephedra plant has been used for thousands of years in Chinese medicine. Still, the combined effects of the herbal potpourri found in many diet supplements have not been studied. While over-the-counter drugs are subject to Food and Drug Administration regulation, herbal supplements are assumed safe unless proved otherwise.
''The public has a blind spot with the herbals,'' said Dr. Bill Gurley, of the College of Pharmacy at the University of Arkansas. ''I have a feeling over time enough serious cases of addiction will pile up and enough adverse events will be reported to change that perception.''
Gurley has just completed a study suggesting wide variations in product ingredients and quality. ''Ephedra supplements are derived from plants that can contain any number of ephedrine-like alkaloids,'' he said. ''These alkaloids vary not only in pharmacological activity and potency, but certain combinations may be additive or synergistieir effect.''
In testing 19 ephedrine-based supplements, Gurley said, he found wide variations in alkaloid content. Some products contained significantly less of the active ingredients than listed on the label, some significantly more.
Two years ago, in response to reports of adverse reactions, the Food and Drug Administration proposed restricting doses of ephedra to 8 milligrams at a time and 24 milligrams a day, and prohibiting the addition of caffeine to ephedrine products. (The American Herbal Products Association, a trade organization that sets standards and guidelines for the diet supplement industry, recommends that dosages not exceed 25 milligrams, or 100 a day; a Metabolife pill has 12 milligrams, according to the label.)
After a lobbying effort by the diet supplement industry, a congressional subcommittee asked the General Accounting Office to investigate the research behind the FDA's proposal. In August, the accounting office issued a report assailing the agency's findings as sloppy science. ''The FDA needs to provide stronger evidence on the relationship between the intake of dietary supplements containing ephedrine alkaloids and the occurrence of adverse reactions,'' the report said.
nn
In recent months, ephedrine-based products have figured prominently in two widely publicized cases, both involving deaths.
Last month, a judge in British Columbia ruled that Julia Campagna, a 28-year-old woman from Kirkland, Wash., was not criminally responsible in the deaths of two teen-age girls in a fiery car crash near the U.S. border in May 1998. Court-appointed psychiatrists testified that Ms. Campagna had been in a state of psychosis, a reaction to the ephedrine-based supplement Xendrine, which she had taken for five days.
A year ago, Anne Marie Capati, a 37-year-old knitwear designer from Huntington, N.Y., died after suffering a stroke at a fitness club in Manhattan. Ms. Capati, who suffered from high blood pressure, had been taking Thermadrene, an ephedra supplement manufactured by SportPharma of Concord, Calif. According to her husband, who has sued the manufacturer, the fitness club and his wife's personal trainer, she had been taking the recommended dose for five days, ''to lose the last five pounds and firm up.''
The warning label on Thermadrene (and many other brands, including Metabolife) makes clear that ephedrine-based products should not be taken by people with certain medical conditions, including high blood pressure.
In an interview, Michael Ellis, the chief executive of Metabolife and a board member of the American Herbal Products Association, strongly defended ephedrine-based supplements. ''I read about the Long Island woman's death, and it's tragic,'' he said. ''This case points out why we need consistency in the warning labels. But let's keep this in perspective.''
With millions of people taking ephedrine each year, Ellis argued, a few cases of adverse effects are to be expected. ''Some people die from eating peanut butter or strawberries,'' he said. ''Everything carries risk.''
He has urged the FDA to appoint a working group of scientists, consumers, herbalists and industry representatives to develop new guidelines for dietary supplements containing ephedra and other herbs.
As for the purity of Metabolife, he said: ''We believe we are responsible. We label correctly, and we have a nonprofit third party give us a certification of good manufacturing practices.''
Ellis is at the center of the latest ephedra-related controversy. After being interviewed for the ABC News program ''20/20,'' and anticipating a hostile report, Ellis took pre-emptive action last week.
In a $1.5 million advertising campaign Metabolife announced the creation of a Web site (www.newsinterview.com) posting the unedited 70-minute interview. Commercial spots ran on 1,500 radio stations, and a number of full-page newspaper advertisements. ABC News says it expects to broadcast the interview later this month.
Eleven years ago, Ellis, a former police officer, was arrested in San Diego and charged with using ephedrine to produce methamphetamine, a highly addictive street drug. He pleaded guilty to using a telephone in the trafficking of drugs and was sentenced to five years' probation.
''I did something very wrong, something very much out of character, and something I am very sorry about,'' he said, and later added: ''Metabolife has been looked at inside and out. We have a report from a DEA-approved lab that shows you can't make methampethamine out of Metabolife. Obviously we are not breaking any laws.''
Ellis said he was hopeful that the attention would help him make a point. ''If this product and industry are going to have longevity, we have to come out say, `You can't pop supplements like they are carrots; this is another form of medicine.'''
The sentiment is shared by many mainstream physicians. ''The public should be informed,'' said Gurley, of the University of Arkansas. ''A drug is a drug whether it's from a natural source or you make it in laboratory.''

China's customs officials have scored remarkable success in drug seizures in 1997, today's International Business Daily reported.
They have seized 369 kilograms of all kinds of drugs during the year, 1.3 times the 1996 figure, the report said.
Drugs containing ephedra vulgaris, drug-making chemicals and mental medicines increased notably in 1997.
Officials of 10 Chinese customs offices were assisted by drug-seizing dogs, used in 20 drug busts of 15 kilograms.
Herbal medicine, the mainstay of therapeutics for centuries before modern purified drugs relegated it to the status of near-quackery, has in the last five years emerged from the fringes of health care with an astonishing flourish and now shows clear signs of joining the medical mainstream.
Despite many cautionary tales about adulterated and even dangerous products, herbs formulated as capsules, tinctures, extracts and teas _ and increasingly as additions to common foods like potato chips and fruit drinks _ are now routinely used by a third of American adults seeking to enhance their health or alleviate their illnesses. Each day the herbal realm wins new converts, particularly among those who have become disillusioned with the cost and consequences of traditional drugs, distrustful of conventional physicians and convinced that ''natural'' equals ''good.''
Yet, because herbal products are classified as dietary supplements, not drugs, and face none of the premarket hurdles drugs must clear, consumers have no assurance of safety or effectiveness. Indeed, scores of products sold in the United States are listed by European and American authorities as ineffective, unsafe or both, and manufacturing standards to assure high quality have been proposed but are not yet in force.
Thus, countless consumers are wasting their money on useless products or jeopardizing their health on hazardous ones. Among the serious side effects that have been linked to herbal remedies are high blood pressure, life-threatening allergic reactions, heart rhythm abnormalities, mania, kidney failure and liver damage. A few widely available products, including sassafras and comfrey, contain known carcinogens.
At the same time, according to a report last year in the journal Psychosomatics, unsuspecting consumers ''have used herbal remedies with good results only to discover that the benefit was actually derived from the presence of undisclosed medicines,'' including steroids, anti-inflammatory agents, sedatives and hormones.
''The lack of quality standards is the No. 1 problem in the whole industry,'' said Dr. Varro Tyler, emeritus professor of pharmacognosy (the study of active ingredients in plants) at Purdue University. Tyler, who has no financial connection to herbal products and is arguably the nation's leading independent expert on herbal medicine, said: ''I feel sorry for the typical consumer. How is he or she to know what is best, what products are reliable and safe? Even when a label says the product has been standardized, the consumer has no way to know if it actually meets that standard.'' And even if an herbal product has been reliably made in some standard dose, it does not mean that scientific studies have shown it to be effective.
The industry itself is promoting a ''good manufacturing practices'' doctrine. Annette Dickinson, director of scientific and regulatory affairs for the Council for Responsible Nutrition, a trade organization for producers of dietary supplements, said a consortium of associations submitted a document of manufacturing standards to the Food and Drug Administration two years ago. Although such a standard would say nothing about an herb's safety or effectiveness, it would result in reliable methods that the industry would have to use to assure the identity and quality of its products. The agency has issued a notice of proposed rules but no final ruling as yet.
Nonetheless, botanicals _ as herbal products are more accurately known _ are enjoying an annual retail market approaching $4 billion, up from $839 million in 1991 and growing about 18 percent a year. Hundreds of products formulated with virtually no government oversight are crowding shelves of health food stores, food markets and pharmacies nationwide. Supplements are also widely sold by marketers like Amway, through catalogs and on the Internet.
Now, even major pharmaceutical companies like Warner Lambert, American Home Products, Bayer and SmithKline Beecham are introducing herbal products, adding respectability to this marginalized market.
Some herbs _ like echinacea, goldenseal, American ginseng and wild yam _ have become so popular that their continued supply from natural sources is in danger. As the plants become scarcer and more expensive, products containing them are increasingly likely to be adulterated and may even contain none of the herb listed on the label. Peggy Brevoort, president of East Earth Herb Inc., a company in Eugene, Ore., that produces botanicals, said the demand for St. John's wort, used for mild depression, and kava, a calmative said to reduce anxiety, now exceeds their supply, introducing the ''danger of adulteration'' by ''unscrupulous dealers.''
At the same time, two major new publications _ a 1,244-page Physicians' Desk Reference for Herbal Medicines, produced by the same company that publishes the Physicians' Desk Reference, and an English-language edition of Germany's therapeutic guide to herbal medicines, The Complete German Commission E Monographs _ have been issued to help educate physicians, pharmacists and interested consumers about the known uses, proper dosages and safety concerns of more than 600 botanicals now sold in this country. The evaluations in both books are based on studies, most done in Germany and reviewed by teams of experts.
Last month, the National Institutes of Health began listing on the Internet international bibliographic information on dietary supplements, including herbal products. The address is www.nal.usda.gov/fnic/IBIDS/.
In addition, a few medical and pharmacology schools have recently introduced courses in phytomedicine, the study of botanicals. And next month the American Pharmaceutical Association will conduct a two-day program on herbal medicine as part of its annual meeting. Still, most doctors remain wary of botanicals, especially when patients choose self-medication with plant extracts over established medical remedies.
nn
The very act of Congress that has fostered this growth _ the 1994 Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act _ has also permitted chaos to reign in the botanical marketplace, with no mechanism to assure that products are safe or effective. Pushed heavily by Republican Sen. Orrin Hatch of Utah, the home base of many supplement makers, and passed over the objections of the FDA, the law created a new product class, the dietary supplement, that was not subject to regulations applied to drugs. Now any substance that can be found in foods, regardless of amount or action and including substances that act as hormones or toxins, can be produced and sold without any premarket testing or agency approval.
Marketed as neither a food nor a drug, herbal products are not obliged to meet any established standards of effectiveness or safety for medicinal products, which require extensive laboratory and clinical trials before approval. As with other substances classified as dietary supplements, the FDA can restrict the sale of an herbal product only if it receives well-documented reports of health problems associated with it. The agency took four years, and more than 100 reports of life-threatening symptoms and 38 deaths, to act against ephedra, often sold as the Chinese herb ma huang, a stimulant that can prove disastrous to people with heart problems.
With FDA authority limited by the 1994 law, the Federal Trade Commission, which monitors advertising, has taken a more active role in monitoring supplement makers.
The FTC last year took legal action against seven manufacturers that had broken rules requiring advertising be truthful and verifiable. The companies were selling remedies or purported cure-alls for ailments like impotence, cancer and obesity.
The commission also sent e-mail warnings to 1,200 Internet sites that it said had made ''incredible claims'' for drugs, devices and supplements, including herbal remedies that would supposedly ward off AIDS. Also, the commission late last year issued its first set of advertising guidelines aimed specifically at the supplement industry.
Still, the current regulations have created a quagmire of consumer confusion and set up potential health crises that even industry officials say could ultimately hurt producers as well as users of herbal products. Under the 1994 law, consumers have no assurance that an herbal product contains what the label says it does or that it is free from harmful contaminants. Independent analyses of some products, particularly those containing costly or scarce herbs, revealed that some have little or none of the purported active ingredient listed on the label.
Adding to the confusion is that botanical makers are allowed to describe products only in terms of their effects on the structure or function of the body, not their potential health benefits. Thus, a product label might say ''promotes cardiac function'' but it cannot say ''lowers cholesterol.''
Likewise, although the law does allow health warnings on the label, most manufacturers have yet to include them.
Consumers are warned, however, that federal drug safety officials are not watching the store. All botanicals must display a disclaimer on the label following the description of the product's structural or functional role: ''This statement has not been evaluated by the Food and Drug Administration. This product is not intended to diagnose, treat, cure or prevent any disease.'' To which Tyler commented, ''If that is true, why on earth would anyone use it?''
The seeds of the modern herbal market were sown in the '60s when ''green, organic and natural became buzzwords,'' Tyler said. But they did not mature until the '90s with the growing consumer interest in ''self-care and controlling one's destiny,'' he said. Many turned to herbs as a gentler way to treat health problems and a potential tool for preserving mental and physical health.
The interest has spawned scores of Internet sites and hundreds of books on various herbs. But much of the literature is replete with poorly documented health claims and, with few exceptions (among them, Tyler's books), advocacy prevails over objectivity.
Because plants contain a mixture of relatively diluted chemicals, they naturally tend to have milder actions, both in their therapeutic benefits and side effects, than the concentrated, single chemicals in most drugs. Thus, botanicals generally take longer to act than regular pharmaceuticals and few have the potency of a prescription, the one possible exception being saw palmetto, which a well-designed study indicated may be as helpful for an enlarged prostate as the more expensive and riskier drug, Proscar.
The combination of chemicals in botanicals is potentially both a plus and a minus. When two or more chemicals enhance one another's activity, the therapeutic benefit could theoretically exceed that of an isolated substance formulated as a drug. Mark Blumenthal, who heads the American Botanical Council, noted that the herb St. John's wort, widely used in Germany and increasingly in the United States to counter mild depression, is standardized for a substance called hypericin. But, he explained, ''hypericin is not directly linked to its antidepressant activity.'' Rather, other substances in the herb seem to have diverse actions on brain chemicals, all of which work together to counter depression.
Equally possible, though, when using an herb with two or more active chemicals, is that one will cancel the benefits of another or introduce a hazard. Without careful chemical tests and large, well-controlled clinical trials such actions are often hard to detect.
Consumer confidence in herbal medicine is bolstered by the common but erroneous assumption that ''natural'' equals ''safe'' and the public's failure to realize that many plants contain chemicals that are potent drugs or outright poisons. Natural laxatives like the herb Cascara sagrada are just as habit-forming and harmful to the colon as laxatives sold as drugs.
nn
Indeed, one quarter of prescription drugs and hundreds of over-the-counter products were originally isolated from plants. Ephedra, for example, contains a natural stimulant that is approved for use as a decongestant and bronchial dilator in some pharmaceutical products. However, when used in uncontrolled dosages or by people with certain underlying health problems, it can cause a dangerous rise in blood pressure and, in its herbal form, has been responsible for serious adverse reactions and dozens of deaths, mainly among people who inappropriately used it as a stimulant or diet aid.
Complicating the safety issue is the fact, shown in several recent surveys, that most patients fail to tell their physicians they use herbal supplements and thus sometimes risk dangerous drug interactions or endure costly tests or treatments when an herb causes an unrecognized side effect. Experts say many patients withhold information about herbal drug use because they fear being ridiculed by their doctors.
Although all German physicians must take courses on herbal remedies, only a handful of American medical and pharmacology schools offer courses in this field.
A year ago, the President's Commission on Dietary Supplement Labels recommended that the FDA appoint a committee to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of herbal products. ''This could be the most important step in the United States toward legitimizing herbal medicine,'' Tyler said.
However, the agency responded that it lacked the budget to support such an effort. American physicians have completed and published only a few well-designed studies of some popular botanicals. Among them were studies showing that saw palmetto can shrink an enlarged prostate and ginkgo biloba can improve memory in patients with early Alzheimer's disease.
The Office of Dietary Supplements at the National Institutes of Health is helping to finance a three-year multicenter study of St. John's wort as a treatment for clinical depression and a study of plant-based estrogens as a preventive for postmenopausal health problems.
However, thousands of studies of botanicals have been completed abroad _ mainly in Germany _ that strongly suggest a health-promoting role for more than 200 plant products. Germany's Commission E evaluated 380 botanicals, approving 254 as safe and reasonably effective and disapproving 126 as ineffective, unsafe or both.
The Germans use a different criterion to assess an herb's benefits _ a doctrine of ''reasonable certainty'' that the herb has the desired effect and is safe, Blumenthal said. Whereas standard testing of a drug for approval by the FDA can cost as much as $500 million per product _ a prohibitive amount for companies to spend on botanicals that cannot be patented _ tests to establish ''reasonable certainty'' would cost only $1 million to $2 million, Tyler estimated.
In June 1996, Dr. Robert Temple, director of medical policy for the FDA's Center for Drug Evaluation, suggested that, rather than subjecting botanicals to the extensive tests required for drugs, the agency might consider applying less stringent criteria to assess an herb's effects, at least when a product is to be used only for a short time. He said, ''A long history of safe use might provide sufficient safety information for products that are intended for short-term use.''
More than four dozen botanicals or botanical formulations have been submitted to the agency as investigational new drugs. If any meet the agency's criteria for safety and effectiveness and are eventually approved as drugs, they would be allowed to carry direct health claims _ instead of just structure and function statements _ on labels and in advertising.
Meanwhile, Dr. Joerg Gruenwald, medical director of a German phytomedicine company and primary editor of the new Physicians' Desk Reference for Herbal Medicines, said professionals can rely on that volume for current, documented information about botanicals. The volume, to be issued annually, updates the Commission E reports and adds several hundred other products sold in the United States, listing effects, side effects and conditions in which their use is inadvisable.
China announced today it will carry out a massive targeted fight against narcotics-related crimes from this month through the end of September, to curb rampant drug smuggling and the increase of drug use.
The campaign was outlined at a national anti-drug conference late last month, and announced today by the National Committee of Narcotics Control (NCNC).
According to the NCNC, the Chinese authorities have attached great importance to the drug problem since it re-emerged in the country in the early 1980s, and have launched a series of offensives against drug-related crimes.
Influenced by worsening international drug crimes, China is now confronted with an unprecedented situation: 520,000 drug users across the country had been registered with government medical institutions by the end of 1995.
But some local authorities have not fully recognized the seriousness of the problem, and have not done enough to crack down on drug-related crime, the NCNC said.
It was discovered that some grassroots level authorities have privately given the green light to drug growers, which has stimulated the spread of drug production and use.
The NCNC demanded party and government bodies at all levels concentrate on the problems of drug use, planting and trafficking.
Tight control should be exercised in regions that produce natural ephedra, which is used to make methamphetamine, or "ice," and all illegal dealings in the substance should be eliminated, the NCNC said.
Departments concerned must avoid wranglings over duties and responsibilities and coordinate with each other, it was urged.
More importantly, the NCNC said, criminals involved in drug-related activities must be dealt with strictly in accordance with law, and fines should never be levied in place of harsher punishment.
It also encouraged public trials to be held for the offenders in order to educate the public and deter crime, and to mobilize the public to actively participate in the anti-drug drive, according to the NCNC.
The NCNC set up a general headquarters today for the campaign and published a hotline number, 65204111, to take reports and opinions and offer legal advice.
Seeking to boost his daily workouts at the gym, Jeff Bowers turned recently to a popular herbal supplement to increase his metabolism.
Bowers bought the ephedrine-based product, Ripped Fuel, at a health food store in San Antonio. But after only a few days of using it as directed to try and heighten athletic performance and burn fat, Bowers suffered an attack.
''I could feel my heart pounding through my shirt, my hands were jittery and I was hyperventilating, so my roommate took me to the emergency room,'' he recalled in a recent interview.
''I took the Ripped Fuel with me, and before I even opened it up, the nurse guessed what it was,'' he said. ''She said I wasn't the first whom she'd seen with the problem.''
After receiving more than 1,400 similar, ephedrine-related complaints from people across the state, the Texas Department of Health is considering classifying the stimulant as a dangerous drug and requiring a prescription for most products containing it.
Banning ephedrine from over-the-counter sales would affect the multimillion-dollar, herbal-supplement industry in Texas.
Some of its products include diet aids, athletic performance-boosters and many ''herbal ecstasy'' intoxicants that teen-agers buy at convenience stores to get an amphetamine-like ''buzz'' or ''high.''
Sales of non-prescription ephedrine products sold for asthma, such as Primatene and some nasal decongestants, would not fall under the proposed new regulations, officials said.
At least eight deaths in Texas and more than 40 nationwide have been linked to ephedrine _ a stimulant found in certain Asian plants _ said Cynthia Culmo of the state health department.
''To say you can determine a safe amount (for over-the-counter sale) is incorrect,'' Culmo said. ''The only amount we see as safe is zero.''
A Department of Health committee met Wednesday to accept public comment on the regulation change. More than 150 people testified at the hearing, with an overwhelming majority against requiring prescription sales of ephedrine.
Most who testified were connected to the industry that provides ephedrine-based dietary supplements or stimulants. The witnesses pleaded with the state to back down from the proposal and instead consider a compromise that, among other things, would restrict sales of ephedrine-based products to minors.
The Department of Health is not expected to rule on the possible changes until this fall.

(STORY CAN END HERE. OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS.)

Banning over-the-counter sales of ephedrine would only hurt consumers and independent business distributors, while allowing larger drug companies to profit, said Phillip Sindler of the Dallas-based Wellness International Network, which sells dietary supplements, including the stimulant.
''It's not a health issue. It's an issue of where is the profit going to go,'' Sindler told the committee.
More than 60 companies in the Texas market ephedrine-based products, which constitute a multimillion industry in the state, according to Michael Ellis, president of Metabolife International.
Although other states have restricted some sales of ephedrine products, Texas' proposal is by far the most far-reaching, Ellis said.
''This shocked us,'' he said, stressing that there is no medical evidence that ephedrine products cause adverse effects.
Ellis and Dr. Ted Farber, a toxicologist for the dietary supplement industry, disputed the number of complaints and deaths Culmo said were possibly linked to ephedrine products.
The Food and Drug Administration originally had reported it was investigating more than 40 deaths possibly related to ephedrine, Farber said. But recently, the federal agency revised that number to only two, he said.
An FDA spokeswoman did not respond to a request for the correct number.
The FDA currently is considering prohibiting the marketing of dietary supplements containing 8 milligrams or more of ephedrine per dose. The agency also is looking at requiring product labels that instruct consumers not to use the product for more than seven days.
As evidence ephedrine is safe, Ellis cited an ongoing study by Dr. Patricia Daly of the Harvard Medical School on the effects of a supplement containing caffeine and ephedra, an herb from which ephedrine is extracted.
The incomplete study, paid for by companies that market ephedrine products, has found no adverse effects so far on patients, Daly said.
The death about two months ago of a 15-year-old California girl who was taking an ephedrine-based stimulant also has highlighted the ongoing debate over the safety of such products. Rosanna Porras reportedly took Ripped Fuel capsules before collapsing at soccer practice.
She later died, and California officials are still investigating the possibility that the herbal supplement caused her death. The company that markets Ripped Fuel, Twinlaboratories Inc. in New York, has said it does not believe its product was responsible.
Bowers supports the move to ban such products from over-the-counter sales.
''Sure, I'll admit that part of it's because of my own ignorance for trusting some 18-year-old who recommended the stuff at the health food store,'' he said. ''But these companies are duping people because they stand to make a lot of money, while this stuff is killing people.''
Here in the heart of the nation's herbal and vitamin industry, a stainless steel contraption was hard at work on a recent morning, spitting out clear plastic capsules at the rate of 90,000 an hour. Each contained precisely 600 milligrams of a fine, brick-colored powder that federal health officials are trying to ban.
The powder, a pulverized strain of rice called red yeast, is imported from China, where it has been consumed for 2,000 years, both as an herbal remedy (it was thought to improve blood flow) and a food (it spices up tofu and makes a tasty marinade for duck and pork.)
Then, five years ago, William McGlashan Jr., a young California venture capitalist, learned that scientists in Beijing were studying the rice for another reason: it seemed to lower cholesterol.
Today, McGlashan's company, Pharmanex, sells the encapsulated red powder under the trade name Cholestin in 37,000 American stores, from health food outlets to the giant Wal-Mart chain. McGlashan calls Cholestin a dietary supplement. Officials at the Food and Drug Administration call it something else: an illegal, unapproved drug.
On June 15, in the gray stone federal courthouse in Salt Lake City, U.S. District Court Judge Dale Kimball will be asked to determine who is correct. The case is being watched as a pivotal battle between the FDA, which is chafing against a 1994 law that left it almost powerless to regulate vitamins and herbal products, and the dietary supplement industry, which has been growing wildly since the law was passed.
At issue is not whether Cholestin is dangerous; no one argues that it is. Rather, the FDA contends that Cholestin has crossed the increasingly murky boundary that separates dietary supplements from drugs, because it contains an ingredient, lovastatin, that is the key component of a cholesterol-lowering drug. Pharmanex says the lovastatin occurs naturally and that Cholestin is more akin to a food than a drug.
The outcome of the case could affect the medicine and kitchen cabinets of millions of American consumers, including many doctors and scientists, who have come to believe that herbs like ginkgo, echinacea and St. John's wort are as important to good health as aspirin and antibiotics.
Aside from the turf battle between the supplement industry and regulators, the dispute raises crucial questions: What is the distinction between these herbal products, which may contain naturally occurring chemicals as potent as those in any drug, and drugs themselves?
Must products like Cholestin be subjected to the rigorous testing that drugs undergo?
''You see more and more dietary supplements sold right next to over-the-counter drugs,'' said William Schultz, the FDA's deputy commissioner for policy. ''There is a risk that the line will blur.''
It is already blurry. ''Foods are medicines; medicines are foods,'' said Loren Israelson, executive director of the Utah Natural Products Alliance, a trade group based in Salt Lake City. ''If you drink coffee in the morning, why are you drinking coffee? You're looking for the caffeine, a stimulant. That same caffeine is sold over the counter as No-Doz. That's a drug when it's in a pill form, and it's a food when it's in coffee. Why is that?''
The FDA struggled with such questions for decades. But with the passage of the 1994 Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act, the law under which the Cholestin case will be decided, the agency's task grew even more vexing.
The new law took dietary supplements out of the underground and into the mainstream, giving manufacturers like Pharmanex the long-sought right to advertise the potential benefits of herbs, even if the evidence for those benefits was sketchy. If the products were safe, companies could say what they wished, so long as they did not claim their products could prevent, treat or cure disease. Thus, McGlashan can advertise that Cholestin ''promotes healthy cholesterol,'' but not that it ''prevents heart attack or stroke.''
''For the first time,'' he said, ''we can educate the American consumer about what the product does. We don't have to rely on a person in a health food store to explain it.''
Since the law was passed, the FDA has received about 2,300 notifications from manufacturers intending to make claims about their products, and has objected to about 150 of them. It has also proposed a rule that would restrict, but not eliminate, the manufacturer's ability to use the herbal stimulant ephedra, which has been linked to more than a dozen deaths nationwide.
But these actions, says former Food and Drugs Commissioner David Kessler, are hardly enough to make a dent in the rampant proliferation of herbal remedies that he says are ineffective at best and unsafe at worst.
''Just walk into your pharmacy; it's out of control,'' said Kessler, who waged a bitter, unsuccessful battle against the 1994 law as commissioner. ''Efficacy is now defined as what sells off the shelves. The agency is powerless.''
While the law was a disaster for regulators, it was a windfall for businesses that sell herbs and vitamins. Indeed, after the act was adopted, annual sales of dietary supplements in the United States skyrocketed, jumping from more than $8 billion in 1994 to nearly $12 billion last year, according to the Nutrition Business Journal, a trade publication.
So furious has the growth been that one analyst, Matthew Patsky of the Boston-based investment banking firm of Adams, Harkness Hill, said some of the nation's biggest pharmaceutical companies are now planning to introduce their own lines of herbal products.
That worries Schultz, the FDA deputy commissioner for policy. ''If companies that would have tested their products and sold them as drugs are now going to not test them and sell them as dietary supplements,'' he said, ''then we have lost information about the safety and efficacy of those products.''
Among the law's beneficiaries was McGlashan, a 34-year-old Stanford University business school graduate who studied Chinese history as an undergraduate. With the baby boomers growing older, McGlashan sensed a growing demand for natural medicines the Chinese have used for centuries.
nn
McGlashan says he had a vision for his business; he wanted to apply ''pharmaceutical rigors'' to the dietary supplement industry, using research to persuade consumers that Eastern therapies worked. In early 1994, he Dr. Michael Chang, a medical chemist and former pharmaceutical industry researcher who had set up a manufacturing plant to produce herbal medicines in Huzhou, China, near Shanghai.
Chang scoured Chinese research for promising herbal products and identified 5,000; together, he and McGlashan narrowed the list to 30. By early 1995, Pharmanex was born, with headquarters in Simi Valley, Calif. Red yeast rice, called Hong Qu, was one of the most promising projects on its list.
''We know Hong Qu has been used for centuries, but we don't know why it lowers cholesterol,'' Chang said. ''We need to find out.''
The 1994 law, McGlashan said, made it worth investing in science. The company introduced Cholestin at the end of 1996, after nearly three years of study. Most recently, Pharmanex enlisted Dr. David Heber, director of the Center for Human Nutrition at the University of California at Los Angeles, to study the effects of Cholestin in adults with moderately elevated cholesterol.
The study, financed by Pharmanex, compared the cholesterol levels of 42 adults who took 2.5 grams of Cholestin every day for three months with the levels in 41 adults who were given placebos. Heber said the total cholesterol counts of those who took the supplement dropped, on average, from 250 to 210.
Heber dismisses the contention that red yeast rice is a drug; instead he calls it ''a functional food.'' The same cholesterol-lowering ingredient in lovastatin, he notes, occurs in even higher concentrations in oyster mushrooms, commonly used in Asian cooking. And nobody, he said, is trying to ban mushrooms.
However, Dr. Richard A. Friedman, director of psychopharmacology at New York Hospital-Cornell Medical Center, contends the current distinction between dietary supplements and drugs is based on semantics, not biology, and that both should be carefully regulated. ''If there is a biologically active component in the supplement, to say it is not a drug is illogical because it will have a similar effect,'' he said. Companies like Pharmanex, he added, ''want to be able to implant the idea in the public that the drug is medically beneficial'' without doing rigorous research drug companies must do to obtain approval.
That kind of science, McGlashan admits, would cost far too much for a small company like his. Yet with a decent body of research behind Cholestin, he said, he at one time envisioned himself becoming the FDA's poster boy for good behavior.
Instead, he received a visit from FDA investigators in April of last year; the agency had received complaints that Cholestin contained lovastatin, both from a pharmacist and from Merck  Co, the pharmaceutical company that manufactures Mevacor, the cholestorol-lowering drug that contains the same ingredient as Cholestin.
Shortly thereafter, federal authorities impounded 10 tons of red yeast rice that had come into the Port of Los Angeles from China; the shipment is now sitting in a storage facility in Mexico. Then on May 20, the FDA notified McGlashan that it considered Cholestin illegal, a move that prompted the company to ask for a hearing before Kimball of the U.S. District Court in Salt Lake City.
McGlashan contends that, at its root, the dispute is an economic one. Cholestin, he said, is sold to people who are too healthy for Mevacor, the Merck drug. Merck, he contends, is making a power grab for that market by trying to push Cholestin off the shelves _ a charge denied by Jan Weiner, a spokeswoman for the pharmaceutical company.
While the court case is pending, McGlashan said, sales of Cholestin are booming. One woman recently wrote him to say she had purchased eight months' worth of the capsules. Even his mother called, he said, asking, ''How am I supposed to get my Cholestin?''
For now, McGlashan has no answer. Standing outside the low-pressure room where the encapsulating machine was spinning, a lab coat covering his royal blue shirt and Hermes tie, he looked a little wistful. The fine red powder being packed into the capsules, he said, was the last of his supply.

Alarmed by what they see as the potential for mishaps with patients taking herbal remedies for everything from depression to memory loss, anesthesiologists have begun urging people to stop taking the herbs and supplements before having surgery.
Doctors say there is growing evidence that substances like St. John's wort and ginkgo biloba may have dangerous interactions with the variety of drugs used to anesthetize patients during surgery. Although hard scientific evidence of a problem is lacking, they say, anecdotal reports from hospitals suggest that herbal remedies may be putting some surgery patients at serious risk.
''The main thing you want is someone who knows enough to keep you out of trouble,'' said Dr. John B. Neeld Jr., president of the American Society of Anesthesiologists.
The society recently issued a warning to consumers using herbal medicine to stop taking the products at least two to three weeks before any scheduled surgery.
More recently, the New York State Society of Anesthesiologists issued a similar warning. The New York group urged patients who could not go off the drugs in time to bring in the medication in its original container and show it to the doctor.
Patients, however, are often reluctant to tell their doctors that they are using nontraditional approaches like herbal medications, said Dr. Carole W. Agin, director of the pain management clinic in Port Jefferson, N.Y. ''I think patients fear that it will somehow drive a wedge between the patient-physician relationship,'' she said.
Americans spend about $5 billion a year on herbal products, which, unlike prescription drugs, are not fully regulated by the federal government.
Often, little is known about the substances, their effects and their interactions with other drugs. And, in some cases, little is done to assure quality control. Only in rare cases, like the one involving the stimulant ephedra, when there are persistent reports of injury or death, does the government take action against an herbal product.
Anesthesiologists say they are taking no position on the use in general of herbal remedies, which are sometimes being incorporated into the practice of traditional medicine.
Two of the most common herbals are St. John's wort, which is said to help with mild depression, and ginkgo, which is taken to improve memory and blood circulation. Doctors also singled out two other popular remedies: feverfew, which is said to help ease migraine headaches; and ginseng, which is taken to improve vitality.
The possible interactions include an unintended deepening of the effects of some anesthetics and problems with blood pressure and bleeding.
One situation that some doctors suspect might be happening in operating rooms involves ephedra, which, despite being banned by the federal Food and Drug Administration, is still being taken in other forms.
From time to time, Neeld said, patients in surgery suddenly show signs of a drop in blood pressure. The anesthesiologist will then administer a drug like ephedrine, to bring the pressure back up.
In some cases, Neeld said, doctors have been surprised to see the blood pressure shoot back up to dangerous levels that could cause a stroke or heart attack. The patients later said they had been taking ephedra.
Doctors emphasize that much study needs to be done to establish whether there is a real risk for patients taking herbal remedies. ''All of the concern may prove totally unwarranted down the line,'' Neeld said.
The growing herbal industry has raised no objection to the doctors' warning. Dr. Phillip W. Harvey, director of science and quality assurance at the National Nutritional Foods Association, whose 4,000 members make and sell herbal remedies, called the caution common sense.
''I would whole-heartedly support that,'' Harvey said.
They vow to help you trim down, boost energy, put muscle on, and even take cellulite off.
Go to any health food store, fitness center, or grocery store and you'll see shelves stocked with energy enhancement and sports performance pills, drinks, and bars. And consumers are hungrier for them than ever.
They spent more than $6.5 billion in 1996 on over-the counter dietary supplements, according to the US Food and Drug Administration's latest figures. And nutrition groups say that sales are rising each year.
But do these supplements actually work? And, more importantly, are they safe?
While the FDA can alert consumers to products that could be dangerous, the Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994 limits the agency's latitude in regulating supplements.
Unlike drugs that get FDA approval before they are marketed, dietary supplements must be proven unsafe before regulators can restrict the use of a product.
While the FDA forbids labels that ''state or imply that the product can help diagnose, treat, cure, or prevent a disease (for example, `cures cancer' or `treats arthritis')'' consumers should be wary of products that are marketed as ''miracle cures,'' ''wonder drugs,'' and ''new breakthroughs,'' according to the agency's website.
In recent years, the FDA has issued warnings about the danger of over-the-counter supplements containing ephedrine, a powerful heart stimulant, and gamma butryolactone, or GBL, a central nervous system depressant.
In January, muscle and performance boosting products containing GBL had to be pulled from gym and store shelves after the FDA banned the product when some consumers experienced vomiting, slowed heart rate, seizures, comas, and even death.
Weight loss, muscle building, and energy boosting products containing ephedrine have not been recalled by the FDA, although the agency issued several warnings after it investigated more than 800 adverse health events including heart attack, stroke, seizure, and more than 30 deaths associated with products containing ephedrine.
In 1997, the FDA advised consumers to restrict their intake of ephedrine (derived from the ephedra plant) to 8 mg per dose and no more than 24 mg per day and not to use the product for more than seven days.
Products containing ephedrine _ commonly labeled as ephedra, ma huang Chinese ephedra, and epitonin _ are often found in weight-loss, energy boosting, and body building supplements.
But some in the dietary supplement industry are at odds with the government's descriptions that some supplements _ particularly those containing ephedrine _ are dangerous.
In May, Metabolife International Inc., sued WCVB-TV Channel 5, its anchor Susan Wornick, and Dr. George L. Blackburn of Harvard Medical School after the Boston station reported on health risks related to the use of ephedrine-containing weight-loss dietary supplements, including the top-selling Metabolife 356, which the San Diego-based company makes.
The report included a comment from Blackburn, who, when discussing the safety of ephedrine-containing products such as Metabolife, said ''you can die'' from taking them.
Metabolife claims his comments, as well as the broadcast, were false, and are damaging to the company, which sold an estimated $600 million worth of the supplements last year.
Motions to dismiss Metabolife's lawsuit were filed last month by attorneys on behalf of Blackburn and by those for Wornick and WCVB-TV.
Blackburn's attorney Jeffrey R. Martin called Metabolife's lawsuit ''frivolous'' and said ''we are doing our best to get it dismissed.''
Metabolife's president Michael J. Ellis has also threatened to sue the Washington Post over a similar report and has battled successfully in states, such as Texas, to stop legislatures from requiring prescriptions for weight-loss products containing ephedrine.
Nevertheless, some stores have voluntarily pulled ephedrine from their shelves. Bread and Circus Whole Foods Markets, a small Massachusetts chain, stopped selling about 12 products containing ephedra around the time the FDA warned in 1996 that the product was an ''amphetamine-like stimulant'' that can damage the heart and nervous system.
''We pulled everything. None of our stores carry ephedra products or ma Huang _ `speed' _ as we like to call it,'' said Allyn Kunz nutrition coordinator for Bread and Circus's northeast region.
''Some companies actually changed their formulas so we would keep their products on the shelf,'' she said, while others ''took out the ma huang and added another herb very high in caffeine called guarnana and they advertise it as `ephedra free,''' Kunz said.
But Bread and Circus doesn't carry products containing guarana either, she added.
While the majority of supplements are not dangerous, consumers shouldn't buy or use products just because the label says ''natural,'' according to Dr. David Levitsky a nutrition and psychology professor at Cornell University.
''Everything is natural,'' Levitsky said. ''Somehow there is the idea that if you use a plant directly or extract a tea it will be more effective and have less side effects (than approved drugs) and that's not true.''
For Levitsky, who is studying the effects of several herbal supplements, memory-aiding products and mood supplements seem to show the most promise. Despite volumes of testimonials from users, many who have been paid to make them, fitness, energy, and weight-loss supplements don't appear to produce a measurable effect, he said.
Where weight-loss is concerned, ''the more you believe in them the more they work...there is something to the placebo effect,'' Levitsky said. ''If you reduce caloric intake you are going to lose weight, no question. If you think what you're doing (with supplements) is helping, then you will stick with it,'' believing the supplements helped, he added.
Jeanne Spellman, a registered dietician at the Boston Athletic Club, said that creatine, a popular strength-increasing supplement, seems to ''have some promise,'' but she tries to steer (her clients) away from most supplements.
''People are looking for that quick fix. People think that they can take creatine or other supplements and sit on the couch for two hours to get more muscle and it ain't gonna happen,'' Spellman said.
Taking a supplement is ''easier to swallow than hearing that you'll have to go to the gym a lot and watch what you put in your mouth.''
The athletic club does not sell creatine or any other supplements, but does have protein powders and sports bars.
Nancy Clark, a registered dietician and director of SportsMedicine Brookline, said supplements ''are just that _ supplements. They are not replacements to eating and living right.''
''I'm not against them,'' Clark says, but ''there is not a magic pill. I say use food to help meet your goals.''
Customers can buy drinks, pills or meal supplements at Gold's Gym, according to Marco Cosentino, owner of four Boston area Gold's Gyms. He says about half of his customers use drinks, pills, or meal supplements to boost performance and build muscle.
''If there is an easier way, people want it,'' Cosentino said. ''It's marketing, there's no miracle. Some do work better than others. We don't tell anyone to take them but we sell them if they want them.''
But not everyone sees the trend as a healthy one for consumers.
''It's important to understand that this is not about health and this is not about well-being; this is about money and jumping on a bandwagon,'' said David Kessler, a former head of the FDA and now dean of Yale University's medical school. Kessler waged a vigorous but unsuccessful battle against the law that virtually stripped his former agency of its authority to regulate herbal and other dietary supplements.
For healthy people, most of the products pose little or no risk, and some, containing garlic and ginseng, may even be helpful, Kessler said. The danger, he said, is that some people with potentially life-threatening illnesses will use the products in place of standard medical treatments. That has always been a risk, but the marketing giants now pushing into the industry can pitch these formulas to more consumers, he said.
''The way they are positioned in the marketplace can lead people down roads to ineffective treatments,'' Kessler said, pointing to products whose names, he argued, could cause consumers to think they could be used instead of prescription drugs. ''If you promote a product as Mood Mender, you have a responsibility to that person who is depressed, and if that product doesn't work, you are doing harm.''
''People with specific illnesses look at these products a different way than the healthy person,'' he added, ''and it is through their eyes that the marketplace must be judged.''
In some cases, critics say, the supplements can be quite dangerous indeed. The FDA, for example, is attempting to rein in the use of the herbal stimulant ephedra, which is sold by various companies in a formula under different names. The formula, which manufacturers say is safe, has been linked to more than a dozen deaths nationwide. Marketers promise that the pills provide an amphetaminelike rush, aid in weight loss and even increase sexual sensation, but medical experts say they can cause heart attacks, strokes and seizures.
The big-name herbal pill dispensers now entering the market say they are sticking to more ''mainstream'' substances and argue that those formulas are safe and effective when taken by healthy people in recommended doses. Besides, they say, unlike the little-known manufacturers that once dominated the industry, they have the research and development budgets and purchasing clout to insure product quality.
''We spend tens of millions of dollars putting together manufacturing and quality-control processes,'' said Elliot Friedman, chairman and chief executive of Pharmaprint Inc., which is producing the supplements that American Home Products is planning to market under the Centrum name. ''The big companies are very protective of their brands.''
That may be, but the critics say consumers have a false sense of security about the regulatory oversight of supplements. They mistakenly assume, the critics contend, that the supplements are subject to the same scrutiny as toothpaste, cough drops and other seemingly benign products under the FDA's watch. The agency requires those goods to carry general cautionary labeling and dosage information, and it imposes limits on the claims that can be made in marketing.
Herbal supplements are regulated by a looser set of standards. Before the passage in 1994 of the Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act, manufacturers were prohibited, for instance, from making claims about the potential benefits of their products. But the revised guidelines allow companies to advertise the health effects of herbal supplements _ without having to conclusively prove their effectiveness _ so long as the wording does not suggest that the products prevent, treat or cure disease.
That gives companies much greater range in making product claims than manufacturers of, say, mouthwash. While a company cannot claim an herbal supplement cures cancer or relieves depression, for example, it can say that it ''promotes prostate health'' or ''aids in mental focus.''
Critics also worry that pharmaceutical companies will attempt to classify some products as herbal supplements instead of as drugs to skirt the rigorous process required to bring a drug to market.
That complaint is at the heart of a battle between the FDA and Pharmanex Inc., which manufactures a product called Cholestin, which it sells as an supplement in Wal-Mart and other big chains. The FDA wants to ban the substance, maintaining that it is an unapproved drug because it contains a natural form of a key chemical in the cholesterol-lowering prescription drug Mevacor, made by Merck  Co.
Last month, Pharmanex won the first round in the battle _ which was prompted by Merck's complaints about the product _ when a judge issued a preliminary injunction lifting the FDA's administrative ban of Cholestin. The company contends that the product is a natural alternative for people who are too healthy to take the drug.
Meanwhile, as other drug makers begin producing herbal pills, the FDA is struggling to find a way to exercise its limited oversight authority.
American Home Products declined to provide an executive to discuss its supplements business beyond issuing a statement through a public relations representative saying, ''Herbals represent a large and growing market with increasing consumer acceptance.''
In fact, analysts estimate that the Centrum line alone has the potential to generate $80 million in revenues within a year of its introduction, a figure Friedman calls ''on the low side.'' His company's share would be 10 percent of pretax revenues.
Friedman said the industry's growth could be even greater as more retailers make room for brand-name supplements on their already crowded shelves.
''Consumers are looking for a name they trust and, to be honest, that's why we went with Centrum,'' he said. ''Pharmacists know it, doctors know it and consumers know it. That is the edge in bringing these new people into the fold.''
Hypnotism has become a successful experiment to rid extra fat in obese men and women in Kuwait, a specialist said here today.
Kazen Abul, a social worker in close contact with the experiment in the country, told Kuwait News Agency that "hypnotherapy of obesity has made an unprecedented success in Kuwait. The number of people coming to clinics for this particular treatment is on the rise."
He said up to 700 obese people were satisfied with the results of hypnotherapy.
Kuwait has a large percentage of obesity cases among its 700,000 citizens, especially women, because of less activities and unrational food structure.
Kuwait has started this medical experiment on obesity cases recently. So far it is the third Arab country that has been using this method after Egypt and Lebanon which have been applying the treatment.
Abul said there was no side effects arising from this method, adding that even international-recognized psychiatrics applies this therapy in many cases like anxiety and depression.
Hypnotism has become the most successful treatment of people suffering from psychological illness like fear, anxiety, and it has been used on people suffering from obesity and even on drug addicts, he said.
The number of sessions patients need in hypnotism treatment depends on how complex the case is, and easier cases take only several weeks to get satisfied curative results, according to the specialist.
More than 40 percent of Kuwaiti women are obese and suffer from other chronic ailments such as vein-hardening, diabetes and hypertension, local press reported today, citing a Kuwaiti psychologist.
Mohammed Al-Mousawi, Director of the Educational Research Center in Kuwait, called on the people to follow a scientific diet to reduce opportunities of contracting the diseases, English daily Arab Times said..
The expert said Friday that a sedentary life style was the primary cause of such diseases.
He warned that obesity would directly lead to depression which is also a common disease in Kuwait.
Kuwaiti women accounted for 50.4 percent of the country's population, which is 708,000.
People in Kuwait are usually kept away from outdoor physical exercises by the hot desert climate which lasts at least for eight months a year, and diet with much fat are their favorates.
Al-Mousawi said: "I therefore advise women suffering from such diseases to take some exercises such as walking and to follow the right diet."
He also cited links between psychological problems such as fear and anxiety with obesity, adding that psychological pressure could drive some people into ingesting large quantities of food that lead to obesity.
The number of diabetics worldwide will increase from the current about 120 million to top 250 million by the year 2025, the World Health Organization (WHO) reported today.
The growth will be registered in both developed and, especially, developing countries, due to population aging, unhealthy diets, obesity and a secondary lifestyle.
According to the U.N. health agency, about 20 percent of diabetics develop the so-called insulin-dependent form of diabetes, or IDDM, and live on with insulin injections, while about 30 percent of the non-IDDM cases may use insulin injections to control their conditions.
The WHO considers insulin an essential drug. However, it noted that in some developing countries, the drug that turns the once fatal IDDM into a treatable disease is still unavailable or unaffordable.
A vial of insulin may cost a month's salary in many African countries, according to it.
Diabetes is a chronic disease caused by the human body's failure to produce insulin or to produce effective insulin. The deficiency leads to increased concentrations of glucose in blood and thus damage the body's many systems, particularly blood vessels and nerves.
The long-term complications of diabetes include blindness, kidney failure, heart attacks and even gangrene and amputation of the limbs.
Insulin was discovered in 1921.
More than half of the 710,000 Kuwaiti citizens are suffering from obesity and anemia because of poor eating habits and other causes, according to studies by a leading local nutritionist.
Obesity is number one health threat associated with nutrition in Kuwait, Director of Food and Nutrition Department of the Ministry of health Fawzia Al-Awadi said in a recent study.
According to his study, 42 percent of Kuwaiti women and 28 percent of men are obese. Twenty-eight percent of Kuwaiti men are overweight.
The ratio of female to male in Kuwaiti population is 51:49.
Several factors contribute to the higher prevalence of obesity in adult women, Al-Awadi said. These factors include repeated pregnancies, rapid decline in breast feeding, an early introduction to bottle feeding as well as poor eating habits.
She revealed that police and army personnel were more susceptible to becoming overweight (34.4 percent) while obesity was most prevalent among males with a technical profession.
"Regular food consumption between meals, the use of sugar in tea, and the consumption of an additional meal at Diwaniya (men's leisure time in chatting gathering) contributed significantly to the development of obesity among this group," she explained.
Al-Awadi's another survey conducted among 1,154 obese patients revealed that nearly one quarter of them had hypertension and about 33 percent suffered diabetes.
Al-Awadi noted that "it has been shown that obesity shortens life which is mainly due to cardiovascular and cerebro-vascular diseases, constituting an additional risk to overweight patients."
The nutritionist also said a large percentage of Kuwaiti children are suffering from malnutrition due to bad feeding habits that cause iron deficiency anemia. She said the intake of vitamin C rich foods such as fruit juices are very low, particularly among pre-school children.
Factors affecting the eating habits in Kuwait are income, food prices, food import policies and the drastic change in food formula, she reiterated. Increase in family income causes a change in the dietary patterns that mainly are represented by an increase in consumption of soft drinks, tea, chocolates, sweets, nuts and ready-made foods.
A survey showed that Hong Kong children were eating too much junk food, local press reports revealed today.
The poll of 2,760 students' eating habits by the Chai Wan Caritas Children and Youth Center found crisps, sweets, chocolates, chips, chicken and other deep-fried food, ice-cream and ice-lollies topped the list of favorite foods.
More than half the respondents spent up to five HK dollars (0.64 US dollars) a day on junk food, and another 26 percent spent between six to ten HK dollars (0.77 to 1.28 US dollars).
Most of the snacks were bought from their school tuck shops, the survey showed.
Over 12 percent said they did not eat breakfast, and close to 30 percent were unsatisfied with their weight.
Head of the center, William Ng Man-sui, said concern over an increasing number of young children with obesity problems had prompted him to research the eating habits of upper-grade students at all seven primary schools in Chai Wan, a district in the east of Hong Kong island.
He urged schools to educate students about nutrition and a balanced diet.
One out of every ten people in Shanghai is overweight, mostly because of improved lifestyles and poor eating habits.
A recent survey found that 12.6 percent of 4,895 adults and 11.35 percent of 9,093 children who live in urban Shanghai are obese, and these figures are close to the average weight proportion seen in developed countries, it was reported in today's "Wen Hui Bao Daily."
The survey was conducted jointly by the Xiangshan Hospital of Traditional Chinese Medicine and the Nutrition and Food Research Section of the Shanghai Medical Science University.
People in the 7-12 and 60-70 age groups run a greater risk of becoming overweight, and incidence of obesity in males is higher than in females, the survey showed.
Educational background was also related to the incidence rate, which is lower in well-educated people, especially in females.
About 70 million Chinese people, mostly city dwellers, are obese, and the number is on the rise as people's living standards have greatly improved in recent years.
Many of them gained unwanted pounds because they do not engage in regular exercise, sleep too much and eat food that is high in fat and calories, another survey of Beijing's overweight people showed.
Experts warn people who are overweight have increased tendencies toward cardiovascular and cerebral disease, diabetes, and kidney and liver disease.
A massive increase in the incidence of diabetes has been forecast for the United Arab Emirates (UAE) nationals unless education and preventive measures are taken, a medical study said.
About 11 percent of national men and 14 percent of women had diabetes and the rate is expected to rise in the following years, according to the study released by UAE's medical center today.
The study, involving 2,000 UAE nationals aged between 30 and 80 years, found diabetes in the UAE to be particularly widespread among the elderly and less educated social groups.
The study attributed the reason to the increasing incidence of obesity among UAE nationals, which is strongly linked to diabetes.
Doctors said common sense should be applied and they suggested nationals to eat more fruits, cereals and vegetables which were cited as the best sources to avoid diabetes.
The UAE has a 2.4 million population, but about two third of them are foreigners.
Heavy-drinking women, school children who smoke and the overweight of both sexes are ruining Britain's drive to create a healthy nation.
Only 11 of the 27 targets set by the Department of Health to reduce premature death and avoidable sickness by promoting sensible lifestyles look certain to be reached, according to an official report.
The National Audit Office today reported limited progress in achieving the aims of the Health of the Nation White Paper of l992.
The ambitious strategy to reduce coronary heart disease, strokes, cancer, mental illness, sexually transmitted diseases and accidents was introduced by Virginia Bottomley when she was health secretary.
Teams from the National Health Service formulated "action plans" to improve education, screening and preventive techniques. Healthy targets were set to be reached by dates between 1994 and 2005.
But despite the implementation of the strategy, John Bourn, the comptroller and auditor general, reported that Britons' behavior is becoming worse in three areas: obesity in men and women, drinking by women and smoking by the young.
The British government set targets on obesity because it increases the likelihood of coronary heart disease, strokes and illnesses including diabetes.
The government wants only 8 percent of women and 6 percent of men, aged 16 to 64, to be overweight by 2005: the same proportion as in 1980. But instead figures since then have risen to 16 percent of women and 13 percent of men.
Alcohol targets were set because too much drink raises the blood pressure, increasing the risk of stroke, and is blamed for liver cirrhosis, cancers and road traffic accidents.
However, the Health Department is refusing to consider a ban on cigarette and alcohol advertising, saying it is up to the public to change lifestyles, following government health education.
Armed with new surveys showing high rates of childhood anemia, obesity, and short stature, nutritionists in Guangzhou are pushing for more attention to local children's diets both at home and school.
According to a recent city survey, more than 40 percent of the teenagers suffer from anemia caused by malnutrition and about 20 percent of middle school students are overweight, "China Daily" reports today.
The survey says that Guangzhou teenagers, shorter than the average national height of the same age group, are about 10 to 15 centimeters shorter than Japanese teens.
Zhong Yukun, a nutrition expert of the Guangzhou Science and Technology Association, blamed unbalanced and dull food eaten every day for the malnutrition-based health problems.
Rice, the main Cantonese food, contains much less nutrition than that found in corn, wheat, potatoes and many other staples popular in north China.
In Guangzhou, about 70 percent of the teenagers either have the school lunch or buy lunch on the street nearby. And most school cafeterias don't serve food containing the seven basic nutrients students need every day, according to Zhong.
Many spoiled teenagers from one-child families eat only a particular kind of food, such as meat or sweets, which might easily lead them to develop obesity, diabetes or heart disease.
A survey in Shanghai has revealed that one in eight people in the city suffer from overweight.
The study shows that the 12 percent obesity is close to the standard in developed countries.
The survey was carried out among nearly 14,000 people, including 4,895 adults and over 9,093 young people from nine districts in the city. It was conducted by Shanghai Medical Sciences University and Shanghai Xiangshan Traditional Chinese Medicine Hospital.
The research showed that the ratio of adults suffering from obesity has reached 12.6 percent, and that of youngsters is 11.35 percent.
The survey indicated that differences in age, gender, and education levels can influence the ratio of obesity.
Fifteen percent of female adults suffer from obesity, while the level among male adults 10.68 percent.
However, more boys suffer from obesity than girls. The ratio of boys is 14.7 percent, almost double that of girls.
Researchers found that children aged from seven to 12, and people between aged 60 and 70, are easiest to fall victim to obesity.
They also found that the higher education levels people have, the less they are likely to suffer from obesity, especially among women.
Medical experts suggested that citizens, especially people suffering from obesity, should follow advice to change their life styles and diets.
Northwest China's Yunnan Province has launched a project to strengthen environmental protection, and will pour more investment into the sector.
Yunnan plans to achieve widespread improvement in its environment by the first decade of the next century, with forest coverage rate hitting 30 percent, and the area of natural reserve zones accounting for eight percent of the province's total land.
Efforts will be focused on 100 severely polluting sources, and provincial officials will close 15 kinds of small enterprises. By the year 2000, the volume of waste discharged by Yunnan will be reduced to the national standard.
Yunnan also has decided to strengthen environmental protection of its lake areas, which are the main residential areas there, by working out many restrictions for the use of lake resources. It has already succeeded in improving the water quality of the Dianchi Lake and Nanpanjiang River.
Regional ecological protection programs have also been launched to reduce the deterioration of the ecological environment. The province has limited the number of trees to be chopped down in the forest area in northwest Yunnan and has stopped building sugar factories in the Xishuangbanna region to preserve the only tropical rain forest in the country located there.
China's largest tropical rain forest, in the Xishuangbanna nature reserve in Yunnan Province, will get further protection when the reserve is enlarged from 247,000 ha to 533,000 ha, according to Zhuang Yan, head of the Xishuangbanna Dai Autonomous Prefecture.
Zhuang says that they are removing itinerant farmers from the rain forest and helping them settle elsewhere.
Han Xingguo, of the Xishuangbanna Tropical Botanical Garden, says that the Himalayas acts as a natural protective screen, stopping cold air from the north, while warm, moist air from the Indian Ocean brings plentiful rain.
This allows the tropical rain forest to harbor many rare and valuable flora and fauna that are on the verge of extinction elsewhere, Han says, but because it's between a torrid zone and a subtropical zone, it is more fragile than those at the equator.
Xishuangbanna has at least 58 species of rare or endangered plants, 15 percent of China's total number, and it is home to 102 species of mammals and 427 species of birds, a quarter and a third of China's total, respectively.
Protecting the area means protecting an important gene storehouse, Han says.
The first nature reserve was established on 57,000 ha of land in Xishuangbanna as early as in 1959, and after nearly four decades it has grown to 247,000 ha with most of the rain forest.
The Academy of Sciences has observation posts in the forest to study the bio-diversity and scientists have moved 3,000 rare plants to a special 90-ha area for protection.
A ministerial meeting of Africa's lumber producers will meet in Cabinda, Angola to discuss and work out new policy for lumber imports and exports.
Officials of the preparatory committee was quoted by the Angolan News Agency today as saying the meeting, scheduled on May 2-5, will also discuss the issue of how to protect the varieties of tropical rain forest.
Specialists will meet on April 27 to make preparation for the meeting at a center in Cabinda, built specially by the government at a cost of 5 million U.S. Dollars.
Angola, Liberia, Nigeria, Gabon, Congo, Cameroon, Sao Tome and Principe, Tanzania, Ghana, Cote d'Ivoire, Zaire, Equatorial Guinea and the Central African Republic are members of the African Lumber Organization.
The 17th Africa Timber Conference sponsored by the African Timber Organization (ATO) is to open in Angola's northern city Cabinda from April 29 to May 7.
The focus of the forthcoming timber conference is to discuss and formulate new policies on African development of timber industry, including timber export and import.
Conservation of tropical rain forest will be another major topic for the meeting, Angola's Deputy Minister of Agriculture Zacarias Sambeny announced here today.
During the conference, representatives from 13 ATO member states will also discuss an ATO work report and a 1996/98 budget of the organization.
The ATO, set up in 1976, comprises Angola, Tanzania, Liberia, The Central African Republic, Cameroon, Nigeria, Zaire, the Congo, Corte D'Ivoire, Gabon, Sao Tome and Principe, Ghana, Equatorial Guinea.
Experts from across China today called for urgent action to protect the dwindling number of black gibbons in southern China's Hainan province.
A total of 150 experts and professors from 25 research institutes and colleges across the country have launched the nationwide appeal. They called on government departments to participate in and mobilize social forces to enhance the construction and management of a natural protection zone on Bawangling Mountain, where black gibbons live.
Located in the western part of Hainan province, Bawangling Mountain boasts more than 1,000 varieties of wild animals, with over 40 kinds belonging to rare animals.
In the 1950s, there were 2,000 black gibbons living in the forest area of the province's 10 counties. Living space for gibbons fell dramatically with increasing human population, deterioration of forest environments, and excessive cutting of tropical rain forests.
Now there are only 15 to 20 gibbons remaining in the mountain area.
Gibbons are regarded as an animal indicator in the tropical rain forest. They have the same skeletal structure as humans -- four limbs, facial features, internal organs, and similar blood as human beings; and they are physiologically, psychologically and mentally similar to human beings.
Gibbons are of high research value, regarded by many as precious as giant pandas in China, according to experts.
Many international and foreign organizations have paid close attention to the protection of gibbons. They sent teams to conduct on-the-spot studies, established research centers, provide funds and publish information to generate world wide attention to their plight.
Hainan provincial government department has vowed to set up a foundation for the protection of gibbons, and to prevent and crack down on activities which threaten the life of gibbons.
A tropical rain forest project is to start soon in south China's Hainan province.
Under the program tropical rain-forest trees will be planted, along with tropical fruit trees and economic trees. Related agricultural and sideline product processing zones will also be established in the area of 5,400 hectares in Jianfeng Mountain area, Ledong county in southern parts of Hainan province.
The project will cost 35 million US dollars, with 18 million coming from Asian Development Bank loans.
Cui Xiaosu, an official in charge of the implementation of the project, said that the theme of the project will focus on environmental protection and help the poor in the project area.
Meanwhile Cui is also confident about the economic returns of the project, since the area boasts rich land resources and favorable soil and climate conditions for the growing of tropical rain trees.
The project area now has 12,000 people, mainly of the Li nationality.
Implementation of the project will stimulate local economic development, expand employment and improve farming skills of local people. More than 30,000 people are expected to benefit from the project.
Jianfeng Mountain tropical rain forest, covering more than 44,600 hectares, is now the largest in China. The forest is of great importance to the environmental and ecological protection in Hainan province and even Southeast Asia.
There are also many endangered and unique plants in the area.
Chinese government has always attached great importance to the protection of this area. It first set up a tropical primary forest protection zone in the area in 1951. A national forest garden was established there in 1992, and in 1993, Hainan provincial government decided to stop commercial tree felling in the area.
Xishuangbanna, one of China's largest tropical rain forest reserves, will almost double its area to bring more wild plants and animals under protection.
The Xishuangbanna Dai Autonomous Prefecture of southwest China's Yunnan Province has decided to enlarge the reserve area to 470,000 hectares from its present 268,000 ha., according to the local government.
The government has also formed a team of armed patrolmen to discourage poaching and illegal lumbering in the area.
The area, bordering on Myanmar and Laos, earned its reputation as "a kingdom of plants and animals" for its more than 20,000 species of plants, 429 species of birds, and 67 species of animals.
China's largest group of wild Indian elephants, as well as gaurus, peacocks, gibbons, and 105 other endangered species under protection, inhabit the primeval forest.
Malaysia and Austria have agreed to further expand bilateral relations by promoting two-way trade, mutual investment, creation of joint ventures and third market initiatives.
A joint statement issued today at the end of the four-day official visit by Austrian Chancellor Franz Vranitzky to Malaysia said Austria has offered scholarships for Malaysian students' post-graduate studies in sustainable rain forest management in the country.
Austria also invited Malaysian experts to study the dual system of vocational education in the country, its hydroelectric power generation and Austrian know-how in the use of mineral springs for therapeutical and preventive medical purposes.
The two sides have agreed to support the early implementation of the decisions taken at the Asia-Europe Meeting (ASEM) in Bangkok in March this year.
Malaysia and Austria also agreed to work together with other participants of the ASEM process on the establishment of an Asian European Business Council which will comprise representatives from small and medium-sized enterprises.
The statement said Malaysian Prime Minister Mahathir Mohamad has agreed to visit Austria in the near future in a bid to promote closer cooperation between the two countries.
Tanzanian Vice-President Omar Ali Juma has called for concerted efforts and cooperation among African nations in designing programs to curb deforestation and land degradation.
Juma made the appeal while opening a five-day international workshop on composite materials and waste minimization here on Monday.
He said that there is great hope in new technologies to turn agricultural residues and wastes into useful construction materials and therefore reduce dependence on wood products.
The vice-president noted that deforestation and land degradation are taking place at a great pace in the country, cautioning that unless drastic measures were taken, Tanzania and many other African countries would soon experience desertification.
He said that the indiscriminate use of forests is largely caused by poverty, "symbolized by such negative practices as rampant felling of trees for firewood and bad farming practices."
The dwindling rain forest reserves and rapid expansion of the Sahara desert southwards pose a threat to the survival of the people in the African countries, Juma warned.
The workshop is being attended by experts from 14 countries in Africa and Europe.
Brazil and Malaysia are to jointly launch a series of remote sensing satellites (RSS) from 1998 to monitor tropical forests.
The launching of the RSSs, the first of this kind of satellite on a permanent orbit 900 kilometers above the equator, is estimated to cost 37 millon U.S. dollars.
The RSSs will monitor 2,200 square kilometers of the Amazon rain forest, which it will pass over every 105 minutes, said Brazil's National Institute of Space Research.
Satellites currently monitoring the region cannot see clearly through the thick clouds which cover the region for several months annually, but the RSSs can do that.
Brazil, which is in charge of the design of the RSS, plans to build a land-monitoring base in the Cuiaba city, located in Amazon's Pantanal wetlands.
Malaysia, also endowed with rich tropical rain forest, will build bases on its territory to pick up and analyse data from the satellites.
Director of the Brazilian institute, Marcio Nogueira Barbosa, recently visited Malaysia to negotiate the joint launching of the RSSs, a project which is estimated to last eight years.
In an apparent response to mounting demands from students and opposition groups, Indonesian legislators on Friday agreed to launch an investigation into former president Soeharto's wealth.
All five factions of the People's Consultative Assembly (MPR), the country's highest legislative body, agreed to add a provision in a decree on clean governance, preventing centralization of power, corruption, collusion and nepotism.
Article four of the decree states that efforts to eradicate corruption, collusion and nepotism must be made indiscriminately upon any state officials, former state officials, their families and cronies as well as private businessmen, business tycoons and former president Soeharto.
After an uncertain response to wide calls for a thorough investigation into the wealth of Soeharto, his family and friends, the dominant Golkar (Functional Group) faction has finally changed its position, saying that it strongly supports the wealth probe.
Addressing a plenary meeting on Wednesday, Golkar spokesperson Marwah Daud Ibrahim said the implementation of a clean government, with no traces of corruption, collusion and nepotism, is a prerequisite to achievement of the aims of the 1945 proclamation.
This is the first time Golkar officially declared war against corruption, collusion and nepotism. During the 32 year rule of Soeharto, Golkar had been in the government bandwagon, given an amen to virtually all the regime's policies and whims.
However, Golkar voiced objections to proposals that the special MPR session adopt a special decree to investigate Soeharto's wealth. It said it would be more relevant if the call for the probe into the riches of the former president and his family was made part of the decree on corruption, collusion and nepotism.
The United Development Party faction earlier asked for a separate decree to contain investigation into Soeharto, officials, former officials and their families.
The faction's spokesman Djuhad Mahja told reporters that they finally agreed with the decree on anti-corruption, collusion and nepotism because the faction's proposal had been accommodated in it.
Commenting on the stand of the Golkar on the subject, the Jakarta Post said, "This is another display of their halfhearted commitment to clean up corruption. A clause in a decree can easily be ignored, but a specific decree would give the needed impetus to kick start the investigation."
The Indonesian National Land Agency's Jambi office has uncovered evidence of former President Soeharto's allegedly ill-gotten wealth in Central Sumatra Province alone, The Jakarta Post reported Wednesday.
Soeharto's fortune, part of which has been sold to his crony and noted businessman Prayogo Pangestu, reportedly comprised stocks, land, a plywood factory, a bank, a pineapple cannery and a TV relay station, worth 122.4 billion rupiah (15.3 million U.S. dollars) in all.
The paper quoted State Minister for Land Affairs Hasan Basru Durin as saying ownership of the property would be canceled and sanctions applied if charges were proven.
The government prosecutor's office would continue a thorough investigation into the wealth while the land would be seized for the state or returned to its original owners, Hasan said.
Chief of the Prosecutor's Office in Irian Jaya Province T.H. Sidabutar said they were also investigating thousands of hectares of land allegedly belonging to Soeharto, his children and cronies.
At least five factories were built there, he said, adding that so far the probe has been focused on Soeharto and his family and has yet to be directed at cronies.
A prominent crony, Bob Hasan, for instance, apparently held a virtual monopoly on the supply of vegetables, meat, eggs, fruits and various other necessities for employees of PT Freeport Indonesia mining firm in Irian Jaya.
Meanwhile, Chairman of the National Mandate Party Amien Rais urged the government to put Soeharto under city arrest and to confiscate his wealth and that of his family and cronies.
"The law should be upheld if we want reform to go on. The time has come to bring economic and political criminals to court," he said after installing the executive board of the party's chapter in Lampung Province on Tuesday.
He cited the new decree of the special session of the People's Consultative Assembly from November 10 through November 13. The decree on clean governance included a stipulation that the government investigate Soeharto's wealth.
"It is possible for the government to consider forgiving Soeharto because of his age but his children and cronies should be tried and punished if they are proven guilty," Rais added.
Local people and students in Indonesia's capital Jakarta held an anti-Soeharto mass demonstration, starting at 14:00 local time on Thursday.
The demonstrators in great number moved toward residence of the former president at Jalancendana street in Central Jakarta. But they failed to reach the target point because of tight security precautions at various intersections that lead to the spot, official Antara News Agency reported.
This is the first time that demonstrators stage their action near the residence of Soeharto who resigned on May 21 amid anti-government demonstrations and bloody rioting in the country.
Students and citizens in the country have held various demonstrations recently, urging the government to bring Soeharto to court on the charges of corruption, collusion and nepotism during his 32-year rule.
Meanwhile, a legislator claimed that President B.J Habibie needed no new law to start investigation on former president Soeharto, saying that the existing anti-corruption law would do.
Djuhad Mahja SH of the United Development Party faction made the statement in the Parliament building here Thursday.
A investigation team set up in September announced on Tuesday that some evidence of Soeharto's allegedly ill-gotten wealth has been found in several provinces including land, factories and others. The team also found Soeharto's personal saving accounts as much as 2.3 million U.S dollars in 72 domestic banks.
Indonesian Attorney General Soedjono C. Atmonegoro said here Monday that an investigation on the wealth of former government officials, including former President Soeharto and his family, was going on.
He refused to disclose the details, saying that the investigation needs a long time.
Soedjono said that he has assigned junior Attorney General to carry out the investigation.
Meanwhile, according to a survey result by the Indonesian Business Data Center which was published here Monday, the assets of Soeharto's family have reached 200 trillion rupiah (about 20 billion U.S. dollars). However, a foreign media once estimated Soeharto's and his family's fortune is worth 40 billion U.S. dollars.
addressing a gathering on Sunday at the Bogor Institute of Agriculture in Bogor, about 60 kilometers south of the capital, Indonesian Moslem leader Amien Rais has asked Soeharto to donate his wealth to the nation and also called on Indonesians to forgive the former president who had made great contribution to the country.
Soeharto, who had ruled Indonesia for the last 32 years, resigned on May 21 under the heavy pressure from the people demanding for total reforms in political, economic and legal fields.
The new government led by B.J. Habibie has promised to carry out the reforms and to be free from corruption, collusion and nepotism.
JAKARTA (JP): The government has launched an investigation into corruption under former president Soeharto but has no plans to specifically target the former Indonesian leader, Attorney General Soedjono C. Atmonegoro told a packed news conference here yesterday. 	   Soedjono said that although the probe did not specifically target the Soeharto family, the investigation would cover its business dealings. 	   ''The former president may be summoned, if necessary, to verify and check evidence in cooperation with other state agencies,'' Deputy Attorney General Ismudjoko added. 	   Ismudjoko said his office would not impose a travel ban on Soeharto or any of his family members, pointing out that his office had received guarantees they would not leave Indonesia. 	   Ismudjoko said that while the investigation was very urgent, it would take some time to complete as the work would involve the checking of many documents related to a large number of business deals. 	   ''What is most important is that we should always maintain national unity,'' Ismudjoko added. 	   ''The investigations are being conducted under the principle of the presumption of innocence,'' Soedjono asserted. 	   Critics and analysts have alleged that nepotism, corruption and crony capitalism lie at the root of the economic crisis the nation has faced for 10 months and have demanded that the businesses of the Soeharto family, cronies and other senior officials be investigated. 	   Soeharto, who abruptly resigned from the presidency on May 21 under strong pressure from the House of Representatives, his cabinet ministers and demonstrating students, has been accused of amassing tens of billions of dollars from corruption, collusion and numerous shady business deals. 	   Leading opposition figure Amien Rais called on Soeharto over the weekend to donate 95 percent of his wealth to the state in return for complete forgiveness from the people so that the government should not have to beg for aid from international agencies and institutions. 	   The secretary-general of the National Commission on Human Rights, Baharuddin Lopa, said yesterday that Soeharto must be prosecuted if there is adequate evidence to prove his wrongdoing. 	   Any corruption case should be handled in accordance with the law, no matter who is involved in the malfeasance, Lopa said. 	   ''If he or she is proven guilty, all of the wealth obtained through corruption must be confiscated for the state,'' he added. 	   Lopa said the ''solution'' offered by Amien was not educative, was against the law and could create the feeling of legal uncertainty. 	   President B.J. Habibie could give Soeharto amnesty, but this could only be granted after Soeharto's accountability is completed, according to Lopa. 	   Lopa is also a member of Gempita, the Movement of Concerned Citizens on State Assets, which was established last week to collect data on ill-gotten wealth and assets. 	   Rp 200 trillion 	   The Indonesian Business Data Center (PDBI) announced yesterday it estimated the wealth of former president Soeharto, his family and its close associates at Rp 200 trillion (US$17.5 billion). 	   Executive director Christianto Wibisono told reporters yesterday the amount included the assets of Soeharto's foundations under the Nusamba group, a diversified group managed by Soeharto's closest crony Mohamad ''Bob'' Hasan. 	   ''What I mean by cronies here are those who are clearly close to him such as Salim (Salim Group's founder and chairman Lim Sioe Liong) and Bob Hasan,'' Christianto said. 	   PDBI's study values several major businesses, in which Soeharto's six children and foundations are involved, at Rp 16.9 trillion, with equity totaling Rp 5.32 trillion. 	   These include daughter Siti Hardijanti Rukmana's toll road projects worth Rp 1.39 trillion, son Sigit Hardjojudanto's chemical businesses worth Rp 628.71 billion, son Bambang Trihatmodjo's diversified Bimantara Group worth Rp 2.72 trillion, and son Hutomo (Tommy) Mandala Putra's transportation and automotive businesses worth Rp 3.7 trillion. 	   According to PDBI, the family's major foreign investment ventures (with foreign partners) total at least US$15.23 billion, including $3.16 billion in equity. 	   This includes US$1.89 million worth of Hardijanti's highway, energy, hotel and pulp projects, $6 billion worth of Bimantara's satellite and chemical projects and $1.16 billion worth of power projects owned by daughter Siti Hediati Harijadi. 	   Christianto said most of the wealth had been accumulated through business deals full of collusion, corruption and nepotism such as monopolies, rent-seeking practices and oligopolies. 	   Companies and foundations controlled by Soeharto's empire had also been given special privileges to win tenders or to get jobs from state firms, including oil company Pertamina and energy company PLN, he said. 	   Christianto said, however, crony business practices and special privileges had not been the monopoly of the Soeharto family and cronies. 	   He said many senior officials such as ministers, governors, regents and mayors also had amassed wealth through corruption, collusion and nepotism during Soeharto's 32 years in power.
The office of Indonesia's attorney general has formed a team to investigate the wealth of present and former Indonesian government officials, a spokesman of the office said here Tuesday.
"The result (of the investigations) of officials of both central and provincial governments will be announced to the public," Spokesman Barman Zahir said.
He said the team will be led by the junior attorney general for civil and state administrative courts. He did not say when the results of the investigations will be announced.
The offices of the attorney general, chief public prosecutor and public prosecutor have asked the public to provide information about the wealth of officials to help the team in its investigations, the spokesman said.
Attorney General Soedjono C. Atmonegoro said last week that the government has started an investigation into the wealth of former government officials, including former President Soeharto and his family.
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20003 Tel: 202-547-4512 Fax: 202-546-4194 COPYRIGHT 1998 BY WORLDSOURCES, INC., A JOINT VENTURE OF FDCH, INC. AND WORLD TIMES, INC. NO PORTION OF THE MATERIALS CONTAINED HEREIN MAY BE USED IN ANY MEDIA WITHOUT ATTRIBUTION TO WORLDSOURCES, INC. 	   JAKARTA (JP): Attorney General Soedjono C. Atmonegoro revealed here yesterday that former president Soeharto has appointed a number of lawyers to represent him. 	   ''Yes that's true,'' Soedjono replied hastily when asked by journalists. 	   When pressed further he revealed that he had also recently met with them. 	   ''They (lawyers) submitted a letter on their power of attorney,'' he said. 	   Soedjono refused to divulge further details, saying only that there were ''several of them''. 	   When pressed if they would be defending the former president, Soedjono evasively retorted: ''They are conducting their job in accordance with their code of ethics to defend truth and justice''. 	   He said when asked why he himself was not Soeharto legal council that: ''Soeharto is now a private citizen so he has the right to be represented by private lawyers. He's nothing (not a public official) now.'' 	   Since stepping down on May 21, the former president has faced mounting pressure for an investigation into alleged abuses of power and illicit accumulation of wealth by Soeharto, his family and cronies during his 32 years in office. 	   Two committees have been formed by the public to investigate the Soeharto clan's wealth.
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20003 Tel: 202-547-4512 Fax: 202-546-4194 COPYRIGHT 1998 BY WORLDSOURCES, INC., A JOINT VENTURE OF FDCH, INC. AND WORLD TIMES, INC. NO PORTION OF THE MATERIALS CONTAINED HEREIN MAY BE USED IN ANY MEDIA WITHOUT ATTRIBUTION TO WORLDSOURCES, INC. 	   Attorney General Soedjono C. Atmonegoro claimed yesterday that a relatively unknown local by the name of Yohanes Yacob had been hired as former president Soeharto's lawyer and that he had not appointed any foreign attorneys. 	   However serious questions remain about Yohanes' legal credentials after a background check revealed that his name was almost unknown in legal circles. 	   Soedjono made his statement in an apparent attempt to correct some media reports that he had met foreign lawyers hired by Soeharto. 	   The spokesman for the Attorney General's Office, Barman Zahir, told The Jakarta Post that he was summoned by Soedjono yesterday morning and revealed Yohanes' name to prove his argument. 	   ''Please notify the media to correct their reports saying that Soeharto has hired a foreign lawyer. He is not a foreigner, he is Indonesian,'' Soedjono was quoted by Barman as saying. 	   According to Barman, Soedjono did not give any details about Yohanes. 	   Soedjono himself was not available for comment. 	   The revelation came as a surprise to many as Yohanes' name is unheard of among prominent legal practitioners. 	   Attempts to track Yohanes down also proved almost fruitless as few people had heard of him. Many even raised serious doubts as to his true identity. 	   The chairmen of all three lawyer's organizations, Haryono Tjitrosoebono of the Indonesian Bar Association (IKADIN), Yan Apul from the Indonesian Advocates Association (AAI) and Yan Juanda Saputra from the Association of Indonesian Lawyers (IPHI) all told the Post that they had not heard of Yohanes. 	   ''I can assure you that his name is not on IKADIN's list,'' Haryono said. 	   Juanda Saputra however said that friends in the Attorney General's Office had told him that Yohanes is the chairman of a little known legal aid office in Tebet, South Jakarta. 	   Soedjono admitted Thursday that he had met lawyers representing Soeharto. At the time he rushed off and refused to give further details. 	   Demonstrators and opposition leaders have been demanding that an investigation be conducted into whether Soeharto and his family accumulated wealth illegally while he was in power. 	   Separately yesterday, Armed Forces spokesman Brig. Gen. A. Wahab Mokodongan said he was not adverse to an investigation by the Attorney General's office into corruption under Soeharto. 	   ''ABRI is part of the government. And the authority to conduct the investigation is the Attorney General's office,'' he told reporters.
Indonesian Attorney General Andi Muhammad Ghalib pledged to hunt state assets which were allegedly stashed overseas during the 32-year rule of former president Soeharto, the Jakarta Post reported Saturday.
"We will consult with the Foreign Ministry to rescue the state assets stashed overseas," Ghalib told reporters after meeting Swiss Ambassador to Indonesia Gerard Fonjallaz at his office Friday.
Indonesian Foreign Affairs Minister Ali Alatas said earlier this week that his ministry was ready to assist the Attorney General's Office in rescuing state assets possibly stashed abroad during the Soeharto era.
"We will make the best of this offer... the minister of foreign affairs (Ali Alatas) has also offered to cooperate," Ghalib said.
Fonjallaz denied that the investigation into Soeharto's wealth was on the agenda during his meeting with the attorney general.
The purpose of his visit is to explain that Switzerland's banking secrecy is "not absolute" as long as there is a formal demand from a particular country to launch investigations into a suspected bank account, he said.
"We would not take the initiative (to launch the investigation), it has to come from the country of origin of the person (suspected of having illegally-gained deposits)," he added.
Ghalib came under fire after he said on Monday that he believed Soeharto's public denial of charges that he had accumulated a fortune worth billions of U.S. dollars during his rule.
Soeharto, in a speech on the channel controlled by his eldest daughter Siti Hardijanti Rukmana on Sunday, said: "The fact is, I don't have even one cent of savings abroad, don't have accounts at foreign banks... let alone hundreds of billion of dollars."
American magazine Forbes estimated in July that Soeharto, who stepped down amid mounting public pressure on May 21, had a fortune worth 4 billion U.S. dollars.
Indonesian Attorney General Andi M. Ghalib Monday said he would ask former President Soeharto to sign a letter of authorization that would enable the investigation team to probe Soeharto's overseas wealth.
"With this letter of authorization, I can go anywhere in the world to search accounts that may be held by Soeharto," Ghalib was quoted by the newspaper The Indonesian Observer Tuesday as saying.
Without such a letter, it will be hard for the team to ask foreign banks to open their records due to long-established banking secrecy policies, he added.
The Indonesian government has set up two teams to investigate alleged corruption by Soeharto as well as his wealth.
A team of investigators will soon question Soeharto, Ghalib said without mentioning time and place for the questioning.
Local and foreign reports have accused Soeharto of amassing wealth illegally during his 32-year reign and stashing the fortune overseas.
But Soeharto, who stepped down amid mounting public pressure on May 21, swore that he did not have any deposits abroad in a statement broadcast by his own daughter's television station early this month.
Meanwhile, State Secretary/Minister Akbar Tanjung Monday reiterated the government's seriousness in investigating Soeharto's wealth.
"The government is serious in investigating Soeharto's personal fortune. Should there be indications (that this wealth was amassed illegally), the government will pursue the case and take legal action," he told reporters.
He said the special team tasked to investigate the former president has already scheduled a meeting with Soeharto.
"Yes, Soeharto will receive the team soon," Tanjung said.
Tropical storm Floyd strengthened Friday to become the fourth Atlantic hurricane this year, moving through the north Atlantic on a path that will take it north of the Caribbean islands and toward the eastern United States.
"The center of Floyd is still in the formative stage, but it has intensified," said Richard Pasch, a hurricane specialist with the U.S. National Hurricane Center (NHC) in Miami. "We think it could continue to strengthen and become a major hurricane in three days."
At 14:00 GMT, the center of the hurricane was about 330 kilometers east-northeast of Barbuda at latitude 19.1 north, longitude 58.9 west, the NHC said.
Hurricane Floyd on Saturday whirred away from the Caribbean's Leeward Islands, but forecasters warned that Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands could be hit by heavy rains and flooding.
The hurricane itself was likely to pass well north of the islands, meteorologists said. Floyd was expected to intensify, and it was unlikely to hit land soon.
It posed no immediate threat to the United States coast. Still, it was recommended that people along the U.S. southeast monitor the storm's course this weekend.
''But it's not going to threaten any land anywhere over the weekend,'' said Stacy Stewart, a meteorologist at the National Hurricane Center.
Five Caribbean islands canceled tropical storm watches Friday night as Floyd, packing winds of 110 mph, moved further out to sea, the National Hurricane Center in Miami reported.
At 5 p.m. Saturday, Floyd was centered about 335 miles northeast of Puerto Rico's capital, San Juan, at latitude 22.7 north and longitude 63.5 west. It was expected to move west-northwest at 12 mph.
Hurricane-force winds extended about 105 miles from the storm's center, and tropical storm force winds extended another 175 miles.
In Anguilla, the government closed schools Friday and residents put up hurricane shutters, in case the storm veered in their direction. Ports and airports remained open.
''Based on what I saw, the people are taking this thing serious. They are shopping mostly for dry foods and batteries, which are essential during a hurricane,'' said Lee Brooks, manager of a supermarket in The Valley, capital of the British island.
It was too early to tell if the storm would threaten the Bahamas, which lie far north of other Caribbean islands. Floyd was expected to be east of the Bahamas in about three days.
Hurricane Floyd got stronger and headed toward the Bahamas Saturday, packing 110 mph winds and leaving weather pundits wondering whether it will hit South Florida this week.
Water managers and county emergency workers were on alert, while some anxious people in Palm Beach County and the Treasure Coast stocked up on storm supplies.
The National Hurricane Center in Miami reported that Floyd was expected to intensify today, becoming a Category 3 hurricane, and it could become a Category 4 with sustained winds of at least 131 mph by Tuesday afternoon, when it's expected to reach the northern Bahamas.
''It's going to be a strong hurricane,'' said meteorologist Edwin Campos. ''The whole thing is where it's going to go.''
Floyd whirred away from the Caribbean's Leeward Islands on Saturday, but forecasters warned that Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands could be hit by heavy rains and flooding. The hurricane itself was likely to pass well north of the islands, meteorologists said.
At 5 p.m. Saturday, Floyd was centered about 335 miles northeast of Puerto Rico's capital, San Juan. It was expected to move west-northwest at 12 mph.
While forecasters say they can't predict where Floyd will go after Tuesday, they said Floyd's center could reach the East Coast by Thursday at its current speed. Residents could experience its wind and rain much sooner. Tropical-force winds extend 175 miles from the center, while hurricane gales reach out 105 miles, the hurricane center said.
If the hurricane keeps on the predicted course, a citizen's information line could be activated as early as today, said Bill O'Brien, Palm Beach County's emergency management director.
''We're doing the same thing as everyone else: We're watching it,'' O'Brien said.
The American Red Cross is ready to open 11 shelters in Palm Beach County, including one for people who need breathing equipment, he said.
Meanwhile, there have been no special water releases from canals, said Ann Overton, a spokeswoman for the South Florida Water Management District.
The district's two meteorologists were working staggered shifts this weekend to watch the storm, she said.
Area grocery stores reported a small run on nonperishables, but grocery managers are anticipating a crush on such items in the next couple of days.
''Oh, yeah, it's happening already _ started this morning,'' said Fred Price, manager of the Publix on Village Boulevard in West Palm Beach.
The store sold 550 1-gallon water jugs Saturday. ''If it keeps coming like it is now, we'll get hit hard,'' Price said. ''It will be outrageous.''
Gary Line, manager of a Winn-Dixie in Stuart, plans to order extra nonperishables today after a run Saturday.
''For a couple of hours it was pretty wild in here today,'' he said. ''We'll order heavy on those items tomorrow, because the next truck won't come until Tuesday and if it's coming it'll be in full swing by then.''
Hardware stores were ordering more hurricane supplies as a precaution.
''We've had several calls today asking about plywood, anchor screw and other items, asking if we had any readily available,'' said Donald Chamberlain, a salesman at the Home Depot on Lake Worth Road. ''But there's been no real noticeable rush yet.''
Boca Raton's residents may be less concerned. ''We haven't gotten any calls at all today,'' a Home Depot employee there said. ''No one's really thinking ahead.''


Storm-weary residents in the Bahamas braced for a brush with Hurricane Floyd as it swelled and powered up to a major storm, packing winds of up to 145 mph on Sunday.
By mid-afternoon, all of the Bahamas -- a 600-mile-long line of islands -- was under hurricane warnings or watches. Forecasters said they might also issue a hurricane watch for part of eastern Florida Sunday night or Monday.
If it stays on its current path, Floyd would hit the coast of Florida between West Palm Beach and Cocoa Beach. Forecasters expected the hurricane to begin turning north before landfall, though perhaps not much before.
Experts said that by Tuesday the storm could approach the Abacos Islands and Eleuthera, which were blasted last month by Hurricane Dennis.
''I just got back on my feet from last month's scare,'' sighed Marie Johnson of Nassau as she pulled out a few bills to pay for flashlight and radio batteries at the City Market grocery store. Customers streamed into the store to pick up hurricane supplies.
A U.S. hurricane hunter airplane reported Sunday evening that Floyd's winds had topped the 131 mph mark of a very dangerous Category 4 storm.
The U.S. National Weather Service recommended people along the southeast coast monitor the storm's course.
In Florida, emergency management officials began mobilizing, with the state's Emergency Operations Center in Tallahassee calling in essential personnel for 'round-the-clock staffing. In Fort Pierce, officials began to analyze needs for residents who are disabled or need medical supervision.
Many Floridians took advantage of the weekend's final day to take careful inventory of their hurricane supplies. Osvaldo Ibarra, hardware manager at a Home Depot in Miami, said sales were brisk for batteries, nails, rope and hurricane shutter fasteners.
''People are really buying the extra screws, the rope, and we've seen a lot more generator sales,'' Ibarra said.
In Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands, south of the storm's center, meteorologists warned that the terrain was already saturated, and that there could be heavy flooding.
Officials posted warnings for Hurricane Floyd across the central Bahamas and hurricane watches throughout the northwest Bahamas. Tropical storm warnings were in effect for the southeast Bahamas and Britain's Turks and Caicos Islands.
The storm swelled in size during the weekend. Hurricane-force winds had broadened to 115 miles from Floyd's center by Sunday. Tropical storm force winds extended another 175 miles, and forecasters said the storm would likely strengthen overnight Sunday.
At 8 p.m. EDT, Floyd was about 370 miles east of San Salvador in the central Bahamas, and was headed almost due west at 14 mph.
Floyd's center is likely to pass close to the capital, Nassau, on Tuesday morning, said Arthur Rolle, deputy director of the Bahamas Meteorological Department.
On Sunday, tourists in Nassau watched weather reports nervously. Honeymooners Michael and Julie Smith of Reynoldsburg, Ohio, lamented their bad luck.
''I hope this doesn't mean our marriage is going to be like this -- messed up,'' Michael said.
Residents Jean and Jerry Isaacs said they had canceled plans to spend a few days in Florida.
''We could get over okay today, but by the way things are going, it'll be tough getting back,'' Jean Isaacs said.
Elsewhere, Floyd was joined Sunday by Tropical Storm Gert, which formed midway between Africa and Barbados. Forecasters said it was gathering strength quickly and could become a hurricane Sunday night or Monday.
As Hurricane Floyd neared the strength of a Category 5 storm today and headed west, thousands of coastal residents were ordered to evacuate and NASA began moving workers out of the low-lying Kennedy Space Center.
''We need people to get ready right now, not tonight, not tomorrow,'' said Joan Heller, a spokeswoman for Brevard County, which ordered tens of thousands of people living in mobile homes and coastal areas to evacuate beginning at 4 p.m. today.
''There are different tracks that have been projected and we don't come out unscathed on any of them,'' Heller said.
Gov. Jeb Bush, whose family lived in Miami during Hurricane Andrew in 1992, declared a state of emergency. That gives him the authority to deploy the state's National Guard and allows him to seize property, order evacuations and suspend tolls on the highways.
''It's scary. It's very scary,'' Bush said. ''Andrew hit Miami in the middle of the night and it was haunting. This is as strong and ... three times bigger.''
Barring a change in the hurricane's course, NASA planned to close down the Kennedy Space Center by midnight, and the center's approximately 12,500 workers began evacuating. The space is only 9 feet above sea level, so a storm surge as well as wind could be devastating.
In addition, forecasters warned NASA of the possibility of 150 mph wind on Wednesday.
''We're going to live and hope -- that's what it's going to take,'' NASA spokesman George Diller said.
Residents who lived through Andrew were taking no chances. Sue Willey had her 17-year-old son, Clayton, stay home to board up their home in Homestead, which survived the brunt of Andrew. The two stopped by a hardware store to buy caulking to keep out water.
''Our house looks like Fort Knox,'' Clayton said.
The National Hurricane Center said Floyd was 470 miles east-southeast of Miami this afternoon, with wind around the eye blowing at 155 mph. A hurricane watch was extended from the Miami area into southeastern Georgia.
Even though the storm was expected to turn before making a landfall in that area, its hurricane-force wind could still rake the coast by the middle of the week.
Residents along 35 miles of the Georgia coast also began bracing for Floyd, and National Park Rangers on Cumberland Island, the exclusive resort spot where John F. Kennedy Jr. got married, met today to decide whether to evacuate 89 campers and visitors.
Floyd was on the verge of becoming a Category 5 storm. A storm of that strength on the Saffir-Simpson scale has top sustained wind of more than 156 mph and is capable of causing extreme damage. Only two category 5 hurricanes have hit the United States since records have been kept: the so-called Labor Day hurricane of 1935, which slammed the Florida Keys and killed 423, and Camille, which killed 256 people along the Gulf Coast and in Virginia in 1969.
When Hurricane Andrew struck southern Miami-Dade County in 1992, it was a Category 4 storm with 150 mph sustained wind and 200 mph gusts. It killed 26 people, made 160,000 homeless and caused damage estimated at $25 billion.
Andrew's hurricane-force wind extended out about 25 or 30 miles. By comparison, Floyd's hurricane-force wind extended 105 miles north and east of its center, said Todd Kimberlain, a forecaster at the hurricane center.
''This would send hurricane-force winds over much of Florida, depending on its exact track,'' Kimberlain said.
The last time NASA had to go through such drastic precautions was for Hurricane Erin in 1995. That came ashore with sustained wind of 85 mph.
Three of the shuttles are in the shuttle hangar, which is designed to withstand wind of only up to 105 mph. A fourth is in the 525-foot-high Vehicle Assembly Building, which is designed to withstand wind of up to 125 mph. Four multimillion-dollar rockets stood on launch pads and can't be moved.
Floyd was moving due west at nearly 14 mph today, but was expected to begin gradually turning by evening, initially taking a west-northwest course.
Floyd's path depends on a weather system over the central United States. A ridge of high pressure has been blocking Floyd and forcing it to move almost due west, but a low-pressure system moving east could weaken the high pressure.
If this high-pressure ridge does weaken, the storm could move north, making it less of a threat to the Miami-Dade area -- but more worrisome elsewhere. Depending on its exact track, it could also threaten the Carolinas or even New England, forecasters said.
Farther out in the Atlantic, storm Gert reached hurricane strength today, with 75 mph wind at late morning.
Gert's center was located about 1,400 miles east of the Leeward Islands. It was moving west near 20 mph.
Hurricane Floyd strengthened to a very dangerous Category 4 storm today with 155 mph wind, surprising forecasters and charging toward the Bahamas on a path that also threatened the Florida coast.
Heavy rain started falling in parts of the Bahamas today as residents scrambled for emergency supplies, shelters opened, schools closed and shop owners boarded up windows.
Mandatory evacuations were ordered in exposed coastal areas of both the Bahamas and Florida's Brevard County. Workers also started leaving NASA's Kennedy Space Center, on a barrier island standing only 9 feet above sea level.
''I have never been this scared about a storm,'' said Bahamas resident Angel Chea, manager of a graphics shop, as she boarded up her windows.
''We need people to get ready right now, not tonight, not tomorrow,'' said Joan Heller, a spokeswoman for Brevard County.
Because of uncertainty about the huge storm's path, a hurricane watch area on the mainland was expanded today, reaching all the way from the Miami area northward into Georgia, the U.S. National Hurricane Center said in Miami.
''It's capable of almost catastrophic destruction,'' said Todd Kimberlain, a forecaster at the hurricane center.
Floyd had top sustained wind today of nearly 155 mph. That put it on the verge of becoming a Category 5 storm, which features top sustained wind of more than 156 mph and is capable of causing extreme damage. By comparison, Hurricane Andrew had Category 4 status when it struck south Florida in 1992, killing 26 people and causing an estimated $25 billion in damage.
However, the hurricane center said little additional strengthening was likely by midday Tuesday.
Only two Category 5 hurricanes have struck the United States since record-keeping began, the Labor Day Hurricane of 1935, which destroyed the railroad connecting the Florida Keys to the mainland and killed 423 people, and Camille in 1969, which killed 256 people along the Gulf Coast and in Virginia.
If Floyd continued on a track toward central Florida, NASA planned to shut down the Kennedy Space Center by midnight tonight, leaving none of its 12,500 workers behind to ride out the storm. The center is only 9 feet above sea level, so a storm surge as well as wind could be a problem.
All four space shuttles were in hangars, but four multimillion-dollar rockets were on launch pads and couldn't be moved.
All of the northwest and central Bahamian islands were under hurricane warnings today. A tropical storm warning was posted for the southeastern Bahamas and the nearby British Turks and Caicos islands.
A hurricane watch on the mainland was extended from the Miami area northward all the way to near Brunswick, Ga.
In the middle of the watch area, Florida's Brevard County ordered tens of thousands of people living in mobile homes and coastal areas to evacuate beginning at 4 p.m. today.
''There are different tracks that have been projected and we don't come out unscathed on any of them,'' said Brevard County spokeswoman Joan Heller.
At 2 p.m., Floyd's center was about 90 miles east of San Salvador in the central Bahamas, and about 470 miles east-southeast of Miami. It was headed west at nearly 15 mph, and was expected to gradually turn to a west-northwesterly-heading by evening, with a further turn toward the northwest on Tuesday.
Hurricane-force wind extended 105 miles from its center with tropical storm-force wind stretching outward up to 290 miles.
Forecasters estimated storm surge conditions could reach 15 to 20 feet for the northwest Bahamas.
Floyd grew unexpectedly into a monster of a storm on Sunday.
''I didn't expect such a very fast intensification,'' said Jerry Jarrell, director of the National Hurricane Center. ''This is a real surprise for us.''
Far out at sea, Gert strengthened into a hurricane today with sustained wind increasing to 75 mph. At 11 a.m. EDT, Gert's center was about 1,400 miles east of the Leeward Islands. It was moving toward the west at nearly 20 mph.
WASHINGTON - Wherever Hurricane Floyd hits, the federal agency responsible for emergencies says it won't be as tardy as it was after Hurricane Andrew, seven years ago.
''There are a lot of things going on that were not going on six years ago,'' said Lacy Suiter, Federal Emergency Management Agency's executive associate director.
When Andrew slammed into Florida just south of Miami in August 1992, the tardy and disjointed federal response sparked cries of anger from state and local authorities and prompted then-President Bush to name his transportation secretary to coordinate the federal effect.
FEMA officials Monday said the agency has changed dramatically since then. They said they were ready to roll and could have supplies into an affected area within hours after the Floyd's passage.
''The federal government is being not just reactive to events and the requests of the governors, but we're being pro-active,'' Suiter said.
''We're not waiting until the hurricane comes ashore to buy the ice and buy the water and get the generators ready and get the other things ready to move out to the area. We're doing it now in anticipation of what the requirements might be,'' Suiter said. ''We've been through this enough to know what to anticipate and what to plan for.''
FEMA emergency response centers have been activated in Atlanta, Ga., and Washington, D.C., and it has representatives at state emergency centers from Florida to North Carolina. A hurricane liaison team of federal emergency officials is also stationed at the National Hurricane Center in Miami to monitor the latest forecasts of the storm's path and intensity.
Meanwhile, FEMA has positioned ice, water, plastic sheeting, cots, tents, and emergency food and medial supplies in Atlanta where they can be delivered within hours wherever Floyd hits land, said Bruce Baughman, FEMA director of response.
There are more than 30,000 rolls of plastic sheeting -- enough to cover 25,000 roofless houses -- and some 100 tons of ice, he said. The supplies are being kept in Atlanta, rather than closer to where the hurricane might hit, in order to protect them.
''Depending on the track (taken by the storm) you don't want to get it too far forward because the supplies themselves may become a victim,'' Baughman said.
In addition to the supplies on hand, FEMA has contracted with suppliers to provide additional support such as debris removal, roofing repairs and bulk water if needed, he said.
Meanwhile, the federal government is urging individuals to prepare by making their property as hurricane-proof as possible such as removing lawn furniture and listening to local government warnings. Residents also are urged to check the FEMA website for other tips at www.fema.gov.
''This is a serious storm,'' Suiter said. ''It may be the worst storm that we have had in many, many years.''
ENDIT


This could be the storm FEMA Director James Lee Witt has been dreading since taking office six years ago: a catastrophic hurricane that hugs the coastline from Florida to the Carolinas, causing massive damage along a swath hundreds of miles long.
''We've tried to prepare for the worst possible case, and this is one of those cases,'' said Witt, head of the Federal Emergency Management Agency after concluding a video conference with emergency teams spread out across the country.
The prospect of an extremely powerful, coast-hugging hurricane ''was a scenario that ever since I've been here I've hoped I'd never see,'' Witt said Monday, noting that the destruction could cover ''not just one area, it's the whole coastline and the pounding it's going to take.''
Jim Loomis, reporting to Witt from the Florida Division of Emergency Management in a late afternoon video conference, said ''if this parallels us, it could act like a Weed-Eater for 25 miles along the coast. Most of those counties don't have population inland, they sit right on the coast, so it's going to be pretty devastating as far as who is going to get hit.''
FEMA officials say that regardless of where Hurricane Floyd strikes, the federal response will be far different from the tardy answer to Hurricane Andrew seven years ago.
''There are a lot of things going on that were not going on six years ago,'' said Lacy Suiter, Federal Emergency Management Agency's executive associate director.
When Andrew slammed into Florida just south of Miami in August 1992, the tardy and disjointed federal response sparked cries of anger from state and local authorities and prompted then-President Bush to name his transportation secretary to coordinate the federal effect.
FEMA officials Monday said the agency has changed dramatically since then. They said they were ready to roll and could have supplies into an affected area within hours after the Floyd's passage.
''The federal government is being not just reactive to events and the requests of the governors, but we're being pro-active,'' Suiter said.
''We're not waiting until the hurricane comes ashore to buy the ice and buy the water and get the generators ready and get the other things ready to move out to the area. We're doing it now in anticipation of what the requirements might be,'' Suiter said. ''We've been through this enough to know what to anticipate and what to plan for.''
FEMA emergency response centers have been activated in Atlanta and Washington, and it has representatives at state emergency centers from Florida to North Carolina. A hurricane liaison team of federal emergency officials is also stationed at the National Hurricane Center in Miami to monitor the latest forecasts of the storm's path and intensity.
Meanwhile, FEMA has positioned ice, water, plastic sheeting, cots, tents, and emergency food and medial supplies in Atlanta where they can be delivered within hours wherever Floyd hits land, said Bruce Baughman, FEMA director of response.
There are more than 30,000 rolls of plastic sheeting _ enough to cover 25,000 roofless houses _ and some 100 tons of ice, he said. The supplies are being kept in Atlanta, rather than closer to where the hurricane might hit, in order to protect them.
''Depending on the track (taken by the storm) you don't want to get it too far forward because the supplies themselves may become a victim,'' Baughman said.
In addition to the supplies on hand, FEMA has contracted with suppliers to provide additional support such as debris removal, roofing repairs and bulk water if needed, he said.
Meanwhile, the federal government is urging individuals to prepare by making their property as hurricane-proof as possible _ such as removing lawn furniture _ and listening to local government warnings. Residents also are urged to check the FEMA Internet site for other tips at www.fema.gov.
''This is a serious storm,'' Suiter said. ''It may be the worst storm that we have had in many, many years.''
ENDIT


A voluntary evacuation of heavily-populated barrier islands and low-lying areas east of Ga. 17 could become mandatory by noon today as Hurricane Floyd showed signs of swinging closer to coastal Georgia.
A hurricane warning was issued north to Brunswick late Monday afternoon and a watch was extended as far up the coast as Savannah.
''This is the most serious threat to coastal Georgia and the whole east coast since Hurricane Hugo in 1989,'' said Ed Abel, chief of Glynn County's emergency management agency. ''We've never had a Category 5 hurricane hit the east coast and this storm is just under that.''
Floyd, already a major Category 4 storm with 155 mile an hour sustained winds and gusts of up to 190 miles an hour, would be upgraded to a Category 5 storm if its winds increase to 156 miles an hour.
Both Glynn and Chatham counties called for voluntary evacuations of the most vulnerable stretches of the coast at 6 p.m. Monday, including such mainland areas as the south Brunswick peninsula, which includes a National Register historic district.
''We're the only counties that have barrier islands with a lot of people on them,'' Abel said.
Linda Padgett, administrative assistant at the Emergency Operations Center in Chatham County, said officials there are keeping close track of the storm.
''We're still hoping it will turn more to the northeast,'' she said. In the meantime, she said, residents of Tybee Island as well as those on Wilmington, Skidaway, Isle of Hope and other islands linked to the mainland by low-lying causeways were being advised to seek shelter inland.
Coastal officials planned to go to a mandatory evacuation, based on overnight reports from the National Hurricane Center. In Savannah, a mandatory evacuation for low-lying areas was to go into effect at 8 a.m. today and for all of Chatham County by noon.
''We know we're supposed to get hurricane-force winds and a storm surge of 9 to 16 feet above normal tide, because Floyd waited so long to start turning north,'' Abel said.
Earlier projections had the storm tracking farther east away from coastal Georgia but the 5 p.m. advisory Monday showed a revised path expected to bring tropical storm-force winds ashore by 2 a.m. Wednesday.
Schools in Chatham and Glynn counties cancelled classes for today and Wednesday.
The Red Cross said shelters were opened to the north in Coffee County and Dublin last night.
By late afternoon, hundreds of coastal residents were lined up at gas stations along the coast. The Home Depot in Brunswick sold out of plywood by mid-afternoon. Grocery store managers said customers were lining up to buy bottled water, batteries and canned foods.
Telephone circuits were jammed with calls.
On St. Simons Island, residents_especially those in homes near the beach_spent the afternoon Monday boarding up windows and moving outdoor furniture indoors.
Woody Woodside, executive director of the Brunswick-Golden Isles Chamber of Commerce, said there are still a number of tourists vacationing on the barrier islands.
''I'm sure they're concerned, as all of us are, and they're staying in touch with emergency officials,'' Woodside said. ''We've been fortunate so many times before and we're hoping we'll be lucky again.''
Jingle Davis writes for the Atlanta Journal-Constitution, Atlanta, Ga.


A hurricane that meteorologists said was four times the size of the infamous Andrew and potentially even more destructive pounded toward Florida Monday, forcing hundreds of thousands from their homes and leaving countless residents to hope that the massive storm would somehow miss their cities.
''This hurricane,'' said Jerry Jarrell, director of the National Hurricane Center, ''could be catastrophic.''
From as far south as Miami to as far north as Cape Canaveral, hundreds of thousands of people evacuated the densely populated Florida coast as the storm, with winds of more than 155 mph, crept westward across the Atlantic and forecasters' radar screens.
''It looks like a giant bullseye out there,'' said Brad Cramer, a lifeguard on Palm Beach.
All day Monday, state meteorologists offered hope that Hurricane Floyd would be nudged from its westerly course by a trough of low pressure air moving to the east and southeast, and, instead of making landfall in South Florida, travel up the coast, its dangerous eye offshore.
But that hope seemed to weaken by early Monday evening as Floyd plowed west and slightly northwest, in the general direction of Palm Beach.
''This is the sort of the thing you have nightmares about,'' said Bill Bill O'Brien, director of emergency management in Palm Beach County.
In a frightening scenario, the hurricane could turn north just as the most powerful winds surrounding the eye make landfall, sending the most destructive part of the hurricane along the coast, meteorologists said.
Like Andrew in 1992, which killed 40 people, wrecked 160 homes and caused more than $25 billion in damages, Floyd was a category 4 storm on Monday. It was on the verge of being a category 5, the most powerful, as of Monday evening, with the power to turn houses into rubble and splinters if it makes landfall.
But Jarrell warned that even if the hurricane's eye stays as much as 30 miles off the coast the storm could still rip roofs off houses and flatten walls. Meteorologists called it a history-making storm.
Jonathan Gottschalck, a research associate in Meteorology at the University of Miami's Rosentiel School of Marine and Atmospheric Science, called it ''one of the largest and strongest storms'' in history to hit the U.S. coast.
''It runs 700 miles in all directions,'' he said of the storm's size, noting that the hurricane-force winds extend 120 miles from its eye. ''We are going to feel it,'' he said.
Forecasters, while warning that this hurricane was large and powerful enough to overcome steering winds like the much-hoped-for southeasterly front, still held some hope that the trough would nudge it northeasterly.
As night fell on South Florida, shelters and hotel rooms inland, especially around Palm Beach, began to fill; cruise ships left for safer waters to the south; long flotillas of pleasure craft snaked along canals looking for safe harbor, as lines grew at hardware and grocery stores.
Because it was still too soon to more accurately estimate the storm's landfall, the entire state of Florida was placed under a hurricane warning. More than 200,000 people on Florida's east-central coast were told to evacuate, and another 200,000 were evacuated from coastal areas of Miami-Dade County.
(STORY CAN END HERE. OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS)
Allen Fiske's boat is his home, and he was worried about losing it as the storm drew closer. A paraplegic since a car accident 17 years ago, he lives aboard his 35-foot sailboat, ''Minimum Balance.''
''I don't know what I'm going to do,'' he said. ''I can leave it here at Dinner Key marina and let it get smashed into the pilings, or I could take it up the Miami River along with everybody else and let it get smashed against all the other boats. `I'm leaning toward going south, down to Key Largo.'' The Keys, he said, seem to be the one place in Florida that are out of harm's way.
While a few people said they thought the evacuations were premature and a sign of media-driven panic, most people took the threat seriously.
''There have only been two other category 5 hurricanes to hit the U.S. _ Camille in the 1960s and an unnamed storm in 1935,'' said Gottschalck. ''This kind of storm needs to be taken seriously.''
As far north as Jacksonville, people watched in amazement as the huge storm swirled across television screens, larger than the state it was approaching.
''Oh, my God,'' said Courtney Edwards, 17, as she saw maps of the storm on a big-screen television in the electronics department of a department store in Jacksonville.
Further south, even people who lived miles inland considered leaving their homes.
''We did consider driving to Atlanta,'' said Bettye Cox, who lives in Boca Raton. Instead, she just bought hurricane supplies.
As the storm approached, the weather along the South Florida beaches as far north as Palm Beach was balmy and breezy _ a perfect day.
Arturo Penalver, 65, a retired longshoreman from Brooklyn, took a swim on Palm Beach. ''It's beautiful,'' said Penalver. ''I don't believe it will come here.''
Edmond Zion, a retired limo driver from Queens, also scoffed at the growing concern.
''You would think that people down here would be used to these storms already,'' he said. ''They act like it's all new, like they never heard of such a thing before.''
But in this case, it may be true. This storm could be something entirely new.
As if the threat of this hurricane was not enough bad news for Florida, another potentially dangerous storm, Hurricane Gert, seems to be taking roughly the same path as Floyd, just a few days behind.
That storm, which developed into a full-fledged hurricane Monday, was expected to push through the Leeward Islands, Virgin Islands and Puerto Rico later this week, and _ if it stays on course _ eventually threaten Florida or the east coast. Though not as large as Floyd, Gert, the fifth hurricane of the season, was expected to pound through the Atlantic with winds well over 100 mph.
For now, Floyd is trouble enough.
On ritzy Worth Avenue in Palm Beach, Susan Bryden and six friends, visiting from Agawam, Mass., hurried through their shopping to make an evening flight home.
''We're leaving,'' said Ms. Bryden, as employees pulled shutters down on the windows of Saks Fifth Avenue and Ralph Lauren, ''and we're glad of it.''
In Miami, the last cruise ship had lumbered out of the harbor by 6 p.m. Most workers had left downtown early. To the north, in Palm Beach, workers cleared the last chairs off the beaches.
Cramer, the lifeguard, has seen this deceptive calm before.
''When you live here, you get used to the idea of hurricanes, but you respect them,'' he said. ''This one demands a lot of respect.''
Israel's most respected TV news anchor took a firm stand against Israeli settlers and occupation that could sway public opinion much as his U.S. counterpart did on the Vietnam war nearly 40 years ago.
For four decades, Haim Yavin has anchored the evening news on Israel's public TV channel, building an image as a dispassionate reporter. On Tuesday, for the first time, he dropped his mask, screening the first of his five-part series of documentaries, coming down hard against Israel's occupation of the West Bank and its treatment of Palestinians.
The series, called "The Land of the Settlers," prompted a call from settler leaders for Yavin's dismissal.
When CBS-TV icon Walter Cronkite returned from a 1968 reporting trip to Vietnam and told his viewers in an editorial comment that the United States could not win the war, then-U.S. President Lyndon B. Johnson observed that if he had lost Cronkite, he had lost middle America. Similarly, Yavin's stand could mark a watershed in how his nation views its four-decade rule over the Palestinians.
Yavin, a founder of Israel's public TV station in 1968, is known here as "Mr. TV" and commands considerable respect. Rarely have settlers been portrayed as harshly by Israel's mainstream media as in Yavin's documentary, filmed with his hand-held video camera and interspersed with his commentary.
"Since 1967, we have been brutal conquerors, occupiers, suppressing another people," Yavin says in the first segment, aired Tuesday, after listening to settlers insist God gave them these lands. "We simply don't view the Palestinians as human beings."
Yavin, 72, is taking a stand at a time of heated controversy over the settlements Israel built in the West Bank and Gaza Strip after capturing the lands in the 1967 Mideast war. Settlers, once coddled and feared by Israeli politicians, feel increasingly beleaguered. Their erstwhile patron, Prime Minister Ariel Sharon, is determined to withdraw from all 21 Gaza settlements and four in the West Bank this summer, forcing about 9,000 settlers out of their homes.
Tom Segev, an Israeli author and social commentator, said Yavin's middle-of-the-road reputation could influence some Israelis. "He is Mr. Israel, the voice of Israel, the soul of Israel, and if he comes out with this, it means that apparently a lot of people feel the same," Segev said. "But I'm not sure if people will react."
Yavin said he was able to keep his views out of many documentaries he had done in the past. But when the latest round of fighting with the Palestinians broke out and Palestinian suffering increased, he decided to take action.
He said in a telephone interview Tuesday that he didn't believe that he had become more dovish _ but Israelis had become more hawkish.
"We have to go through a mental revolution," Yavin said. "The Palestinians are a people and we have to share this land ... We have to wake up from our dream."
In his documentary, Yavin repeatedly shows Palestinians suffering at the hands of arrogant settlers and soldiers. In one scene, he filmed a crowded Israeli army roadblock, showing sick women and crying children waiting in the hot sun for hours. Israel set up the roadblocks at the outbreak of the current round of fighting in 2000, pointing to a need to prevent Palestinian suicide bombers and gunmen from reaching Israel.
At one point, Yavin shifted the camera toward Israeli soldiers at the checkpoints to ask why they weren't letting the people through. "I look for danger in these people and I can't find it," Yavin said in the film.
In another scene, settlers chased Palestinian olive pickers out of an orchard, accusing them of planning terror attacks. The scene ended with an elderly Palestinian woman asking the camera: "Is it forbidden for us to pick olives? Isn't it a sin not to let us pick?"
Settlers were outraged over the documentary, which was broadcast by the private Channel Two, rather than by Yavin's station, Israel TV. Yavin said Israel TV declined to air the documentary, but said the decision was not motivated by politics. Fewer than a dozen settlers held a demonstration outside the offices of Israel's Broadcasting Authority, which oversees Israel TV.
A leader of the Settlers' Council, Bentsi Lieberman, demanded Yavin's dismissal in a letter to the authority. "It is unacceptable that Haim Yavin will continue to anchor the news of the national station that professes to be objective," Lieberman wrote.
Authority chairman Uri Porat said in response that Yavin would not be fired since he had not violated his contract.
UNICEF officials in Austria and the neighboring Czech Republic and Germany demanded Thursday that the three countries intensify their crackdown on child sex tourism.
"For many underaged people in the border area, prostitution remains a part of everyday life," the United Nations Children's Fund officials said in a joint statement.
UNICEF said a recent survey of 1,585 children aged 7 to 15 revealed that roughly one in seven respondents had been approached by an adult who offered money in exchange for sexual favors.
The organization called on the governments of all three countries to do more to crack down on so-called "sex tourists" _ adults, mostly men, who solicit sex from children. It said it was particularly concerned about reports of rampant sex tourism in Cheb, a Czech town on the border with Germany.
"It's shocking that in Europe we haven't created any protections to guard children against prostitution," said Gudrun Berger, who heads UNICEF's Austria office. "As long as only one child remains abuse, the work is unfinished."
Marcus Trescothick scored his second century in a row against Bangladesh as England marched to a 165-run lead in the second test on Friday after bowling the visitors out for 104.
Having amassed 194 in England's lopsided victory at Lord's, the Somerset opener was out for 151, the first test century scored at Riverside Stadium.
At the close, England was on 269 for three with Ian Bell on 57 and Graham Thorpe, playing his 100th test, on two.
Trescothick reached his 12th century with his 14th boundary and later lofted leftarm spinner Mohammed Rafique and paceman Anwar Hossain Monir for sixes. He was finally out for 151 going for another big hit, caught just inside the boundary by Mohammad Ashraful off Aftab Ahmed having hit 21 fours and two sixes.
Andrew Strauss was out lbw for eight to Mashrafe Mortaza and the same bowler had England captain Michael Vaughan caught for 44. By that time England had just passed the visitor's feeble total and appeared on the way to another victory in less than three of the five scheduled days.
Durham paceman Steve Harmison took five wickets on his home field and wicketkeeper Geraint Jones took six catches as England dismissed Bangladesh cheaply.
"We've pitched it up and let the ball do the work and we've been rewarded with 104 all out," Harmison said. "Five wickets in test cricket is great, no matter who you play against. I'm quite happy with my five and my confidence is very high at the moment."
Matthew Hoggard, Andrew Flintoff and Simon Jones also took wickets and Bangladesh opener Javed Omar (37) and Khaled Mashud (22) provided the only real resistance for cricket's weakest test team.
After beating Bangladesh at Lord's in 2 1/2 days, England put the visitor in to bat and took wickets regularly. The same happened last week, when England won by an innings and 261 runs.
Harmison struck first with 17 runs scored when Nafees Iqbal, on seven, mistimed an off drive to third slip Andrew Strauss.
Habibul Bashar struck a four off Harmison to push the score to 27 but the pace bowler struck two balls later, clattering the stumps with a 90.4 mph (144.6 kph) yorker. Bashar made six.
Mohammed Ashraful was next out, for three, when he thin-edged a ball from Simon Jones to wicketkeeper Jones. Then Thorpe took a chance at short leg to remove Rajin Saleh for 3 off the bowling of Flintoff.
Hoggard picked up his 150th test wicket when England finally wore down Omar, the opener glancing a ball to the wicketkeeper.
Harmison accounted for Ahmed before Harmison got rid of Rafique and Tapash Baisya in the space of three balls. Gareth Batty, England's sole specialist spinner who hasn't yet bowled in this series, removed Rafique with a diving catch.
After Mortaza was out, Mashud guided his team past 100, pushing a ball from Harmison for four and helped put on 11 runs for the final wicket before edging a Harmison delivery to Jones.
Harmison's five wickets cost him 38 runs, while Hoggard took 3-24, Flintoff 1-14, and Jones 1-26.
A year after he should have celebrated his breakthrough victory on the Nextel Cup circuit, Kasey Kahne is back at Dover International Speedway hoping for a better result.
Kahne was running away from the field last June with 18 laps remaining in the MBNA 400 when he spun in an oil slick dropped a lap earlier by Casey Mears and crashed out. It took him until last month to become a first-time winner on NASCAR's top circuit, and now Kahne has some unfinished business here.
"I had no clue the oil was there," he recalled. "To have a car that good and not be able to race for the win, that's pretty disappointing."
Kahne went on to become Rookie of the Year on the strength of five second-place finishes and came close to qualifying for the new Chase for the Championship, the 10-race final segment of the season when the top-10 drivers compete for the title. The Monster Mile certainly contributed to Kahne's 13th-place finish in the standings.
His 21st-place finish in June _ as disappointing as it was _ was only a precursor to Kahne's next outing on The Monster Mile last September. A broken flywheel put him out after just 13 laps and he wound up 42nd in a filed of 43.
He laments that loss almost as much as his first setback on the high-banked concrete oval.
"We broke early in the race, so we don't know how competitive we could have been," he explained. "We'd like to be around to run the entire race and see what we have at the end, that's for sure."
The misfortune of last year has done nothing to dim the 25-year-old Kahne's enthusiasm for racing at Dover.
"The track is fast and you can drive the car hard here," he said. "I like that. It's a lot of fun. It's a cool track."
Mark Martin was the beneficiary of Kahne's June crash and got his fourth Dover victory, ending a 72-race losing streak that stretched over 2 1/2 seasons.

MAYFIELD'S NEW CONTRACT: Jeremy Mayfield will be driving for Evernham Motorsports for the foreseeable future. The 36-year-old driver has signed a multiyear contract with the Dodge team.
"Year after year, he has shown that he can be a constant candidate to win races and make the Chase for the Nextel Cup," Ray Evernham said Saturday at Dover International Speedway. "He has been a great team player for Evernham Motorsports."
The driver from Owensboro, Kentucky, has four career victories, nine poles and 46 top-five finishes in 357 starts on NASCAR's elite circuit. He got his first victory for Evernham last September in Richmond, Virginia, to qualify for the final 10-race, 10-driver title competition.
"Ray has made a commitment to make this a championship team," Mayfield said. "I have no doubt in the potential of this team."
Terms of the contract weren't revealed.

PETTY LOVES DOVER: Kyle Petty is back at the track where he got the most recent of his eight career victories _ 10 years ago. He started far back in the field that June day, and that was a lucky break because Petty was so far behind that he avoided a massive pileup right after the start of the Miller Genuine Draft 500.
Petty picked up about 25 positions after the wreck and went on to win. That was 374 races ago.
"It's right up here with one of my favorite places to go," Petty said of Dover International Speedway, a place appropriately nicknamed The Monster Mile. "It's probably strange, and maybe it sounds strange since so many people don't like it, but I have no problem with Dover."
Petty will make his 726th career start, going from the 30th spot on the grid Sunday in the MBNA 400. His liking for the high-banked concrete oval even extends to the dreaded days of Dover's sometimes five-hour, 500-mile races.
"The distance never really bothered me," he said. "It was a long day, and probably a long day for the fans in the seats, but Dover is a lot of fun if you're racing out there."
The races were shortened by 100 miles in September 1997.
Flavio Amado and Fabrice Akwa scored headers Sunday to lead Angola over Algeria 2-1 in a World Cup Africa qualifier.
Angola, which was playing with striker Pedro Mantorras in its lineup for the first time in three years after a serious knee injury, took the lead in the 48th minute when Amado scored.
Akwa headed home the second goal from a corner in the 58th.
Algeria pulled one back in the 66th when Nasreddine Kraouche slipped one past goalkeeper Joao Pereira.
Angola and Nigeria lead Group 4 with 14 points each. Zimbabwe is third with 11 points, followed by Gabon and Algeria with six each, and Rwanda with five. Only the five African group winners qualify for the 2006 World Cup finals in Germany.
The Agriculture Department's inspector general offered scant explanation Wednesday for why she suddenly ordered new tests on brain tissue from a cow declared free of mad cow disease seven months ago.
Auditors noticed "an unusual pattern of conflicting test results" while reviewing the government's program of testing for mad cow disease, according to a statement released Wednesday by Inspector General Phyllis Fong's office.
Beyond that, the statement said audit findings won't be released until late summer.
The Agriculture Department announced Friday it is checking into a possible U.S. case of mad cow disease, or bovine spongiform encephalopathy, in an animal previously declared free of infection.
Initial tests last November indicated the existence of the disease in the cow, but subsequent tests had ruled out any infection. The inspector general ordered a third round of tests last week, and the cow turned up positive.
A sample from the animal is being sent to an internationally recognized laboratory in Weybridge, England, and the Agriculture Department will conduct further tests.
The cow did not present a threat to people or other animals, the department said. It was a "downer" cow, one that is unable to walk. Downer cows are kept out of the food supply.


Judging from appearances, Eartha Kitt, glamorous and seductive at 78, is probably in better shape than you or me. As you watch the original Material Girl growling and grasping at diamonds, minks, yachts and the millionaires who can supply them, this godmother of gold diggers seems totally up to date, except that now millionaires are small potatoes; you must multiply by a thousand.
The difference between Kitt, who has returned to the Cafe Carlyle after several years' absence, and her descendants, whether entertainers or trophy wives, is the keenness of her still slightly scary sense of humor and her intelligence. The scary part is when she locks eyes with a shy male admirer and undertakes a demanding examination of his occupation and financial assets, coldly working her wiles until she breaks into brittle laughter.
Her hyper-sophisticated repertory has changed little in recent years. Vernon Duke and Yip Harburg's obscure "Speaking of Love," which has been called the most mercenary song ever written, remains the comic high point, with its gold-plated lines like "We'd have a destiny/ If you'd invest in me." The comedy continues with her partly Japanese rendition of "Come On-a My House" and a version of "I Can't Give You Anything but Love," delivered to another male admirer with the word "love" strategically withheld until his upper-income status has been certified.
As the show continues, the comedy fades, and the proud, unbowed show business survivor and international diva takes over. Her early years in France, when she left the Katherine Dunham Dance Troupe to become a nightclub star, are remembered. Ferocious renditions of two of Edith Piaf's signature songs, "La Vie en Rose" and "Hymn to Love" ("If You Love Me, Really Love Me"), evoke those days in Paris.
The show culminates in a medley of summing-up songs that combines "When the World Was Young," "It Was a Very Good Year," "September Song," and "Here's to Life" in a cumulative wallop that leaves you slightly dazed and wondering what has been the personal cost of being Eartha Kitt.
Eartha Kitt performs through July 2 at the Cafe Carlyle, 35 E. 76th St., Manhattan, (212) 744-1600.
Bank executives are ramping up their marketing efforts in hopes of wooing customers away from the region's largest bank, Bank of America Corp., as it undertakes a critical computer conversion for 2 million New England account holders this month.
Citizens Financial Group took a particularly aggressive stand this week when it said it had hired two outside firms to survey customers of rival Bank of America. The survey of 200 customers in Eastern Massachusetts showed that nearly a quarter of Bank of America's customers said they were likely to switch banks, and that only 56 percent rated themselves completely or very satisfied with Bank of America.
The survey results may not mean that several hundred thousand Bank of America customers will switch overnight. But Citizens executives say the data reflect tremendous opportunity in the market.
Citizens, which made headlines in recent weeks through its offering of iPods to customers who switch banks and a giveaway of free gas for drivers, also said Wednesday that the number of its checking accounts in Massachusetts increased by 9 percent in the last year, with a quarter of that growth coming from Bank of America customers who switched. The bank declined to specify the number of new accounts but gave the percentage growth.
The release of the survey comes as Bank of America executives have publicly stated that they are gaining customers as a result of the $48 billion merger with FleetBoston Financial Corp. In the Northeast, they said, customers opened about 79,000 net new checking accounts from January through March, compared to 11,000 under Fleet during the same period last year. Those numbers include New York City and New Jersey; a spokeswoman declined to break out data for New England.
Despite the strong numbers, several of Bank of America's rivals have said publicly that they are gaining customers, and that they believe more will leave soon. Much of their focus revolves around Bank of America's computer-systems switch, which will occur June 17. Bank of America plans several other changes at various times this month, including a switch for brokerage customers on June 13 and some restrictions on online banking use from June 16 though June 20, as it converts former Fleet customers to the Bank of America system.
In previous bank mergers, such conversions have led to visible problems for customers, including long lines and ATM cards that do not work.
Bank of America executives have said they have put in thousands of hours to prevent such problems from occurring. But the bank's competitors plan to be ready for any fallout.
Sovereign Bancorp plans to boost its advertising during Red Sox games and by direct mail. Its executives also are visiting businesses in the neighborhoods of its branches to make a personal appeal to switch, said Pat Sullivan, Sovereign's market chief executive in Massachusetts.
"Anytime you disrupt a customer's everyday way of doing business, it causes them to rethink why they're banking there," he said. "We'll take the opportunity to go after that disruption anytime we can."
TD Banknorth Inc., a Maine bank that aims to expand across the Northeast, will put its name on the FleetCenter in July, and its chief executive has told analysts that it plans a visible campaign to introduce the new name to Boston residents. "It couldn't happen at a better time," TD Banknorth's chief executive, William Ryan, said during a call to disclose the bank's first quarter earnings. (Bank of America gave up Fleet's contract to name the FleetCenter, home of the Bruins and Celtics, earlier this year.)
TD Banknorth also increased its marketing budget 16 percent last year to $25 million, and it plans to increase its spending again this year, a spokesman said.
Eastern Bank also plans to mail customers in select areas $200 in cash to switch bank accounts during the transition. It will offer higher CD rates as well, though the exact rate has not been set yet, a spokesman said.
Bank of America declined to discuss any marketing efforts that it plans around the merger. A spokeswoman, Alex Liftman, said the bank's primary focus is delivering benefits to customers, including a nationwide network of ATMs, excellent customer service, and "a full range of traditional and innovative financial products and services."
"We're retaining more accounts, we're opening new accounts at a fast pace and customers are significantly more satisfied banking with us," Liftman said.
In the survey of Bank of America customers, paid for by Citizens but executed by two independent firms, customers were asked which bank they would move to if they switched in the next 30 days. More than a third of Bank of America customers surveyed said they would switch to Citizens, while 12 percent said they would switch to Sovereign Bancorp, and 4 percent said they would move to TD Banknorth.
The survey firms compared the results to a similar study of Fleet customers performed in November 2003, before the merger, and the results on customer satisfaction and likelihood to switch looked mostly the same.
Citizens also plans to be highly visible this summer, as with its promotions that offer customers who switch an iPod or a gift card valued up to $200 for Home Depot, Best Buy, or Sunoco gas. "This is an important time for customers, and an important time for us," said Bob Mahoney, Citizens' vice chairman. "We'll be active."
Sasha Talcott can be reached at stalcottglobe.com.
A federal initiative as ambitious as the Manhattan Project was needed to protect the nation from infectious diseases, Sen. Bill Frist of Tennessee, the majority leader, said Wednesday in a lecture at Harvard Medical School.
Frist, who studied medicine at Harvard, said the effort would defend against both bioterrorism and diseases that are spread naturally. He said that the United States and the rest of the world were unprepared for a potential pandemic despite signs that emerging viruses like the avian flu are capable of causing sharp losses of life.
"Any number of known and unknown viruses for which at present there is neither immunization nor cure are at this moment cooking in Asia and Africa, where they arise in hotbeds of densely intermingled human and animal populations," said Frist, who was delivering the Marshall J. Seidman Lecture to the Department of Health Care Policy.
Frist said he had not yet developed an estimate of the costs to the federal government of his proposal.
Elements of his proposal are incorporated in pending Senate legislation on biodefense, but he said his immediate goal was to open a discussion about the need to take seriously the threat such diseases pose. "I've got to build a case for it," he said, laying out the idea of a close working relationship among the government, the private sector and educational institutions that would rival the Manhattan Project, the World War II initiative to build the atomic bomb.
"I propose an unprecedented effort -- a Manhattan Project for the 21st century -- not with the goal of creating a destructive new weapon, but to defend against destruction wreaked by infectious disease and biological weapons," Frist said.
The senator, who has been mentioned as a possible Republican presidential candidate in 2008, noted that Britain, France and Canada were already far ahead of the United States in trying to secure the scarce supplies of the antiviral agent for the avian flu.
"We have decided upon going to the moon and then done so in a few short years," Frist told his audience. "We must open our eyes to face the single greatest threat to our safety and security today, but also to seize our single greatest opportunity."
With the most tantalizing mystery in recent political history solved, the cottage industry of amateur detectives devoted to uncloaking Deep Throat has turned to confront one of the last remaining questions: How did so many people guess so wildly wrong for such a long time?
W. Mark Felt, the former No. 2 official at the Federal Bureau of Investigation who revealed himself on Tuesday as The Washington Post's secret source on the Watergate scandal, usually fell low on the list of suspects, if he was there at all, in scores of books and articles speculating on the subject.
Instead, prominent Washington figures like Alexander M. Haig Jr. and David Gergen captured the imagination of publishers and producers -- as did the notion in some quarters that Deep Throat did not exist at all.
Only a few people actually singled out Felt as the best candidate for Deep Throat, who mainly confirmed information the Post reporters, Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein, developed from other sources.
Now vindicated, several of them said on Wednesday that they had settled on him by developing a forensics-style profile of Deep Throat, first by assessing his motivations for undermining President Nixon -- they figured the source had an institutional grudge and thus could have come from the FBI -- and determining who had access to the information, much of it from the FBI's Watergate investigation.
"I think we took the detective's approach," said Jack Limpert, the editor of Washingtonian magazine, who wrote two breezy but prescient items naming Felt as the source in 1974. "I thought we made a good, logical case, because this is how this town works."
On those terms, some of the names bandied about over time now appear far-fetched, including former President George Bush; the former Senate majority leader, Bob Dole; Diane Sawyer, a one-time Nixon press aide, and Justice William H. Rehnquist of the Supreme Court.
Some of the cases of mistaken identity appear to be the result of false clues planted by Woodward and Bernstein in their book, "All the President's Men," as they tried to protect Felt by adding, for example, an allusion to Deep Throat as a White House source.
Perhaps the most exhaustively researched -- yet incorrect -- conclusion was drawn by Prof. William Gaines of the University of Illinois, who led his journalism students in a four-year study into the mystery and declared in 2003 that Deep Throat was Fred F. Fielding, the former deputy counsel to President Nixon. This week, Gaines posted a correction on the school's Web site, calling the latest twist in the investigation "a learning experience for all of us."
"I had some calls from students, and they were more or less consoling me, like it was a death in the family or something," Gaines said on Wednesday. He said he was planning to lead a new course on how his study went astray.
Two former counsels to President Nixon, John W. Dean and Leonard Garment, missed the mark repeatedly with their theories. Dean, who was White House counsel and an ardent Deep Throat hunter, wrote in an article in The Los Angeles Times earlier this year that he had "little doubt that one of my former Nixon White House colleagues is history's best-known anonymous source." That incorrect guess followed a claim in his 2002 book, "Unmasking Deep Throat," that the source did not work for the FBI.
The claim by Garment, who was acting special counsel, in his 2000 book "In Search of Deep Throat," that a Republican strategist named John P. Sears was behind the Watergate leaks was knocked down immediately by Sears as well as Woodward and Bernstein. Though the reporters kept their source's identity secret for three decades, they never publicly ruled out Felt.
In 1976, Esquire magazine published an article naming Gergen, who was a speechwriter in the Nixon White House, as the likely source. In 1992, CBS News said it could have been L. Patrick Gray, the acting director of the FBI during the time of the disclosures.
Earlier this year, Adrian Havill, who wrote a biography of the two Watergate reporters, said he believed Deep Throat had been former President Bush, then the head of the Republican National Committee -- a notion that other sleuths dismissed as absurd but that frequently made its way into the popular parlor game of guessing who it was.
"I watched a whole bunch of speculation that made no sense to me," said James Mann, the reporter who made the most extensive case for Felt in a 1992 essay in the Atlantic Monthly magazine. "People tended to grab at famous faces who, if you had any idea how Washington worked, made no sense."
Timothy Noah, a writer who has for years promoted the Felt theory in the online magazine Slate, reveled more openly in the week's news. "Told you so," Noah began an article he posted on Tuesday.
Yet even now, some skeptics remain unconvinced that Felt is the Deep Throat who was portrayed as a lively, erudite public servant who reveled in cloak-and-dagger pursuits.
David Obst, the former literary agent for Woodward and Bernstein, wrote a book contending that Deep Throat was actually a composite of several anonymous sources -- a view he still held after Tuesday's revelations.
"Mark Felt was an invaluable source to The Washington Post and to Woodward and Bernstein, but he was not Deep Throat -- there was no Deep Throat," said Obst, who claims that the character was added to the original draft of "All the President's Men" to give it more intrigue.
Obst said on Wednesday that it defied credibility to suggest that such a high-ranking FBI official would take the time and energy required to discuss information to Woodward in the ways the book described, like marking up a newspaper on Woodward's doorstep to signal his desire for a meeting. Though Felt was a source, Obst said, he was not the only one.
"There's not a chance one person was Deep Throat," Obst said. "So, no, I'm not eating crow."
Six masked assailants have taken more than 20 people, including Americans and Europeans, hostage on a remote resort island in eastern Malaysia, police said Monday.
The abductors surprised and captured the group on a beach on Sipadan Island late Sunday, and two foreign tourists managed to escape the men, Semporna police chief Sulaiman Junaidi told The Associated Press by telephone.
Osman Ibrahim, a police spokesman in the Malaysian capital, Kuala Lumpur, confirmed that the two who escaped were Americans and that they were still in Sabah. He said most of the hostages were Europeans and Americans.
Sipadan, popular for diving, is an island off the northeast coast of Sabah, the Malaysian side of Borneo island, which is shared with Indonesia.
Sulaiman said the assailants were believed to be Filipinos. The hostages were said to have been taken onto a boat and are now at sea.
Police are currently trying to trace the boat, he said. He said no demands had been announced.
Chong Kah Kiat, the minister of tourism and environment for Sabah, said the island was near two Malaysian naval bases on the eastern coast of Sabah.
''This has never happened here before, so I don't think there are any Malaysians involved,'' in the hostage taking, Chong said.
Chong said the area was considered one of the top 10 diving spots in the world and that six resorts on the island cater mostly to professional divers.
He said access to the island was restricted to 80 divers at one time, and 40 staff at the six resorts, to protect the coral reef and wildlife.
Malaysia and Indonesia both claim sovereignty over the Celebes Sea islands. The Southeast Asian neighbors have both filed claims with the International Court of Justice at The Hague, Netherlands.
The argument over the islands dates back to 1969, when Indonesia and Malaysia failed to reach agreement during technical discussions about the overlapping continental shelf that borders the neighboring countries.
But there were no early indications that the assailants were involved in the territorial dispute.
James and Mary Murphy were just another American couple escaping on a dream vacation to a lush Malaysian resort island.
By the time they arrived at the Kuala Lumpur International Airport late Monday, they were among the few escapees of a mass abduction by mysterious gunmen 24 hours earlier which left 20 hostages still missing in Southeast Asian waters.
''We really need to talk to our children,'' Mary Murphy told The Associated Press at Malaysia's international airport. ''We really want to get to the phone.''
The Murphys, both 51, of Rochester, N.Y., appeared shaken up and very much alone. Scores of reporters waited for them to arrive, but no Malaysian authorities or U.S. embassy officials were there to escort them from their plane after their long ordeal.
Mary Murphy, wearing plaid Bermuda shorts, was close to tears. They had not yet informed their three children living in Boston, Rochester and Australia about their trauma. The Murphys have been living in Sydney for the past two years.
Six gunmen stormed the Sipadan Island Resort off the eastern Malaysian state of Sabah late Sunday, taking 20 people, including 10 foreign tourists, hostage on two boats.
Rescue teams searching southeast Asian seas say they've zeroed on assailants -- an attack that the Philippine rebel group Bbu Sayyaf on Tuesday claimed it carried out.
Muslim rebels in the Philippines who are seeking the release of militants jailed in the World Trade Center bombing case claimed responsibility Tuesday for the Malaysian kidnapping. But Philippine officials quickly expressed skepticism over the statement.
The Murphys escaped by refusing to get on the boats, according to police in Semporna. Eyewitnesses said the hostages were forced to swim to the boats. They said Mary Murphy couldn't swim and when the kidnappers tried to force her, her husband said they'd have to shoot him if they forced her into the water.
When the hostage-takers turned around, the Murphys ran into the bushes and hid until dawn, eyewitnesses said.
When asked if this was an accurate account, the Murphys smiled but would not elaborate. Asked if they had hidden in the bushes, Murphy said, ''We did that.''
Murphy, an executive for Eastman Kodak Co. in Sydney, said they had not slept since the previous night but were otherwise fine.
''She's got lots of bites from sleeping in the bushes, a lot of sand fleas,'' he said, pointing to Mary Murphy's legs, which were covered with a rash of insect bites.
Murphy said that he would speak more extensively once he knew that the other hostages were released and safe.
''I don't want to do anything that would endanger their lives,'' he said.
As cameras flashed around them, Mary Murphy said all she wanted now was ''a good night's sleep and a hot shower.''
South African Department of Foreign Affairs on Monday confirmed that two South Africans are among the 21 people taken hostage by gunmen in Malaysia's famed diving island of Sipadan.
The department's spokesman Ronnie Mamoepa told South African Press Association that the identity of the man and the woman have been known to the South African mission in Malaysia.
"We know who they are and we are still trying to get hold of their families before we release their names," he added.
Momoepa said the mission is involved in discussions with Interpol.
"The government is doing everything in its power to secure the release of these two people," he said.
Sipadan is a world-renowned diving island off the northeast coast of Sabah, the Malaysian side of Borneo Island, which is shared with Indonesia.
The gunmen, believed to be Filipinos, apparently surprised the tourists on a beach on Sipadan Island on Sunday night. The other tourists taken hostage are believed to be from Germany, France and the United States.
The hostage takers have made no demand so far.
Philippine President Joseph Estrada Monday ordered the Philippine military forces to go after the six armed pirates who reportedly kidnapped some 20 people, mostly foreigners, in eastern Malaysia, a senior Philippine official said.
In a press briefing, Press Secretary Ricardo Puno said the Philippine embassy in Kuala Lumpur has received a note from the assistant director of the Malaysian Police informing the Philippines of the kidnapping.
The tourists were reportedly taken hostage late Sunday on a remote resort island of Sipadan off the Sabah coast, eastern Malaysia.
But Puno, who is also the presidential spokesman, said initial reports from the Philippine National Police could not confirm if the pirates were Filipinos.
Citing the Malaysian police report, Puno said 10 of those kidnapped were foreign tourists, which include French, German, South African, Lebanese and Finnish nationals.
According the report, five staff members of the Sipadan resort, and a Filipino, a Malaysian policeman and four staffers of the Malaysian wildlife department, were also among the abducted.
Puno said the hostages were reportedly taken by boats heading toward Philippine waters early Monday morning.
He added that President Estrada had given the instructions to the Philippine Navy and the Philippine Air Force in support of the border patrol agreement between the Philippines and Malaysia.
"There is a border patrol agreement between the Philippines and Malaysia which has been activated and so elements of both countries are in operation in that area," Puno said.
A total of 20 people were taken hostage by six heavily armed men Sunday night from Sipadan island off Sabah, East Malaysia, but their motives behind the abduction are yet to be confirmed, Malaysian Police said Monday.
While police could not yet confirm the captors' motives, politics, ransom and feelings of dissatisfaction were among the possible reasons, Malaysian Police Inspector-General Norian Mai told a news conference here at the federal police headquarters.
"We seriously feel that politics may be a reason," he said.
He did not rule out the possibility that the kidnapping was connected to the Abu Sayyaf rebel group which was holding several hostages in southern Philippines. "There is a possibility."
He said police had not made any contact with the kidnappers.
It was however confirmed that among the hostages, there are 11 foreigners -- three Germans, two South Africans, two French nationals, two Finns, one Lebanese and one Filipino while the rest nine are Malaysians comprising four workers of the Wildlife Department, three workers of the Sipadan resort center, a policeman and a staff of Syarikat Borneo Divers.
According to Norian, an American couple, both aged 51, who were captured together with the 20 people, managed to escape before they were forced into a boat.
They fled into the jungles and emerged Monday morning, and their condition was good and they were not injured, he said.
Norian said the armed men raided the police base on the island before capturing the hostages.
"They came in two 'jongkong' boats, and when fleeing with the hostages they used only one jongkong boat and seized a boat belonging to the resort center. Their other boat was left behind," he said.
A special team has been set up by the Malaysian police to rescue the hostages and the Malaysian police are in contact with their counterparts in Southern Philippines in efforts to track down the kidnappers.
Deputy Prime Minister and Home Minister Abdullah Ahmad Badawi said earlier Monday Malaysian security forces are in hot pursuit of the kidnappers.
He said the authorities are determined to secure the release of the foreign tourists and local residents held hostage. "Freeing them is uppermost," he added.
Describing the incident as unexpected, Abdullah said it should prompt the police to review the security of territorial waters off Sabah.
Meanwhile, Malaysian Foreign Minister Syed Hamid Albar also held a news conference earlier Monday on the incident, saying that all the 20 people taken hostage by armed pirates were safe.
Syed Hamid said the names of the hostages would be released by the Malaysian police.
He said the incident was an "isolated" case and it was safe for people to visit Sipadan island, a resort popular with scuba-divers.
Malaysian Foreign Minister Syed Hamid Albar said Monday that all the 20 people taken hostage by armed pirates Sunday night are safe.
The hostages include two French nationals, three Germans, two South Africans, two Finns and one Lebanese, all tourists, he told a news conference here.
The others are eight Malaysians and two Filipino workers, he said, adding that the names of the hostages would be released by the Malaysian police.
The minister said that his ministry had informed two foreign missions here whose nationals are involved.
The other missions could not be contacted but they would be informed later, he said.
"They are getting help from neighboring countries to trace the hostages," he said.
"I think the authorities are taking the necessary steps to get them (hostages) released from their captors," Syed Hamid said.
He said the hostage incident is an "isolated" case and it is safe for people to visit Sipadan island, a popular resort especially among scuba-divers.
The minister could not say if the pirates have made any demands.
Earlier, Deputy Prime Minister and Home Minister Abdullah Ahmad Badawi said a special team has been set up by the police to rescue the hostages who were taken in boats by the pirates.
Abdullah said Malaysia's security forces are in hot pursuit of the pirates, who were reportedly armed with rocket launchers and M16 rifles.
About 20 people, including foreign tourists, were taken hostage by armed pirates on Sipadan island off the Sabah coast, East Malaysia, Sunday night, according to police sources Monday.
Most of the hostages are foreign tourists, police said.
Confirming the news in Kuala Lumpur Monday afternoon, Deputy Prime Minister Abdullah Ahmad Badawi said a special team has been set by the police to rescue the hostages who were taken in boats by the pirates.
He said Malaysian police are in contact with their counterparts in Southern Philippines in efforts to track down the pirates.
Sipadan island is a popular resort especially for scuba-divers.
Muslim rebels who have been holding 27 Filipinos hostage at a remote mountain stronghold in the Philippines claimed responsibility Tuesday for also abducting about 20 people from a nearby Malaysian tourist island.
Philippine officials, however, expressed skepticism over the claim by the extremist Abu Sayyaf rebels.
The claim came as troops battled their way up the densely forested mountain in the Philippines where the Muslim extremists were holding their captives.
Helicopter gunships pounded three outlying Abu Sayyaf camps with rockets again Tuesday, said Lt. Gen. Diomedio Villanueva, chief of the military's Southern Command. He said the ground troops were pursuing fleeing rebels, and the troops next plan to advance to the main stronghold further up the mountain, he said.
The assault, which began Saturday, has been slowed by heavy vegetation and by land mines, which have forced the troops to employ metal detectors, officials said.
As that assault progressed, about 20 people, including foreign tourists, were abducted Sunday night by heavily armed attackers on a nearby Malaysian island and taken by boat toward the Philippines.
Philippine officials initially said they were investigating possible links to the Abu Sayyaf. Police there said the kidnappers in Malaysia spoke Tausug, a language spoken in parts of the southern Philippines, but not in Basilan, where the Abu Sayyaf rebels operate.
''Our group is behind the abduction of the foreigners (in Malaysia) and there are still a lot of surprises for the government if they won't listen to us,'' Abu Sayyaf spokesman Abu Ahmad said in an interview over local radio station DXRZ.
The government has refused several rebel demands, including the release of three Arab terrorists held in jails in the United States.
Philippine Defense Secretary Orlando Mercado said the military is still determining whether the Abu Sayyaf is actually responsible for the Malaysian abductions.
''We don't just jump and believe the Abu Sayyaf immediately. We will verify and confirm this,'' he told The Associated Press.
The 20 hostages, including foreign tourists and local resort workers, were abducted late Sunday from Malaysia's Sipadan Island by six heavily armed men and taken on two fishing boats toward the Philippines, officials said.
The 27 Filipino hostages -- who include many schoolchildren -- are believed to be held at the main rebel stronghold further up the mountain, which Villanueva said his forces were avoiding shelling to prevent injuries to the captives.
''This is a hostage situation and we're considering the safety of the hostages to give them the best chance to survive,'' Villanueva said.
At least 10 Abu Sayyaf rebels and four soldiers have died in the fighting in the hinterlands of the southern island province of Basilan. The rebels have warned they will behead their five remaining adult male hostages -- including a priest -- if the military does not halt its assault.
The group also announced last week that it had beheaded two male teachers. The rebels, who are fighting for an independent Islamic state in the predominantly Catholic Philippines, are demanding the release of Muslim militants jailed in the United States, including the mastermind of the 1993 World Trade Center bombing.
The Abu Sayyaf is the smaller but more radical of two Muslim groups fighting for an independent state in the Philippines. It has been blamed for numerous attacks on Christians.
A rebel spokesman said two hostages, including a child, were injured in the shelling of the rebel camp, but the claim could not be independently verified.
The hostages have been forced to stay in unprotected shacks while the rebels have taken refuge in bunkers, a hostage told ABS-CBN television in an interview by cellular telephone.
Suspected Abu Sayyaf rebels attacked an army outpost in Jolo in nearby Sulu province late Sunday, injuring seven soldiers and five civilians, Sulu police chief Candido Casimiro said.
The rebels originally seized more than 50 hostages, including many children, from two schools in Basilan on March 20 for use as human shields after attacking another army outpost. About half of the hostages have since been freed.
The group has demanded freedom for World Trade Center bomber Ramzi Yousef, and Sheik Omar Abdel-Rahman, accused of conspiring to blow up New York City landmarks.
The demands were rejected by the Philippine government and by the U.S. Embassy.
In retaliation for the abduction, a group of vigilantes seized 11 relatives of Abu Sayyaf leader Khadaffy Janjalani. They still held nine relatives after freeing Janjalani's pregnant wife and a daughter.
The U.S. State Department has included the Abu Sayyaf in a list of 28 foreign groups that threaten Americans at home or abroad.
Rescue teams were searching Southeast Asian seas on Tuesday for assailants who abducted 20 hostages from a Malaysian diving resort -- an attack that Philippine Muslim rebels claimed they carried out.
Muslim rebels in the Philippines who are seeking the release of militants jailed in the World Trade Center bombing case claimed responsibility Tuesday for the Malaysian kidnapping. Philippine officials, who were helping coordinate the rescue attempt, quickly expressed skepticism over the statement.
An American couple escaped the Sunday evening attack in Malaysia by refusing to swim out to the kidnappers' boats and then hiding overnight in nearby bushes.
Malaysian Defense Minister Najib Tun Razak said Monday that an air-and-sea search team had determined where the hostages -- half of whom were foreign tourists -- were being held, following their abduction on the lush Sipadan Island in eastern Malaysia. Najib did not give details.
But Semporna police chief Sulaiman Junaidi said Tuesday that authorities had yet to pinpoint the abductor's hideout. ''We're tracking them down,'' he added.
Nafir Sakaran, a state Cabinet minister at police headquarters in Semporna, told The Associated Press Tuesday that marine police and navy reinforcements have been brought in. ''The military has been called out. We have soldiers who are riding on patrol boats, working with the Philippine navy.''
The attack began when six masked gunmen, carrying AK-47s and a rocket launcher and speaking a Philippine language, grabbed tourists and workers and confiscated their cash and jewelry, Norian said.
A local marine photographer said one of the attackers identified himself as a police officer and told him to give up his watch and cellular phone.
''At first I thought he was joking ... but when I refused to obey his orders, he held a gun to my head,'' Danny Chin, 48, was quoted as saying by the national news agency Bernama.
Chin said he hid in the woods while the kidnappers ransacked the resort.
The attackers then forced their hostages to swim a distance to two fishing boats, which then sped away and appeared to be heading into Philippine waters, officials said.
Two of the captives -- James and Mary Murphy, both 51, of Rochester, N.Y. -- managed to escape. Eyewitnesses said Mary Murphy didn't know how to swim, and her husband told the assailants they'd have to shoot him if they forced her into the water. The kidnappers apparently let them go, and the American couple ran into the bushes and hid until dawn.
The Murphys, who have been living in Australia the past two years, arrived in the Malaysian capital, Kuala Lumpur, on Monday evening but said they didn't want to talk to the media extensively until the hostages are released.
''I don't want to do anything that would endanger their lives,'' James Murphy told The Associated Press at the airport. ''We haven't slept yet, but yes, we are fine.''
The hostages forced onto the fishing boats included two French tourists, three Germans, two South Africans, two Finns and one Lebanese, as well as a Filipino worker and nine Malaysians, authorities said.
In Basilan, Philippines, Philippine troops shelled rebel camps again Tuesday as soldiers battled their way up a mountain where Abu Sayyaf rebels were holding 27 Filipinos captive.
''Our group is behind the abduction of the foreigners (in Malaysia) and there are still a lot of surprises for the government if they won't listen to us,'' Abu Ahmad, spokesman for the Philippine rebel group Abu Sayyaf, said in an interview over local radio station DXRZ.
The rebels have demanded the freedom of three Arab terrorist suspects in U.S. jails, including Ramzi Yousef, mastermind of the 1993 bombing of the World Trade Center in New York, and Sheik Omar Abdel-Rahman, accused of conspiring to blow up New York City landmarks.
Philippine Defense Secretary Orlando Mercado said the military is still determining whether the Abu Sayyaf, which is fighting for an independent Islamic state in the predominantly Catholic Philippines, is actually responsible for the Malaysian abductions.
''We don't just jump and believe the Abu Sayyaf immediately. We will verify and confirm this,'' he told The Associated Press.
Prior to the rebel announcement, Col. Ernesto de Guzman, chief of staff of the Philippine military's Southern Command, said officials were trying to determine whether there was a connection with the hostage situation on the southern Philippine island of Basilan, about 275 miles northeast of Semporna, the port from which tourists take boats for Sipadan.
Since 1969, Malaysia and Indonesia have both claimed sovereignty over Sipadan and Ligitan, another Celebes Sea island. But there were no indications that the hostage-takers were involved in the territorial dispute.
Chong Kah Kiat, tourism minister for Sabah, said he was concerned that the attack would scare off the 400,000 tourists who visit Sabah beaches and rain forests every year.
Meanwhile, at the airport in Kuala Lumpur, Mary Murphy was close to tears.
''We really need to talk to our children,'' she told the AP. ''We really want to get to the phone.''
Her husband, an executive for Eastman Kodak Co. in Sydney, Australia, said they had not slept since Sunday night but were otherwise fine.
''She's got lots of bites from sleeping in the bushes, a lot of sand fleas,'' he said, pointing to his wife's legs, which were covered with a rash of insect bites.
As cameras flashed around them, Mary Murphy, wearing plaid Bermuda shorts, said all she wanted was ''a good night's sleep and a hot shower.''
Authorities hunted the seas between Malaysia and the Philippines today for two fishing boats controlled by heavily armed men holding 21 hostages they abducted from a Malaysian diving resort two days earlier.
The kidnapping might be tied to Muslim rebels in the Philippines who are seeking the release of militants jailed in the United States, although some authorities said the Abu Sayyaf rebels were just trying to attract attention.
''Our group is behind the abduction of the foreigners (in Malaysia) and there are still a lot of surprises for the government if they won't listen to us,'' Abu Sayyaf spokesman Abu Ahmad told Philippine radio station DXRZ.
Several hours later, however, Ahmad said he would neither confirm nor deny his group was involved.
Officials were searching today for the hostages -- half of whom are foreign tourists. They were taken Sunday night from lush Sipadan Island off the northern Borneo state of Sabah.
A police intelligence report said the hostages were taken to the province of Sulu at the southern tip of the Philippines, no more than an hour's boat ride from Sipadan. But Lt. Edgar Joseph Andres, a navy pilot, said he found nothing in a three-hour search of the sparsely inhabited area today.
Malaysian officials said today that the kidnappers were believed to be outside Malaysian waters.
A waitress from the Philippines who escaped the abduction added weight to the Muslim rebels' claim that they were involved. Jeneth Cagaanan said when one of the men grabbed her, she replied to him in Suluk -- the language prevalent in the southern Philippines -- and that he understood her.
Cagaanan also said one of the assailants wore a vest emblazoned with the initials of the Moro National Liberation Front, the Philippines' largest Muslim rebel group before it signed a peace accord in 1996.
Five people were being questioned in connection with the abduction, Sabah chief of police Mamat Talib said.
Police said some of those arrested were former employees of the Sipadan resort and were tied to the Filipino fishing community along Sabah's eastern coastline.
The attack on Sipadan began Sunday when six masked gunmen, carrying AK-47s and a rocket launcher, grabbed tourists and workers and confiscated their cash and jewelry.
The gunmen then forced their hostages to swim to two fishing boats, which sped away and appeared to be heading toward Philippine waters.
Eyewitnesses said two of the captives -- James and Mary Murphy, both 51, of Rochester, N.Y. -- escaped after James Murphy told the assailants his wife didn't know how to swim. When the kidnappers turned around, the American couple ran into the bushes and hid until dawn.
In the Malaysian capital, Kuala Lumpur, James Murphy declined today to talk extensively about his ordeal. ''We don't want our comments to overshadow anything that's going on with the situation,'' he said.
The hostages forced onto the fishing boats included tourists -- two French, three Germans, two South Africans, two Finns and one Lebanese -- and nine Malaysians who either worked at the resort or for the wildlife service. One was a Filipino resort employee and the nationality of the 21st hostage wasn't immediately released.
Another hostage situation was escalating in a remote area of the southern Philippines, about 275 miles north of Semporna, the port from which tourists take boats for Sipadan. On the island province of Basilan, troops shelled Abu Sayyaf camps again today as soldiers battled their way up a mountain where the rebels were holding 27 Filipinos captive.
Jose Calimlim, chief of intelligence for the Philippine military, said an air force plane and navy boats were searching Philippine waters near Malaysia for the hostages captured Sunday. He doubted the Abu Sayyaf claim of credit.
''This is a part of their propaganda because they are really trying to attract attention, especially international attention,'' he said.
The rebels have demanded the freedom of Arab terrorist suspects in U.S. jails, including Ramzi Yousef, mastermind of the 1993 bombing of the World Trade Center in New York.
Prime Minister Mahathir Mohamad insisted Malaysia was still a safe tourist destination. The Sabah economy relies heavily on the 400,000 people who visit its beach resorts and rain forests every year.
''We don't get this kind of thing happening in Malaysia very often,'' Mahathir said. ''It will affect tourism in Sabah, but the rest of the country is not affected by this. Malaysia is very safe for tourists.''
That may be of little comfort to Yee Mui Phia, a guide at Sipadan Dive Center who sat today in his empty office in Semporna.
''We are scared,'' he said. ''And what's more important, it will affect our business.''
Two batches of Heinz baby food have been recalled in Hong Kong following a similar action in the United States over worries they may contain high levels of lead, the Health Department said Monday. 	   A statement said 14,000 jars of 4-ounce (110 gram) Vegetable Chicken Dinner and 2.5-ounce (70 gram) Beginner Strained Carrots were being recalled by the distributor in the territory. 	   It said the department has also taken some samples of Heinz products for further testing. 	   Last week, Heinz officials in the United States said the traces of lead pose little health risks. 	   The problem was discovered in a routine Food and Drug Administration review of supermarket shelves. No illnesses have been reported.
Los Angeles, November 4 (Xinhua) -- A U.S. company said Wednesday that it was recalling all ground beef it produced on October 22 because it may contain the potentially deadly E.coli O157:H7 bacteria.
IBP, the world's largest processor of fresh beef, said in a report the recall involved 556,226 pounds of ground beef produced at its plant in Dakota City, Nebraska.
Retailers, food service operations and distributors in a total of 33 states have been identified as having received the ground beef, said the company, adding that much of it is believed to have been consumed already.
But no illnesses have been reported in connection to the beef produced on that day and the company said it had notified the U.S. Department of Agriculture, which was testing the product.
Earlier this year, IBP recalled a shipment of 282,129 pounds of beef after a sample was found to be tainted by the same bacteria.
Researchers said E.coli O157:H7 accounts for more than 20,000 infections and 200 deaths annually in the United States.
More than 250,000 kilograms of ground beef in 33 U.S. states have been recalled because the meat might contain a deadly strain of E. coli.
The meat-packing giant IBP Inc. disclosed that a sample of beef taken on October 22 from its Dakota City plant could be tainted with E. coli O157:H7, an Associated Press report said.
Complications associated with the O157:H7 strain can lead to kidney failure, severe anemia, clotting problems and, in some cases, coma and death.
IBP spokesman Gary Mickelson said 71 retail, food service and distribution customers bought the ground beef, sold in vacuum-packaged tubes. The recall does not include any prepackaged fresh or frozen beef patties.
The meat was under test by the U.S. Department of Agriculture. But the company decided Wednesday to recall it.
Consumers who have purchased meat products manufactured at Thorn Apple Valley's Forrest City, Ark., plant in the last six months are being urged to return them because of concerns of possible contamination with the Listeria monocytogenes bacteria.
The Agriculture Department announced the recall Friday night. It includes all meat and poultry products bearing the codes ''EST 13529'' or ''EST P13529'' anywhere on the package. The recall includes dozens of brand names, based on information collected by the department's Food Safety and Inspection Service and provided by the company.
The department suspended operations at the Arkansas plant on Dec. 31 because of its noncompliance with sanitation requirements. Operations there remain suspended. That plant has a production capacity of 400,000 pounds of hot dogs per day, according to the company.
No consumer illnesses have yet been linked to the products, which were distributed nationwide and shipped to foreign countries, including South Korea and Russia, and manufactured after July 6, 1998.
''Because of the potential of foodborne illness, we urge consumers who have purchased the suspect product not to eat it and return it to the point of purchase,'' said Margaret Glavin, associate administrator of the FSIS.
Between July and December 1998, government inspectors collected 20 ready-to-eat samples from the plant. Five tested positive for Listeria monocytogenes bacteria, which can cause high fever, severe headache, neck stiffness and nausea. Based on the findings and conditions at the plant, the agency concluded there may be a public health risk associated with the product.
The Agriculture Department said it has no evidence, however, linking the product to a nationwide listeriosis outbreak that is under investigation. About 1,800 cases of food poisoning caused by listeria are reported in the United States each year.
Healthy people usually can fight off the bacterium with no more than flu-like symptoms. But listeria can kill, by causing meningitis or blood infection. Most at risk are pregnant women, the elderly and people with weak immune systems.
Those concerned about illnesses they suspect are related to these products should contact their physicians immediately.
This is the third major recall in a month of meat products.
Last week, Oscar Mayer Foods Corp. recalled more than 28,000 pounds of deli meat because of concerns of possible contamination with the Listeria bacteria.
Sara Lee Corp. announced in late December a recall of hot dogs and other packaged meats as a precaution after an outbreak of food poisoning sickened more than 35 people in nine states, killing four.
Consumers seeking information about the Thorn Apple Valley recall may contact the company at 1-800-316-2855. Consumers with food safety questions may phone the USDA Meat and Poultry Hotline at 1-800-535-4555. The hotline is staffed from 10 a.m. to 4 p.m. EST Monday through Friday. Recorded information is available 24 hours a day.
The brand names of the hot dogs and lunch combinations included in the Thorn Apple Valley recall are:
Hot Dogs: Borman Franks, Spartan Franks, Tops Franks, Always Save Franks, Wilson Franks, Piggly Wiggly Franks, Gunnoes Franks, Fairgrounds Franks, Best Franks, Colonial Franks, Nepco Franks, Hannaford Franks, Wilson Farms Franks, Big Uns Franks, Carters Franks, Iowa Gold Franks, Herrud Franks, Corn King Franks, Winn Dixie Franks, Schnucks Franks, Flavor King Franks, Thorn Apple Valley Franks.
Lunch combinations: Schnucks Bologna with American Cheese, Kroger Turkey Breast with Cheddar, Kroger Cooked Ham with Swiss Cheese, Kroger Bologna with American Cheese, HyVee Turkey Breast with Cheddar, Hy Vee Bologna with American Cheese, Best Bologna with American Cheese, Safeway Turkey Breast with Cheddar, Safeway Cooked Ham with Swiss Cheese, Safeway Bologna with American Cheese, Smart Selections Turkey Breast with Cheddar, Smart Selections Bologna with American Cheese, Smart Selections Turkey Ham with American Cheese, Smart Selections Cooked Ham with Swiss Cheese, Lady Lee Turkey Breast with Cheddar, Lady Lee Ham with American Cheese, Lady Lee Cooked Ham with Swiss Cheese, Lady Lee Bologna with American Cheese, Iowa Gold Turkey Breast with Cheddar, Iowa Gold Bologna with American Cheese, Iowa Gold Cooked Ham with Swiss Cheese, Save A Lot Turkey Breast with Cheddar, Save A Lot Cooked Ham with Swiss Cheese.
A meat processing plant is voluntarily recalling all frankfurter and lunch combination products it produced since July 6 because they may be contaminated.
The products, which were distributed nationwide and to foreign countries including Russia and South Korea by Thorn Apple Valley's Forrest City plant, may be contaminated with Listeria monocytogenes, according to the U.S. Agriculture Department's Food Safety and Inspection Service announced.
The plant was shut down for sanitary reasons by the USDA on Dec. 31. A person answering the telephone at the plant Monday said no one could comment about the scale of the recall.
A variety of brand names are included in the recall but the key to discovering potentially contaminated product is in coding on the packages. Only meats with the codes ''EST 13529'' or ''EST-P 13529'' on the product package are subject to the recall.
So far, no cases of illness have been linked to the recalled products, the USDA said.
The suspected bacterium is found in soil and water. An estimated 1,100 people in the United States become seriously ill each year from eating food contaminated with Listeria. Listeriosis affects primarily pregnant women, newborns and adults with weakened immune systems.
When the first reports of a food-poisoning outbreak from hot dogs and deli meats started to accumulate in state health departments across the United States last August, officials could not have guessed that the effort to contain the eruption would be so ineffective that they would still be counting victims five months later.
A recall of meats made by a Sara Lee Corp. subsidiary, Bil Mar Foods in Zeeland, Mich., began on Dec. 22. But some state public health officials say the outbreak could have been contained sooner had the Agriculture Department done its job.
To its credit, the Agriculture Department has announced recalls of processed meats contaminated with listeria from four other companies in the last four months, most recently last weekend. But consumers may have a difficult time understanding why those recalls were announced by the government and Bil Mar's was not.
Listeria monocytogenes is not a serious threat to healthy people, causing only short-term gastrointestinal problems. But it is a big risk to people 75 and older, people with compromised immune systems, pregnant women and the very young. Pregnant women and their unborn children are in the greatest danger. The current outbreak associated with Bil Mar has been blamed for 13 deaths and two miscarriages or stillbirths; in all, there have been 70 confirmed cases.
Unlike salmonella and E. coli 0157:H7, which have become household words in the United States, listeria is not well known. There are only 1,000 to 2,000 reported cases of listeriosis in the United States each year; an accurate figure cannot be obtained, as health professionals do not routinely test for it and many cases go undetected.
But health officials find it especially troubling because, based on the number of reported cases, the percentage of people who die from it is much higher than from most other food-borne bacteria. And the incubation period is much longer, up to 70 days before symptoms appear.
''Listeria is rare,'' said Dr. Robert Tauxe, chief of the food-borne and diarrheal diseases branch of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in Atlanta, ''but in someone susceptible, it is catastrophic.'' In addition to causing miscarriages and stillbirths, listeria can cause fatal blood infections and meningitis.
Without a new method of detection, Tauxe said, ''I don't think we would have identified where the listeria came from.''
The new system, called Pulsenet, gives scientists the ability to fingerprint the DNA of bacteria and then compare the fingerprints to see if the listeria is from a common source. The system was set up in 1997 to track E. coli 0157:H7, but it appears to be equally successful with listeria.
American scientists began to take listeria seriously in 1985, when 18 deaths were traced to the eating of Jalisco brand soft cheese. (The company is now defunct.) There were also 30 stillbirths and deaths of newborns. Another 142 people became ill.
Listeria is carried in the intestines of animals and can easily come in contact with dairy products, uncooked meats, fish, poultry and vegetables as well as precooked meats like the ones responsible for the August outbreak. The investigators say they do not know how the listeria contaminated the cooked meats at Bil Mar Foods.
Food-borne diseases like listeriosis are more troubling today for several reasons, including changes in the makeup of the population and the increasingly complex way food is processed and distributed. The population is aging: In 1950, 2.6 percent of Americans were over 74; by 1995, the percentage was 5.6. The number of people who survive cancer for five years has also increased, as has the number of people who have AIDS or are living with transplanted organs.
In addition, the centralization of food production has turned what might previously have been a small local problem into a global one. Products from the Bil Mar plant, for example, are distributed all over the United States.
Still, Dr. Michael Osterholm, the state epidemiologist at the Minnesota Health Department, says he is increasingly frustrated with the federal government's response to outbreaks of food poisoning, and even with the new detection system.
In the Bil Mar Foods case, the Agriculture Department left the announcement of the recall to the company. The agency does not announce recalls until it has proof that a sealed product contains the disease-causing bacteria, and it did not have that proof until Dec. 31, nine days later.
When the company announced the recall, a spokesman for the Agriculture Department, Andrew Solomon, said, reporters who cover the agency were notified and the information was put on the agency's Web site and on its consumer-information line (800-535-4555).
''We felt the word was out there and an additional press release would not have generated new news coverage,'' he said.
Osterholm disagrees. ''If there had been a real effort to get the message out by the Department of Agriculture throughout the country, consumers would have had more awareness,'' he said.
Both he and Dale Morris, the director of the division of infectious disease of the New York State Health Department, say there can never be enough notification. In Broome County, in upstate New York, they say, Meals on Wheels was still serving the Bil Mar products to elderly clients eight days after the recall, because it had not been notified.
''Those people are one of the highest-risk populations in the country,'' Osterholm said. And there may still be tainted hot dogs or deli meats in people's freezers.
In other cases, the Agriculture Department did take action. Over the weekend, it announced the recall of hot dogs from Thorn Apple Valley in Forrest City, Ark., because of listeria.
The previous week, the agency announced the recall of deli meat from Oscar Mayer Foods for the same bacteria, as it did in October for hot dogs made by Dixie Packers Inc. of Madison, Fla., and cheeseburger sandwiches from Hormel Food Corp.
As usual, the last line of defense against food-borne illness is consumers, who are advised to take the standard measures: thorough cooking of raw animal products, thorough washing of all food that is to be eaten raw like fruits and vegetables; keeping foods to be eaten raw separate from uncooked meats; thorough washing of hands, knives and cutting boards.
Unlike many other disease-causing bacteria, listeria can grow in a refrigerator that has a normal temperature of 40 degrees, which means leftovers should be reheated.
But how does this advice fit in with meats that people expect to eat without further cooking?
Public health officials strongly urge those at greatest risk from listeria to stay away from all soft cheeses, including feta and blue-veined cheeses like Roquefort and Camembert. They also say that it is essential to cook hot dogs until the internal temperature reaches 165 degrees, by either steaming or frying. Cooking in the microwave is not recommended. And unless people at risk are willing to eat salami, corned beef and pastrami hot _ in other words, cooked again _ they should not eat them at all.
''Listeria hasn't been on anyone's radar screen,'' Tauxe said. ''But it's something pregnant women should be made aware of. At this point, as far as I can tell, the number of pregnant women who are aware of this is zero.''
Recent outbreaks of listeriosis are causing an immediate public health problem, federal agriculture officials said in launching a review of whether to require more testing for the deadly bacterium.
Some Agriculture Department officials said they would like more legal authority to focus on the danger to public health when they recommend recalls, so they can warn the public faster.
At a daylong public meeting on Wednesday, officials said they had more questions than answers about a spike in outbreaks of listeriosis like the one traced to hot dogs and cold cuts at Michigan's Bil Mar Foods plant in December that has killed 16 people and sickened more than 70 in 14 states.
Listeria monocytogenes is a bacteria that healthy people usually fight off but sometimes can kill. Pregnant women, the newborn, older adults and people with weakened immune systems are especially at risk.
''Because we have an immediate public health problem, our first goal is to establish an immediate action plan to address improvements in the control of listeria,'' said Thomas Billy, administrator of USDA's Food Safety and Inspection Service.
Farther ahead, the agency is considering whether industry should be required to do its own testing. It is also revisiting the shelf life of foods to see if the bacterium grows quickly at particular times or in particular foods after they are processed.
''The new information based on this outbreak brings into question the adequacy of control procedures we've been relying on,'' Billy said.
The focus is on ready-to-eat foods such as luncheon meats because the bacterium can be killed if it is cooked until steaming hot, or past about 170 degrees. Fewer than 2,000 people in the United States report serious illness from listeriosis each year, but about one in four of them die from it.
Plant officials at Bil Mar voluntarily recalled about 35 million pounds of hot dogs and lunch meat on Dec. 22. That recall, and one in January of about 30 million pounds of hot dogs and luncheon meat from the Thorn Apple Valley plant in Arkansas, represent most of the increase in the pounds pulled from shelves for listeria contamination in recent years.
Since 1989, when the government implemented stricter policies for the bacterium, illnesses from listeria monocytogenes have dropped 44 percent.
At the meeting, some federal officials also questioned whether they acted quickly enough in the Bil Mar recall.
Officials at the Centers for Disease Control had managed to trace 20 cases of food sickness to the Bil Mar plant by Dec. 18, and USDA officials said they met Bil Mar executives to urge them to consider a recall then. However, USDA officials said they did not feel comfortable recommending a recall until they found a package of unopened meat with the bacterium at the plant. That happened Dec. 30.
After several days of debate among medical experts, CDC officials clearly determined there was a public health threat on Dec. 22, the day of the recall, said Dr. Paul Mead of the CDC.
Phil Derfler, a USDA deputy director, suggested there should be legislation allowing the agency to require a recall ''based on the threat to public health rather than what it can show about the content of the food.''
Investigators from the Federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention who are looking into an outbreak of food poisoning that has sickened 40 people and killed four in 10 states since August have warned consumers on the storing and cooking of hot dogs and cold cuts.
The outbreak led to the recall on Tuesday of certain lots of hot dogs and packaged meat produced at the Bil Mar Foods plant in Zeeland, Mich., and sold throughout the United States. Bil Mar is a division of Sara Lee Corp.
The culprit, investigators say, is a strain of air and soil-borne bacteria known as Listeria monocytogenes, which is carried in the intestines of animals and can easily come into contact with raw vegetables, dairy products or uncooked meat. It thrives in refrigerators, but can be destroyed by boiling or reheating food to 165 degrees Fahrenheit.
When ingested, Listeria bacteria can cause illness and death among the elderly, pregnant women, newborns and those with weakened immune systems. In a normal year, an estimated 1,850 people become seriously ill. Of these, 425 die.
Three who have died in this outbreak have been elderly. They are a man, 79, from the Rochester, N.Y., area, and two others from Ohio, one from Toledo and one from Cincinnati. The fourth victim, from the Toledo area, was a fetus.
Ohio has had the largest number of cases, 13. New York has had 12. Tennessee, Massachusetts and West Virginia have each had 3. Michigan has had two cases. Connecticut, Oregon, Vermont and Georgia have had one each. The outbreak began on Aug. 2.
Dr. Elizabeth Koch, acting state epidemiologist in Ohio, said the DNA of the bacteria involved in the outbreak showed ''a very rare pattern,'' called Pattern E.
Seeking the source, health officials from New York, Connecticut, Ohio and Tennessee worked with the agency to examine the diets of affected patients. Most had eaten cooked hot dogs the month before they became ill.
Tom Skinner, a spokesman for the disease agency, said that on Dec. 19, three days before the Bil Mar recall, investigators isolated this strain of Listeria on an open package of hot dogs that a month earlier had been eaten by one of those who became ill. It is not known how or where this package was contaminated.
The agency is studying whether some of the Bil Mar products might contain the Listeria bacteria.
The products recalled were only those labeled with Establishment Numbers EST P261 or EST 6911 for Ball Park, Bil Mar, Bryan Bunsize, and Bryan 3-lb. Club Pack hot dogs, and Grillmaster, Hygrade, Turkey, Sara Lee Deli Meat and Sara Lee Home Roast brands.
''We have stopped operations for those product lines at the plant,'' Theresa Herlevsen, a spokeswoman for Sara Lee, said in a telephone interview, emphasizing that there had been no conclusive information about contamination of these products.
Ms. Herlevesen said Sara Lee estimated the cost of the recall at $50 million to $70 million. Consumers may return the recalled products to the place of purchase for a full refund.
''We want to commend the company for taking this step,'' said Skinner of the disease control agency, noting that the company was cooperating with federal investigators. ''What's important is that people at risk, such as the elderly and pregnant women, need to reduce their risk by avoiding these products or thoroughly cooking them before eating them.
''If you thoroughly cook your hot dogs,'' Skinner said, ''you kill the Listeria. We don't want people to stop eating hot dogs and cold cut meats.''
The investigation into the source and cause of the outbreak was continuing, he said.
The disease control agency said healthy adults and children were occasionally infected with Listeria, but rarely became seriously ill. People with weakened immune systems, including those with cancer, diabetes and kidney disease, are much more vulnerable. People with AIDS are almost 300 times more likely to get listeriosis than people with normal immune systems.
Symptoms are those of a flu-like illness, and may include a fever, muscle aches, nausea, diarrhea or a stiff neck. A blood test is the most reliable way to diagnose the disease.
To reduce the risks, the disease centers, recommends thoroughly cooking raw food from animal sources, washing raw vegetables, and keeping uncooked meats separate from vegetables. Hands, knives and cutting boards should be washed after coming into contact with uncooked foods.
Although the risk of listeriosis associated with foods from deli counters is relatively low, the disease agency says pregnant women and immunosuppressed people may choose to avoid these foods or thoroughly reheat cold cuts before eating. They should also avoid soft cheeses like feta, Brie, Camembert, blue-veined and Mexican-style cheese.
Lisa Lee, pregnant with twins, had less than five months left before the due date when she came down with what seemed to be the flu. She was rushed to the hospital last month and was cured but lost both babies in the process.
Doctors now say the prospective mother was struck by listeriosis, a disease caused by the bacteria Listeria monocytogenes, a food-borne pathogen often found in hot dogs, luncheon meats, soft cheese, even milk.
Lee's once-rare disease has received tremendous attention in recent months, especially since a massive recall in December of possibly tainted food from a Michigan plant.
Bil Mar Foods Co., a meat processor owned by Sara Lee in Zeeland, Mich., recalled 15 million pounds of hot dogs and cold cuts after a rare strain of the listeria bacteria was found in both opened and unopened packages.
The same strain, pattern E, has been linked to 12 adult deaths and five miscarriages among 82 illnesses in 19 states.
Aside from causing stillbirths and miscarriages, listeriosis also can cause serious and sometimes fatal infections in people with weakened immune systems: infants, the elderly or patients with chronic diseases, HIV infection or undergoing cancer chemotherapy.
Although Bil Mar is the only plant to have an outbreak with illnesses traced to its products, several others across the country have had to recall products after tests detected listeria.
Since September, there have been nine known recalls due to listeria, mostly from deli meats and hot dogs. One recall was for milk.
It's an increase from the corresponding period a year earlier when the Agriculture Department recorded just one listeria-related recall. And that recall was at the end of 1997, the only recall of that year.
''It certainly seems like it's on the rise,'' said Dr. Robert B. Gravani, professor of food science at Cornell University. He said experts are trying to determine whether the incidents are due to better reporting or whether the listeria really is appearing more frequently.
Better testing and reporting is the more likely reason, said Margaret Glavin, associate administrator for USDA's food safety and inspection service. ''We don't see an uptrend in the number of positives we're finding,'' she said.
Listeria was a real problem for the United States in the mid-1980s, said Dr. Lester Crawford, director of Georgetown University's Center for Food and Nutrition Policy, but the government declared zero tolerance for the pathogen. Listeria levels dropped sharply, Crawford said.
''By 1994, the CDC (Centers for Disease Control) was proclaiming that this was one of the most successful regulatory actions in U.S. history,'' Crawford said.
Now the sudden rise in recalls has experts baffled.
''We have explored whether or not there might be a new strain or new characteristics in listeria that's causing it to be more difficult to control,'' Crawford said. So far, no evidence has been found to support that theory.
Experts also found no evidence that a new scientific-based food inspection program, USDA's Hazard Analysis and Critical Control Point, has failed. If anything, they argue, HACCP's inspections, which monitor things like temperature in the processing system, have helped.
So, why is listeria suddenly popping up?
''We're sort of left with no real answer,'' Crawford said.
For now, he and other experts, remind people to cook hot dogs and eat deli meats before the sell-by date. They also say consumers should be careful not to reheat leftovers more than once.
Pregnant women, about 20 times more likely than other healthy adults to get listeriosis, should be particularly careful to never eat raw meat or undercooked eggs or food, the USDA recommends. They also should avoid soft cheeses, such as feta or Brie, and avoid food from deli counters. Any lunch meat or hot dogs should be thoroughly heated.
For Lisa Lee, it was a risk she says she never knew existed. Luncheon meat in her has been turned over to the local health department for testing.
Her advice for other pregnant women is ''ask more questions, be more informed.''
President Clinton plans to press Congress on Saturday to provide all $101 million he has sought to ensure the safety of the nation's food supply. But Congress seems unlikely to cooperate.
Clinton also plans to announce two steps the administration can take without congressional authority to protect food safety, administration officials said.
According to an advance text of his Saturday radio address, the president will also ask Congress to give the Food and Drug Administration ''greater authority to halt imports of fruits, vegetables and other food products that are produced under safety conditions that do not match our own strict standards,'' and to give the Department of Agriculture ''new authority to impose tough fines on businesses who violate those standards and to issue mandatory recall of unsafe meat and poultry.''
The government has no reliable tracking system, but health officials say food-borne diseases account for up to 30 million cases of illness and 9,000 deaths a year. There have been many large outbreaks of food-borne illness in the last year, including one just last week that made a New York woman ill and resulted in the recall of 172,000 pounds of ground-beef patties contaminated with the deadly bacteria E. coli O157:H7.
But Congress has failed to address legislation proposed by the administration to give the food agencies greater authority, and it appears unlikely that Congress will provide the full amount of money the administration has requested to expand inspections, increase research and surveillance of food-borne illness and educate consumers. Before the July 4 recess, the House voted to provide only $16.8 million of the requested money, and the Senate bill, which has not been voted on, provides just $2.6 million.
''Until the day the agencies can quantitatively answer how much it would cost to reduce food-borne illness,'' said John Ziolkowski, a staff member of the House Appropriations Committee, ''they won't get any more money. If they can say we will cut food-borne illness by so much, I'm sure the members would say that is a serious proposal. Did we provide enough money? No. I'm sure we didn't for a lot of people.''
The chairman of the Senate Appropriations subcommittee on agriculture, Thad Cochran, R-Miss., said that even though some new programs proposed by the administration had merit, the committee did not have the money for them. So it provided nothing. Instead, Cochran suggested that some of the Food and Drug Administration's duties be delegated to states and local governments.
But government officials say more action is needed.
''Food-borne diseases are a continuing problem that have not yet been resolved,'' said Dr. Robert Tauxe, chief of the food-borne and diarrheal diseases branch of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. This fact has been underscored in the last few months by two unexpected outbreaks of food-borne illnesses: travelers' diarrhea, or enterotoxigenic E. coli, from potato salad, which sickened 4,000 people in Illinois, and salmonella in breakfast cereal, which made 200 people ill in 11 states.
''Salmonella in breakfast cereal is basically a first for us in this country,'' Tauxe said. ''We cannot have a breakfast-cereal plant having failures like that, and that's an inspection problem.''
The potato salad outbreak is equally worrisome, he said. ''We used to believe you had to travel overseas to get travelers' diarrhea. It's a classic example of emerging infections common in Latin America becoming a problem here.''
Despite what Tauxe described as ''extraordinary efforts'' to prevent E. coli O157:H7 from contaminating meat, it continues to be a problem. ''I don't feel that recalls are the answer,'' he said, ''because we don't want E. coli in the meat to begin with. That's a sign that additional efforts are needed.''
Since 1988, the number of products recalled for life-threatening microbial contamination has increased almost fivefold, according to the FDA. In 1993, the agency asked the administration for the power to bar fruits, vegetables, grains, fish and other food from countries with food-safety systems inferior to that of the United States. But advocates of free trade oppose ceding that power, called equivalency, and no action, executive or legislative, has been taken.
The Department of Agriculture has the power to bar imported meat and poultry, but in a report issued in May, the General Accounting Office, an investigative arm of Congress, said ''Federal agencies cannot ensure that the growing volume of imported food is safe for consumers,'' and recommended that the power of equivalency be extended to cover all foods eligible for import.
(STORY CAN END HERE. OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS)
The FDA now deals with imported food only after it arrives. It inspects slightly more than 1.5 percent of all foreign shipments, and among imported produce items, a source for some extremely serious outbreaks of food-borne illness, only 0.2 percent were sampled last year. The number of shipments of food for which the FDA is responsible has increased to 2.2 million from 1.5 million five years ago. The number of people who inspect the food has remained the same. And domestically, the agency inspects food plants only every 10 years, on average.
When Congress returns from its recess, Sen. Tom Harkin, D-Iowa, will offer an amendment to restore all of the original $101 million for the president's food safety initiative.
And in his radio address, the president will announce what the administration can do without congressional approval. One measure is an FDA rule requiring warning labels on all packaged juice that has not been pasteurized or processed to kill harmful bacteria. A second measure is the creation of a national institute for food safety research to coordinate public and private research.
Unpasteurized apple juice, contaminated with E. coli O157:H7, caused the death of a 16-month-old child last year and led to the hospitalization of a dozen other children. The new labeling rule will take effect in time for the apple cider season.
''Congress is sitting on its hands while we watch all these outbreaks occur around this country,'' said Caroline Smith deWaal, director of food safety for the Center for Science in the Public Interest, an advocacy group based in Washington, ''and things are not going to get better without resources and authority to regulate food.''
Watford manager Ray Lewington backed his team to give Liverpool a tough test in the semi-finals of the English League Cup after his side were drawn against the Premiership side on Wednesday.
Watford, the only Championship team left in a tournament which also features a semi-final between Chelsea and Manchester United, booked their place in the last four with a 3-0 win over top-flight opponents Portsmouth on Tuesday.
"It's a privilege to be there and the tie is a treat for us," Lewington told Sky Sports after seeing the Hornets knock out Pompey's south-coast Premiership rivals Southampton 5-2 earlier in the competition.
"We know we're massive underdogs but we will give it a real go, it's an opportunity for us.
"It's a real long shot but if we can capture the form we showed against Portsmouth and Southampton we'll have a chance."
January's tie, to be played over two legs, will only be Watford's second League Cup semi-final. By contrast Liverpool, who needed a penalty shoot-out before beating Tottenham in their quarter-final on Wednesday, have won the tournament seven times.
But Lewington insisted he wanted his team to do more than merely 'enjoy' the occasion.
"We played in a FA Cup semi-final two years ago and went in with the attitude of just enjoying, but I think we need to make a battle of it this time."
He added: "I'm pleased to have the second leg at Vicarage Road. We can go there and try to do a job, and if we're in touch for the second leg it could make for a really terrific match."
Chelsea, who reached the last four with a 2-1 win over west London neighbours Fulham on Tuesday, face Manchester United after the Reds advanced to the semi-finals with a 1-0 win over Arsenal on Wednesday
Chelsea, last won the competition in 1998 having previously won it back in 1965. United have won the competition just once, in 1992.
Draw
Chelsea v Manchester United
Liverpool v Watford
Ties to be played over two legs on the weeks commencing January 10 and January 24

This is a tale of two really, really big banks.
Both are heavyweights in financial services with trillions of dollars in assets and billions in market capitalizations. Both offer a cornucopia of products and services to consumers and large corporate customers. Both have exhibited voracious appetites in recent years, gobbling up competitors and peers to establish themselves as megabanks with coast-to-coast and even international reach.
On the surface, the two financial giants, Citigroup and Bank of America, have business models that appear to be very similar. But there are significant differences. While Citigroup chased after the higher-fee businesses from corporations in the late 1990s, Bank of America focused on the more staid, boring business of serving the retail customer.
That bet seems to have paid off. Today, Bank of America's operating margins, return on capital and sales growth are all better than Citigroup's. Investors have taken notice, helping to send Bank of America's shares up 11.4 percent in the last year while Citigroup's shares have climbed 4 percent.
While it is still the nation's largest bank with $1.48 trillion in assets and a $240 billion market value, Citigroup these days seems stuck. Since taking the reins of the company in 2002, Citigroup's chief executive, Charles O. Prince, has spent a great deal of his time apologizing to regulators around the world and settling lawsuits relating to Citigroup's dealings with corporate highfliers like Enron and WorldCom.
Bank of America is acting like the Citigroup of old. In the last week or so, it made a $2.5 billion investment to take a 9 percent stake in one of China's biggest bank and, on Thursday, further bolstered its retail presence by agreeing to buy the MBNA Corporation in a $35 billion deal that would make it the nation's largest issuer of credit cards. When the deal closes later this year, Bank of America's assets will top $1.27 trillion and its market cap could reach $213.6 billion.
Some on Wall Street are fascinated by the role reversal. "Citigroup has been so traumatized by the events of the last five years that it is no more the wild-eyed risk taker," said Richard X. Bove, an analyst at Punk Ziegel & Co. "We're seeing one company shrink while the other expands. It's only a matter of time before Bank of America is bigger than Citigroup."
The New York Times said in an editorial for Tuesday, Nov. 1:
It's not every day that a foreign affairs issue comes up in the same context as unfair lending practices, which can strip borrowers of hard-won assets and drive people into bankruptcy. But given the 30-state investigation of the lending practices of the Ameriquest Capital Corp., a mortgage behemoth, the Senate Foreign Relations Committee was right to delay a vote to confirm the company's chairman as ambassador to the Netherlands.
The executive, Roland Arnall, is well respected in the business world and by some fair-lending advocates. He has a good record of public service. Even some who remain deeply critical of his company believe that he would be an asset as a diplomat.
For his part, Arnall admits that Ameriquest has made mistakes in the past -- apparently as a result of its rapid growth -- and he says that these problems have been corrected.
The issue, however, is not so much what Arnall believes as how his company, which has the power to treat lenders poorly or well, will behave from now on. Citing other cases, state regulators rightly believe that the only way to end abuses for good is for the company to sign a formal agreement forswearing the alleged practices that led to the investigation. Since the two sides have already agreed on the figure Ameriquest will pay in compensation, the rest of the negotiation should not be difficult.
It's not too much to ask that Arnall close this chapter before being rewarded with an ambassadorship. He should take the advice that was given to him at a hearing earlier this month, when Sen. Paul Sarbanes, D-Md., urged him to settle the matter as quickly as possible.
Mild weather for early November will cover much of the nation on Wednesday as the jet stream remains far to the north along the Canadian border. Increasing winds from the southwest will transport unusually warm air into the central and southern Plains as ample sunshine lifts temperatures to near 80 degrees as far north as Nebraska.
Active breezes from the northwest will carry cooler air into the Northeast states on Wednesday, although temperatures will remain several degrees above seasonal levels. Farther south, patchy clouds and isolated showers will surround a disturbance crossing Florida.
Abundant sunshine and warm conditions will cover the Southwest, although onshore breezes will deliver cooler air to the California coast. Clouds and scattered showers will accompany a chilly disturbance crossing the Pacific Northwest.
FOCUS: ANOMALIES
October was exceptionally wet at Central Park in New York City, where weather records began in 1869. The 16.73 inches of rain that fell there was only 0.12 inch less than its wettest month, September 1882. Meanwhile, Detroit measured only 0.13 inch of rain, the driest October on record there. Of course, unusual weather is constantly occurring across the globe. While last month anomalous rainfall pattern occurred at official reporting sites in the populous U.S. Northeast, countless weather anomalies go unreported because they happen over sparsely populated land or oceans.
Syrian officials have been saying for years that they have closed down all the offices of Palestinian factions working here in the capital city, as the United States and the Europeans, among others, have insisted. They are all gone, they say: Hamas, Islamic Jihad, the Popular Front for the Liberation of Palestine and others.
But last month, President Bashar Assad held a meeting of the leaders of all the factions. He called for unity among Palestinians and, according to people at the meeting, said that he would remove some of the restrictions he had placed on their political work from Damascus.
"It would be illogical to say let's have a public meeting and say our offices are closed," said Abu Ahmed Fouad as he sat behind his desk in the downtown Damascus office of the Popular Front.
For decades Syrian leaders have played a kind of double game, assuring the world, for example, that the Palestinian offices were closed while letting them set up shop in "apartments." It was a strategy that worked well for Hafez Assad, Bashar's father and predecessor as president, who would often rely on proxies to carry on his battles while he tried to use Syria's influence with the Palestinian groups as a bargaining chip to advance Syria's agenda.
But that same strategy is now exposing some of the weakness and indecision plaguing the government. Faced with a U.N. investigation into the assassination of Rafik Hariri, the former Lebanese prime minister, a crisis that threatens to undermine the ruling circle, the Syrian leadership has returned to form, resorting to Cold War-style rhetoric and relying almost exclusively on an appeal to the faded concept of Arab nationalism to rally regional support.
The crisis has highlighted how Bashar Assad's efforts to bring young, forward-looking technocrats into the government have largely failed, and how isolated Syria has become. And it has demonstrated, perhaps most disturbingly to many younger, reform-minded Syrians, how tone deaf the leadership can be.
For example, after the U.N. Security Council voted Monday to demand that Syria cooperate with the Hariri investigation, many people here said they were shocked to hear Syria's foreign minister, Farouk al-Sharaa, suggest that saying Syrian security forces knew about the murder in advance would be like saying the United States knew about Sept. 11 in advance, or Spain about the Madrid train bombings, or Britain about the subway attacks.
Syrians seem uniformly convinced that the murder investigation is being used by the West to bend the Assad government to its will. But that is not translating into support for the government or for its approach to managing the investigation. Worse, people here say, the crisis has begun to change the public's perception of its leaders, shaking their confidence in the ability of the leadership not just to fight back but to survive.
(STORY CAN END HERE. OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS.)
"The regime is crippled at the highest, closest, smallest circle," said a Syrian political analyst who has worked closely with the people in power here over the years but said he had to speak anonymously for fear of retribution.
And so there is a debate within the inner circle, this analyst said. On one side are the conservatives who want to try to preserve Syria's role in the region, its use of surrogates, such as Hezbollah in Lebanon, or its support for the Palestinian cause. On the other side, the analyst said, is a smaller group inside the government looking to shore up Syria's strength by taking steps to calm the critics and to improve Syria's domestic political, economic and social situation.
At the moment, the analyst said, the conservatives seem to be prevailing, adding that it is hard to know where the president stands in the debate.
When Assad first came to power five years ago, he brought in young educated Syrians, many from abroad, who were keen to usher their country into modernity, economically and politically.
Now almost all of those people are gone, and those remaining have been largely marginalized. Curiously, the conservatives have been simultaneously empowered by the Hariri crisis and, in a broader sense, undermined by it.
It is commonly heard here that the public would be willing to endure sanctions and international isolation if the government were in trouble for its stand on the Palestinian cause or for its positions on Iraq, but not over the Hariri affair. That was evidenced on Tuesday when the authorities tried to organize a sit-in outside the U.S. Embassy. They hung flags, set up speakers and blared music. A few hundred people showed up at first, but the crowd quickly started to thin. Security agents were seen ordering young people to stay put as they tried to walk off.
Many officials here are saying that they were duped by Detlev Mehlis, the German prosecutor leading the Hariri investigation. Several officials said they were shocked when he said that Syria had not cooperated.
Officials here said in interviews that Mehlis never once expressed any discontent during his two days in Damascus, and that he must have been setting Syria up to fail.
"Do you want full cooperation, exactly what do you want?" said a Syrian official close to the president who asked not to be identified because he was not authorized to discuss foreign policy. "We gave what we thought was full cooperation without any objection of the Mehlis team. Not any objection. They did not record a single objection. So what is cooperation? I don't understand."
There is some sympathy for Syria's position here in Damascus, with Western diplomats acknowledging that Syria has taken some steps to meet foreign demands, like tightening its borders to impede the flow of militants and weapons into Iraq and encouraging the Palestinians in Damascus to support the Palestinian Authority and not to sponsor militant actions in Lebanon, Gaza or the West Bank.
But even for diplomats, trying to figure out what Syria's leaders are really up to is a bit like reading tea leaves. At the conclusion of his meeting last month with the Palestinian factions, for instance, Assad sat with all of the leaders for a picture. That the head of Hamas was seated by his side was taken by many outside Damascus as a warning and a threat that Syria was reverting to its old ways.
TAMPA - Investigators say it began with a note, passed in a math class at Wharton High School.
I think you're attractive, it said. Do you feel the same?
Sent in December 2002, the note initiated 19 months of sexual encounters between teacher Jaymee Wallace and one of her female students, according to police. The student was 15, a rising star on the girls basketball team that Wallace coached.
By the time the meetings broke off in August 2004, the two had engaged in sexual activities more than 50 times, the girl, now 17, told Tampa police.
They would meet in Wallace's car, in her Tampa Palms apartment, and near a running trail at the University of South Florida, the girl said.
"The student was convinced the two of them were in love," said Tampa police spokeswoman Laura McElroy.
Wallace, 28, was charged this week with one count of lewd and lascivious battery, a second-degree felony punishable by up to 15 years in prison.
State law makes it illegal for anyone 24 or older to engage in sexual activity with a person under 18. Wallace posted $7,500 bail within hours of her arrest and left the county jail Monday afternoon. Her attorney, Joe Bodiford of Tampa, said his client maintains her innocence.
"We're going to have tons of people come forward to give glowing reviews about her and her coaching," he said.
The arrest is the second in as many years of a female Hillsborough County teacher accused of having sex with a teenage student.
Former Greco Middle School teacher Debra Lafave, arrested last year amid allegations she had an affair with a student, is scheduled to stand trial in December on two counts of lewd and lascivious battery.
Like Lafave, Wallace was newly married at the time of the alleged encounters.
"This is a case of someone who has taken advantage of her position to victimize a teenage student," McElroy said of Wallace. "It's total exploitation of the student's trust."
The student told detectives the note from Wallace came tucked inside an envelope, clipped to a graded paper Wallace handed her in math class.
She wrote Wallace back and expressed interest. More such exchanges followed. On Jan. 21, 2003, the student wrote that she "wanted to do more than just write notes," according to detectives.
After a basketball game, Wallace drove the student to a running trail on USF's campus.
They arm-wrestled, the student told detectives. Then they kissed.
Wallace drove her home. It was 9 p.m.
By the spring of 2003, they were having oral sex in the coach's apartment and in parking lots around the city, the student told detectives.
The student hid encounters from her parents for months, even as campus rumors and allegations triggered questions from Wharton officials in the spring.
"The victim denied it. The victim's mother said this didn't happen," said school district spokesman Stephen Hegarty. "Everybody who would know about this said it wasn't happening."
Kansas State University professor Bob Shoop, an expert witness in cases involving sexual abuse between teachers and students, said students usually don't report the incidents.
"The student feels this is a real relationship," Shoop said, speaking generally. "She becomes a co-conspirator because she doesn't want the relationship to end."
Police started investigating Wallace in June, after the student told her mother what was happening, McElroy said. The girl told detectives she did not want Wallace prosecuted but that she felt guilty about the lies.
Detectives started interviewing fellow students, including the player's sister.
The sister told detective Melanee Holder that she found a "love note" from Wallace in the back of her sister's pants pocket in 2003. She said she once saw the two lying naked on Wallace's bed.
In August, the student's mother gave police notes she found, addressed to her daughter from fellow students.
"Is you the first girl she messed with?" one girl wrote. "You my dawg and I love you NO MATTER WHAT, but I think coach should be punished!"
The student said Wallace ended the relationship in August 2004 because she wanted to have children and felt guilty about betraying her husband, Craig Wallace, a math teacher and girls soccer coach at Wharton.
She married Wallace, a native of Jamaica, in a ceremony conducted June 7, 2003, by the Rev. Susan Baron at St. Andrew's United Methodist Church in Brandon, according to county records.
She joked with some players that Craig Wallace, 28, was suspicious of her relationship with team members, former student and player Nikki Kelley told police.
McElroy said detectives have found no evidence of other victims.
Wallace graduated from the University of Tampa in May 1999 and has been at Wharton since the 1999-2000 school year, when she started as a substitute teacher.
She became varsity basketball coach in spring 2003, after having coached the junior varsity team.
Under Wallace, Wharton had one of the county's top programs. Last season, the Wildcats won their district, finished 21-8 and reached the second round of the Class 5A playoffs, where they were defeated by Haines City, 62-57. The previous season, Wharton went 23-8 with a district title and state playoff appearance.
Wallace isn't coaching or teaching this year. Hegarty said she was transferred to the school district's Office of Professional Standards, where she has no contact with students.
"We take these allegations very seriously, and when these things come up, we want to protect the children," Hegarty said.
Times staff writers Keith Niebuhr, Scott Purks and Jeffrey Solochek and researcher Cathy Wos contributed to this report.
Bundled against a brisk north wind and temperatures in the 50s, dozens of nursing-home residents stranded in Houston by a bureaucratic foul-up boarded red, white and blue-stenciled tour buses Tuesday for their return to their New Orleans home.
The passengers' mood seemed jubilant as workers loaded wheelchairs, baggage and ice chests packed with sandwiches and beverages on the coaches for the seven-hour trip to Woldenberg Village in New Orleans' Algiers neighborhood.
"We really want to go home," said Muriel Ostrow, who was among 171 senior citizens evacuated to Houston two days after Hurricane Katrina devastated the New Orleans area Aug. 29. "I want to hug my son and daughter-in-law and my grandchildren. I want to see my cat."
Forty-eight Woldenberg Village residents boarded Louisiana-bound buses beginning about 9 a.m. Tuesday from a central staging area at The Forum at Memorial Woods. The group, delayed by the late arrival of a shuttle bus carrying more passengers from a Texas City nursing home, departed shortly after 11 a.m. Five residents traveled in ambulances. A second group is to return Friday.
Last Wednesday, approximately 60 of the residents were stranded when, after they waited at least four hours, the buses scheduled to transport them home failed to arrive. Authorities said the glitch developed when communication between state and federal agencies broke down.
As the elderly residents boarded the buses Tuesday, Woldenberg Executive Director Don Morris said he was "thrilled."
"We dealt with technical issues," he said, "and we had a good outcome."
Malcolm Slatko, executive director of Seven Acres Jewish Senior Care Services, which coordinated the New Orleans residents' evacuation, medical evaluation and temporary housing at 11 Houston-area nursing homes, said the multiagency, multi-nursing-home response to Hurricane Katrina may be a model for coping with future natural disasters.
Morris ordered the evacuation of his nursing home and assisted-living center as conditions in Algiers deteriorated in the hurricane's wake. As residents boarded buses for Houston, gunshots sounded in the neighborhood and natural gas hissed from a nearby wrecked apartment complex.
The stress of that evacuation, the two-month stay in Houston and aborted efforts to return to New Orleans right before Hurricane Wilma struck Florida and again last week may have adversely affected the health of some residents.
All will be medically evaluated again when they get home, Morris said.
"We will be treating them as if they were new residents," he said.
Additionally, Morris said his geriatric center will adjust nursing schedules, going from three eight-hour shifts to two 12-hour shifts, to ensure residents receive adequate care. Twenty-three of 60 staff members have not returned to their jobs after the storm.
Transportation of the nursing-home patients was provided by the U.S. Department of Transportation at the request of the Federal Emergency Management Agency, which, in turn, responded to a request from the state of Louisiana.
Authorities said last week's problem occurred when the state failed to ask FEMA to schedule the buses.
"We'd trust that this is something everyone has learned something from," said Robert Johnson, spokesman for the DOT.
"Much of the work from our standpoint," he said, "was getting information that there was a problem. Once our team was aware, they jumped on it. ... It was gratifying to make these things happen."
A 19-year-old man who killed two neighbors then himself while dressed in a cape and paintball mask had posted suicidal messages on a Web site, according to a report published Tuesday.
William Freund posted an Internet message Oct. 16 that threatened a "Terror Campaign to hurt those that have hurt me," the Los Angeles Times reported. In the same message, he said: "My future ended some time ago."
The messages were posted on wrongplanet.net, a site used by people with Asperger's syndrome, an autism-like neurological disorder marked by poor social skills and communication problems. He wrote on the site that he was diagnosed at age 16, but the Times reported details of his medical treatment were unavailable.
The founder of the Web site, George Mason University student Alexander Plank, said volunteer monitors were concerned about the messages and tried unsuccessfully to find Freund's parents. After seeing news accounts of the shootings, Plank contacted police.
"We're looking into his mental health at the time of the shooting," said Orange County sheriff's spokesman Jim Amormino.
On Saturday, Freund, who lived with his parents in the upscale community of Aliso Viejo, donned a dark cape and a paintball mask. Armed with a shotgun, he drove to a nearby neighbor's house and shot to death Christina Smith, 22, and her father, Vernon Smith, 45.
After the gun apparently jammed when trying to shoot another neighbor, he walked home and killed himself.
On the Web site, Freund wrote that he had purchased a 12-gauge shotgun for defense, and that his health was deteriorating because of a new medication. "I feel like I need to kill myself," he wrote.
On Oct. 19, he asked for references to a mental hospital and said he needed counseling and training in social skills. He also wrote that he wished he had some friends _ emphasizing it with 75 exclamation points.
Some of the messages remained on the site Tuesday morning.
Wednesday's English soccer results:
Football League Championship
Coventry 1, Stoke 2
Derby 3, Ipswich 3
Southampton vs. Crystal Palace (postponed due to waterlogged pitch)
Carmen Miranda is back and fighting to get her slice of the icon pie in her native Brazil, where memories have faded of the late bombshell known for her trademark fruit headdress.
On the 50th anniversary of Miranda's death Wednesday, the Modern Art Museum is hosting "Carmen Miranda Forever," an exhibition honoring the Hollywood star that introduced Brazil and outrageous turbans to moviegoers everywhere.
"Brazil has a very short memory. We don't have a culture of making myths eternal," said Kitty Monte Alto, vice president of CMG Worldwide, the company that licenses Miranda's image and conceived the show. "I don't want to ask a child or teenager who Carmen Miranda was and have them say they don't know."
While Miranda was adored here _ more than 500,000 packed Rio streets during her funeral procession in 1955 _ exhibit curator Fabiano Canosa said the South American country's devotion pales in relation to her success in the United States, where she starred in films such as "Copacabana" and "That Night in Rio."
"In America she always had a much bigger following. You can still find her records there today," he said.
Organizers said they are discussing plans to bring the exhibit to the United States and Europe. Monte Alto said her company may also bring the exhibit to the Queen Mary ocean liner, which is now hosting a similar show devoted to Monroe.
According to biographer Ruy Castro, Miranda was the highest paid actress in the United States in 1944.
"She was the most famous Brazilian woman of the 20th century and she was the first Brazilian woman famous outside Brazil," said Castro, whose 500-page biography of the star hit stores Wednesday.
He said that while most Brazilians recognize Miranda with her trademark fruit headdress, few today really know who she was.
Few Brazilians know that Miranda was actually Portuguese, and came to Brazil when she was 10 months old. Nor do many remember the hundreds of records she cut during the 1920s and 1930s.
"We want to restore the image of Carmen, who has had an incredible impact on Brazil," Canoda said.
He said her widespread appeal also helped the rise of entertainment media in Brazil.
"She got her start in records and the radio just when both mediums were just starting here in Brazil, and she had four or five dozen major hits," Canosa said.
Yet Miranda's biggest impact may have been on the world of fashion, he said. The department store Macy's dedicated its windows to the "Carmen Miranda Look" in 1943, and even today Brazilian designers devote entire collections to her memory.
The exhibition, which opened Wednesday, is billed as the largest ever dedicated to Miranda. It features over 700 items, including clothing, jewels, old records, magazines and pictures.
It chronicles Miranda's early years in Brazil during the 1920s and 1930s, when she was the country's most popular singer and the star of 10 films, all but one of which have been lost. It also follows Miranda's career in the United States, from Broadway to Hollywood, where she quickly became a star.
Several of Miranda's dresses are part of the exhibit, with life-sized mannequins reminding visitors that Brazil's biggest star stood a mere 1.5 meters (5 feet) tall, hence her Brazilian nickname "the notable little one."
Dozens of investigators combed the hills with specially trained dogs Tuesday to search for any clues left by masked assailants who beheaded three Christian school girls and injured a fourth.
Religious leaders and residents in the tense province of Central Sulawesi pressed the government for answers.
Authorities worry that Saturday's attack outside Poso, a town long plagued by Muslim-Christian violence, could spark retaliatory acts just as relations between the two communities are improving.
The region was on high alert Tuesday with 1,500 soldiers and police deployed on street corners and at traditional markets, mosques, churches and schools.
Capt. Idham Mahdi, Poso's chief detective, said it was too early to say who was behind the killings _ though suspicion has fallen on Islamic militants seeking to destabilize the region.
Four dozen detectives and forensic experts were trying to re-enact the events leading up to the crime, he said.
Sniffer dogs led them to the rugged hills overlooking the cocoa plantation where the teenagers were murdered while walking to their Christian high school, just outside of Poso.
"We believe the perpetrators may have been watching the girls from the hill before they attacked them," said Mahdi, adding that authorities also found a backpack that allegedly belonged to the assailants. It contained only a key chain.
Though he vowed to hunt down the killers and bring them to justice, authorities in the world's most populous Muslim nation have long been accused of not taking the conflict in Poso seriously because so many of the victims are Christian. Religious leaders say it should not be hard to prevent communal violence in a town of just 6,000 inhabitants.
Despite a heavy police presence, there have been numerous bomb attacks and assassinations since a 2002 truce ended a bloody sectarian war that killed around 1,000 people _ and almost no arrests.
They included an attack on a market in May that killed 22 people, most of them Christians. A bomb planted on a minibus packed with Christian passengers last week injured one.
"Why can't they stop the killings?" asked the Rev. Eriyanto Kongkoli, secretary-general of the Central Sulawesi Christian Church.
Noviana Malewa, the 15-year-old girl who survived Saturday's attack, told police all six assailants were clad in black veils and wielded machetes.
The victims' bodies were left in the cocoa plantation and their heads were found several kilometers (miles) away _ two near a police station and another in front of a church.
Beheadings, burning and other atrocities were common during the 2001-2002 sectarian war in Central Sulawesi, which unlike most parts of the country has a roughly equal number of Muslims and Christians.
Hundreds of other people have been decapitated or hacked to death elsewhere in recent years, the bulk of them in central Kalimantan province, also known as Borneo.
Most of Indonesia's more than 190 million Muslims practice a tolerant version of the faith, but hard-line groups are increasingly making inroads.
In recent months, the country's highest Islamic body has issued a fatwa condemning liberal Islamic thought and radical groups have stepped up campaigns to prevent the country's Christian minority from building more churches.
President Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono has ordered police to bring those responsible for Saturday's attacks to justice.
Nine people, including a policeman and two children, were killed while four others were wounded when a group of unidentified armed men attacked them in Lanao del Sur in southern Philippines on Monday, said a police report on Tuesday.
The report said the victims were on board a vehicle and cruising a village when they were ambushed by the assailants.
Private armed men ranging from Islamic militants to security men fed by political warlords thrive in Lanao del Sur, located in the southwestern part of the restive Mindanao region.
Clan wars also take place there from time to time because of land disputes.
A roadside bomb struck a police patrol in southern Baghdad on Tuesday, killing a civilian and wounding three others, police said.
"A roadside bomb went off at about 8:15 a.m. (0515 GMT) near a police convoy, while patrolling Jurf al-Nadaf area, just south of Baghdad," Captain Ahmed Abdullah from Baghdad police told Xinhua.
A policeman was among the three injured, Abdullah said, adding the blast badly damaged a police vehicle.
Insurgents often target Iraqi security forces and government officials in a bid to topple the Shiite-and-Kurdish-dominated government installed in April.
The United Nations special envoy to Sudan has condemned the killing of two Swiss deminers in an alleged ambush in southern Sudan by Uganda's rebelling Lord Resistance Army (LRA).
In a statement available here Tuesday, Special Representative of the Secretary-General for Sudan Jan Pronk expressed his outrage at the "cowardly" killings and urged a speedy investigation into the circumstances of the attack, to identify the perpetrators, and to bring them to justice.
"The special representative urges a speedy investigation to establish the exact circumstances of the attack and identify the perpetrators and bring them to justice," said the statement.
The two men, employees of the Swiss Foundation for Mine Action, were driving along the Juba-Nimule road in a three-vehicle convoy on Monday when they were stopped by three men, ordered out of the vehicle, and killed.
The two following vehicles turned around and took refuge in the Sudanese Armed Forces camp farther south.
The slain workers were under the employ of the UN World Food Program (WFP), and were assigned with clearing vital roads of mines in the area to ensure the safety of returnees, and the use of the roads by the UN and its partners, said the UN Mission in Sudan (UNMIS).
Preliminary reports indicate that two armed Sudanese Army soldiers were also wounded during the interchange.
Pronk also called on the Sudanese government and the government of southern Sudan to exert every effort to ensure the safety and security of all humanitarian workers, and to expedite joint action to contain small armed groups still active in southern Sudan, including the LRA.
Security continues to be an issue of concern in southern Sudan with banditry and looting in the area, said UNMIS which has been reporting a growing tension there since the middle of September.
Relief organizations active in southern Sudan have complained of an upsurge in LRA violence in recent weeks that saw two aid workers killed in attacks in northern Uganda last week.
The deaths prompted several aid groups to announce they were scaling down their operations in the region.
Uganda long accused the Khartoum regime of turning a blind eye to LRA rear bases on its territory but in recent years the two governments have signed a series of agreements designed to boost security cooperation.
The UN's mine program has recorded 67 casualties from mine explosions since the January peace deal while it is believed many incidents go unreported.
Water leakage from a calcium carbide furnace injured twelve workers at a chemical plant in north China's Inner Mongolia Autonomous Region Monday evening.
According to the local administration of work safety, the accident took place at 8:45 p.m. in Lier Chemical Co. Ltd in the city of Wuhai.
High-temperature water leaked from the junction of the electric board and copper tube of the company's No. 1 calcium carbide furnace, leaving 12 workers injured, with four of them suffering serious scalds.
Investigation into the cause of the accident is under way.
Chinese archaeologists have discovered a temple, dating back more than 1,500 years, in the southern rim of the Taklimakan Desert in northwest China's Xinjiang Uygur Autonomous Region.
About seven kilometers from the Damagou Township of Cele County, the Tuopulukedun Temple is 2.25 meters long and two meters wide, with walls about 1.3 meters high.
The temple is wood-and-mud structured and has fine frescos of Mahayana scriptures on the four walls. A Buddha statue, about 0.65 meters tall, stands in the central part of the temple. In the middle of the northern parts stand other Buddha statues, wide-shouldered and thin-waisted.
The Tuopulukedun Temple is so far the smallest ancient temple that has been discovered in the world, said Wu Xinhua, head of the Xinjiang Archaeological Team of the Archaeology Institute under the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences.
"The temple is also the sole ancient temple which is comparatively intact and with the best-reserved frescos and Buddha figures discovered in the Taklimakan Desert," Wu said.
Approximately 3,000 years ago, the Yutian Kingdom was established in the southern rim of the Taklimakan Desert, the largest desert in China and the second largest desert in the world. Buddhism was introduced into the Yutian Kingdom around the year of Our Lord, according to a historical document.
The Yuchi family, which began ruling the Yutian Kingdom around 2,000 years ago, were devoted Buddhists and made great efforts to promote Buddhism inside the kingdom by building many temples and Buddhist pagodas. Thus Yutian was held sacred by Buddhism believers, from where the Mahayana scriptures were introduced into inland areas of China.
In the mid 8th century, the Kalahan Kingdom in the western part of the Taklimakan Desert launched a religious war against the Yutian Kingdom and defeated the Yutian Kingdom in 1006. Since then, Islam was introduced and became prevalent in the territory of the former Yutian Kingdom. Many temples and pagodas built by former Yutian Kingdoms were destroyed in wars and from changes of regimes and religions over the past more than 1,000 years.
The Tuopulukedun Temple, which has been buried under the sand for about 1,500 years, was accidentally discovered by a cowboy recently.
Archaeologists in Xinjiang and from the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences made an excavation in areas within a radius of 100 meters around the temple from September 30 to October 12 this year, but found no other valuable relics.
The Tuopulukedun Temple opened a new window for archaeologists to study the ancient Buddhist Yutian Kingdom, said Wu, with the Xinjiang Archaeological Team, adding that shape and structure of the temple, frescoes and other relics unearthed from the temple are of significant value in the study of Buddhism, Buddhist belief among common people and fresco painting in the ancient Yutian Kingdom, as well as the spread of  Buddhism in northwest China and inland areas of China.
The temple is also material evidence of exchange between eastern and western cultures along the ancient Silk Road, a famous commercial route linking China with central and west Asian more than 2,000 years ago.
About 500 meters westward from the temple is a 30-meter-wide ditch running from the south to the north. An area along the ditch was once the central part of Bimo Kingdom, a mall kingdom built on an oasis, which was later taken over by Yutian Kingdom. The ditch is called by locals  "Damagou".
Wu said the name of "Damagou" actually originates from ancient Indian Sanskrit "Dharma", and "Kho", an affix used by ancient people in the area to describe location. "Damagou" means "A pool of Buddha's teachings".
Archaeologists discovered large quantities of relics in the Damagou area which prove the history of the Yutian Kingdom and the ancient history of the southern part of Xinjiang.
Gu Xiulian, vice chairwoman of the Standing Committee of China's National People's Congress, met here Tuesday with a women delegation from Japan's Gunmaken province.
The guests are here at the invitation of the All-China Women's Federation (ACWF) to attend celebration activities marking at 25th anniversary of the friendly women exchanges between ACWF and Gunmaken province.
The Zanzibar's Electoral Commission announced here Tuesday that Amani Abeid Karume, whose party has ruled the islands for about four decades, was re-elected president of Zanzibar.
Zanzibaris went to the polls on Sunday to elect president and parliamentarians. The electoral commission has earlier declared ruling party winner of parliamentary polls.
Zanzibar, though a part of the United Republic of Tanzania, has its own president, cabinet, parliament and jurisdiction system.
Following are the gymnastics results at the East Asian Games on Tuesday: Men's individual all-around: 1. Feng Jing, China, 57.611 2. Lu Bo, China, 56.886 3. Yang Tae-young, South Korea, 56.437 4. Dong Zhendong, China, 56.285 5. Kim Dae-eun, South Korea, 56.074 6. Ryosuke Baba, Japan, 55.686 Women's individual all-around: 1. Zhang Nan, China, 37.974 2. Fan Ye, China, 37.949 3. Kyoko Oshima, Japan, 37.174 4. Pang Panpan, China, 36.824 5. Miki Uemura, Japan, 36.187 6. Kim Un-jong, DPR Korea, 36.136
Thailand's premier exposition, Defense 2005 has opened here, marking a big comeback to the capital city of Bangkok.
The event, held at the sprawling IMPACT Exhibition arena in Bangkok from Nov. 2 to 5, will showcase cutting-edge technology from the aerospace and defense industries.
The expo is featuring systems and hardware from some 250 defense-related companies from 25 countries. It is the largest tri- service defense event for land, sea and air military exhibition ever held in the Kingdom.
The latest cutting-edge technology products and equipment at the show include broad spectrum of weapons for sea, air and land uses, anti-terrorist, anti-riot and civilian safety equipment for the emergency services.
The exhibition will also see the unveiling of the latest defense technologies, devices and weaponry systems such as missiles, tanks with guided-weapons, missile launchers, transport vehicles, battleships and cargo ships, security systems, fire prevention systems, satellites, telecommunication equipment, electronic devices and unmanned aerial vehicles (UAV).
Winning the World Boxing Association heavyweight crown has thrust former middleweight champion James Toney into a muddled title unification picture.
Toney dethroned Puerto Rico's John Ruiz with a unanimous 12-round decision here Saturday at Madison Square Garden, matching Roy Jones as the only ex-middleweight champions in more than a century to win the heavyweight crown.
"He will definitely change this picture a little bit," Jones said. "If James Toney can get in shape, he would be one of the better heavyweight champions because of his quick hand speed."
That puts Toney in position for a unification event involving both major rival champions, American southpaw Chris Byrd of the International Boxing Federation and Ukranian Vitali Klitschko of the World Boxing Council.
"If you want to electrify the division, you go fight Klitschko," Jones said.
Klitschko is idle until at least September with a back injury, his mandatory defense against American former champion Hasim Rahman having been postponed three times.
"Klitschko guys aren't the answer. They can't handle Toney," Jones said. "It will take people like Rahman to give James Toney a problem."
Promoter Don King backs Toney, Byrd, Rahman, lightly regarded World Boxing Organization champion Lamon Brewster and his next foe, Poland's Andrew Golota.
"It's going to lead to one undisputed champion," King said, pondering the profitable possibility. "I'm going to put all of these guys in there to fight each other."
But without Klitschko or the crown he owns or top pay-per-view drawing card Mike Tyson, King's stable of heavyweights are a lackluster lot with none seen as a true champion.
King said he would welcome Klitschko into a tournament with none of the usual strings attached about King owning rights to future fight defenses.
"I will invite Vitali Klitschko without any obligations because I don't think he can fight," King said. "If you want the sport to grow, he should jump through hoops to be in the tournament.
"I didn't want anything from him. In fact he asked me for a return match clause in the event that he loses, which he will."
Britain's Lennox Lewis, who retired as champion after stopping a badly bloodied Klitschko in his farewell fight, said champion versus champion is the only attractive path to reviving interest in the division.
"The heavyweioght scene is open," Lewis said. "Boxing B-class opponents doesn't give respect to anybody."
King taunted Klitschko again about the respect he gained from a worthy effort in his loss to Lewis, noting that "You can't make losing winning."
An X-factor in the hunt is Tyson, who makes a comeback June 11 in Washington against Ireland's Kevin McBride with plans for several fights after his 39th birthday on June 30.
Jason Terry buried a three-pointer with 26 seconds remaining as Dallas posted a 97-93 victory over Houston and evened their NBA first-round playoff series at two games apiece.
After dropping the first two games at home, the fourth-seeded Mavericks used a 20-0 fourth-quarter run to win Game Three on Thursday.
In this one, the Mavericks overcame a six-point fourth-quarter deficit to recapture home-court advantage in a series where the home team has yet to win.
Terry, known as a scoring point guard, had the ball knocked away with the Mavericks nursing a 91-90 lead with under 30 seconds left.
But Dirk Nowitzki corralled the loose ball and found Terry, who drilled a 3-pointer from the right side for a four-point lead.
"It (the ball) just ended up in my hands," Terry said.
After David Wesley drilled a three-pointer to pull the Rockets within one, Jerry Stackhouse split two free throws with 12 seconds left to give the Mavericks a 95-93 lead.
Stackhouse missed his second attempt, but McGrady had the rebound poked away by Josh Howard and the ball grazed off his arm and out of bounds.
Nowitzki sank two free throws - his only points of the fourth quarter - with six seconds left to seal things.
Tracy McGrady, who never has won a playoff series in his eight-year career, managed just two of his 36 points in the fourth quarter.
He was limited to one basket in the fourth quarter when the Rockets wilted down the stretch in Game Three.
"Did I have enough help? Absolutely," McGrady said. "I wouldn't be in this situation if I didn't have enough help. I just think that right now everybody wants it so bad, we're just not staying poised."
Dallas hosts Game Five on Monday.
Paul Pierce enjoyed an all-around game to lead the Celtics to a 110-79 rout of the Indiana Pacers that evened their Eastern Conference first-round matchup at two wins apiece.
The Celtics easily won the series opener, then dropped the next two contests against a Pacers team that has battled adversity for virtually the entire season.
In Game Three, the Celtics lost their cool down the stretch, culminating in Walker tossing referee Tom Washington aside after an altercation with Jermaine O'Neal.
That incident led to Walker being suspended for this contest.
Pierce collected 30 points, eight assists, seven rebounds and five blocked shots.
Etan Thomas scored 20 points on 8-of-9 shooting as Washington got back into their Eastern Conference first-round series by posting a 117-99 victory over the Chicago Bulls.
The victory was the first in the playoffs for Washington since it beat the Detroit Pistons, 106-103, on May 4, 1988. The win also pulled the Wizards within 2-1 in the series that has been dominated by the home team.
Manu Ginobili scored 32 points and helped pick up the slack for an ineffective Tim Duncan as the San Antonio Spurs posted a sloppy 86-78 win over the Denver Nuggets and took a 2-1 lead in their Western Conference first-round series.
The second-seeded Spurs have rebounded from a surprising loss in Game One and again look like the team that could represent the Western Conference in the NBA Finals.
Thousands of workers took to the streets in various Indonesian cities on Sunday to mark Labor Day by demanding better working conditions and calling on the government to declare the day a public holiday.
In the capital, about 4,000 workers gathered at a main roundabout in Central Jakarta and marched about two kilometers (just over a mile) to the presidential palace to hold a labor day protest.
Carrying flags of their respective labor organisations, the workers held a rally in front of the empty palace, guarded by some 300 unarmed police.
The workers also displayed posters demanding "Entrepreneurs oppressing workers be arrested," and rejecting "low wage standards."
Others opposed temporary work contracts and demanded that all workers be employed under permanent contracts.
Speakers addressing the rally also called on the government to declare May 1 a public holiday.
Similar protests were reported in at least five other major cities.
In Bandung, the capital of West Java and an industrial center, some 3,000 workers took to the streets with the same demands as their colleagues in Jakarta, the Detikcom online news service said.
The ElShinta radio reported similar workers' rallies in Semarang, Central Java, in Bekasi, West Java, and in Makassar, South Sulawesi, while the state Antara news agency reported massive rallies involving "thousands" in the East Java capital of Surabaya.
Results of Australian National Rugby League (NRL) matches played Sunday:    Newcastle Knights 10 Canberra Raiders 14    New Zealand Warriors 14 Penrith Panthers 16    Wests Tigers 32 St George Illawarra Dragons 40    Played Saturday    North Queensland Cowboys 38 Sydney Roosters 18    Canterbury Bulldogs 30 Parramatta Eels 16    Melbourne Storm 10 Cronulla Sharks 30    Played Friday    Brisbane Broncos 38 Manly Sea Eagles 12    Standings (wins, losses, points for, points against, points):    North Queensland     6  2  248 179  12    Brisbane             6  2  227 174  12    Cronulla             5  2  164 114  12    Manly                5  2  199 156  12    Canberra             5  2  168 162  12    Melbourne            4  4  248 153   8    Penrith              4  4  178 154   8    NZ Warriors          3  4  162 150   8    Bulldogs             3  4  176 180   8    Wests Tigers         3  4  173 206   8    Parramatta           4  4  172 209   8    Sydney Roosters      3  5  187 208   6    St George Illawarra  3  5  192 248   6    South Sydney         2  5  150 217   6    Newcastle            0  7  110 244   2
Florida Governor Jeb Bush won't be taking legal action to stop a pregnant 13-year-old from having an abortion, the Florida Executive said Tuesday.
Florida state authorities said they would not contest a judicial order giving the go-ahead for the abortion.
"It's a tragedy that a 13-year-old girl would be in a vulnerable position where she could be made pregnant and it's a tragedy that her baby will be lost," Governor Bush told local television in Tallahassee, Florida's state capital.
The girl, who lives in Palm Beach county and has been identified only as "LG", tried to get an abortion after realizing three weeks ago she was pregnant. She called on the Florida Department of Children and Families to help her.
The Department refused to allow a termination, however, saying its rules do not permit it to give consent. They then sought an injunction to stop the abortion.
The girl was removed from the parents home due to abuse and became pregnant with a 30-year-old man after leaving a DCF home in January, her mother told local media.
A Palm Beach judge authorized the procedure late Monday, a move countered by the DCF who apppealed the decision again, automatically blocking the procedure.
The girl told the judge she lived in a shelter, had no way of working, and that it was an unwanted pregnancy.
Under Florida law the girl does not need her legal guardians' consent to abort, merely inform them. "She has the right under the Florida constitution to decide for herself whether she wants to carry the pregnancy to term or terminate it," said Alexandra Meetz, spokeswoman for the American Civil Liberties Union, one of the groups representing the girl.
It is not known whether the girl has since had an abortion.
The case had been viewed as a new potential fight between conservatives and liberals in the United States over the right to abort, but tension ebbed away after Bush's decision.
Another hard fought series of court battles finally ended last month, when a severely brain-damaged woman was disconnected from her feeding tube after 15 years, despite her parents' opposition, after a court found in favor of her husband's bid to have her disconnected.
The case of Terri Schiavo reached the US Congress which passed an emergency law to try and have her reconnected to the tube. Appeals were repeatedly rejected and the woman died about two weeks later.
China's trade with major partners in Latin America in the first two months of 2005, with the value in million US dollars and change on a year-on-year basis: Partner     Total    Change  Exports   Change     Imports Change Brazil    1,686.795  20.0%   590.303   50.3%    1,096.492     8.2% Chile     1,028.741  51.1%   284.590   52.1%      744.151    50.8% Mexico      982.349  16.5%   708.753   37.6%      273.640   -16.6% Argentina   434.711  -3.8%   131.831   93.5%      302.880   -21.1% Peru        394.172  97.3%    74.959   88.9%      319.213    99.3% Source: General Administration of Customs.
Leander Paes, India, def. Farrukh Dustov, Uzbekistan, 7-6 (4), 6-2, 6-0.
Prakash Amritraj, India, def. Denis Istomin, Uzbekistan, 6-3, 6-2, 6-2.
Doubles
Leander Paes and Mahesh Bhupathi, India, def. Murad Inoyatov and Denis Istomin, Uzbekistan, 6-3, 6-4, 6-4.
Pakistan 2, Taiwan 1
At Lahore, Pakistan
Singles
Aisam-ul-Haq Qureshi, Pakistan, def. Wang Yeu-tzuoo, Taiwan, 6-2, 6-1, 6-3.
Lu Yen-hsun, Taiwan, def. Aqeel Khan, Pakistan 7-6 (4), 4-6, 7-5, 7-6 (5).
Doubles
Aisam-ul-Haq Qureshi and Aqeel Khan, Pakistan, def. Lu Yen-hsun and Wang Yeu-tzuoo, Taiwan, 7-6 (3), 6-2, 7-5.

EURO-AFRICA
Group I
Second Round
Italy 4, Morocco 1
At Rome
Singles
Potito Starace, Italy, def. Mounir El Aarej, Morocco, 6-0, 3-6, 7-5, 6-0.
Filippo Volandri, Italy, def. Younes El Aynaoui, Morocco, 6-2, 6-4, 6-1.
Doubles
Daniele Bracciali and Giorgio Galimberti, Italy, def. Younes el Ynaoui and Mehdi Tahiri, Morocco, 7-5, 6-1, 6-2.
Reverse Singles
Mounir El Aarej, Morocco, def. Filippo Volandri, Italy, 6-3, 1-6, 6-1.
Potito Starace, Italy, def. Mehdi Tahiri, Morocco, 6-1, 3-6, 6-4.
Serbia and Montenegro 1, Belgium 2
At Belgrade, Serbia and Montenegro
Singles
Janko Tipsarevic, Serbia-Montenegro, def. Christophe Rochus, Belgium, 2-6, 4-6, 7-5, 6-4, 6-1.
Olivier Rochus, Belgium, def. Novak Djokovic, Serbia-Montenegro, 1-6, 7-5, 6-7 (3), 6-1, 6-3.
Doubles
Dik Norman and Kristof Vliegen, Belgium, def. Dusan Vemic and Nenad Zimonjic, Serbia-Montenegro, 6-3, 6-4, 3-6, 6-4.

AMERICAS
Group I
Second Round
Canada 1, Venezuela 0
At Valencia, Venezuela
Singles
Frank Dancevic, Canada, def. Yohny Romero, Venezuela, 6-4, 7-6 (7), 6-0.
Ecuador 3, Paraguay 0
At Guayaquil, Ecuador
Singles
Giovanni Lapentti, Ecuador, def. Gustavo Ramirez, Paraguay, 6-0, 7-6 (3), 6-3.
Carlos Avellan, Ecuador, def. Daniel Lopez, Paraguay, 6-3, 6-0, 7-5.
Doubles
Nicolas Lapentti and Carlos Avelan , Ecuador, def. Juan Carlos Ramirez and Enzo Pigola, Paraguay, 6-3, 6-4 and 6-1.
A pro-democracy activist who returned from exile to the Maldives to form the island nation's first official opposition party was put under government surveillance and his telephone is being tapped, an opposition spokesman said Sunday.
Mohamed Nasheed, chairman of the Maldives Democratic Party, which has been operating in exile in neighboring Sri Lanka, arrived Saturday in the Maldives' capital, Male. Nasheed was able to enter the country without any trouble despite fears that he might be arrested, party spokesman Mohamed Latheef said.
"But he is under government surveillance and his telephone is being tapped," Latheef said Sunday.
He said police visited a cafe on Saturday where Nasheed was meeting with MDP supporters and questioned the participants. "They wanted to scare our people," he said. No arrests were made.
But a government spokesman denied the accusations, and said officials were not interfering with the party chairman.
"Mr. Nasheed is not under any surveillance and we do not tap telephones," said government spokesman Mohamed Shareef, reached by telephone from Colombo.
Political parties are banned in the Maldives, where President Maumoon Abdul Gayoom has ruled with an iron fist since 1978. Nasheed, a former member of Parliament who has been jailed nine times for pro-democracy activities, had been living in Sri Lanka since October 2003.
Gayoom has promised sweeping reforms to establish a multiparty democracy, but recently said that the time to form political parties has not yet come, and that opposition activists should wait for constitutional reforms. He has not said when any such changes would be made.
Gayoom's promise of reforms followed international pressure prompted by allegations of torture of political prisoners, and a series of anti-government riots in 2003.
Meanwhile, the head of a British charity involved in tsunami relief efforts denied he has links to Islamic fundamentalists in the Maldives .
David Hardingham of Friends of Maldives was barred Friday from flying from the Sri Lankan capital, Colombo, to Male. Government spokesman Mohamed Shareef said he had been blacklisted because of his suspected links to a radical Muslim group trying to operate in the Maldives.
"This is a total fabrication. I have no links whatsoever with any fundamentalists, Islamic, Christians or any other type," Hardingham said Sunday, adding that he might have annoyed the government with his human rights activities.
"We are a humanitarian organization and when we see human rights violations we speak up," he said.
The Maldives is a Muslim nation of 278,000 people on 1,192 coral islands about 500 kilometers (300 miles) off southern India.
Japanese fighter jets scrambled 13 times last year in response to Chinese military aircraft approaching their airspace, up from only twice in 2003, amid growing tension between the two Asian neighbors over territorial disputes and other issues.
Several of the Chinese aircraft were believed to be reconnaissance planes, said a Defense Agency spokeswoman on condition of anonymity. All turned away and no major confrontations were reported. She declined to provide further details on the approaching planes.
The spokeswoman, however, said Tokyo will continue to monitor possible violations of its air space and defend its sovereign rights over disputed islands, including the Senkaku, a group of islets in the East China Sea claimed both by Japan and China.
An incursion of a Chinese naval submarine into Japanese waters last year prompted a military alert.
Tensions between Tokyo and Beijing have escalated recently over Japanese textbooks that critics say gloss over atrocities the country's military committed in World War II, territorial disputes and visits by Japan's prime minister to a shrine honoring its war dead. The tension has led to several violent anti-Japanese rallies in China.
In total, Japan's Air Self-Defense Forces scrambled its planes 141 times in response to approaching foreign military aircraft in 2004, slightly down from 158 times the year earlier, the spokeswoman said.
The scramblings were mostly triggered by approaching Russian military jets _ 118 times _ but the number was down on an average of 200 times in the past few years, she said. It was also considerably lower than a record scramblings of 994 in 1984.
Japan and Russia also disagree over the sovereignty of a chain of islands, called Northern Territory in Japan and Kurils in Russia, after Moscow took them over in the closing days of World War II. The issue has prevented both countries from signing a peace treaty.
The man behind a string of highway shootings in which one woman was killed was "not rational," his lawyer said in his closing argument, but prosecutors insisted the defendant knew his actions were wrong and should not be declared insane.
Despite claiming that he was only acting to reduce humiliating voices in his head, Charles McCoy Jr. deliberately picked shooting locations and took steps to avoid capture, prosecutor Doug Stead told jurors on Wednesday.
"He knew what he was doing was wrong and he wanted to get away with it," he said.
Defense attorney Michael Miller insisted McCoy was not sane.
If McCoy knew it was wrong to shoot at people while he was trying to get rid of voices in his head, he would be an evil person, Miller said in his closing.
"This boy is not evil. This boy is sick," Miller said. "This boy is not rational. This boy is psychotic."
Jurors, who are being sequestered in the case, deliberated for about an hour Wednesday afternoon before being bused to a hotel.
McCoy's attorneys concede he was the gunman in 12 highway shootings in the Columbus area. Under his plea of innocent by reason of insanity, they must prove his severe, untreated paranoid schizophrenia prevented him from understanding the shootings were wrong.
McCoy, 29, could face the death penalty if convicted of the most serious charge of aggravated murder in the death of Gail Knisley, the only person struck during the shootings in 2003 and 2004. She was a passenger in a car that was struck by a bullet.
If jurors find him insane, he would be sent to a mental hospital.
A prosecution expert testified Tuesday that McCoy did several things that showed he knew the shootings were wrong, including not shooting if a police officer was close, leaving shooting scenes quickly and moving his attacks to other roads after police focused on the stretch of Interstate 270 near his home where the shootings began.
"He told me he knew what he was doing was against the law," Dr. Phillip Resnick said. "He told me he didn't intend to hurt anybody, but he stopped caring if he did or not."
A defense psychiatrist, Dr. Mark Mills, testified Monday that McCoy could not have understood the shootings were wrong. He said McCoy told him the shootings reduced the harassing voices in his head.
In his closing, Stead criticized Mills for only doing interviews and reviewing medical records without reviewing police reports.
"Dr. Mills came in here as an advocate," Stead said. "His methodology was seriously flawed."
Miller responded in his closing that Resnick focused only on McCoy's actions that indicated evasion.
Tim Petrovic sank a 20-foot birdie putt on the 72nd hole and beat James Driscoll with a par on the first playoff hole to capture his first US PGA title here Sunday at the Zurich Classic.
Americans Petrovic and Driscoll each finished 72 holes at 13-under par 275 and Petrovic sank a four-foot par putt on the par-5 18th in the playoff for the victory, worth 990,000 dollars at the 5.5 million-dollar event.
Petrovic was twice a PGA runner-up, at the 2002 St. Jude Classic and the 2003 Pennsylvania Classic.
Masters runner-up Chris DiMarco, a playoff loser in the past two majors, found more frustration with a 72nd-hole bogey to miss the playoff. He has not won a US PGA event since the 2002 Phoenix Open.
Petrovic became the fourth first-time US PGA winner on tour this year, joining Ireland's Padriag Harrington, Australia's Peter Lonard and American Joe Ogilvy.
The defense on Monday demanded that the judge be changed for the court martial of Private Lynndie England, the US soldier seen in photographs from Iraq's Abu Ghraib prison holding a leash attached to the neck of a naked inmate.
England's lawyers threw up their objections at the start of the court martial forcing a recess barely 30 minutes after the hearing opened, and before England had made her expected guilty plea.
Defense lawyer Rick Hernandez asked the military judge, Colonel James Pohl, to recuse himself because he had presided over all the other Abu Ghraib abuse cases. Hernandez said this "gives the appearance of bias."
When the judge said it made sense for one judge to preside over the "factually complicated cases" that had thousands of pages of supporting documents, Hernandez responded that the fact that England was going to enter a guilty plea meant the case would not be "complicated."
Pohl became increasingly frustrated during the questioning and told Hernandez that in order to recuse himself: "I'd have to believe there was an appearance of impropriety from two colonels and two three-star generals."
Following are the list of charges to which US soldier Lynndie England on Monday pled guilty here in relation to abusing Iraqi prisoners at the Abu Ghraib prison near Baghdad:
- Two counts of conspiring to maltreatment of subordinates: Maximum two years in jail
- On October 23, 2003, England conspired with then Corporal Charles Graner to maltreat a prisoner who was subject to her orders and then "posed for a photograph holding a strap tied as a leash around a naked detainee's neck."
- On November 7, 2003, England conspired with Garner and three other soldiers to maltreat a number of prisoners who were subject to their orders and posed in a photograph beside a pyramid of naked prisoners.
- Four counts of maltreatment of detainees: Maximum four years in jail
- On October 23, 2003, England held a strap around an Iraqi detainee's neck as he crawled naked on the ground.
- On November 7, 2003, England posed for a photograph pointing at the word "rapeist" that had been written and incorrectly spelled on the exposed buttocks of a detainee.
- On November 7, 2003, she posed for a photograph with detainees who were forced to form a human pyramid while naked.
- On November 7, 2003, England pointed at the naked genitals of a detainee who was sitting on the back of another naked detainee.
- Charges which were dropped as part of the plea agreement:
- Dereliction of duty: Maximum six months in jail
- From October 20 through December 1, 2003 England "willfully failed to protect detainees from abuse, cruelty and maltreatment, as it was her duty to do."
- Committing an indecent act: Maximum five years in jail
- On November 2, 2003, England allegedly posed for a photograph while performing fellatio on Garner.
England has yet to be sentenced by the military court hearing her case.
Following are the results from the French Ligue 1 soccer matches on Sunday: Sunday, May 1 Monaco  2 Lille    0 Friday, April 29 Auxerre 3 Toulouse 2
Pfc. Lynndie England's guilty plea, if approved by the judge, would bring to eight the number of Army reservists convicted of abusing detainees at the Abu Ghraib prison.
Spc. Sabrina Harman, 27, the other remaining soldier charged in the scandal, is scheduled for trial at Fort Hood next week. She faces up to 6 1/2 years in prison if convicted of conspiracy, maltreating detainees and dereliction of duty.
The others previously convicted:
Charles Graner Jr., 36, is the only defendant to go to trial. Prosecutors described Graner, who is said to be England's ex-boyfriend, as the ringleader of a group of Abu Ghraib guards who mistreated Iraqi detainees. He was photographed giving the thumbs-up sign behind a pile of naked detainees and ordering them to masturbate. He is serving a 10-year prison sentence at Fort Leavenworth, Kansas, after he was found guilty in January.
Last month he married Megan Ambuhl, 30, a former Abu Ghraib guard who pleaded guilty to failing to prevent or report maltreatment of prisoners. She was accused of watching prisoners being abused and helped set up the photograph of England holding a naked prisoner by a leash. Ambuhl was discharged from the Army without serving prison time.
Ivan Frederick, 38, was sentenced to 8 1/2 years in October after pleading guilty to conspiracy, dereliction of duty, maltreatment of detainees, assault and committing an indecent act. Frederick admitted he helped place wires on a detainee's hands and told him he would be electrocuted if he fell off a box. He was a staff sergeant, making him the highest-ranking soldier to serve prison time in the case.
Jeremy Sivits, 25, pleaded guilty last May to four counts for taking pictures of naked Iraqi prisoners being humiliated, including some of the photographs that triggered the scandal. The former guard was sentenced to a year in prison.
Roman Krol, 23, admitted pouring water on naked detainees and forcing them to crawl around the floor at Abu Ghraib, and throwing a foam football at them while they were handcuffed. After pleading guilty, Krol was sentenced in February to 10 months in prison.
Armin Cruz, 24, was sentenced to eight months in September after pleading guilty to conspiracy and mistreating prisoners. Cruz was accused of forcing naked prisoners to crawl along the floor and handcuffing men together.
Javal Davis, 27, received a six-month sentence after pleading guilty in February to assault, dereliction of duty and lying to Army investigators. Davis admitted stepping on the hands and feet of handcuffed detainees and falling with his full weight on top of them.
Here's a Newsweek cover from 100 years into the future: an aerial view of the United States with California split off from the mainland and floating in the Pacific. The headline: "California Island: More popular than ever 62 years after the Big Quake."
And here's Sports Illustrated 100 years hence: "Hell Freezes Over! Cubs Win 2105 World Series."
These faux futuristic covers are part of a $40-million, three-year campaign by the magazine industry to win advertisers and try to convince them that magazines, which have existed in the United States for nearly 250 years, are likely to be here for the next 250, come what may. At the same time, the newspaper industry has begun a multimillion-dollar, three-year campaign to make over its image in the eyes of advertisers.
The Newspaper Association of America has hired the Martin Agency of Richmond, Va. -- whose clients include United Parcel Service, Geico and Miller beer -- to help change the perception of newspapers from stodgy to contemporary.
The Magazine Publishers of America hired HotSpring, a brand development company in New York, for ideas on how the industry could reposition itself, and the ad agency Fallon New York to reach the advertising industry. This is the first time that magazines have joined together in a large-scale marketing effort.
It is no secret: Print feels threatened as never before. Newspapers and magazines may have complained when radio and television came along. But they seem to be in full panic mode now as readers and advertisers flock to the Internet.
With their advertising campaigns, poor old print is declaring that it's not going to take it anymore.
"Enough!" John Kimball, chief marketing officer for the Newspaper Association of America, said in an interview. "You read things that the industry is dead, that the Internet is eating our lunch, that everyone is watching television, that national advertising is declining in the major metros."
"But the medium is very strong," Kimball said. "There are lots of ads in the papers, and not because those people think they're making a charitable contribution. They're investing in the medium because it's delivering results."
Newspapers are generally profitable but they leave Wall Street unenthusiastic. A Goldman Sachs report last week warned investors that "lackluster ad revenue growth, weak circulation revenues" and "a downward trend in earnings estimates" reinforced its "negative view" of the newspaper industry. And recent disclosures of inflated circulation figures have soured the climate for some advertisers.
Earl C. Cox, who is the Martin Agency's chief executive and is leading the newspapers' public relations campaign, told newspaper executives at a recent conference that the current perception of newspapers among advertisers was that they were "static, inflexible and hard to buy." And, he added, "It doesn't help any that media buyers are under 30 and their focus is elsewhere," mostly on the Internet.
He said newspapers needed to retell their story to remind advertisers that their readers are highly engaged and influential and that they are paying attention, unlike some of the "eyeballs" darting around the Internet.
His agency is to devise a strategic plan by this summer, but he already had one piece of advice: The industry should update its calling card from being "the newspaper business" to being "in the business of news." Translation: The word newspaper is so yesterday.
Magazines are in a somewhat different position. They appear to have recovered from the advertising slump of a few years ago. Ad pages for the industry in March were up 1.2 percent from March 2004. In the first quarter of this year, 76 new magazines appeared.
"The magazine industry is extremely healthy," said Jay Kirsch, vice president of AdMedia Partners, financial advisers to magazines. "The newsweeklies are in tough shape, but the monthlies and lifestyle and enthusiast magazines are doing fabulously."
Of the $141 billion spent on all forms of advertising in 2004, about 17 percent went to magazines, according to TNS Media Intelligence. Newspapers captured 20 percent of that, network television 18 percent, cable television 12 percent and the Internet 6 percent. But the newspaper share was down, the magazine share was flat and the Internet was growing fast. Advertising Age predicted last week that the combined advertising revenue of Google and Yahoo this year would rival those of the big three television networks, marking what it called a "watershed moment" in the evolution of the Internet.
"We're really good at putting out products that consumers love, value and trust, and trust is very hard to find these days," said Jack Kliger, president and chief executive of Hachette Filipacchi Media U.S., which publishes Elle, Woman's Day and Car and Driver, among others. "We've not been good at marketing our medium."
Readers of magazines, like readers of newspapers, are highly engaged.
Kliger said research showed that when people are reading magazines, they are unlikely to be using any other form of media. But when they watch television, listen to the radio or wait to download something from the Internet, they are more likely to be listening, watching or reading something else at the same time. They are also likely to be fast-forwarding through commercials or deleting pop-up ads that they see as intrusions. But, he said, magazine readers often see ads as helpful and as part of the magazine experience.
"Engagement improves return on investment," he said.
Nina Link, president of the magazine publishers' group, said the marketing campaign was not intended to denigrate the competition.
"We play nicely in the sandbox with other media," she said. "We're not saying don't advertise in them." But, she said, "We want a higher share of the revenue."
The idea behind the futuristic covers was to show advertisers that whatever earth-shattering changes might occur in the next 100 years, magazines will survive them, and endure. Kliger said some magazines might even start running the futuristic covers in between their real covers, just to reinforce the message with ordinary readers.
Those readers, of course, may be less concerned about the future of magazines than with the future world the magazines predict: a world where cloning is common, women are giving birth at age 75 and global warming has created beaches in Antarctica.
A clique of U.S. soldiers tormented Iraqi detainees at Abu Ghraib prison for "amusement," not for any authorized military mission, Pfc. Lynndie England testified Monday as she pleaded guilty to seven abuse-related charges.
"I had a choice, but I chose to do what my friends wanted me to," the 22-year-old reservist said at her court-martial. "I was just yielding to peer pressure."
A jury of U.S. Army troops will be selected today to set punishment, which could be a sentence from two to 11 years for conspiracy, indecency and maltreatment of detainees.
England became the eighth enlisted soldier to be found guilty of 2003 Abu Ghraib crimes that continue to taint the reputations of the United States and its military. The most severe punishment was set at 10 years for Pvt. Charles Graner, who orchestrated many of the abuses and will be called as a witness for England.
She and Graner, both from the Maryland-based 372nd Military Police Company, were romantically involved while in Iraq. England gave birth to his son in October, months after they broke up. Last month, the imprisoned Graner was married by proxy to co-defendant Megan Ambuhl.
Graner is crucial to England's claim that she followed his lead at Abu Ghraib, where he was a guard and she was a clerk.
Before accepting her guilty pleas, the judge, Col. James Pohl, required England to clearly describe her wrongdoing and motives. Asked if she had been ordered by her chain of command to mistreat inmates, England replied, "No, sir."
Queried how she knew it was wrong to pose in a photo with nude inmates being forced to masturbate, England said: "Anybody could be offended seeing that picture."
The interrogation produced repeated statements by England that soldiers abused Iraqis "for their own amusement," and admissions that she participated "because they asked me to."
But she also confirmed to the judge's satisfaction that she knew it was wrong to engage in the abuses, regardless of the fact that Graner and another abusive soldier had backgrounds as civilian prison guards.
Explaining perhaps the most notorious photo in which she appeared, England said the main reason she held an Iraqi on a leash was because Graner told her to. Graner had said he wanted to photograph the 5-foot-1 England controlling the nude Iraqi to instill fear in other inmates, she claimed.
"He wanted it to look more degrading and humiliating, with a female of my size," she said. But she quickly realized Graner's explanation that he needed to abuse the detainees in order to "control" them was not true.
"I thought it was not only morally wrong but legally wrong," she said.
England also conceded that during most of her misdeeds, she was visiting Graner and other friends from her company, but wasn't always on official business in the maximum security wing where they worked.
England also backed off from earlier assertions that the tormenting of detainees was part of an effort to soften them up for intelligence agents. Although guards were told to deprive detainees of sleep, manipulate their meal schedules and force them to maintain awkward positions to cause stress, England said, "no, sir," when asked if any of her crimes were done to help interrogators.
Officers and enlisted soldiers who will set England's punishment are expected to hear testimony from several defense witnesses, including psychology and sociology experts, as well as Graner.
In a sentencing hearing likely to last several days, jurors also could hear a prosecution witness who is expected to describe England's job performance while in Iraq, which included admonishments for her affair with Graner.
Pfc. Lynndie R. England, the woman seen holding an Iraqi prisoner on a leash in the iconic photo from the Abu Ghraib prison, pleaded guilty Monday to seven charges stemming from prisoner abuse.
The military judge overseeing the case, Col. James Pohl, accepted the plea after initially expressing some doubts about at least one of the charges against her. The case now will begin a sentencing hearing in which a military jury will determine what punishment England, 22, should face.
Before accepting England's plea, Pohl carefully scrutinized the charges and the actions of the 22-year-old Army reservist.
He asked England what happened in the facility outside Baghdad that caused the infamous scene of the prisoner being led by a leash. England responded that the man was refusing to cooperate with the guards and that her supervisor, Spec. Charles A. Graner Jr., told her to go get the strap and put it around the prisoner as a leash. He also instructed her to hold the prisoner because Graner said it would be more degrading to the man.
Then Pohl asked England what training she had for prison work. England, who was a records clerk in the military before being assigned to Abu Ghraib, said she had none and told the judge she was unaware of the Geneva Conventions. But she said that Graner had worked as a civilian as a prison guard and she trusted his analysis of the situation.
Pohl then said, ''I don't see how it would be illegal to pose for a photograph if you considered it legal.'' But after a recess, he accepted the plea deal.
England, from Fort Ashby, W. Va., originally faced nine charges, but the Army agreed to drop two of those as part of the agreement. She pleaded guilty to two counts of conspiracy, four counts of maltreating prisoners and one count of dereliction of duty.
Her defense lawyers said the deal was expected to reduce the maximum sentence she faced from 16 1/2 years in prison to 11.
She is the seventh enlisted soldier to face criminal penalties in the Abu Ghraib case. No commissioned officers at the prison, and no senior officer in the chain of command, has been charged. Six enlisted soldiers have entered guilty pleas in the case.
Graner, who reportedly fathered a child with England during their service in Iraq, faced a court-martial in January. He was convicted and sentenced to 10 years in prison despite his assertion that senior officers directed and approved the actions of guards in cellblock One-Alpha.
Pfc. Lynndie R. England, the young Army reservist whose grinning, thumbs-up image came to symbolize the worst of the Abu Ghraib prison scandal, told a military judge Monday that she knew the detainee abuses were wrong but went along because of peer pressure.
Offering the most ordinary explanation to a scandal that ignited international outrage, England said she posed in some of the widely circulated photographs showing humiliating abuses of Iraqi detainees to placate her then-boyfriend and others from her Maryland-based unit.
''I had a choice, but I chose to do what my friends wanted me to,'' England, 22, said in a glum voice as she pleaded guilty to mistreating detainees at the notorious Baghdad prison. ''They were being very persistent and bugging me, and I was like, OK, whatever.''
England became one of the most visible and polarizing figures in the prison abuse scandal when the notorious photographs of naked and hooded Iraqi detainees enduring abuses at the hands of U.S. soldiers became public a year ago.
The 5-foot, 1-inch soldier with the pixie haircut was shown flashing a thumbs-up behind a pyramid of naked prisoners in one photograph. In another, she has a cigarette clenched in her teeth as she grins and points at the genitals of a naked detainee. In one of the most vivid pictures from the scandal, England is shown holding a leather leash tied around the neck of a prisoner lying on the cellblock floor.
Those photographs stood in stark contrast to the image of England when she returned to the United States early last year, pregnant (reportedly by the scandal's reputed ringleader, Charles Graner) and facing more than three decades in a military prison for her role in the abuses.
Closing the last high-profile case in the scandal, England pleaded guilty Monday to two counts of conspiracy, four counts of mistreating detainees and one count of dereliction of duty.
England, who gave birth to a son in October, now faces a maximum sentence of 11 years in military prison. But she is expected to face considerably less time than that under the undisclosed terms of her plea deal with prosecutors.
A jury composed of Army officers and enlisted soldiers will be seated Tuesday morning to recommend a sentence for England as part of a penalty hearing expected to last several days. Under military law, she would receive the lesser punishment between what the jury recommends and what prosecutors have offered.
England was one of seven members of the 372nd Military Police Company charged with humiliating and assaulting prisoners at Abu Ghraib. Four other members of the 372nd and two low-level military intelligence officers have entered guilty pleas in the abuse scandal and received sentences ranging from no time to 8 1/2 years.
Spc. Sabrina Harman, a former Abu Ghraib guard, is scheduled to go to trial at Fort Hood next week.
Graner is so far the only soldier charged in the scandal to contest the case against him at a military trial. He was convicted of every charge at a trial here in January and sentenced to 10 years in prison.
Monday, Graner was back at the court building at Fort Hood, called as a possible witness for England in the penalty phase of her proceedings. England's attorneys are expected to argue as part of their mitigating case that England was led astray by Graner, whom she frequently sneaked out at night to visit at the prison's cellblock.
The two no longer are romantically involved. After his conviction, Graner married fellow soldier and former co-defendant Megan Ambuhl; he is serving his sentence at the military prison at Fort Leavenworth, Kan.
Under questioning Monday from Col. James L. Pohl, a military judge, England repeatedly said that she agreed at Graner's suggestion to appear in the photographs that outraged much of the Arab world and opened an embarrassing chapter in the U.S.-led invasion of Iraq.
When Pohl asked about the photograph showing England holding a detainee by a leash, she said it was Graner's idea: ''I assumed it was OK, because he was an MP. He had the background as a corrections officer, and, him being older than me, I thought he knew what he was doing.''
England said she knew it was wrong when Graner pulled out his digital camera and started taking pictures of the episode ''for his own amusement.''
Defense attorneys are expected to present evidence over the next few days that England has long suffered from mental problems and learning disabilities and was extremely susceptible to the influence of her peers.
In court, England frequently appeared hesitant and unsure of her answers as Pohl asked whether she knew other various actions were wrong at the time she committed them -- a key legal test in determining whether a plea in military court can be accepted.
The judge spent nearly three hours going over with England the details of an 11-page statement of facts that England acknowledged in her plea deal.
''If you knew it was wrong, then why did you do it?'' Pohl asked again and again during the hearing. Referring to Graner, England repeatedly answered: ''He asked me to.''
''Did you get any amusement out of it?'' Pohl asked at one point.
''Not really,'' England said after a long pause. ''But I did what they wanted me to.''
Army Pfc. Lynndie R. England formally pleaded guilty Monday to mistreating inmates at Iraq's Abu Ghraib prison, with many of the seven counts related to her appearance in some of the most graphic photographs of the abuse that shocked the world last spring.
Under a deal she made with military prosecutors, the reservist from Fort Ashby, W.Va., will serve less than the maximum term of 11 years in prison that could result from her guilty plea. She had faced nine counts and could have received up to 16 1/2 years. A military jury here will decide her sentence this week.
England, 22, was perhaps the most familiar face in the notorious photos. She was pictured holding one inmate tethered to a leash. In another, she smiles and smokes a cigarette while pointing at a naked prisoner. Her involvement in a group of sexually humiliating scenarios went alongside images of military dogs attacking prisoners, soldiers carrying out physical assaults, and detainees being chained to their beds and cell doors in ''stress positions.''
The emergence of the Abu Ghraib photographs spawned nearly a dozen defense department and military inquiries into detainee abuse and focused an international spotlight on U.S. detention operations in Iraq, Afghanistan and Guantanamo Bay, Cuba. While government officials initially tried to minimize the Abu Ghraib abuses as being at the hands of a few bad apples in the Army Reserve, the larger investigations revealed widespread abuses involving questionable and harsh interrogation tactics.
England's defense team has been arguing for nearly a year that her case was part of a bigger picture, initially trying to get top U.S. officials, including Defense Secretary Donald Rumsfeld, to testify at her court martial about the nation's policies for handling and interrogating detainees. They argued England was simply doing as she was told and as a low-ranking soldier, she wasn't in a position to question her orders.
Still, in the end England negotiated a plea. But those careful arrangements almost went awry in the stark military courtroom Monday when a skeptical Army judge raised questions about her admission of guilt.
In military law, a judge cannot accept a defendant's guilty plea without assurance that the plea is true.
England told the judge, Col. James L. Pohl, that she was sent to Iraq as a records clerk with the 372nd Military Police Company, based in Cumberland, Md., and had no training as a prison guard when the Army assigned her to work at Baghdad's toughest prison. When Pohl asked the defendant why she posed for the leash picture, she responded that she had been told to do so by then-Sgt. Charles A. Graner Jr, who was trained as a prison guard.
''Did you question this procedure?'' the judge asked.
''I assumed it was OK,'' England replied, ''because he was an MP (military police soldier), he had the corrections officer background. He was older than me.''
Pohl appeared troubled by her answer, noting she had to have knowledge her actions were wrong to be legally culpable. He told prosecutors that ''it's going to be difficult to make a photograph of a lawful act into a crime.''
After a brief recess for the lawyers to meet, England returned to the courtroom and said she knew at the time that use of the leash ''was not only morally wrong but legally wrong. I had a choice, but I chose what my friends wanted me to do.''
England went on to say she had deliberately done wrong in posing for other pictures, including one that showed seven naked prisoners forced to form a human pyramid. ''I knew it was wrong,'' she said. ''Who would morally do something like that in a U.S. prison?''
England becomes the eighth U.S. soldier to plead guilty or be convicted in relation to the Abu Ghraib abuses. Graner, the highest-ranking soldier implicated, was the only one to go to trial. Described by investigators as a ringleader of the abuse, he was convicted at a court martial in January and is serving a 10-year sentence.
No senior officer at the prison, and no one higher up in the chain of command, has faced charges in the case. Last week, the Army's inspector general exonerated four generals in Iraq of any blame for Abu Ghraib.
(optional add end)
England became pregnant while in Iraq. Her child -- believed to be Graner's son -- is a few months old and is living with relatives.
She told the judge Monday that many of the photos in which she is seen standing beside naked Iraqi inmates were taken late on the night of Nov. 7, 2003. She said she had gone to Cell Block One-Alpha that night to celebrate with the guards there; the next day was her 21st birthday.
An avalanche crashed through a small Austrian resort on Tuesday, killing at least eight people and leaving dozens missing, in what officials feared could turn out to be Austria's worst snow disaster in years.
Driving snow and deadly winds prevented emergency helicopters from flying into the ski village of Galtuer, near the Swiss border, where local rescue workers spent the night digging through walls of snow and rubble for survivors. At least 30 people, some of them critically injured, were dug out by evening, Austrian television said.
The fiercest snowstorms in 50 years set off massive avalanches all across the Alps in recent weeks, killing dozens of residents and ski vacationers in France, Switzerland, Italy and Austria. In Switzerland, officials said the death toll over the weekend had risen to seven. Houses, railroads and highways were buried by avalanches. Tens of thousands of tourists were stranded in some of northern Europe's most fashionable resorts.
In Galtuer, a town of 700 year-round inhabitants and about 3,000 tourists in Tyrol Province's Paznaun Valley, the avalanche thundered though the heart of town near the village church at 4:00 p.m. instantly crushing four houses.
The village, which has no hospital, had been cut off from the outside world by heavy snows and high winds for nearly a week.
''We were drinking hot mulled wine, when suddenly it started'' Franz Wenko, a hotel operator in Galtuer, told Austrian television. ''he lights went out. It was dark. There was only dust and snow. We got out of there as fast as we could.''
Maj. Thomas Schoenherr of the Austrian army, told Austrian radio on Tuesday evening that about 55 people were feared missing in Galtuer. Other estimates varied. Some officials said 20 to 30 people were still missing. Another government spokesman said that only ''a few'' were unaccounted for.
Austrian army helicopters remained grounded in the town of Landeck, about 20 miles from Galtuer, overnight. Schoenherr said, ''We will meet again at 6 a.m. to assess what we can do.''
Inside the village, witnesses said the residents were digging for survivors. ''Some 300 people are looking for buried people in the mass of snow,'' Lufwig Walter, a ski instructor, told the Austrian Press Agency. Walter said that in some parts of the village, snow was 17 feet high. ''There's no let-up,'' he said, referring to the rescue effort.
A doctor, who is believed to be the only one in the village, told an APA reporter by telephone, ''We are working in very basic conditions.'' Snow fell heavily overnight, and the news agency reported that another 20 inches were expected by Wednesday morning.
All over Europe, the avalanches took lives and destroyed homes. A 35-year-old German woman was killed when a snowslide ploughed into a chalet in Sportsgastein, near Salzburg, Austria.
In the ski village of Morgex, in northern Italy, a 52-year-old woman was killed when her house collapsed under an avalanche before daylight. Three others in the house survived, but she was killed when a steel beam pierced her chest.
In Switzerland, teams of rescue workers searching for survivors found five more bodies on Tuesday, after an avalanche that crushed chalets near Evolene on Sunday. Four of the victims _ one a child _ were French tourists. The other was a 28-year-old local man. Three people were still missing as of Tuesday night.
In France, blizzards hampered rescuers seeking French skiers and hikers missing in the Alps and the Pyrenees.
In western Austria alone, about 20,000 tourists have been unable to leave their hotels since last Wednesday. So much snow had fallen over the last week that the Austrian Motoring Association complained that its density monitors had been buried, making it impossible to measure the snow fall. Swiss television reported that as many as 60,000 people were snowbound in the resorts of Davos and Klosters.
In many parts of Europe, driving snow caused trains to be canceled. Highways were blocked or traffic was backed up for hours.
The recent avalanches, labeled by some newspapers as ''the white death,'' were described as the largest and most terrifying in recent memory.
`'I've seen many avalanches, but not the type that come into your house and blow it away,'' said Nathan Wallace, 28, from Mammoth Lakes, Calif., whose chalet near Chamonix was destroyed by an avalanche on Feb. 9. `'It was more like a California earthquake.''
Wallace and his girlfriend, Alicia Boice, 21, were rescued two hours after the roof of their chalet collapsed.
*Wednesday, Feb. 24, 1999
Independent Counsel Hearings Open
Congress should just let the independent counsel law expire since almost any effort to revise it so soon after President Clinton's impeachment acquittal ''is likely to be a mistake,'' former White House chief of staff Howard Baker told a Senate committee today. He spoke to the Governmental Affairs Committee at its opening hearing on whether to renew, rewrite or let the law die. The 1978 statute is due to expire June 30. President Clinton, meanwhile, declined to comment on the issue but told reporters that White House lawyers will testify on the matter next week.
Kosovo's Ethnic Albanians Unite
Kosovo's rival ethnic Albanian factions today formed a coalition to push harder to secede from Serbia. The surprise announcement came a day after Kosovo peace talks concluded without any breakthrough on a deal to end a year of fighting in the southern Serbian province. The announcement spelled success for a long-term American and European goal -- getting ethnic Albanians to speak with one voice.
Clinton: U.S. Has Stake in Kosovo
President Clinton said today the United States has an interest in resolving the Kosovo conflict. ''I would argue we have a humanitarian interest,'' he said. ''The United States does have a direct interest in whether there is instability in the Balkans,'' Clinton said. Clinton is considering sending up to 4,000 U.S. troops as part of a 28,000-strong NATO force that would go to Kosovo for at least three years if a peace plan were implemented.
1 Dead in Avalanche in Austria
Helicopters rescued stranded tourists in western Austria and another killer avalanche brought new heartache today. The new avalanche struck just miles from where rescuers were digging for victims of Europe's worst snowslide this winter. The latest torrent of snow smashed into the town of Valzur, where a dead woman and three survivors were pulled from the snow and debris. Five people remained missing, the Austria Press Agency said. Seven miles away the death toll rose to 16 from an avalanche yesterday.
Prejudice May Be Heart Care Factor
Subconscious prejudices among doctors may help explain why women and blacks complaining of chest pain are less likely than men and whites to receive the best cardiac testing, a study suggests. A new study of 720 physicians found that, with all symptoms being equal, doctors were only 60 percent as likely to order cardiac catheterization for women and blacks as for men and whites. For black women, the doctors were only 40 percent as likely to order catheterization.
Greenspan Warns About Minimum Wage
Raising the minimum wage could deny some teen-agers their chance at entry-level jobs, Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan said today. Delivering the Fed's semiannual economic report to Congress, Greenspan said increasing the wage probably would push inflation higher. President Clinton, in his State of the Union address last month, proposed raising the wage by $1 to $6.15 by September 2000.
8th-Grader Takes Principal Hostage
An eighth-grade boy with a gun took his principal hostage this afternoon, apparently after the principal tried to discipline him for carrying the weapon in school. Montvale Elementary School Principal Jim Ratledge was taken hostage in his office shortly after 2 p.m., a spokeswoman for the school system said. No shots had been fired and no one was reported hurt, she said.
Calif. Man Convicted of 11 Murders
Charles Ng was convicted today of 11 counts of first-degree murder in a series of sex slavery killings dating to 1984 and 1985. The jury also found special circumstances of multiple murder that make Ng, a 38-year-old from Hong Kong, eligible for the death penalty, to be determined in a separate penalty phase of the trial.
Stocks End Lower; Dow Off 144.75
Stocks closed lower today after bond prices slid and pushed interest rates higher. The Dow Jones industrial average closed down 144.75 at 9,399.67. NYSE decliners led advancers 1,782-1,202. The Nasdaq was higher most of the day but ended 36.95 lower at 2,339.40.
Lakers Fire Coach Del Harris
INGLEWOOD, Calif. AP) -- The Los Angeles Lakers, mired at .500 12 games through the abbreviated NBA season, fired coach Del Harris today. Jerry West, the team's vice president of basketball operations, said that one of two assistants -- Kurt Rambis or Larry Drew -- will handle the coaching duties for the rest of the season. The team made the announcement as it was adding Dennis Rodman to what on paper is one of the more talented teams in the league.
AP NewsBrief by GABRIEL MADWAY
*Wednesday, Feb. 24, 1999
Charles Ng Convicted of Murder
Charles Ng was convicted today of 11 counts of first-degree murder in a series of sex slavery killings dating back to 1984 and 1985. The jury also found special circumstances of multiple murder that make Ng eligible for the death penalty, to be determined in a separate penalty phase of the trial. Ng looked down at the defendants' table as the verdicts were read and showed no reaction.
Albright: Albanians Want US Troops
Secretary of State Madeleine Albright told Congress today that there was ''zero chance'' that a peace plan for Kosovo could succeed without U.S. participation in a peacekeeping force. Kosovo's ethnic Albanians, although tentatively agreeing to a peace accord yesterday in talks near Paris, would back out of the deal without U.S. participation, Albright said in testimony to the Senate Foreign Relations Committee.
Jury To Decide King's Punishment
White supremacist John William King, convicted of the dragging death of a black man, was capable of future acts of violence, a psychiatrist testified today. The jury that found King guilty yesterday of kidnapping and murdering James Byrd Jr. last June must agree with Dr. Edward Gripon in order to sentence King to death.
CIA Sees Y2K Problems Overseas
The Year 2000 computer problem could cause serious disruptions abroad, including breakdowns in nuclear reactors and strategic missile systems, midwinter power outages and disruptions in world trade and oil shipments, a CIA official warned today. The United States is regarded as the world leader in fixing the Y2K problem, but the draft of a report being prepared by two senators who have been studying the issue, said the consequences within the country should not be underestimated either.
New Avalanche Buries 10 in Austria
A new avalanche 45-feet deep thundered down the mountainside outside the stricken village of Galtuer today, burying 10 people in its path, the Austria Press Agency reported. Four of the 10 who were swept away were pulled out of the snowslide -- shaken but alive -- by rescuers. Six remained missing, Austrian state radio said. Just hours earlier, Austrian soldiers had taken advantage of a break in heavy snowfall to search for victims of yesterday's avalanche in the Alpine town -- relieving villagers who dug with bare hands to reach the missing. Sixteen people were confirmed dead.
Dr. Arrested in Murder in Hospital
A respected plastic surgeon was accused of shooting his estranged wife's boyfriend to death during a visit to the wife's hospital room. Dr. James Kartell, a 25-year veteran of Holy Family Hospital, went to see his wife, Suzan Kamm, in the hospital yesterday. Police said he encountered 56-year-old Janos Vajda, who was believed to be the wife's new boyfriend. An argument between the two men followed, and Kartell allegedly shot Vajda in the head.
Broadcasters Plan To Sue DirecTV
Broadcasters will sue the nation's largest satellite TV company over its plans to continue providing CBS and Fox programs beyond a court-ordered Sunday cutoff date. All four major broadcast networks -- CBS, Fox, ABC and NBC -- and their affiliate organizations intend to seek a court order to block the satellite company, DirectTV Inc., from doing this, the National Association of Broadcasters announced today.
Stocks Higher; Dow Up 50
Just before 2 p.m. EST, the Dow industrials were up 50.91 to 9,595.33. NYSE advancers led decliners 1,561-1,229. The Nasdaq index was up 27.74 to 2,404.09.
$65M Offer To Buy Out Marge Schott
A group headed by Larry Dolan, a member of the family that owns Cablevision, has offered $65 million to buy Marge Schott's controlling interest in the Cincinnati Reds, The Cincinnati Enquirer reported today. The newspaper, citing unidentified sources, said Dolan's group made the offer for 5 1/2 of Schott's 6 1/2 shares, or about one-third of the ballclub.
AP NewsBrief by KATHLEEN SAMPEY
Austrian soldiers took advantage of a break in heavy snowfall today to mount a rescue of avalanche victims from a stricken Alpine town, joining villagers who dug with their bare hands in a frantic effort to reach those buried below.
The confirmed death toll from Tuesday's avalanche at Galtuer stood at 10 early today, but was expected to rise, provincial governor Wendelin Weingartner told reporters. He said 31 people were still missing in the village in the Tyrol province, near the Swiss border.
Rescue workers have recovered at least 17 injured, seven of whom required intensive care. They were being flown in by helicopter to the hospital in nearby Landeck, where rescue operations were headquartered
''We're doing everything humanly possible to rescue people,'' said Austrian army spokesman Maj. Thomas Schoenherr in Landeck.
He said that soon after daybreak, about a dozen helicopters ferried some 200 troops to the avalanche site and also carried some of the injured back to hospitals in Landeck, 25 miles away. The main road into Galtuer was blocked by an earlier avalanche.
Children, some of whom had been playing in the streets when the snow rumbled over them, were among the dead.
Firefighters, tourists and residents joined in the search for survivors, some digging in the snow with their bare hands.
''It's a terrible day for Tyrol,'' Weingartner said Tuesday.
Schoenherr said that people caught in the open by the slide had little chance of surviving more than a few minutes but those trapped in their homes, where they had air to breathe, had a chance of surviving considerably longer.
He said the United States, Germany and Switzerland had all offered to lend helicopters to the rescue efforts, and officials were evaluating how best to use them.
The Galtuer avalanche was one of the worst to strike Central Europe this winter as the region continues to endure its heaviest snowfall in 50 years.
Tens of thousands of travelers were stranded in train stations, traffic jams and isolated resort towns across France, Italy Switzerland and Austria as the avalanches buried homes, roads and railways.
More than 60 people have died in avalanches in Europe this year.
In Austria's western Vorarlberg province, rescuers near Gargellen found a man and a woman Tuesday who were buried a day earlier when an avalanche swallowed a mountain restaurant, APA reported. The man was still alive, but bad weather prevented an emergency flight to a hospital, and he died later of his injuries.
Where helicopters could fly, rescuers flew in food and tons of mail to entire valleys that had been cut off by heavy snow. Some 20,000 tourists were stranded in Tyrol province, and thousands of others in Vorarlberg.
In northwestern Italy, a mass of snow and debris tore through the small village of Morgex on Tuesday, killing a 52-year-old woman in her home and injuring three others.
Over the border in the Swiss state of Valais, avalanches thundered down repeatedly into a mountain valley Tuesday, propelled by fresh snow and winds gusting up to 95 mph.
Rescuers in Evolene, Switzerland, found five more bodies Tuesday from avalanches on Sunday. Three people were still missing.
*Wednesday, Feb. 24, 1999
Lauryn Hill Wins 4 Grammys
Hip-hop star Lauryn Hill won four Grammy Awards tonight for her solo debut album, including best new artist. Madonna won her first musical Grammys. And the ''Titanic'' ballad ''My Heart Will Go On'' won three Grammys, including song of the year. Madonna won best pop album for her excursion into electronica, ''Ray of Light.'' Hill, who led with 10 nominations in nine categories, won best rhythm and blues album for ''The Miseducation of Lauryn Hill.'' Her hit song, ''Doo Wop (That Thing)'' won best RB song and best RB vocal performance.
Senate Approves Military Pay Hike
The Senate voted overwhelmingly today to give the nation's military a benefits increase. The legislation includes an across-the-board 4.8 percent pay increase with further boosts in future years. The nation has 1.4 million active-duty military members. The bill, the first passed by the Seante this year, now goes to the House.
Broaddrick Details Alleged Assault
At times tearful, Juanita Broaddrick appeared on NBC's ''Dateline'' tonight describing an alleged sexual assault by Bill Clinton 21 years ago. In the interview, taped Jan. 20 but held by the network until tonight, Mrs. Broaddrick cried briefly as she detailed the alleged assault. She said of Clinton, ''my hatred for him is overwhelming.'' Clinton, who was attorney general of Arkansas in 1978, refused comment earlier today on Mrs. Broaddrick's allegations, saying he stood by the statement of his attorney, David Kendall, who called the accusations ''absolutely false.''
Avalanche Hits Austria Again
Another killer avalanche struck Western Austria today, striking just miles from where rescuers were digging for victims of Europe's worst snowslide this winter. The latest torrent of snow smashed into the town of Valzur, where two people were killed and two survivors were pulled from the snow and debris. Seven miles away, in Galtuer, the death toll rose to 16, with 15 still missing.
Violence Ahead of Iran Elections
A gunman opened fire on a moderate party's election headquarters today as reformers and hard-liners bickered over candidates in Iran's first local elections in 20 years. Witnesses said there were no casualties in the attack, in which a passenger on a motor scooter sprayed bullets. The shooting highlighted the tensions before Friday's polls, which pit supporters of reformist President Mohammad Khatami against his hard-line rivals in the Islamic government.
Simpson Faces Custody Retrial
The California Supreme Court rejected O.J. Simpson's appeal for custody of his two children today, and he faces a new custody trial that would include evidence on whether he killed their mother. The court unanimously denied review of a lower-court ruling that set aside a judge's order giving Simpson legal custody of his daughter Sydney, 13, and son, Justin, 10. Simpson, reached at home, said he was prepared to face another trial against his ex-wife's parents.
Report: Net Increases Hate Groups
The Internet is to blame for a dramatic increase in the number of hate groups operating in the United States, the Southern Poverty Law Center said. Their ranks swelled to 537 last year, up from 474 in 1997, the center said in its annual Intelligence Project report. ''The Internet is allowing the white supremacy movement to reach places it has never reached before -- middle- and upper-middle class, college-bound teens,'' said Mark Potok, a researcher for the center.
Tokyo Stocks Rise in Early Trading
Japanese stock prices advanced Thursday. The Nikkei Stock Average rose 88.04 points to 14,443.49 points in early trading. In New York Wednesday, the Dow Jones industrial average closed down 144.75 at 9,399.67.
Tiger Sails on a Day of Surprises
The first day of the inaugural Match Play Championship was everything it was advertised to be today -- and stunning results sent some of the best players packing. Tiger Woods was not among them. He breezed to a 4 and 3 victory over Nick Faldo. Half of the top 64 players in the world won't get another chance this week to play for the $1 million first prize -- including Mark O'Meara, Davis Love, Colin Montgomerie and Ernie Els.
NBA Picks Nine for 2000 Olympics
Grant Hill, Tim Duncan, Kevin Garnett, Gary Payton, Tim Hardaway, Steve Smith, Tom Gugliotta, Allan Houston and Vin Baker have been chosen as the first nine members of the 2000 U.S. Olympics team, The Associated Press learned today. Those nine plus three non-NBA players yet to be selected will represent the United States in the Americas Zone qualifying tournament June 14-25 in San Juan, Puerto Rico.
AP NewsBrief by GABRIEL MADWAY
*Wednesday, Feb. 24, 1999
More Avalanches in Austria
Another killer avalanche brought new heartache to Western Austria today, striking just miles from where rescuers were digging for victims of Europe's worst snowslide this winter. The latest torrent of snow smashed into the town of Valzur, where two people were killed and two survivors were pulled from the snow and debris. Seven miles away, in Galtuer, the death toll rose to 16, with 15 still missing.
Lauryn Hill Is Early Grammy Winner
Lauryn Hill's solo debut album ''The Miseducation of Lauryn Hill'' and the hit single ''Doo Wop (That Thing)'' won the hip-hop star three Grammys awards tonight. The ''Titanic'' ballad ''My Heart Will Go On'' won three, including song of the year, and Madonna also won three. Shania Twain, Stevie Wonder, the Brian Setzer Orchestra were double winners.
Military Pay Hike OK'd by Senate
The Senate voted overwhelmingly today to give the nation's military the biggest benefits increase since the early 1980s. The legislation includes an across-the-board 4.8 percent pay increase with further boosts in future years. The nation has 1.4 million active-duty military members. Republican leaders said they wanted the first Senate bill passed this year to telegraph support for U.S. troops, particularly in light of a possible new deployment to Kosovo
2000 Budget Might Exceed Limits
The new House speaker signaled today that Republicans might exceed spending limits enacted two years ago with President Clinton, placing the GOP in the ticklish position of evading strictures aimed at shrinking government. ''I'm not saying we're going to bust them or not bust them,'' Speaker Dennis Hastert, R-Ill., told reporters. Some top Republican aides went further, saying that in private consultations, the House GOP seemed to be moving toward surpassing the spending limits for fiscal 2000 by billions of dollars.
GOP Energized Over N.Y. Senate Race
Republican fund-raisers seized on ''Hillary Clinton for Senate'' as their own rallying cry today as the first lady, undecided about a candidacy, summoned advice-givers to the White House family quarters. Whether she does or doesn't, the sheer specter of a run by Mrs. Clinton is enough to galvanize Republican donors, said Kentucky Sen. Mitch McConnell, chairman of the National Republican Senatorial Committee. Mrs. Clinton met in the White House family quarters today with New York Sen. Charles Schumer, New York Rep. Nita Lowey and New Jersey Sen. Robert Torricelli.
Mexican Cartels Said Penetrating US
A top Drug Enforcement Administration official said today the Mexican narcotics cartels' penetration of the United States has increased dramatically. The statement by DEA Administrator Thomas Constantine comes just ahead of President Clinton's expected certification of Mexico's counter-drug effort. But Constantine, testifying to the Senate Caucus on International Narcotics Control, stopped short of saying Mexico should be decertified.
Va. Bill Targets Some 'Junk' E-Mail
Virginia is making criminals out of flagrant junk e-mailers with a new law to protect computer users from getting ''spammed.'' The legislation passed yesterday makes Virginia the fourth state in the country to pass an anti-spamming law and 18 others are considering them, said the National Conference of State Legislatures. Like Virginia, California's law allows for the jailing of some spammers while laws in Washington and Nevada impose civil fines.
Tokyo Stocks Rise in Early Trading
Japanese stock prices advanced Thursday. The Nikkei Stock Average rose 88.04 points to 14,443.49 points in early trading. In New York Wednesday, the Dow Jones industrial average closed down 144.75 at 9,399.67.
NBA Picks Nine for 2000 Olympics
Grant Hill, Tim Duncan, Kevin Garnett, Gary Payton, Tim Hardaway, Steve Smith, Tom Gugliotta, Allan Houston and Vin Baker have been chosen as the first nine members of the 2000 U.S. Olympics team, The Associated Press learned today. Those nine plus three non-NBA players yet to be selected will represent the United States in the Americas Zone qualifying tournament June 14-25 in San Juan, Puerto Rico.
Slumping Lakers Can Del Harris
INGLEWOOD, Calif. AP) -- The slumping Los Angeles Lakers fired coach Del Harris today. The move was announced while Dennis Rodman was participating in his first practice session with the team after signing a contract yesterday. Jerry West, the team's vice president of basketball operations, said that one of two assistants -- Kurt Rambis or Larry Drew -- will succeed Harris for at least the rest of the season.
AP NewsBrief by GABRIEL MADWAY
FOR THURSDAY AMs
Here are today's top news stories from The New York Times News Service for AMs of Thursday, Feb. 25.
INTERNATIONAL   (''i'' code)
KOSOVO-U.S. (Washington) _ Secretary Albright testifies before Congress on Kosovo and other matters. By Philip Shenon.


KOSOVO-ASSESS (Paris) _ A news analysis: Why things didn't work out for the U.S. in the Kosovo talks. By Jane Perlez.
And
KOSOVO (Pristina) _ Developments: Albanian delegation to return today. By Carlotta Gall.

AUSTRIA-AVALANCHE (Galtuer, Austria) _ Avalanche developments: The death toll has risen to 16; 29 missing. By Craig R. Whitney.


AVALANCHE-CONTROL (Denver) _ U.S. experts talk about avalanche control. By James Brooke.
CLINTON (Washington) _ Developments as Clinton has a press conference with President of Ghana. By John M. Broder.
BANKS-APARTHEID (Geneva) _ Financial watchdog groups says Swiss and German banks propped up the apartheid regime in South Africa. By Elizabeth Olson.
CHINA-CRASH (Beijing) _ An aging Russian plane used by China airline crashes in southern China, killing 60. By Elisabeth Rosenthal.

HONGKONG-CHINA (Hong Kong) _ Hoping to quell a bitter legal row with mainland China, Hong Kong's government today filed a motion asking its high court to clarify a landmark immigration ruling that provoked objections from Beijing. The court ruled that children born in China to Hong Kong parents had a right to live in the territory. By Mark Landler.
WASHINGTON   (''w'' code)
HOUSE-HASTERT (Washington) _ Our look at the new speaker of the House in the first week of a new less-powerful speakership, with more power in the hands of committee chairmen. By Katharine Q. Seelye. (1000 words)
CONGRESS-COUNSEL (Washington) _ Congress holds hearings on the independent counsel act. By Lizette Alvarez. (1000 words)
MEDICARE (Washington) _ The Medicare commission meets for one of its last sessions, recommends prescription drug coverage and foresees significant savings from higher premiums and a bigger role for private HMO's. By Robert Pear. (800 words)
MILITARY-PAY (Washington) _ In GOP's first major post-impeachment bill, the Senate is expected today to approve a pay raise and new pension program for troops, a measure the Joint Chiefs say is essential to stem the alarming decline in recruiting and retaining top-caliber soldiers. By Eric Schmitt. (900 words)
SCOTUS (Washington) _ Arguments before court on a seeming catch-22 facing the disabled: a disabled person who filed for disability payments from Social Security has been blocked from filing a workplace discrimination suit. By Linda Greenhouse.
NATIONAL GENERAL   (''a'' code)
EQUAL-PAY (Undated) _ The AFL-CIO launches a drive for its next big goal: equal pay. The labor federation will seek legislation in 20 states and resurrect the idea of comparable worth as a standard for comparing pay levels. By Tamar Lewin.
NY-DOG-CONTROL (New York) _ The Giuliani administration begins the latest in its quality-of-life campaigns, to curtail unleashed dogs in the city's parks, using such measures as increased fines and citizen patrols. By Blaine Harden.
NY-POLICE-SHOOTING (New York) _ New York City Police shoot another unarmed man; this time, the victim survives. The police say the man, a transit worker, threatened their lives.
FINANCIAL
BIOTECH-TREATY (Cartagena, Colombia) _ Negotiations collapsed early this morning over a proposed treaty to regulate international trade in genetically modified products. The European Union countries and more than 110 other nations reached a consensus late Tuesday on a Biosafety Protocol. But the United States, together with Australia, Canada, Uruguay, Argentina and Chile, refused to accept the proposal, insisting on a more narrowly focused treaty that would have had a minimal impact on trade in the goods. By Andrew Pollack.
CONTACT-LENSES (Undated) _ Companies are racing to develop intraocular contact lenses, clear polymer arcs implanted in the eye, which could reach the market within the next two to three years. The new products, essentially the world's first permanent contact lenses, are expected to eventually draw a large share of the $10 billion that Americans spend each year for glasses and contact lenses. By David J. Morrow.

FED-GREENSPAN (Undated) _ Fed Chairman Greenspan completes his testimony, appearing today before the House Banking panel. By Louis Uchitelle.
BOEING (Undated) _ One-fourth of the $13 billion that Boeing is investing in its product lines will produce no meaningful returns, according to a study by the company that paves the way for an overhaul of its operations. By Laurence Zuckerman.
MICROSOFT-ANTITRUST (Washington) _ Developments at the Microsoft antitrust trial. By Steve Lohr.
ACCOUNTING-RD (Undated) _ The Financial Accounting Standards Board discusses whether to issue a new accounting proposal that would wipe out instant write-offs for the value of as-yet-undeveloped products _ so-called in-process research and development _ picked up in an acquisition. By Melody Petersen.
CADBURY-EARNINGS (Undated) _ Cadbury Schweppes records an indicated earnings increase, before gains from the sale of assets, of 4.5 percent for the second half and says it will use proceeds from its sale of brands to Coca-Cola to acquire beverage businesses in North America and candy businesses elsewhere. Its stock falls, apparently because investors are disappointed that the company did not announce a buyback plan. By Constance L. Hays.
MARKETPLACE (Undated) _ The daily marketplace column.
MARKET (New York) _ At midday, the industrial average was up 19 points, or 0.2 percent, and the Nasdaq index was up 10 points, or 0.4 percent. Elsewhere, prices fell 1 percent in Tokyo and rose 2.6 percent in Hong Kong. They increased 0.9 percent in Frankfurt and 1.9 percent in London. They were flat in Brazil and up 0.4 percent in Mexico. On the American debt market, the long bond was down 1/32 point, with the yield at 5.43 percent. By Robert D. Hershey.
ECONSCENE (Undated) _ The weekly Economic Scene column. By Michael M. Weinstein.
COMMENTARY   (''k'' code)
Bob Herbert's ''In America'' and William Safire's ''Essay.''
MOVING LATER:
AM-ADD-NYT-BUDGET _ A rundown of culture, lifestyle, sports, and special section stories will move by 3:00 p.m. ET.
AM-PAGE1-NYT-CONSIDER _ A list of stories being considered by New York Times editors for Page 1 will move at 4:30 p.m.
AM-EARLY-FRONTPAGE-NYT _ Stories scheduled for Page 1 will be listed by 7 p.m.
AM-FRONTPAGE-NYT _ A description of the front page layout of the first edition of The New York Times will move at 7:30 p.m.

The day supervisor is Gary E. McCardell (E-mail, garymc(at)nytimes.com).
The evening supervisor is Pat Ryan (E-mail, patryan(at)nytimes.com).
The late supervisor is Sam Weiss (E-mail, saweis(at)nytimes.com).

The Photo-Graphics editor is Deborah Marchand






NEW YORK TIMES PARTNERS:
Please note that your New York Times News Service report includes news and features from The Arizona Republic, Bloomberg News, The Boston Globe, Cox News Service, The Fort Worth Star-Telegram, Hearst Newspapers, The Houston Chronicle, The Kansas City Star, The Los Angeles Daily News, The San Francisco Chronicle, The Seattle Post-Intelligencer, States News Service and the New York Times Regional Newspapers.
With more snow covering the Alps than almost anyone could remember, Ulrike Schwarz came to the Austrian Alpine resort of Galtuer from her home in Germany last week with her two teen-age children, expecting the best skiing in years.
Since last weekend, though, it had been snowing too hard to ski. So Mrs. Schwarz, her daughter, Solvieg, and her son, Christoph, were relaxing in bed on the third floor of their bed-and-breakfast chalet in the center of Galtuer at 4 p.m. Tuesday when, with an almighty rumbling, clouds of snow blasted through the windows and the whole house collapsed beneath them.
''Avalanche!'' Mrs. Schwarz screamed, pushing the children toward the stairs in the back of the Tyrolean chalet, away from millions of tons of highly compressed snow carrying rocks and shredded trees and roaring down upon the village. All three survived, climbing out of the house through a hole where the roof had been, and were flown out to an emergency center in Landeck Wednesday afternoon.
Authorities here said Wednesday that they had recovered the bodies of 16 people, many of them German vacationers, from the avalanche, which was 15 to 20 feet deep and 300 to 500 feet wide. They were still looking for 20 to 30 other missing people, feared dead under the snow.
On Wednesday, 24 hours after the Tuesday avalanche, authorities said another snowslide, up to 45 feet deep and 600 feet wide, in the nearby resort of Ischgl had swept away four houses.
Two people, a man and a little girl, were pulled alive from the snow Wednesday in Ischgl, but a woman was killed and six other people were believed missing, according to authorities and Austrian television.
All told, the avalanches were the worst in Austria since a series of snowslides killed 56 people in the village of Blons in January 1954.
With Galtuer and Ischgl cut off from road access Wednesday by the continuing danger of avalanches, information on the latest deadly slide was scarce. Maj. Thomas Schoenherr, an Austrian military spokesman, said rescuers in Galtuer had no way of making their way down the valley Wednesday afternoon to help after the most recent avalanche in Ischgl, but that others had been flown in by helicopter.
''The snow is like cement and it's full of pieces of wood and wreckage,'' Schoenherr said.
After heavy snows over the past two weeks set off avalanches that killed seven people near the southern Swiss village of Evolene and 19 people in France, the mood Wednesday at the height of this Alpine vacation season is edgy. The vacationing skiers and those who cater to them live for snow; now they are finding that they can also die from too much of it.
Here in Landeck, more than 20 miles east of Galtuer, Austrian authorities turned a military barracks compound into an avalanche-emergency command center for evacuating people from the stricken resorts and sending in food and other supplies. They barred all civilian air or road traffic in the area.
(STORY CAN END HERE. OPTIONAL MATERIAL FOLLOWS)
Landeck and Galtuer are separated by mountains more than 8,000 to 10,000 feet high, fearsome, jagged peaks that, from the air Wednesday, looked softened and benign under their heavy coats of blinding white snow.
On the ground, olive drab Austrian Huey helicopters beat their way down into the narrow landing field of the Landeck barracks compound for most of the day, taking out about 400 vacationers and villagers before a heavy snowfall late Wednesday afternoon halted the flights. Other choppers loaded up with meat, cabbage, potatoes, tomatoes and milk for the 7,500 tourists in Ischgl and the 600 ski vacationers still in Galtuer.
The United States flew in six Blackhawk medical evacuation helicopters to Innsbrueck airport, 60 miles northeast of Galtuer, to help take people out, but they could not fly in Wednesday because of the afternoon snow, Schoenherr said.
Austrian television showed video tape, apparently taken by the rescuers, showing dogs sniffing for survivors and long lines of rescuers plunging sticks into the snow and digging holes 6-to-10 feet deep in hopes of finding victims still alive.
The tape showed solid three-story concrete and stucco Tyrolean houses torn apart as if by an earthquake, and automobiles rolled into crumpled metal balls by the snow.
And it showed rescuers lifting frozen bodies out of the ice.
''This is the most painful day of my life,'' said Wendelin Weingartner, the top elected official in the Austrian Tyrol region. Eight seriously injured victims were flown to hospitals in Innsbrueck, where they were all said to be in stable condition under treatment for hypothermia.
European authorities explained the spate of avalanches by the almost unparalleled amounts of snow that have fallen since the second week of February and the high winds that have whipped it into drifts and made it unstable on the crust of earlier snow.
Scores of other resorts in Austria, Switzerland and France have been cut off from road access for days by the mounting danger of avalanches. Places like Davos, Switzerland, where the high and mighty of the worlds of government, industry and finance congregated at a conference early this month, are now inaccessible by road or rail, and others, like the fashionable Austrian resorts of Lech and Zuers, another 60 miles west of here, have been cut off for more than a week.
Yet almost all the resorts have Web sites or television advertisements that boast of fantastic ski conditions, and most are clearly expecting a new infusion of guests as soon as the roads reopen.
Mrs. Schwarz had a meal in the barracks mess hall after her ordeal and waited for her husband to come from Germany to pick up the family.
Would she or her children ever go skiing again? ''Yes, but not with this much snow,'' Mrs. Schwarz said.
At least eight people have been confirmed killed and 30 others injured as two avalanches roared through a ski resort in Austria's western state of Triol on Tuesday evening, the Austrian news media reported.
Some 20 people went missing while rescuers are continuing the searching work.
Both avalanches rushed down the Alps to the Galtuer resort nestling in the Paznauntal valley after 4 p.m. local time (1500 GMT). The snow wall, five meters high and 800 meters long, tore through 10 houses and buried 50 people. (Austria-Avalanches-Death)
- - - -
Central American foreign ministers will meet here on Friday to prepare for a summit meeting of regional heads of state with U.S. President Bill Clinton.
The summit meeting was slated for March 12 in Guatemala and the participating heads of state will examine questions of regional interest, said Nicaraguan Foreign Minister Eduardo Montealegre.
Clinton will come to Nicaragua on March 8 on the first stage of his Central American tour, which will also take him to Guatemala and Honduras. (Central America-Clinton-Summit)
- - - -
Polish President Aleksander Kwasniewski on Tuesday signed a law to ratify the Comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban Treaty.
The treaty, adopted at the United Nations General Assembly on September 10, 1996, bans any nuclear test, restricts the upgrade of nuclear weaponry or the improvement of the nuclear weapons now in service.
The treaty will go into effect 180 days after the ratification of all the 44 countries known to have nuclear reactors, including Poland. (Poland-Ratify-Nuclear Treaty)
- - - -
President Bill Clinton called on Tuesday the partial peace agreement reached on Kosovo "a significant step forward" in the search for peace in Kosovo and urged the Serbs and ethnic Albanians to sign a full peace deal next month.
"The peace talks ... are a significant step forward in the search for a fair and lasting peace in Kosovo," Clinton said in a statement issued by the White House.
His statement came after the Contact Group, composed of Britain, France, Germany, Italy, Russia and the United States, announced that an agreement had been reached on substantial autonomy for Kosovo and a conference on implementing the accord would be held in France beginning on March 15. (Clinton-Kosovo-Peace Agreement)
- - - -
LOS ANGELES -- One worker died and seven others were injured in a fire that broke out at a crude refinery about 20 miles east of San Francisco, a local official said Tuesday.
The fire broke out at 12:18 in the early afternoon at the refinery located in Contra Costa County east of San Francisco. The refinery has been operated by Tosco Corp. and a company spokesman said the fire was put out by the company's own emergency workers by 12:30. (US-Fire)
- - - -
The European Union (EU) issued a statement Tuesday, urging the warring sides of Kosovo to make most of their extra time to reach a comprehensive agreement when their talks resume on March 15.
The European Union (EU) noted that the six-nation Contact Group on the former Yugoslavia allowed the signing of agreement before March 15, according to the statement issued by Germany, which is holding the rotating presidency of the EU.
The Serbian authority and the ethnic Albanians failed to sign on any agreement by the deadline on 1400 GMT Tuesday after their 17 days of negotiations. (EU-Kosovo)
At least eight people have been confirmed killed and 30 others injured as two avalanches roared through a ski resort in Austria's western state of Triol on Tuesday evening, the Austrian news media reported.
Some 20 people went missing while rescuers are continuing the searching work.
Both avalanches rushed down the Alps to the Galtuer resort nestling in the Paznauntal valley after 4 pm (1500GMT). The snow wall, 5 meters high and 800 meters long, tore through ten houses and buried 50 people.
Red Cross sources said 30 people have been dug out with injures in various conditions.
A state spokesman said the heavy snow blocking the mountain roads makes it hard to get the nearly 10,000 besieged skiers out of the valley in a short time.
The trial for one of two men accused in the beating death of University of Wyoming student Matthew Shepard has been postponed.
Judge Jeffrey A. Donnell moved the start of the trial for Russell Arthur Henderson from March 22 to April 6 due to a scheduling conflict involving one of the attorneys.
Shepard died following a brutal beating in Laramie in October. Police have said the attack was motivated in part because he was gay.
Henderson and Aaron James McKinney, both 21, are charged with murder and face the death penalty if convicted. McKinney's trial is set for Aug. 9.
The trial for one of two men accused in the beating death of University of Wyoming student Matthew Shepard will begin with jury selection March 24.
Opening arguments in Russell Henderson's trial have been scheduled for April 6, according to Judge Jeffrey Donnell. Henderson's trial was originally set for March 22.
Judge Jeffrey Donnell delayed the start of the trial because of a scheduling conflict involving one of the attorneys.
Shepard died following a brutal beating near Laramie in October that police said was motivated in part because he was gay.
Henderson and Aaron McKinney, both 21, are charged with murder and face the death penalty if convicted. McKinney's trial is set for Aug. 9.
In the weeks after the beating death of gay student Matthew Shepard, this college town found itself portrayed as backwards, homophobic, an outpost of Wild West-style violence and small-mindedness.
With the first of Shepard's alleged attackers set to go on trial for his life Wednesday, those images of Laramie could work to prosecutors' advantage.
Betty Hoover, a jury consultant based in Raleigh, N.C., said the jurors may be eager to show that the people of Laramie, population 26,000, are progressive, law-abiding folks.
''If you've got a small town where nothing like this has ever happened, then they are definitely going to do their best to portray that they care,'' she said. ''They don't want the world to think that's the type of thing that happens in their town.''
Russell Henderson, 21, is charged with murder, kidnapping and aggravated robbery in Shepard's grisly beating death last October. The crime shocked the nation and drew condemnation from President Clinton and Congress and calls for stronger bias crime laws.
The other man charged in the slaying, Aaron McKinney, 21, is set to go on trial in August. Both could get the death penalty.
Authorities said Henderson and McKinney posed as homosexuals and lured the 5-foot-2, 105-pound Shepard out of a bar, kidnapped him, pistol-whipped him and stole $20. He was left for dead, tied to a fence in the 28-degree chill of Wyoming's high plains. The political science major at the University of Wyoming died five days later at a hospital.
Jon Forwood, a prosecutor in nearby Cheyenne, said the university setting will probably help the defense.
''The academic community is generally perceived as one that is less in favor of the death penalty and more inclined to seek out the emotionalism as to what has happened and why,'' he said.
Joseph Rice, a clinical psychologist and jury consultant in San Francisco, cited what he said is a key difference between this case and the Jasper, Texas, dragging-death trial, in which a white man was swifly convicted and sentenced to die for dragging a black man to pieces.
America, he said, has ''moved further along on the issue of race and people tend to know what the `right' answer is.''
''The homosexual issue is less cut-and-dried, a little more difficult to measure,'' Rice said. ''It's a question less people have considered in their own minds.''
The day before one of the men accused of killing her son was going on trial in Wyoming, the mother of gay college student Matthew Shepard lobbied tearfully for hate-crime laws that could deter future acts of violence.
Her plea was seconded by a relative of James Byrd Jr., the black man who was chained to the back of a pickup truck last summer and dragged to his death over East Texas roads.
Judy Shepard and Byrd nephew Daryl Verrett appeared at a Washington news conference organized by the Human Rights Campaign and the Leadership Conference on Civil Rights, urging Congress and state legislatures to enact new statutes against hate crimes.
''There is no guarantee that these laws will stop hate crimes from happening. But they can reduce them,'' Mrs. Shepard said haltingly, her statement punctuated by sobs. ''They can help change the climate in this country, where some people feel it is okay to target specific groups of people and get away with it.''
Her son, a University of Wyoming freshman, was pistol-whipped, lashed to a fence and left for dead last October. He died in a hospital five days later. The first of Shepard's two alleged attackers, Russell Henderson, goes on trial Wednesday.
Mrs. Shepard declined to discuss the trial, saying only that she and her husband ''want to allow justice to run its course.''
In Byrd's case, the first of three white men accused in his slaying, white supremacist John William King, was sentenced last month to death by lethal injection.
Byrd's nephew took issue with Texas Gov. George W. Bush and others who question the need for special hate-crime statutes. Bush said Monday: ''People, when they commit a crime, have hate in their heart. I think it's hard to distinguish between one degree of hate or another.''
But Verrett said hate crimes, unlike most other crimes, are meant to have impact beyond the immediate victim.
''Hate crimes are done to send a message of terror to persons of different color, religious beliefs, sexual orientations, ethnicity, nationality or etc.,'' Verrett said. ''The message is if you are in any way like this individual, you are hated, you are subhuman, you have no right to be on this earth, and if possible, all people like you should be exterminated from this earth.''
The savagery of the Shepard and Byrd slayings horrified the nation, giving new impetus to consideration of hate-crimes laws in Washington and state capitals.
Measures pending in Congress would make federal prosecution of hate crimes easier and would expand existing statutes, allowing the Justice Department to prosecute crimes that were based on a person's sex, sexual orientation or disability. Now, the statute only covers crimes based on race, color, religion or national origin.
More than 40 states have hate crimes laws, but only 21 cover sexual orientation.
Some congressional Republicans have suggested the legislation is unnecessary because state laws protect the groups identified in the bill. And some social conservatives bridle at what they view as special protections for homosexuals.
Police stepped up patrols today outside the courthouse for the trial of one of two men accused of murdering gay college student Matthew Shepard.
There were no protesters before the court session got under way, but authorities set aside areas for them during the trial of Russell Henderson, 21.
Anti-gay protesters and gay rights advocates have clashed repeatedly over the Shepard case.
Henderson is accused of pistol-whipping Shepard, lashing him to a fence in Wyoming's high plains and leaving him to die last fall.
Jury selection was to begin today, with opening statements scheduled for April 6.
Jim Osborn, who attended grade school with Shepard and remained his friend, stopped by the courthouse on his way to work to remember Shepard.
''The most important thing is: My friend is dead,'' Osborn said. ''Matt was a person. He wasn't just a gay man. Nothing can bring him back.''
Asked about having to endure the trials of the two murder suspects, Osborn said, ''It's going to be very difficult.''
Henderson and his co-defendant, Aaron McKinney, 21, both face the death penalty if convicted in a case that has become a central focus for gay rights activists and others seeking stronger bias crime legislation.
On Tuesday, Shepard's mother asked Congress and state legislatures to enact bias crime laws to deter future acts of violence.
''There is no guarantee that these laws will stop hate crimes from happening. But they can reduce them,'' Judy Shepard said at a news conference in Washington, D.C. ''They can help change the climate in this country, where some people feel it is okay to target specific groups of people and get away with it.''
Mrs. Shepard declined to discuss the trial, saying only that she and her husband ''want to allow justice to run its course.''
Authorities said Henderson and McKinney, both high-school dropouts, posed as homosexuals and lured the 5-foot-2, 105-pound Shepard out of a bar last October and then kidnapped and beat him. The political science major at the University of Wyoming died five days later at a hospital.
McKinney is scheduled to stand trial in August.
After the attack, Laramie found itself portrayed as a backwards, homophobic outpost of Wild West-style violence and small-mindedness.
Betty Hoover, a jury consultant based in Raleigh, N.C., said jurors may be eager to show that the people of Laramie, population 26,000, are progressive, law-abiding folks.
''If you've got a small town where nothing like this has ever happened, then they are definitely going to do their best to portray that they care,'' she said. ''They don't want the world to think that's the type of thing that happens in their town.''
City spokesman Randy Vickers said police have set up fences to keep news reporters and demonstrators at bay, and access to the Albany County Courthouse has been limited to one door, where two metal detectors have been installed.
The trial is expected to last five weeks.
One of two men arrested in the beating death of gay college student Matthew Shepard merely watched while the other man pistol-whipped Shepard and left him to die, a defense attorney said Wednesday as jury selection began.
''The defense will contend that Russell did not participate in the beating and did not share in the proceeds of the robbery,'' said Wyatt Skaggs, the lawyer for 21-year-old Russell Henderson. Skaggs also said the slaying wasn't premeditated.
He asked potential jurors not to punish his client to redeem this small town's image in the eyes of the nation.
The killing ''has literally injected into our community a feeling of guilt. The press wants us to think that we are somehow responsible for what went on Oct. 6,'' he said.
''Are any of you here going to judge this case because you feel guilty and want to make a statement to the nation?'' he asked the prospective jurors. They replied, ''No.''
Prosecutor Cal Rerucha told the prospective jurors that Shepard was ''not the same as you and I'' but that every individual should be treated equally under the Constitution.
Authorities said Henderson and Aaron McKinney, 21, posed as homosexuals and lured the 5-foot-2, 105-pound Shepard out of a bar Oct. 6, kidnapped and pistol-whipped him and left him tied to a fence in the cold. The University of Wyoming student died five days later at a hospital.
The crime led to demands for stronger hate-crime laws around the country.
McKinney will be tried later. Both men could get the death penalty.
Skaggs also told the jury candidates that the case ''is not about lifestyles.'' ''This case is not about hate. All crimes ... aren't about hate. They all come down to some real simple motives,'' he said.
One prospective juror, a man in his 40s, objected quickly: ''No, I disagree. ... I think Matthew Shepard's lifestyle was part of this.''
By the end of the day, 15 of the 71 prospective jurors in the first pool had been dismissed, many for financial, medical or child-care related decisions. Jury questioning for the rest of the week will be closed to the public. Opening statements are set for April 6.
The prospective jurors will be questioned individually in the judge's chambers.
A prosecutor asked 71 prospective jurors today to set aside the emotions of pity and rage if chosen for the trial in the death of gay college student Matthew Shepard.
Prosecutor Cal Rerucha also told the panel to remember that Shepard, who was beaten and left tied to a fence in near-freezing weather last fall, was ''a victim that was different, a victim that was not the same as you and I.''
But he emphasized that the Constitution requires all people to be treated fairly under the law.
Rerucha's statements came as the trial of Russell Henderson began in Albany County District Court.
During his comments to potential jurors, defense attorney Wyatt Skaggs shifted the blame for the killing to Henderson's co-defendant, Aaron McKinney, who was to be tried later.
''Russell Henderson was a witness to the beating of Matthew Shepard,'' Skaggs said.
He also warned jurors they would be seeing ''really, really graphic'' photos during the trial. As he said this, Matthew Shepard's mother, Judy, who was in the last row of the courtroom, slowly looked down.
By the lunch break, 10 prospective jurors had been dismissed for various reasons, including health and business issues. One woman was dismissed for child care reasons.
During the morning session, Henderson, 21, showed little emotion and occasionally looked at the pool of possible jurors seated in the courtroom's spectator section.
Henderson and the 21-year-old McKinney both face the death penalty if convicted in a case that has become a central focus for gay rights activists and others seeking stronger bias crime legislation.
Opening statements were scheduled for April 6.
Authorities said Henderson and McKinney, both high-school dropouts, posed as homosexuals and lured the 5-foot-2, 105-pound Shepard out of a bar last October and then kidnapped and beat him, leaving him lashed to a fence. Shepard, a political science major at the University of Wyoming, was not found for hours and died five days later at a hospital.
Despite the attention given the case, there were only a few spectators in the courtroom. Fenced-off areas for protesters outside were empty. Still, police stepped up patrols today outside the courthouse because anti-gay protesters and gay rights advocates have clashed repeatedly over the case.
Jim Osborn, who attended grade school with Shepard and remained his friend, stopped by the courthouse on his way to work.
''The most important thing is: My friend is dead,'' Osborn said. ''Matt was a person. He wasn't just a gay man. Nothing can bring him back.''
Asked about having to endure the trials of the two murder suspects, Osborn said, ''It's going to be very difficult.''
On Tuesday, Shepard's mother asked Congress and state legislatures to enact bias crime laws to deter future acts of violence.
''There is no guarantee that these laws will stop hate crimes from happening. But they can reduce them,'' Mrs. Shepard said at a news conference in Washington, D.C. ''They can help change the climate in this country, where some people feel it is okay to target specific groups of people and get away with it.''
Mrs. Shepard declined to discuss the trial, saying only that she and her husband ''want to allow justice to run its course.''
City spokesman Randy Vickers said police have set up fences to keep news reporters and demonstrators at bay, and access to the courthouse has been limited to one door, where two metal detectors have been installed.
The trial is expected to last five weeks.
Seven people were dismissed Thursday as jury selection continued in the trial of a man accused in the beating death of gay college student Matthew Shepard.
The selection process, which began Monday, is going on behind closed doors. Twenty-two of 71 potential jurors have been dismissed.
Russell Henderson, 21, is accused of posing as a homosexual to lure the 5-foot-2, 105-pound Shepard out of a bar Oct. 6. Henderson, along with Aaron McKinney, allegedly kidnapped and pistol-whipped Shepard and left him tied to a fence in the cold. The University of Wyoming student died five days later at a hospital.
Henderson's attorney said his client was only a witness and did not participate in Shepard's beating.
McKinney will be tried later. Both men could get the death penalty.
Phil Holt, a 52-year-old Greek literature professor at the University of Wyoming, said he was relieved after being excused from jury selection Thursday.
''Laramie's small enough that if you don't know the victim, you at least know people who do,'' he said. ''I know some people who knew Shepard. I know some people close to Henderson's family. It sent shock waves through the town.''
Opening statements are scheduled for April 6.
Fourteen people were dismissed Thursday as jury selection continued in the trial of a man accused of beating gay college student Matthew Shepard to death.
The selection process, which began Wednesday, is going on behind closed doors. Twenty-nine of 71 potential jurors have been dismissed.
Russell Henderson, 21, is accused of posing as a homosexual to lure the 5-foot-2, 105-pound Shepard out of a bar Oct. 6. Henderson, along with Aaron McKinney, allegedly kidnapped and pistol-whipped Shepard and left him tied to a fence in the cold. The University of Wyoming student died five days later at a hospital.
Henderson's attorney said his client was only a witness and did not participate in Shepard's beating.
McKinney will be tried later. Both men could get the death penalty.
Phil Holt, a 52-year-old Greek literature professor at the University of Wyoming, said he was relieved after being excused from jury selection Thursday.
''Laramie's small enough that if you don't know the victim, you at least know people who do,'' he said. ''I know some people who knew Shepard. I know some people close to Henderson's family. It sent shock waves through the town.''
Opening statements are scheduled for April 6.
The strategy for the first defendant on trial in the beating death of gay college student Matthew Shepard is clear: blame the co-defendant.
''Russell Henderson was a witness to the beating of Matthew Shepard,'' attorney Wyatt Skaggs told prospective jurors as Henderson's trial opened Wednesday.
Henderson stood by and watched while his friend Aaron McKinney brutally pistol-whipped Shepard, 21, and left him to die, Skaggs said.
''The defense will contend that Russell did not participate in the beating and did not share in the proceeds of the robbery,'' he said.
Individual questioning of potential jurors continued today behind closed doors. Officials said about 30 people would be questioned. Outside the courthouse, clearly marked protest areas were empty.
Both Henderson and McKinney are accused of first-degree murder, kidnapping and aggravated robbery in an attack that led to demands for stronger hate-crime laws around the country. McKinney's trial is scheduled for August.
Skaggs asked prospective jurors not to punish his client for the sake of redeeming this small town's image in the eyes of the nation.
''Are any of you here going to judge this case because you feel guilty and want to make a statement to the nation?'' he said. ''The press wants us to think that we are somehow responsible for what went on October 6.''
Prosecutor Cal Rerucha told the potential jurors that Shepard was ''not the same as you and I'' but that every individual should be treated equally under the Constitution.
Henderson and McKinney, both 21, face the death penalty if convicted. Authorities said the pair pretended to be homosexual and lured the 5-foot-2, 105-pound Shepard out of a downtown bar before they beat him and then left him lashed to a fence in a remote area east of town. The University of Wyoming student died five days later.
Shepard's mother, Judy, remained mostly impassive during the first day of jury selection.
By the end of the day, 15 of 71 prospective jurors in the first pool had been dismissed.
During the session, Skaggs put his arm around Henderson and told the jurors: ''This is not a defendant, not a person, but a real live living human being. Can all of you give him a fair shot?''
The names, addresses and employers of jurors and their spouses will be kept secret once the Unabomber murder trial gets under way with jury selection on November 12 in Sacramento, California.
Unabomber, the mail bomb terrorist, killed three people and injured 23 others between 1978 and 1995. The suspect, Theodore Kaczynski, a 55-year-old former University of California math instructor, is charged with four of the 16 attacks attributed to the Unabomber, two of which are fatal. He is also charged with a third fatal bombing in New Jersey.
U.S. District Judge Garland Burrell Jr. issued that order today in denying a news media motion to make juror names public, according to news reports.
Media Attorney Charity Kenyon argued there isn't enough evidence showing they will be harassed, endangered or influenced if the public and news media knew who they are.
But Burrell disagreed, saying that threats to witnesses in the 18-year Unabomber case "raise the specter that juror safety is potentially at risk."
He also said reports of harassment against witnesses -- submitted by attorneys on both sides of the case -- meet the test for juror anonymity spelled out by the 9th U.S. Circuit, which may be asked to overturn his order.
One report by federal defender Quin Denvir said the names and addresses of 18 supposed Unabomber witnesses were publicly distributed in July with the suggestion that they be contacted and scared as a game.
Burrell said the length of the trial, which is expected to last up to six months, makes it impractical to pursue alternatives to an anonymous jury, including sequestering jurors or moving the trial to another city.
The court has contacted about 600 prospects for the 12-member jury, with six alternates, so far.
Jury selection for the trial of suspected Unabomber Theodore Kaczynski is under way in Sacramento, California, with an unprecedented number of nearly 600 prospective jurors to be interviewed.
It is expected that several hundred prospects may be eliminated quickly because the trial and selection process could cause the trial to last for six months, including the jury courtroom selection, which is scheduled to begin November 12.
Attorneys are hopeful they can impanel 12 impartial jurors and six alternates to decide the fate of Kaczynski, a 55-year-old former college math instructor, who was arrested at a remote Montana cabin last year, United Press International reported.
He is charged in Sacramento with placing or mailing four bombs that killed computer store owner Hugh Scrutton in 1985 and timber lobbyist Gilbert Murray in 1995, and with injuring two scientists in the San Francisco Bay area and in Connecticut in 1993.
Kaczynski is also charged with another fatal bombing in a separate case in New Jersey.
U.S. District Court Judge Garland Burrell Jr. has ordered that jurors' identities in the Sacramento trial be kept secret, but said they won't be sequestered.
The following are major news items in leading U.S. newspapers today:
The Washington Post:
-- Chairmen of the House Budget and Ways and Means committees Sunday said they would oppose an emerging administration initiatives to offer Medicare benefits to younger retirees and predicted the proposal would be rejected by the Congress.
-- In their drive to win back the House in 1998, Democrats are counting on Latino distrust of the GOP to unseat Republican incumbents in San Diego and a half-dozen other districts nationwide.
The New York Times:
-- White House officials said President Bill Clinton wanted to put in place a plan to shore up social security, which is expected to run out money by about 2030.
-- Contending that he had no further place in Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu's right-wing coalition, Foreign Minister David Levy resigned Sunday, leaving the embattled government with a razor-thin majority in parliament.
The Wall Street Journal:
-- Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan broached the sensitive subject of stock prices in a speech, saying that "very rapid asset price declines" can be "a virulently negative force in the economy." Still, the Fed chief didn't predict a market plunge or even comment on its current level.
USA Today:
-- Treasury Secretary Robert Rubin Sunday warned Congress against counting on a federal budget surplus, calling talk of tax cuts "very dangerous."
-- Lawyers are set to make opening statements Monday in trial of Unabomber suspect Theodore Kaczynski.
The UNABOMber trial is getting under way today with jury selection in Sacramento, California.
FBI agents arrested Theodore Kaczynski 19 months ago at his cabin in rural Montana following one of the most intensive manhunts in U.S. history.
Prosecutors say they have a great deal of evidence against the 55-year-old former math professor, who's charged with four of the 16 bombings blamed on the notorious UNABOMber, according to news reports.
Defense lawyers are expected to try to raise reasonable doubt in the minds of jurors that the hermit is the same man who placed or mailed bombs that killed Sacramento computer store owner Hugh Scrutton in 1985, and timber industry lobbyist Gilbert Murray 10 years later.
Legal experts say Kaczynski's best hope is escaping the death penalty in the second phase of the trial, if he's convicted, on grounds that he has had lifelong mental problems.
In the first phase, jurors must determine if Kaczynski is the bomber who terrorized the country for 17 years, beginning in 1978.
U.S. District Judge Garland Burrell Jr. plans to call one dozen prospective jurors a day, beginning today, until he has a pool of at least 64.
At that point, attorneys will question juror candidates and use dozens of preemptory challenges to exclude those they consider unfit. Burrell said he'll form the panel when he has 12 jurors and six alternates.
Unabomber suspect Theodore J. Kaczynski pleaded innocent today via video to charges he sent the mail bomb killing an advertising executive exactly two years ago.
Kaczynski's plea from California was made through a live hookup to the federal courthouse in Newark, New jersey, where Judge Dickinson R. Debevoise presided in a courtroom, The Associated Press reported.
Among those present was Susan Mosser, whose 50-year-old husband, Thomas, was killed when he opened a package containing a bomb on December 10, 1994, in his northern New Jersey home.
In Sacramento, California, where Kaczynski has been jailed since early summer, the U.S. Marshals Service moved Kaczynski to the county public defender's office for the cross-country arraignment.
Kaczynski, the former Berkeley mathematics professor, has pleaded innocent to four Unabomber attacks that killed two people in Sacramento.
Prosecutors have said they hope to decide before January whether to seek the death penalty, which Kaczynski could also face for the two California bombing deaths.
Debevoise also heard arguments on a defense request to transfer the New Jersey case to Sacramento, where a November trial date has been set. Kaczynski's lawyers are seeking a single trial there on all the Unabomber charges.
Kaczynski, 54, was arrested April 3 at his cabin in Lincoln, Montana, and is being held without bail.
Federal authorities believe he used bombs to kill three people and injure 23 others between 1978 and 1995.
U.S. Attorney General Janet Reno has authorized prosecutors to seek the death penalty for Unabomber suspect Theodore Kaczynski, Justice Department official and a lawyer for the Kaczynski family said Thursday.
In a statement, Washington, D.C. attorney Anthony Bisceglie said he had informed Kaczynski's brother David and his mother Wanda of Reno's decision to authorize prosecutors to seek the death penalty in the case.
Kaczynski, a 54-year-old former mathematics professor, is accused of being the Unabomber, who killed three people and injured 23 during a campaign against technology between 1978 and 1995.
David and Wanda turned in Theodore Kaczynski last year after authorities had mounted an unsuccessful 18-year search for the Unabomber.
The family argued that other families in the future might be reluctant to turn in relatives if a death sentence were imposed in this case.
Justice Department sources said Reno agreed to prosecutors' request and had authorized the death penalty in the case, and said the decision was expected to be disclosed in a court filing later on Thursday in Sacramento, California, where the case is pending.
Kaczynski, arrested in Montana in April 1996, has pleaded not guilty to the Sacramento charges accusing him of four bomb attacks, in which two people were killed.
He faces a later trial in Newark, New Jersey, on federal charges that he mailed a package bomb that killed advertising executive Thomas Mosser in New Jersey. Kaczynski has also pleaded innocent in the case.
A federal judge has rejected a motion to exclude key evidence from the Sacramento, California trial in November of UNABOMber suspect Theodore J. Kaczynski.
Kaczynski is the suspect of the mailing-bomb terrorist who has killed three people and injured 23 others in the 18 years. He was arrested April last year.
U.S. District Judge Garland Burrell Jr. says Kaczynski's constitutional rights wouldn't be violated if his potentially incriminating journals, notes and other private writing are used against him.
The 55-year-old former mathematics instructor's defense team argued that admitting the documents would infringe on his rights of privacy and protection from self-incrimination. Burrell rejected a motion on the same issue earlier.
In his latest ruling Monday, he said the defense argument applies only "when the government compels an individual to incriminate himself," which he says didn't happen in Kaczynski's case, news reports said.
The evidence includes journals that prosecutors say contain admissions to all 16 bombings attributed to the UNABOMber during a 18-year reign of terror that began in 1978.
Kaczynski is charged in Sacramento with four of those bombings, which killed two men and wounded others. He also is charged with a third fatal bombing in New Jersey.
Lawyers for UNABOMber suspect Theodore Kaczynski are asking for special measures to find northern California jurors who aren't biased against him by news coverage.
Kaczynski, the 55-year-old former university math instructor is suspected of being the UNABOMber, the mailbomb terrorist who killed three people and injured 23 others in 17 years before his arrest last year. The UNABOMber was so named because his early targets were universities and airlines.
Attorneys Quin Denvir and Judy Clarke have asked that prospective jurors for the November 12 trial in Sacramento, California, be picked from within the Eastern District, which includes Sacramento and 22 other counties, according to news reports.
Their 1,600-page motion also asks the pool to be taken from licensed drivers rather than voter registration lists typically used in federal trials.
Denvir and Clarke want prospective jurors to complete detailed questionnaires about their knowledge of the case and their feelings about the death penalty, which the government is seeking against Kaczynski.
The attorneys say the 17-year case has prompted more news coverage than any other in history, including 341 New York Times articles between June 1993 and May 1997.
Kaczynski is charged in Sacramento with four of 16 bombings, which killed two men and wounded two others. He is charged with a third death in New Jersey.
Prosecutors say they expect to take up to four weeks to present evidence showing that Kaczynski is the UNABOMber.
The judge in the trial of Unabomber suspect Theodore Kaczynski turned down a series of defense requests for revisions in jury selection.
In an order filed late Friday afternoon and distributed by a court document service today, U.S. District Judge Garland Burrell Jr. in Sacramento, California, said defense lawyers Quin Denvir and Judy Clarke had failed to prove the necessity of expanding the jury pool beyond the list of registered voters, media reports said.
Kaczynski, 55, is awaiting trial on November 12 on a 10-count federal indictment charging him with four of the 16 bombings attributed to the Unabomber -- a name stemming from the bomber's early victims, which included universities, airlines and other technology-related targets. The mail bomb terrorist killed three people and injured 23 others in 18 years.
The former college math instructor is charged separately in New Jersey in connection with a fifth bombing.
Kaczynski, who was arrested in April last year, has pleaded innocent to all charges. If convicted, he could receive the death penalty.
The defense had asked that lists of licensed drivers, as well as lists of registered voters, be used to broaden the pool of ury.
Burrell said the request had to be rejected because the defense had failed to show that using the voter rolls the impact of pretrial news coverage.
Authorities have moved UNABOMber suspect Theodore Kaczynski from Sacramento County Jail to a federal prison 20 miles southeast of Oakland in California.
Media reports said Kaczynski's lawyers requested the transfer, which was completed Wednesday, 10 weeks before his trial begins in Sacramento.
Officials said the 55-year-old former college mathematics instructor had complained of noise in the jail, although they declined to say if that was the reason for the transfer.
Lt. Dan Lewis, the jail's executive director, said the Federal Correctional Institution near Pleasanton holds a higher number of white collar criminals and may be quieter.
Kacznski is expected to be returned to Sacramento for his trial on November 12. He is charged in four bombings that killed two men and wounded two others.
Explosive devices placed or mailed by the notorious UNABOMber killed three people and injured 23 during a 17-year reign of terror that began in 1978. The terrorist is so dubbed because his first targets included universities and airlines.
Kaczynski was arrested in a cabin in Montana in April last year.
